<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11399</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Food &amp; Drink: Recipes to stir the pulses - Cookery /
Vegetarianism has come of age
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIPPA DAVENPORT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
VEGETARIANISM has come of age at last. Gone are the deadly-serious pulse and
wholegrain menus that lay like lead on the stomach and depressed the spirit
of those who did not worship at the altar of the health food religion.
New-wave vegetarianism is concerned not with cant but with the pleasures of
good eating without meat. Red meat, that is: fish remains on the menu for
many and game and poultry for some. The new style is generous of spirit,
full of joie de vivre, rich in textures, bursting with fresh tastes, often
robust but also capable of lovely subtleties.
The most exciting new exponent is a young cook called Annie Bell, whose
first book has just been published: A Feast of Flavours, subtitled The New
Vegetarian Cuisine (Bantam Pounds 14.99).
Bell is a talented and instinctive cook, no stickler for the confines of
tradition but breaking new ground happily with her own menu structures. Her
meals are designed as 'a series of little courses that complement and mingle
with each other' rather than what my husband calls the obligatory
three-piece suite: first course, main course and pudding.
The idea is appealing, but I am not convinced entirely that some of her
menus are practicable. It is all very well for caterers and chefs (she is a
caterer) to continue working behind the scenes as a meal progresses, and to
deliver an extra little dish here and there. But most home cooks, surely,
want to hang up their aprons when the doorbell rings and spend the evening
with those gathered round the table.
Perhaps I am just too old a dog to learn new tricks. Certainly, some of her
menus made me salivate as I read them, and they include many triumphs. Her
cooking style, and the way she combines ingredients, show a fine
understanding of, and respect for, the raw materials.
She seems fond of many of the ingredients I love: lemons, aubergines,
fennel, spinach, globe artichokes, caramelised onions, pears, pine nuts, red
peppers, basil and rocket. Like many who eschew meat, she displays a
weakness for sweet things, particularly chocolate.
There are some lovely pastry recipes: phyllo tartlets filled with parsley
puree and grilled courgettes; scallops and artichoke bottoms in puff pastry
with a puree of roasted garlic; and a rhubarb tart that throws all
pre-conceived notions of rhubarb tart out the window.
Some of the dishes that attract me most are beautifully simple: wilted
spinach with hazelnut oil and pomegranates; wild rice and fennel salad;
peaches baked on brioche with a sabayon sauce; and the two I quote below.
Her recipe for stuffed peppers is far and away the easiest I know to prepare
 -and it is one of the best stuffed pepper dishes I have eaten.
Here is a vegetarian cook who is not shy of butter, cream or eggs. She does
not once suggest using wholewheat pastry or brown rice. Indeed, her book is
very nearly a pulse-free zone (Le Puy lentils are served with mussels,
tapenade toast and quennelles of tomato mousse) and there is a notable
absence of the quiche-style cliches that pass as vegetarian options in some
circles.
This is happily hedonistic vegetarianism. The title is apt. Annie Bell has
delivered a feast.
PEPPERS ROASTED WITH CHERRY TOMATOES AND HONEY (serves 6)
Luscious and brilliantly simple - I wish I had thought up this recipe
myself. Bell advises that the peppers are best served warm, and suggests
using a mixture of red and yellow vegetables to create a harlequin effect.
Ingredients: 3 red or yellow peppers;  3/4 lb red or yellow cherry tomatoes;
3 teaspoons honey; olive oil; flat-leafed parsley to garnish.
Method: Cut the peppers in half from stem to base, leaving the green stalk
attached. Remove the seeds and pith. Halve the cherry tomatoes and fill the
pepper cavities with them. Dribble over the honey and a little olive oil.
Season with salt and pepper and bake in a very hot oven for 20-30 minutes
until the peppers are wilted and patched with brown. Serve garnished with
chopped parsley.
As the peppers cook, the juice from the tomatoes combines with the juice
from the peppers, merging with the honey and olive oil into a heavenly
liquid which demands that a loaf of good bread is at hand.
CHAR-GRILLED FENNEL WITH FRESH HERBED CHEESE (serves 6)
Ingredients: 3 fennel bulbs; 1 lb ricotta or fresh cream cheese; 2
dessertspoons finely-chopped chervil, chives, parsley, fennel, lovage; good
Italian olive oil; lemon juice; 6 slices coarse-textured white bread,
char-grilled on a stove-top griddle just before serving.
Method: Combine the cheese and herbs in a bowl. Shape the mixture into a
square or cylindrical log about 7in long, cover, and chill until required.
Quarter the fennel bulbs by first cutting them in half vertically, slicing
between the shoots, then cutting each half in half, again vertically. Nick
off any excess root, leaving enough to hold the layers together.
Steam the fennel for 5-7 minutes. Pat it dry and brush with olive oil.
Season and char-grill for 20-30 minutes until it starts to char in patches.
Squeeze lemon juice over the fennel. Serve it with slices of the herbed
cheese, olive oil trickled over and a sprinkling of salt, plus the
char-grilled bread.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11400</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Food &amp; Drink: Appetisers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS LANDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Warning Talbot calculated head depth wrong IF, like me, you dread the weekly
visit to the supermarket - all that queuing and heavy shopping bags - then
you will be pleased to hear, if you live in London, that The Food Ferry
Company has come to the rescue. If you order Pounds 20 or more worth of
goods - not difficult these days  - it will deliver your shopping for an
additional Pounds 2.50 (Pounds 3.50 for those with an 081 telephone number).
Prices look fair - about 5 percent more than the local supermarket. Ring
071-498-0827 for a loose leaf directory of more than 1200 product lines
(which is updated regularly) and then you can order your groceries on the
phone, by fax, or even by remote control (if you have Westminster Cable TV.)
The Food Ferry Company will be on your doorstep that same day, and it will
deliver between 5.30 pm and 9 pm. Lucinda de la Rue
ANY visitor to the West Country or Bath in particular will benefit from the
fact that Stephen Ross has returned to the kitchen.
Ross made his name at Popjoys in Bath in the 1970s, and then at Homewood
Park, one of the most successful country house hotels of the 1980s.
After selling Homewood Park he and Penny, his wife, opened The Queensbury
Hotel in Russel Street, Bath (tel: 0225-447928, fax 0225-446065) as a small,
24-bedroom, comfortable hotel which intentionally did not have a restaurant.
Now he has succumbed and opened The Olive Tree restaurant in the hotel,
where the name and menu reflect his enthusiasm for Mediterranean cooking.
Prawn and cous-cous salad, Provencal fish soup, a wild mushroom souffle
omelette and a choice of risottos are just some of the dishes.
Open lunch and dinner, Tuesday-Saturday; about Pounds 18 for three courses
and coffee. Set price lunch is Pounds 12.50.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11401</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Food &amp; Drink: Takeaway porcupine - Street Food
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HILARY DE BOERR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NGUYEN VAN CHUONG leant over the table and proceeded to break up the fish in
the broth with his chop sticks. 'The stomach is for you,' my guide said, 'a
Vietnamese delicacy.'
Something, thankfully, was lost in the translation, I later discovered. It
was not stomach but bladder. It was not unpleasant, having taken on the
flavour of the soup. And even if it had been, the delicious tastes of the
juicy white fish itself and the accompanying spicy prawns would soon have
made up for it.
That first meal in Ho Chi Minh City (formerly Saigon) - at a kerbside
restaurant with as many cats as patrons - was just one of many based around
soup. Noodle soup with quails eggs for breakfast, rice spaghetti soup with
pork for lunch, spicy beef soup with noodles and broth for dinner.
The soups - a national dish of Vietnam  - provide a hearty and readily
available meal. In every village, town or city in southern Vietnam,
privately-run road side stalls and cafes provide the Vietnamese equivalent
of fast food. A plateful of fresh herbs and vegetables to put in the soup -
like mint, coriander and bean sprouts  - a few chillis, and a pot of tea
make it a meal. A Coke or beer can increase the price of lunch almost
six-fold to about 60p.
Much of Vietnam's daily life takes place on the street. Vendors hawk rice
squares wrapped in banana leaves, soya bean cakes, carved pineapple pieces
and bread rolls.
One of the joys of Vietnam is the abundance of seasonal fruits and
vegetables. There are the usual - such as watermelon, mangoes, strawberries,
oranges, avocados and artichokes - and the less familiar; jackfruit, a
pendulous affair the size of a football containing thick perfumed orange
petals; and muop, a long pale green vegetable, the flavour of which reminded
one diner of wet swimming towels left rolled up for several days.
Much of it comes from Dalat in the Central Highlands, a temperate area
famous as a retreat during colonial rule. Early in the morning, farmers
bring their fresh fruit, vegetables and flowers to Dalat's central market.
Splashing out in Vietnam means spending maybe Pounds 3 at one of the big
hotels in Ho Chi Minh City. The Rex Hotel's rooftop bar offers a wonderful
view of the city - and a pleasant escape from the noise and heat of the
streets below. Work your way through the delicious and refreshing fresh
fruit juices - pineapple, mango, strawberry, orange and even avocado.
Experience shows that it is best to order food at least half an hour before
hunger strikes. When it finally arrives, the prawn and pork salad is
mouthwatering - a huge dish packed full of prawns seasoned with lemon grass
and a basil-like herb called rau ram. If the waiter remembers, it might also
be accompanied by nuoc cham, a fermented fish sauce mixed with sugar, lime
juice, vinegar, shallots, garlic and carrot. Nuoc mam, the concentrated
version, accompanies most Vietnamese meals on one form or another. It is to
the Vietnamese what soy sauce is to the Chinese.
Vietnam's long coastline and the mighty Mekong River mean the country is
well served for seafood and fish. At the dinner table, prawns come wrapped
in rice rolls (cha gio), moulded on sugar cane sticks (chao tom), or
battered and fried. Deep-fried soft-shelled crabs, which can be eaten whole,
can be rolled in lettuce with fresh mint leaves and dipped in nuoc cham or
chilli sauces.
Adventurous palates are well served in Vietnam. Cobra, python, porcupine,
frog and bats can be found in specialty restaurants. The Rex Hotel serves up
sea slug with pig's trotters, while at the Seri Hotel in Bao Loc - a pretty
town on the way to the Central Highlands  - underemployed waiters will bring
you sea leech with deer's leg for about Pounds 1.30.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11402</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Food &amp; Drink: A Bordeaux worth watching - The little-known
Cotes de Francs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EDMUND PENNING-ROWSELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN ALL but name, the Cotes de Francs are part of the Cotes de Castillon
plateau, a mere six miles to the north of Castillon-a-Batailleon on the
Dordogne. To the east they look across to the Dordogne department. On the
west lies the satellite St Emilion commune of Puissegin.
With only 500 hectares of vineyards, 20 estates, a small 40 member
co-operative, and an average production of 20,000 hl, it is nearly the
smallest of the Bordeaux AC districts centred on red wine. There are only
three villages, almost hamlets: Francs, St Cibard and tiny Tayac.
Until recently there was a fourth, Les Salles, which included the prominent
Ch Belcier, owned by the Massif insurance company; but in 1989 Castillon
secured the right to drop the word Bordeaux from its label, Les Salles
joined it, and Belcier voluntarily followed it. A mistake, say some of the
Francs growers - who tend to regard themselves as a little superior to their
neighbours.
Yet the Cotes de Francs came to the fore only recently. Although an ancient
vineyard area, it suffered the same near-oblivion as the Cotes de from the
phylloxera era. Its appellation, Bordeaux Cotes de Francs, was granted in
1967, when it chose to retain Bordeaux on the label in the belief that, in
the ever-growing world of wine, association with Bordeaux established a
certain identity. Although similar to Cotes de Castillon wines, with the
same clay-limestone soil and Merlot-Cabernet Franc-Cabernet Sauvignon vine
composition, there is rivalry between the two.
Whereas the much larger Castillon is content to be included, by the Conseil
Interprofessionel in Bordeaux, as one of the Cotes group such as Bourg and
Blaye - one class up on generic Bordeaux  - Francs claims that it is remote
from these bigger districts, and that its wines are different. (This is
certainly true.) It says it is really part of the Libournais.
Traditionally it was, with wines similar to St Emilion, as in adjoining
Puissegin. In time, it hopes to persuade the authorities to accept this
alliance.
Nevertheless, the development of the Cotes - described by one vineyard
proprietor as 'the last revolution in Bordeaux' - has been unusual, a state
of affairs mainly set down to the distinguished Belgian wine merchant family
of Thienpont. The head of the family, Georges Thienpont, had bought in 1924
the leading Pomerol estate of Vieux Ch Certan, still owned by the family. In
1946 his son, also Georges, bought a large mixed farm in St Cibard, and in
1980, on the clay-limestone plateau, he planted 30 ha of the common blend of
50 per cent Merlot, 30 per cent Cabernet-Franc and the rather large
percentage of 20 per cent Cabernet-Sauvignon in the hitherto neglected
vineyard of Puygueraud, which is now run by his son, Francois. This was
followed, in 1984 - by planting in the same village  - 10 ha of La Claverie
and, in Francs in 1988, 5 ha of Charmes-Godard - both of them in the hands
of another son, Nicholas.
Moreover, in 1985 Francois Thienpont persuaded two of his friends, Dominique
Hebrard, son of the former director of Cheval-Blanc, and Hubert de Bouard,
son of the owner of Angelus also in St Emilion, to buy for a modest sum the
large, ancient semi-ruined Chateau de Francs and its ill looked-after
vineyard, planting 30 ha of Merlot (60 per cent) and 20 per cent apiece of
the two Cabernets. The cellars have been restored, but the boarded-up
chateau awaits a buyer.
Finally, the migration from St Emilion was followed by Patrick Valette,
whose father owns Pavie, to 11 ha of La Prade vineyard in St Cibard. So a
good deal of viticultural experience has been injected into the tiny
district. (It is only fair to add that excellent wine is also made elsewhere
here: for example in Moulin-la-Pitie and Massau, while the co-op produces a
superior, pal-matured Duc de Seignade brand)
Another speciality of the Cotes is an AC which includes white wines, sweet
as well as dry, neither of which is allowed in the Cotes de Castillon nor,
of course in the large St Emilion area. So far, only Francs and
Charmes-Godard have produced a dry white wine, for the Semillon and
Muscadelle grapes. The 1990 was the first vintage produced in very small
quantities: aromatic, oaky wines of considerable body and flavour, very much
on the lines of the 'new wave' dry white Bordeaux. The sweet whites, only to
be expected in very fine years, will be awaited with considerable interest.
The red wines are deep in colour, often rich on the nose, and concentrated
on the palate: real mouthfuls of wine. The leading vintages are '83, 85',
'86, '88 and '89. When in bottle, the '90 may well be exceptional.
Puygueraud is what the French like to call the 'locomotive' of the district.
It's reputation began with the '85, although, surprisingly, its '83, (from
only three-year-old vines) was remarkably successful. The vintage probably
at its peak is the '85.
Of the wines I sampled on my recent visit, the '86 of Francs (its first
proper vintage) had lots of body, and so did the '88, along with
Moulin-la-Pitie and Puygueraud. The La Prade '89 had an elegant nose and
long flavour, though the Francs, because of its prolific Merlot, was softer.
The '89 is now widely on offer there but, like the '88, is not to be opened
for at least another two or three years, because they both are quite tannic.
On British lists, the Cotes de Francs are even rarer than the Cotes de
Castillons; few Bordelais or British merchants visit them in any depth. But
with the high-flyers of the Medoc, and St Emilion increasingly expensive,
demand should rise for the relatively inexpensive, stylish Cotes de Francs
wines - although with nearly half still sold in bulk to the Bordeaux trade,
and thus losing its identity in blends, there is some way to go. Much will
depend on the enterprising immigrant proprietors.
On lists now, Stokes Fine Wines, London, SW9 (tel:071-582-9265) offer Francs
'88 at Pounds 84 a case; Tanners of Shrewsbury (0743-232400) have Lauriol
'88 at Pounds 4.28 a bottle; Haynes, Hanson &amp; Clark, London SW8
(071-736-7878) list La Prade '89 (Pounds 55.80 a case); and Lay &amp; Wheeler of
Colchester (0206-764446) offer La Prade '90 ex-cellars when bottled, at
Pounds 43.92 a dozen - a duty-paid price of about Pounds 66 a dozen bottles.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11403</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Food &amp; Drink: Matured to the sound of bagpipes - Giles
MacDonogh tipples malt whisky at two Scottish distilleries
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GILES MACDONOGH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE FIRST commercially marketed malt whisky crossed Hadrian's Wall in the
early 1960s and, since then, a further dimension has been added to the
drinker's world.
That trickle has turned into a stream, with roughly 100 different single
malt whiskies now on offer, breeding a new race of enthusiasts who go about
collecting new releases with the same passion as children used to spot
trains.
To the best of my knowledge, none of the commercial blends has suffered at
the hands of single malt whisky; indeed, almost all the distilleries are
owned by companies possessing at least one branded spirit. Now we can
approach whisky almost as we enjoy varieties of good wine.
I should be happy to see more. Many distilleries remain closed as a result
of rationalisations which took place in the industry a generation ago. This
is particularly true of the whisky stills on the islands, which were too
remote to have even a tourist industry to support their continuation.
Scotland's smallest distillery, Edradour, near the old spa-town of
Pitlochry, has known how to benefit from the streams of visitors who visit
the Highlands every year, and now about half of its production is sold from
the cellar door.
Edradour is owned by Campbell Distillers, now part of the Pernod-Ricard
Group. Its blended whiskies include Clan Campbell and House of Lords. Only
about 20 per cent of Edradour, however, is purloined for the blends, the
rest is sold as a 10-year-old single malt. Only about 2,000 cases are made
annually on the distillery's two small stills. Everything is small scale in
the buildings which cluster on either side of the Edradour spring.
Since 1966 all the whisky has been run off into casks formerly housing
oloroso sherry. By 1996 this 'sherrying' process will be complete, and the
Edradour, like the more famous Macallan, will be a 100 per cent sherry-wood
malt.
Campbell Distillers' other malt, Aberlour, produces more than 50 times as
much whisky as Edradour. Although it is only a stone's throw from the Spey
it has little of Edradour's charm. The first licensed distillery on the site
burnt down at the turn of the century and the new buildings are dour and
functional. The only historical charm is provided by St Dunstan's (or St
Drostan's) Well, where - according to legend - heathen chieftains were
baptised.
If Aberlour looks modern, Kenny Fraser, head 'brewer', is adamant that
nothing has changed in the whisky itself: 'We still make whisky as we did 50
years ago, although it's a little more sophisticated,' he says. Computers
now watch over the process from the steeping of the grist or milled, malted
barley to the transformation of the sweet, porridgy wort into beery wash
prior to distillation. The wash is distilled twice, then run off into cask
and left to mature.
'Mature in peace' is what I nearly wrote, but Kenny serenades the casks with
his antique bagpipes; something perhaps more pleasant for Scotch whisky than
it would be for most people living on the other side of the border.
Kenny arrived in 1970, so all the Aberlour currently on the market was
reared in this way. I am happy to say that he put down his pipes in order to
put me through a tasting of Aberlours and Edradours at different stages of
their development from the new-run spirit to the 1969. I have always found
new whisky rather attractive with its smells of pears, raspberries and
bananas. It is hard to tell that it is not fresh, fruit schnapps until you
taste the cereal character on the palate.
About 10 years ago, malt distillers began to re-use Bourbon casks to house
Scotch whisky. Now malts fall into two main styles: those which derive their
mellowness from years in Kentucky oak and those which absorb a sweet,
raisiny character from ageing in old oloroso casks from Jerez in Spain.
The straight, 10-year-old Aberlour has a strong nutty, buttery character
with a bouquet of raisins and dried apricots which marks it out as a
sherry-wood whisky. Edradour is rather sweet, with a taste of honey and
walnuts; a real after-dinner whisky. More recently Aberlour has released two
superb 21-year-old whiskies: a 1969 and a 1970. These are perfect
illustrations of the two schools.
The '69 is all sherry-wood and smells like rich fruitcake with a hint of
smokiness. More of a whisky-drinker's whisky is the '70, the first made by
Kenny Fraser. This was housed in Kentucky casks, giving it a nutty, cereal
character with a porridge-like smell recalling the wort. These are two
whiskies which will make admirable additions to a collection.
Information: Edradour is open to visitors all year. Tel: 0796-2095. Around
3,600 bottles of the numbered 1969 Aberlour will be sold from duty-free
shops only. Some of the 8,000 bottles of the Aberlour 1970 will be available
from specialist merchants.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11404</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / How To Spend It: Blazer furnishes its one-off image
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LUCIA VAN DER POST
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BLAZER has always been one of those cult stores whose influence was
infinitely more important than its size. Started by David Krantz (who now is
looking after his newest baby, the mail order clothing company Racing
Green), from one shop in Golders Green in north London in 1979, it is now
part of the Storehouse Group; it has 24 branches all over the UK and a niche
in the hearts and minds of many a snappy man about town.
Its strength has been its commitment to understated, classic clothes of high
quality with a distinctly English look - navy wool blazers, crisp Oxford
shirts, cotton chinos. According to Robert Jenkins, its new young managing
director, Blazer, largely because of its quality image, has not been as
seriously affected by the recession as some more prosaic lines. Nonetheless,
he says: 'I wouldn't have liked to have lived through the last two years
without the backing of Storehouse.'
Given the brief by his masters 'to make it gallop' he felt he had to do
something. The first thing was to initiate some qualitative market research
which revealed that the typical Blazer man reads the FT (wise fellow), The
Times and The Economist. He also prefers Virgin Atlantic Airways to any
other, takes two holidays a year (one skiing in the winter, one long-haul),
drives a Golf GTI or a BMW and is likely to live in Fulham, Hampstead or
Richmond.
It also revealed that as customers' spending power decreased, fashion had
increasingly to compete with other things (like the skiing, the long-haul
holiday and the cars), in particular with reasonably priced one-off design
products, which were doing surprisingly well in an otherwise gloomy
retailing scene.
It also emerged that 26 per cent of the adult population in Britain bought
at least one example of British crafts during last year, and that the same
number visited at least one crafts exhibition. From there Jenkins developed
an idea of linking the Blazer shops with individual, distinctive, one-off
craft pieces.
Having discovered that his customers disliked frequent sales ('it undermined
their confidence in the product') he decided to generate interest and
excitement in his shops by commissioning a piece of furniture from several
distinguished designers. Each piece would feature prominently in one of the
stores, and a brochure was produced showing each designer (almost all of
whom were already Blazer customers) wearing some of the clothes.
The exhibition is shortly to finish, so anybody interested should hurry
along to their nearest Blazer branch where every one of these pieces can be
bought. Even if it has already been sold the shop can link designer and
potential customer or client so other pieces in similar vein can be bought
or commissioned.
In the meantime, the splendid brochure shows Designer Man looking very
creative in a series of Blazer clothing, reaching out to creative directors,
art directors, film directors, interior designers and showing that there is
more Blazer than mere Yuppiedom.
Malcolm Temple, a painter turned furniture maker, for instance, is shown
wearing a pinstriped suit teamed with a T-shirt and grey flannels and a
classic blazer with a two-buttoned woollen polo shirt instead of a shirt and
tie. Matthew Hilton looks arty and relaxed in jeans and informally formal in
grey flannels, a blazer and a white polo-shirt.
So far this link between the shops and creative design looks to be very
fruitful. Customers are interested, the designers have had some new
customers and Robert Jenkins is already wondering what he will do next -
paintings, sculpture? It will be something, you can be sure.
The promotion is currently on at Blazer shops in London in Derry Street,
Kensington; 33a King's Road, SW3; Long Acre, Covent Garden WC2; New Bond
Street, W1; 170 Oxford Street W1. Out of London: 8-10 Old Bond Street, Bath;
31a-32 East Street, Brighton; 10 High Street, Nottingham; 15 Hill Street,
Richmond, Surrey; Above Bath Street, Southampton.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11405</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / How To Spend It: Crafted by design
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LUCIA VAN DER POST
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
I HAVE always suspected that many people nurture a lingering affection for
things one-off, individual and quirky, but I have had no proof until now.
Elsewhere on the page, I report how Robert Jenkins of the Blazer chain was
fascinated to discover that some 26 per cent of the population had bought a
craft item in the past year, and the same number had visited at least one
exhibition. I am not a bit surprised.
Whenever I go to them, I am always bowled over at the skills, the
enterprise, the sheer creative talent on view. I am also nearly always
amazed at the prices - how little each craftsman must be earning per working
hour.
Very often, what they do is grossly underpriced - women, in particular,
often do not cost their time properly, and men and women alike are often
afraid of losing a customer for fear of costing realistically.
Not everything at craft fairs is wonderful and not everything will be to
your taste. But at the best of the fairs, I guarantee that anybody who has
never made the effort to go will be delighted by much of what they see.
One of the best of them - Creative Eye  - is on at Chelsea Old Town Hall,
King's Road, London SW3. There are about 100 exhibitors ranging from
toymakers to jewellers, textile designers, glassblowers and ceramicists.
Everybody there has been through the needle's eye test of scrutiny by the
Crafts Council, so standards are guaranteed to be high.
Although almost every kind of craft is there, this year seems to have
encouraged a special emphasis on clocks and time-pieces. Marianne Forrest's
wall clock (photographed here) - a marvellous piece, half useful, half
sculptural - is just one of the many pieces. She also has a silver pocket
watch, La Poche, darkened by oxidation, with bright gold detailing and
inlay.
Two jewellers, Kim Ellwood and Mike Abbott have combined to produce some
hand-made, steel wall clocks which start at Pounds 40, Desmond Ryan has done
some in wood while Louise Slater uses plastic laminates.
The exhibition is on view, April 30-May 4, at Chelsea Old Town Hall, between
10am and 6pm. The Pounds 5 entry fee includes a colour catalogue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11406</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / How To Spend It: Inspired Indonesia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LUCIA VAN DER POST
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
YOU MIGHT have thought there was hardly a corner of the world that had not
been plundered of its most vibrant, charming, useful or desirable features.
In London, the wares and cultural icons of most countries are displayed in
one store or another. Liberty has, however, managed to find somewhere that
manages to spring a few surprises: Indonesia.
Of course, such fabrics as the beautiful batik and ikat have been available
in Britain (although in limited form) for some years, and anyone interested
in design will be familiar with their rich patterns. But Liberty has managed
to assemble a vast collection.
There are rare old batiks from the royal courts; expensive, naturally, and
collectable. There are traditional batik designs in blue and white which can
be bought by the length as well as a range designed specially for Liberty by
Linda Garland, who uses old pieces of batik as her inspiration (all
somewhere between Pounds 8.95 and Pounds 9.95 a metre). The fabrics also
have been made into throws, cushions, and used as coverings for books, boxes
and other daily objects.
Liberty's buyers must have had a high old time putting this collection
together. They travelled into the heart of Java to find furniture which has
survived generations.
There are benches made from huge slabs of teak; tables and armchairs hewn
from a single piece of wood; wooden chests; beds on wheels; teak plates and
bowls; and highly-decorative painted pieces. There are marvellous carved and
painted small trunks - at around Pounds 95 each, and about 2 1/2 by 1 1/2
ft, they would make good coffee or lamp tables.
There is a very small collection of the highly sought-after Javanese
furniture made by the Dutch East India Import Company (now known as VSO
Company furniture, and very collectable because of its rarity). For example,
a large cupboard - about 8 ft tall by 4 ft wide, and useful for storing
clothes or textiles - sells for about Pounds 995, while another matching
pair is Pounds 1,500.
Less expensively, there is Balinese silver which, with prices starting as
low as Pounds 10, is excellent value.
Those who have been to Indonesia will enjoy the exhibition for the memories
it revives, as well as the beauty of the wares. Those who have not are
likely to be charmed by this glimpse of another very different world. I
suspect that few will come away without buying something.
The 'Indonesia' exhibition is in the basement of Liberty, Regent Street,
London W1, until May 7.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11407</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Travel: The six-dollar sunrise - Nicholas Woodsworth stays
near the Nile in a sauce-stained hotel with a wonky lavatory but brilliant
views
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS WOODSWORTH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
6am. The Abu Simbel Hotel is not a luxury establishment. In high season you
take what you can get when you fly into Aswan in the middle of the night
without a reservation.
My bed sags. I cannot sit on the toilet without banging my knees into the
sink. Outside my room a morose floor attendant sits in a ragged turban and
long robe like a mummy propped in a chair. The lift is operated by touching
two bare wires together. In the dimly-lit, sauce-stained dining room
downstairs, ancient and cadaverous waiters stagger about like the cast from
Night of the Living Dead. What can you expect for Dollars 6 a night?
What you do not expect is a room with a view worth a million dollars. I had
never believed in the phrase 'breath-taking' until I pulled back my curtains
a minute ago. Suddenly, the room was filled with scintillating light. The
view was a vision of luminous clarity. In the delta far to the north,
Mediterranean winter storms are battering Alexandria, and Cairo is wet and
grey. But here on the Upper Nile the air is different. Bathed in early
morning sunlight, Africa is startlingly close and beautiful.
Outside my window the Nile flows blue and silver-stippled through the
desert, past the smooth granite outcrops and boulders of the First Cataract,
past the mud-brick villages and date groves on Elephantine Island, and on
round a wide, slow bend in the river. On the other side, yellow sand-dunes
rise steeply out of the water. At their foot, above a fringe of feathery
palms, sits the domed stone mausoleum of the Aga Khan; 500 ft higher, a row
of dark entrances dug into sand and rock mark the Tombs of the Nobles.
Below, on the riverside corniche, I can see life stirring. Horse-drawn
caleches, all brass and polished leather, jingle down the road toward the
five-star hotels. With a little horn-honking, the first cars and buses are
warming up for another day's insane driving. Goats are browsing on grass and
cigarette packets on a traffic island in the road. A cook emerges on the
rear deck of a moored cruise boat and dumps a bucketful of papaya skins onto
the bank.
Already, advance units of the Corniche's army of touts and hawkers are on
the march along its granite-tiled promenade. They are determined,
irrepressible, skilled in the arts of the sidewalk ambuscade. 'You want
guide?' 'You want felucca?' 'You want to see my shop?' This is just the
beginning of a long day's skirmishing.
11.30am. All morning I have been tramping about Elephantine Island, the
largest of the islands that sit in the Nile at Aswan. It is long and narrow,
and houses not only the remains of a temple complex devoted to the
ram-headed god Khnum, but two Nubian villages.
I like the lush fields that surround the villages. Water splashes noisily
through winding irrigation ditches, pannier-laden donkeys sleep under shady
fig trees, and dark-skinned peasants in bright blue djellabas - the long
cotton robe of Egypt  - swing mattocks in mud-walled vegetable fields. But
the villages themselves I could do without. They have suffered an annual
winter invasion ever since Thomas Cook opened Upper Egypt to tourism a
century ago, and it shows.
'Hello Bicpen]' shout little boys as they rush from blue-and-yellow-painted
mud-brick houses to greet visitors. 'Hello Bonbon]' scream little girls as
they trip over fat-tailed sheep in a rush to reach you first. 'Hello Baby
Baksheesh]' yell mothers draped from head to toe in black bombazine.
Panicking, I have sought refuge in the garden that sits between the Aswan
museum and the Khnum temple. It is a place of delightful calm. It is not
nearly as large, ambitious or elegant as the botanical gardens established
by General Kitchener during the Khartoum campaign - they are on the
neighbouring island bearing his name. Rather, this is a rambling garden of
straying vines and creepers, ancient Egyptian statues carelessly concealed
in the undergrowth, and brilliant displays of flowers.
My companions here are Mohammed and Ouedah, Egyptian equivalents of Bill and
Ben the Flowerpot Men. They are in their 70s, they think, and have worked in
the garden most of their lives. Mohammed is the chief gardener and Ouedah
his assistant, although their polite manners, white turbans, grey moustaches
and broken plastic shoes are so similar it is hard to tell who assists whom.
Mohammed introduced himself with the gift of a fragrant sprig of basil. Now,
ladders and pruning hooks forgotten, we are sitting under a bower of
flowering jasmine, smoking a water pipe, drinking glasses of sweet tea, and
deliberating on the foreign policy of 'Egeorge Ebush.' Mohammed approves,
Ouedah does not. I am more interested in a drum-beating, hand-clapping
Nubian wedding party that is skirting the island in a felucca, the graceful
miniature dhow of the Nile.
5pm. More hard slogging this afternoon, this time through the jammed bazaar.
Camel caravans of slaves and gold may have disappeared, but this remains one
of of the noisiest, most colourful, odorous and crowded market streets on
the continent.
Here you can find glib young polyglot Egyptians in wrap-around sun-glasses
selling tourists anything from stuffed baby crocodiles to bottles of bogus
Chanel perfume. But on the whole this remains the genuine thing, a Nubian
market used by local people for everyday purchases.
Under shady awnings that overhang the street there are oranges, lemons and
tangerines sitting in tall, geometrically perfect pyramids. There are shops
that specialise solely in dates; in one I counted 18 varieties. There are
piles of bright red peppers and shiny purple eggplants; stacked baskets of
green lentils, yellow corn and tawny millet rising tier upon tier; melon and
pumpkin seeds for chewing and spitting; cages of fat pigeons and barrows of
tripe; blocks of rock salt, rows of hookahs, bales of cloth.
The riotous profusion runs even to smells - odours of coffee, incense,
drains, sweet tobacco, dried fish, sugar cane and a score of spices all
blending in happy confusion.
Everything meets and mingles in this market - even races. The man sitting
cross-legged on his vegetable barrow is an inky black colour. The ragamuffin
on the shafts of a donkey cart is bricky red. The woman hawking brassware is
a pale, eggshell brown. Aswan may no longer be the major trading crossroads
between Arab and black Africa that it once was, but its legacy lives in its
genes.
7pm. I am taking my revenge on the shoddiness of the Abu Simbel and drinking
a gin-and-tonic on the riverside terrace of the Old Cataract Hotel. It is
quite possibly the most beautiful place in the world to watch the sun go
down. Long after it has sunk below the horizon, feluccas continue to glide
and swirl on the river below like swallows on a twilight hunt.
10.30pm. A cold wind is blowing in from the Libyan desert, and it is as
chilly now as it was at dawn. But the people of Aswan, swathed in heavy
turbans and thick cotton gowns, are as hardy as they are sociable. At the
outdoor cafes on the square by the railway station, business is booming.
Water pipes are bubbling, tea steams from glasses, and from every table
comes endless chatter and the rattle of dominoes and dice.
I have eaten two stuffed pigeons, been beaten three times at backgammon, and
am going to bed. There are no rooms free elsewhere, so it is back to saggy
beds, dodgy lifts and zombie waiters. But I do not mind. With an Upper Nile
sunrise only hours away and just outside the window, how could I?
Nicholas Woodsworth travelled with British Airways which offers an excursion
price to Cairo of Pounds 510 return. Tel: 081-897-4000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11408</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Travel: Mexican mix that works - Snapshot / Why San Miguel
is a good base for a break
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARAH ANDERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AFTER the Second World War, 800 American GIs were sent to San Miguel de
Allende, four hours north of Mexico City. Many of them married Mexicans,
establishing the core of what has become the most successful mix of Mexicans
and Americans in the country. The mix works because they genuinely like each
other, whereas in other parts of Mexico Americans are often envied and
resented.
The town has had its ups and downs. Built in 1542, San Miguel was a day's
walk from the silver mines in Guanajuato. The countryside roundabout was
fertile and had numerous hot springs, so many of the mine owners lived in
San Miguel and built themselves fine houses.
To walk down a street is to gain little idea of the beauty of these houses.
It is only when you pass through a door into gardens full of blue plumbago
and bougainvilia and see lofty courtyards filled with hanging ferns that you
glimpse something of the grandeur within.
Emperor Maximilian greeted the crowds from the balcony of the house where I
was staying. The streets are cobbled and round every corner there are
chuches with bells which chime in strange sequences throughout the night but
which are oddly silent during the day.
Much of the day-time noise comes from the sprawling market in the centre of
town. It is very much a working market. From the surrounding countryside,
people bring their produce - tomatoes, radishes, carrots, potatoes, perhaps
two or three avocadoes, a mass of gaudy gladioli, pinks, chrysanthemums.
Cheap plastic toys jostle for place with imitation jewellry, leather shoes,
embroidered cotton dresses.
There are many religious processions. The statue of the saint of the day is
dressed in clothes and carried around the town by eight women, of all ages,
dressed in black, who wear the label Virgen on their shoulders. When the
statue returns to its church, it is greeted by Indian drums and
Andean-sounding flutes, fireworks and firecrackers.
The mixture of Catholicism and Indian culture makes everything seem alive
and vibrant. However, the real hub of the town is focussed around the
zocalo, the Plaza Allende, which is shaded by bay trees. There is a small
bandstand but mostly people come here to talk, to watch, and to court.
In 1938 a Peruvian set up an art school, Bellas Artes, in the convent which
had been built for Josefina de la Canal in 1775. Josefina was the daughter
of a man made rich by silver. At the age of 17 she decided to become a nun,
so her father built her a convent, part of which still houses the
Concepcionistas, an enclosed order.
San Miguel makes an extremely good base from which to visit other parts of
the state of Guanajuanto. Ten miles away is the village of Atotonilco, which
has a huge church. Adjoining it is a vast building where 4,000 penitents
undertake eight-day retreats. Very few outsiders see this spooky place: when
the penitents are there (50 weeks of the year) no one is allowed in.
Conversely, once the penitents have committed themselves, they are not
allowed out.
In the dusk, bats swoop and stray dogs roam the huge, damp, dank concrete
passages which are the sleeping quarters and which contain nothing but an
iron bar for hanging clothes. Complete silence is required; reading is not
allowed. Men and women come at separate times. There are two meals a day.
Beans, coffee and tortillas are cooked in black cauldrons by volunteers. As
a further enticement, self-flagellation is recommended.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11409</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Travel: Rilke, Dali and El Cid slept here - As tourists pour
in to Spain, Jimmy Burns explains how to escape Expo and Olympic hype
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JIMMY BURNS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
I BEGAN to find what I was looking for just a few kilometres south of
Seville on a narrow road off the motorway to Cadiz. It was a village called
Cabezas Blancas (White Heads), appropriately the first stop along what
Spaniards have termed the 'route of the white towns.'
I had left behind me a city that was cracking up under the strain of Expo
and found a little village of white-washed houses where old men lounged in
doorways and children chased each other in and out of trees. The atmosphere
had been transformed. There was no hurry, just a seemingly endless time to
talk and drink under the sun.
Beyond, the road took me through fields of cotton and sunflowers gracefully
bowing to the light, with not a human in sight. In spring these fields are
speckled in yellow and red: sunflowers in full bloom and poppies. It is hard
to imagine that such a pastoral scene was the setting for some of the
bloodiest battles between infidel and El Cid during the Moorish occupation
of Spain.
The villages and towns that line the route, and the castles in between, are
nevertheless very Moorish indeed; the white towns are perched high on hills,
clinging to the landscape defensively.
There are more than a dozen white towns to visit. Among them, Arcos de la
Frontera deserves its reputation as one of the most picturesque towns to be
found in Andalucia. The town is perched high on a ridge, overlooking a
river. Its narrow streets are flanked by small squat houses. Gothic
churches, friendly tapas bars and little palaces are hidden in the labyrinth
of whitewashed alleyways.
There are plenty of cheap hotels on the route, but after a couple of hours'
driving through the hills I opted for the graceful Reina Victoria Hotel in
Ronda because the poet Rainer Maria Rilke drew his inspiration there.
I booked a room just beneath his and from there watched the swallows swoop
over the valley as the sun set, like a melting gold coin behind the granite
hills. Rilke likened the dramatic gorge which separates the old and new town
to St Christopher carrying the baby Jesus on his shoulders. Crossing the
bridge, we left behind the bustle of the new Ronda with its busy commercial
life, and entered a part of the town which had survived the years largely
untouched and unaltered.
We followed the path deep into the gorge, to the Moorish baths. They were
closed to the public but we convinced Juan, an old gardener, to let us in.
He told us that the baths had been closed because a young tourist had
tripped on the narrow path, fallen, and broken a leg. While my companion
stayed at the top, I followed Juan along the fateful track, peering ahead as
best I could.
Juan was anxious to show me the fountain because it was here that they shot
the scene of Carmen washing herself in Rossini's film of the opera.
Clutching his hand scythe, Juan told me that his job now was to clean away
the brambles and weeds where lizards lurked.
As we stood under the surviving arches, I surveyed the remains of the
drainage, the simple but logical way the baths had been laid out, the use of
shadow and thick walls to create a perfect mild temperature for us to lounge
in.
Juan looked up at the ramparts: 'You know they built that without concrete
and it's still standing after all these years. I dont know how they managed
it.'
On our walk to the baths we had passed a couple of English girls.
'Cross-breeding seems to be a Spanish trait', one of them remarked as they
walked past a bundle on the cobble stones. The bundle was a litter of
kittens, of various sizes and shades ranging from ginger to black. They had
been abandoned in the heat. When we were bidding our goodbyes, I pointed to
the cats and remarked that they would die unless someone packed them up.
'Hay que ver', Juan said. 'These people who take away the children from
their natural mother. They should be ashamed of themselves.' Juan promised
to take them with him to his village high up in the sierra where other cats
lived amidst the hills. And so we left Juan gazing beyond the Morrish baths
at the kittens on the cobblestones, and headed back towards the new town
built by the Christians.
We visited the bullfight museum. Here bullfighting was elevated to the realm
of ritual, the garments and instruments of the toreadores laid out like
relics: a glorification of death. There was a ticket to the bullfight the
day Manolete was killed. Some exhibits were pure pastiche: a cape with an
Aztec sun and a naked body of the tortured Christ rising up into the sky.
There were portraits of Ordonez with Orson Welles and Hemingway. The
director of the museum was as protective of his exhibits as the curate of
his local Virgin. Indeed, there is a similarity that links the two cults -
ritual and unquestioning devotion.
Near the bullring there is an old Carmelite church. We went there to buy
some cakes. Next to a picture of the Virgin Mary a price-list referred to a
variety of sweet delicacies: polvorones (crumble cakes), pestinos (sweet
fritters), cocadas (coconut cakes) magdalenas and mudagas (cup cakes).
I made out my order for a quarter of a kilo each. I communicated with an
anonymous nun through a dumbwaiter encrusted in the medieval stone. The
nun's muffled, slightly ageing voice repeated each order like a litany
before quoting the total price. I deposited the money.
The dumbwaiter twirled and for a few moments I was without cakes and without
money. But there was faith in the air. The dumbwaiter twirled again and the
cakes appeared neatly packaged in plastic. Each bag carried the inscription
(in Spanish): 'How beautiful it is to have an ideal in life.'
A noble sentiment, indeed, although it was difficult to forget that every
sweet morsel made by these Christian nuns had its origins in Moorish
kitchens, before the Moors were booted out.
We had been told that one of the curiosities to glimpse along the route was
the Spanish fir - the pinsapo  - a rare tree not found anywhere else. We
would have seen several hundred as we made our way along the mountain road
were it not for a large forest fire, caused by a stray piece of rubbish,
which for two days engulfed an entire sierra. We saw thick sandy-coloured
smoke rising over the horizon. The local radio described the fire as the
worst ecological disaster to hit the area in 25 years.
After his wanderings round Europe, Rilke had found his peace here. Writing
to Rodin in November 1912, he had reflected on how much Spain had to give
him. 'Ronda is incomparable', he had marvelled.
Rilke's room in the Reina Victoria was a poet's room, simple and
contemplative: a small desk with two fountain pens, a small library of books
and a window giving out to the sunset. Yes, Ronda with its sense of
timelessness, its beauty, its hidden mysteries, poets and bullfighters, was
difficult to beat.
We left Seville shrouded in the pink of dawn, its new airport a monstrous
carbuncle of futuristic architecture, a kind of 21st century hangar with
blue arches made of some undesirable synthetic material. The spirit of Expo
chased me all the way down the runway like a rampant bull.
At Barcelona airport I was greeted by the Olympian bull. Redesigned and
expanded into a bubbling international rendezvous, the airport now provides
another futuristic nightmare made worse by an inexplicable shortage of
toilets.
There was a quickened pace about the airport which grew in intensity as we
drove on to the motorway. There were places to eat but all that was being
sold was fast food. Over the motorway a computerised clock marked the
countdown to the opening day of the Olympics, lest anyone forgot. At this
pace, I thought, there will be a collective burn-out before anyone gets to
the starting line.
At Blanes, the Costa Brava's first frontier town, I got stuck in a terrible
traffic jam. The heat was sweltering. We diverted to the nearest fast food
snack bar. An assortment of chickens, french fries and hamburgers were
displayed in coloured photographs behind the bar.
I pointed to each in turn, only to be told that nothing was available. I
pointed to some bars of chocolate and some crisps. I was served crisps and
Fanta reluctantly, and the man glowered when I spilt the Fanta. I told him
that I would complain to the Olympics board - and I did.
We were soon driving along the Costa Brava. The road between Blanes and
Lloret de Mar became increasingly twisty, meandering through spectacular
pines, the sea luminous. Unfortunately, one of my passengers was sick all
over the back seat.
Lloret de Mar and neighbouring Tossa were crowded with tourists - mainly
British, arrogant and badly dressed, lounging in cafes. To think that this
was a quaint fishing town before Ava Gardner made a film here in the 1950s,
I lamented.
San Feliu was anti-climatic. It was here that I had spent five idyllic
summers as a child, and was revisiting for the first time in 30 years. We
stopped for lunch by the quayside. It was much as I remembered it as a boy -
the oil on the water's surface, the bits of rubbish floating between the
rocks. Yes, there was pollution in those days, but no one seemed to mind so
much. Now there was a self-conscious sign by the local authorities declaring
the port to be a green zone.
Beyond San Feliu, the developers had bulldozed my memories. The fields of
corn had sprouted apartment blocks. It was lucky that we had rented a house
in Aiguabrava, the most beautiful and secluded spot along the Costa. The
house was set up high on a hill. Its construction was a veritable rabbit
warren of paths and patios and hidden rooftops. Plants and creepers of every
kind and colour covered it.
Mornings and evenings were the best times to admire the beauty of the scene.
At night under a yellow moon the pines swayed, and the wind swept the hills.
The air was heavily perfumed with the smell of thyme and pine.
The next day we went down to the nearest beach as the sun rose. There was
already another couple. She was massaging her partner's back with lascivious
intent. As the morning wore on, the beach got crowded with more and more
topless women massaging their partners and vice versa. There was an array of
differing human forms I scarcely imagined possible.
I thought it all most natural, this baring of breasts in and out of the
water, among the sun-shades, ice-creams and suntan lotions, the children
struggling with their flippers like unruly penguins. My female companion
dismissed it all as a mix of exhibitionism, male chauvinism and menopause.
We left the beach by mid-day. By then all sense of individuality had been
surrendered. The aspect of nakedness struck me as one enormous expanse of
flab, as immobile under the sun as a beached whale.
After a day of this, I felt it was time to search for Dali. We drove to the
village of Cadaques which the painter thought embodied 'the most
incomparable beauty on earth.' It was at Cadaques, Dali tells us in his
autobiography, that he had perfected his awareness of his situation.
As we drove down from the hills, Cadaques looked unlike any other town that
straddles the Costa Brava. It is not really a town, more a village; unlike
the others it has not spread its tentacles along the coast. Its compactness
strikes one immediately, as does its whiteness.
The local Dali museum has a wonderful model of a 1920s bus. Dali sits in red
hat and red scarf in the driver's seat, looking quite lunatic, of course;
his wife Gala is beside him, bewitching in a purple velvet dress.
Behind them are Picasso (the man Dali most thought about after his father),
Marcel Duchamp (the man who painted a moustache on the Mona Lisa), and Lorca
(who let Dali fondle his knee once), looking thrilled as schoolboys on an
outing.
In Cadaques there is no beach worthy of mention. But there are friends and
boats and we took both a few miles up the coast to the bay of Port Ligat.
There the house where Dali had spent most of his life stood in an overgrown
olive grove, closed to the outside world. Next to it was the villa belonging
to Captain Moore, the man who was Dali's personal secretary. And next to
this a mock Moorish castle painted sand red. It, too, was closed to the
public, but it was rumoured to have once contained a load of Dali paintings.
We anchored the boat and went diving for mussels and oysters in the bay Dali
had painted into the most popular of his religious works, the Christ of St
John of the Cross.
When we re-emerged, the naked outline of a woman was silhouetted against the
sky, near to Dali's house; by her a man in red underpants was fishing with a
bamboo stick. All around us the sea swayed with erotic motion, as if moved
by some primaeval force.
From Cadaques we went to Figueras and the Dali museum, which holds the
distinction of being the most popular museum in Spain after the Prado.
There were crowds circling the block, mainly of young people with long hair
or older people pretending to look surrealistic. Inside there was something
for everyone or everything for some of us. Every secret recess of Gala's
body was on display in a dozen or so pen drawings and paintings. But it was
to the Mae West room that the crowd was converging as to an erogenous zone.
The room had a sofa shaped like a pair of bulbous lips, a long mane of
bleached hair draped from the ceiling and two lithographs - one of an eye
winking, the other of an eye staring vacuously.
The visitors' ultimate destination was the top of a wooden staircase. There,
under the testicles of a wooden camel, one was required to look at the Mae
West room through a piece of glass.
For 20 minutes, and out of sheer curiosity, I waited my turn. I had been
told that if I looked through the glass I would see Mae West's face. In fact
what I saw was a sofa shaped like a pair of bulbous lips, a long mane of
bleached hair hanging from the ceiling, and two lithographs. Only the crowd
looking down below had their bodies distorted into fantastological shapes by
the glass.
I realised then that Dali had achieved his ultimate tease: to make us part
of the frame while exploiting our gullibility.
'The clown is not I', Dali wrote once, 'but rather our monstrously cynical
and so naively unconscious society that plays at the game of being serious,
the better to hide its own madness.'
I was ready to escape from the circus.
Jimmy Burns flew from London to Seville and thence to Barcelona c/o Iberia.
Tel: 071-437-5622.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11410</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Profiting from a fund for Sheps -
Second-hand endowment policies
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ERIC SHORT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A SCHEME that will enable investors, even those with small amounts of
capital, to invest collectively in second-hand endowment policies (Sheps) is
to be launched soon by Policy Managers Ltd, a subsidiary of Collective
Investments Ltd.*
Investor interest in buying existing with-profit endowments is growing
apace, particularly for contracts with only a few years to maturity. And
although a recent article highlighted the merits of investing in second-hand
endowments, it also pointed out certain possible disadvantages, namely:
Lack of flexibility in the investment. The investor has to select it from
the list offered by the marketmakers. He cannot pick the exact investment
period or the exact amount to be invested.
Unless the investor has considerable capital, he cannot spread his
investments over a period or with several life companies.
The strong demand for second-hand endowments means investors have very
little time to make a suitable selection. Often, they are beaten to it by
others. Investments required tend to be for large amounts. There are
comparatively few endowments available to small investors. Investors have to
make further payments by meeting the premiums on the endowment until it
matures and they get the maturity value.
Stephen Jones, an executive director of Collective Investments, has designed
a scheme to overcome these disadvantages and to open up the second-hand
endowment market to more people.
The plan is classified under the Financial Services Act as an unregulated
collective investment scheme, but its structure is quite straightforward. It
will operate as an open-ended fund on a unitised basis similar to an
unauthorised unit trust. Investment will be via the usual method of buying
and selling units.
The fund will invest in second-hand endowments through the established
marketmakers. Although the intention of the managers is to hold the
endowments until maturity, they could be sold back to the marketmakers if
conditions warrant. The managers intend to concentrate on buying endowments
from around 15 selected life companies with good bonus prospects.
Collective Investments will not itself be a marketmaker, thereby avoiding
any conflicts of interest. Neither will it hold a box of cashed-in units.
All these will be cancelled automatically and fresh units created for
incoming investors. But the managers will set aside a sufficient amount of
the money which has been invested to meet future premiums on the purchased
endowments.
In addition, the fund will hold an adequate liquidity margin in order to
meet re-purchases without being forced to sell endowments. This money will
be held in a separate, interest-earning account.
Policy Managers is still discussing whether to operate the pricing on the
usual bid/offer basis or to follow the trend in the unit trust industry and
have a single pricing system. But the basic price will relate to the market
value of the endowment portfolio and the cash held.
Although Policy Managers will be calculating the prices itself each week,
the valuation will be based on the market rates of return achieved by the
Foster &amp; Cranfield auction prices. Foster &amp; Cranfield will act as adviser on
the pricing and selection of endowments.
The managers reserve the right to expand the margins or freeze the price if
there is a very high value of redemptions within a very short period. But
the managers are negotiating loan finance on the security of the underlying
endowments, so that forced sales can be avoided.
The operation of this fund would appear to be somewhat incestuous, with
little outside monitoring. But Collective Investments, which will handle the
marketing of this new scheme, is authorised by Imro (the Investment Managers
Regulatory Organisation) for its mainstream business of enterprise zone
trusts and limited partnerships.
As such, the managers have had to submit full details of their plans to Imro
for scrutiny, particularly the pricing mechanism, and discussions are
continuing. Even so, as an unregulated collective investment plan, it is not
covered by compensation machinery.
The fund is being structured so that investors would be subject to a capital
gains tax liability only on selling their holdings, against which they can
offset their annual exemption - similar to the tax position on cashing-in
units with unit trusts.
This scheme might well be of interest to parents wishing to make gifts to
their children. Normally, the income from such gifts is aggregated with the
parent's income (usually that of the father) and children cannot use their
tax allowances.
Under this scheme, though, there is no income, so it can be gifted by
parents to children. On cash-in, the child should be able to use the
exemption to offset the CGT liability.
Since this scheme is classified as an unregulated collective investment
plan, Collective Investments can market it only through authorised
intermediaries (although it can deal direct with experienced investors
through customer service agreements). But, generally, potential investors
applying direct to Policy Managers would be given a list of names of
independent financial advisers in their locality.
Being a new investment concept, it has taken considerable time to set up the
scheme and obtain the necessary approval from Imro. But Collective
Investments hopes to start trading within a few weeks. The intention is that
people will be able to invest from Pounds 2,500 upwards.
If this scheme is successful, Stephen Jones is exploring the feasibility of
offering dated funds where the units would be redeemed at a certain date in
the future. He has his eye on the school fee planning market.
*Collective Investments, 77 London Wall, London EC2N 1BE (tel.
071-628-2828).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11411</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: An EZ life ends
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LONDON'S Docklands moves into uncharted territory this weekend.
From tomorrow, the area loses the enterprise zone status it won on April 26
1992. This does not necessarily harm the opportunities for investors to take
advantage of tax concessions - measures announced before Christmas and
likely to be enacted in the new Finance Act allow investors to profit from
EZ tax concessions for up to two years after a building first comes into
use.
But life will be more hectic for the tenants of Docklands buildings (or at
least, those who pay the rents) because rates will now be payable - even if,
like many Docklands buildings, there is no occupant.
According to John Harrison, of Investment and Tax Publishing Services, an
expert on enterprise zone taxation, the precise level at which rates are
levied could be controversial, because there is no clear base of comparison.
Rates may not be as high as they are in the City of London, for example, and
there might also be a case for keeping rateable values low until the public
transport infrastructure is fully in place.
Times are hard for Docklands developers in any case, as the much-publicised
difficulties of Olympia &amp; York, responsible for the Canary Wharf
development, make clear.
A number of Docklands EZTs have problems. Last week PET 8, launched in 1989
and the biggest EZT of all, asked to defer its rent payments to investors.
Globe Trust, the private property company which guaranteed the rental
income, blamed the downturn in commercial rents and values for its
difficulties. The trust owns Two Exchange Tower, at present only 40 per cent
let.
Investors who borrowed to finance their EZT investment could be seriously
affected by delays in rent collection - they could lose the tax relief
available if rental income is used to pay off the loan. The advent of rates
will not make it any easier for Globe to meet its obligations.
Confusion also reigns over CET 7, sponsored by IPS, who also sponsored
Olympia &amp; York's Cabot Square Trust. CET7 was launched at the end of the
last tax year to buy part of One Exchange Tower. It needed Pounds 26.3m, but
according to Property Enterprise Managers, which handled the administration,
only Pounds 12m was raised.
The trust was not formally underwritten, which means that investors' money
may need to be refunded. Negotiations are continuing to complete the deal.
However, at present, according to PEM, 'the trust has been formed so that
investors have units effectively allocated.' But it is a matter of getting
the deal in the form the prospectus led them to expect, PEM adds. 'And if it
doesn't work like that, allowing them to withdraw.'
An injection of cash for One Exchange Tower might help meet the rent on Two
Exchange Tower, but the situation should become more clearer in the coming
weeks.
The outlook, now Docklands is no longer an enterprise zone, could be gloomy.
As Harrison says: 'If they can find tenants and let the buildings then the
developers are off the hook. If they can't then they are stuck with paying
the rent and from next week a potential charge for rates as well. That could
be the last straw for some people.
'Against that, interest rates could be coming down and the banks might allow
some leeway. That's the balancing act.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11412</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Why widows need watchdogs - Casebook
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BUILDING societies are still getting away with the old trick of cutting
interest rates on their accounts without telling customers - in spite of a
welter of bad publicity last year, including a judgment by the building
societies ombudsman against the Nationwide Anglia.
But when money has been left in an account in trust, often for a widow, the
trick is easy to accomplish and rates of interest paid can be very low.
Solicitors administering these trusts need to look for income, so they
prefer accounts which pay interest monthly. This restricts choice.
Even though money deposited in this form must be very much a 'safe earner'
for the societies, they still do not rush to make sure that their elderly
clients are receiving the best interest available for their requirements.
For example, one solicitor conducted a review of the trust funds he
administered, and found the following rates of interest were being offered:
1.69 per cent on Pounds 3,000, by Abbey National;
1.73 per cent on Pounds 2,000, by Alliance &amp; Leicester;
2.475 per cent on Pounds 3,000 by Birminham Midshires;
2.25 per cent on Pounds 500 by Halifax;
2.25 per cent on Pounds 3,000 by Portman;
2.63 per cent on Pounds 5,000 by Woolwich;
3.75 per cent on Pounds 500 by Nationwide Anglia; and
4.43 per cent on Pounds 5,000 by Bristol &amp; West.
When prompted, the societies were able to offer some improvement. The
solicitor said: 'In every case, the society was able to recommend another of
their accounts giving better rates of interest but usually these provided
for annual income only - which I feel is not appropriate for trusts where
there is a life tenant entitled to the income - or periods of notice of two
or three months unless minimum balances of Pounds 5,000 or Pounds 10,000
were maintained.'
The best compromise seems to be the 'High 30' account offered by Bristol &amp;
West, which currently pays a gross 8.51 per cent annual rate on balances of
more than Pounds 500, but requires 30-day notice. Market Harborough offers a
similar account with interest of 8.05 per cent. This is apparently the most
suitable account for widows holding trust funds at present.
Otherwise, building societies dislike the costs of administration for such
small sums, and most of the options available come in the form of 'current
accounts' which are not suitable for saving.
According to Blay's Guides, the top rates for monthly interest with
immediate access are 7.95 per cent from Woolwich, 7.72 per cent from Bristol
&amp; West, 7.44 per cent from Swansea, and 5.85 per cent from Coventry.
It might not seem that difficult for a society to provide extra flexibility
for elderly widows, who often find the income from these small accounts
invaluable. But perhaps they are more interested in an easy way of making a
profit . . .
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11413</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: A difficult shareholder
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BEFORE 1982, we purchased a freehold retail outlet at a value based
primarily on property. At the end of 1985 one of the shareholders parted
company, resulting in transfer of his shares to my wife. Allowing for the
potential CGT liability, and calculating the absolute nett value of the
shares, mainly based on the property value, we agreed a consideration sum
for the share value, albeit unhappily.
In March 1988, when the chancellor abolished liability to CGT on pre-1982
gains, the ex-shareholder demanded his share of the potential CGT saving. He
has no rights after the shares were transferred, but because of heavy
pressures and unbearable tension I have agreed to resolve the matter by
paying him his share of the retained CGT liability.
1. How do I stand regarding stamp duty? This additional payment will
obviously be counted as a consideration for the original share value. Do I
simply say that this was a delayed payment? What about penalty, and so on?
2. In what manner do I inform the Revenue?
1. The payment which you have made cannot be regarded as part of the
consideration for the transfer of the shares to your wife at the end of
1985. Consequently there is no stamp duty problem.
2. You have simply made a gift to the former shareholder, in order to stop
him pestering you. So far as we can see, from the bare facts outlined, that
gift cannot be taken into account for CGT purposes, either in relation to
your wife's shareholding or in relation to your own. (The gift is a
potentially exempt transfer for inheritance tax purposes.)
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11414</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: Recorded gifts
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
IN MARCH you wrote that under certain circumstances probate could be granted
but that there should be a record of any gift to the daughter of a
beneficial interest in bank and building society accounts. What would
constitute a record? A deed, a simple written expression of intent? Could
such an expression be revoked subsequently by an express disposition in a
will or implicitly by a residuary clause?
The idea is to record the fact that the gift has been made; for example by a
signed written memorandum stating that there has been a gift of the relevant
interest. The gift may be effected either by a declaration of trust or by a
formal, written assignment of which notice in writing is given to the debtor
(for example the bank or building society).
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11415</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: Tax on interest
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
EARLY in 1991 I raised a considerable sum by taking out a loan. The sum has
been earning interest while waiting to be used. This interest, say the tax
authorities, attracts higher rate tax. No allowance has been granted in
respect of the interest payable. I have appealed, but the tax inspector has
ruled against me and I have had to pay the demand.
The tax inspector is right. Tax relief in these circumstances was abolished
in 1974 (following restrictions imposed in 1972). In a reference library,
you will find the current restricted relief for loan interest in sections
353 to 368 of the Income and Corporation Taxes Act 1988. Look for the
British Tax Encyclopedia, British Tax Legislation, Simon's Taxes, or
Tolley's Taxation Service.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11416</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: Driveway dispute
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE driveway of my mother's home is adjacent to the pathway of her
neighbour's at the boundary line, though it is higher by some 18 inches.
The neighbours have allowed the concrete surface of their pathway to crack.
Rain has caused movement of the underlying soil, lowering the surface of the
pathway and exposing and moving the soil beneath my mother's driveway, which
has cracked.
A large portion of the otherwise well-constructed driveway will have to be
and replaced. Has my mother any claim for negligence? Are there legal
safeguards she can adopt to prevent a further costly occurrence?
If the damage is caused by natural seepage of rainwater which has not been
artificially collected by the concrete your mother would have no claim in
law against her neighbour. The position might be different if the pathway
itself supported your mother's driveway and had been in place, with that
effect, for more than 20 years.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11417</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: Poll tax bill on empty house
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MY DAUGHTER is in dispute with the local authority over the payment of the
community charge on a property which she voluntarily surrendered to the
building society when she got into difficulties with the repayments.
Originally the authority was prepared to levy this charge against the
society and the society was prepared to accept it, but it now seems that the
society is seeking to avoid payment, claiming that my daughter, although
denied access to the property or any say in its disposal, is legally
responsible as the freeholder. Of what, if she neither owns nor occupies the
property?
We think the council is correct. Your daughter is responsible for the
standard charge on the empty property until either the mortgagee or she
herself effects a sale of the property. She remains the owner of the empty
property, and is entitled to any surplus money if there were to be a sale at
a price exceeding the mortgage loan plus interest.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11418</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance &amp; the Family: How loans can save tax
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN GRANT and TONY FOREMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LOANS to private companies can bring tax and interest savings, but you need
to plan ahead, write Ian Grant and Tony Foreman.
Sometimes, when clients have made loans to a nephew's business or a
son-in-law's company, they find the business has folded and the loan will
have to be written off. The lender's first thought is that tax relief might
mitigate some of the financial loss.
The sad thing about these situations is that, very often, tax relief could
have been available if the loan had been set up in the right way, The basic
difficulty is that a loan is not normally a chargeable asset for capital
gains tax purposes. Originally, this meant that a loss on such a loan being
written off was not allowable for CGT purposes. The law was changed some
years ago; now, section 136 of the Capital Gains Tax Act 1979 gives relief
where a lender makes a loss on a loan extended to a person carrying on a
trade in the UK.
But relief is available only if a range of conditions is satisfied, and this
is often a problem in practice. Furthermore, even where relief is available,
the allowable loss is confined to the amount of the loan which proves to be
irrecoverable. There is no indexation relief.
Contrast this with the situation where a loan is made to a private company
by way of a debenture, with the loan stock being transferable and carrying a
right to conversion into shares. Such a loan usually will qualify as a 'debt
on security,' which means that it is a chargeable asset for CGT purposes.
Because it is convertible, it does not fall within the definition of a
qualifying corporate bond (on which no CGT relief is available). If the loan
has to be written off, the allowable loss for CGT purposes is increased by
indexation.
This still does not give income tax relief. A capital loss can be set only
against capital gains, which may be in short supply at present. There is,
however, a way in which income tax relief can be secured.
The secret is to put money into a private company by way of redeemable
participating preference shares rather than as a loan. You should bear in
mind that, in commercial terms, there will often be little to choose between
the two types of investment.
Whether you put in money as loan stock or participating preference shares,
normally you will find that, if there is a liquidation, you rank for payment
only after secured creditors and the banks have been paid off. Very often,
that will leave nothing for anyone else. But if there is, then a preference
shareholder will have higher priority than ordinary shareholders.
A participating preference share is a special type of preference share where
the holder is entitled to a fixed dividend plus a variable one. The variable
element can be quite small, so that shares would qualify as participating
preference shares if they carried a right to a fixed dividend of 9 per cent
plus a variable dividend of 1p for every Pounds 1 dividend paid to ordinary
shareholders.
Why does the fact that shares are participating preference shares make so
much difference? The reason is that they count for tax purposes as 'ordinary
share capital.'
Where a person has subscribed for ordinary share capital in a private
trading company, and the shares eventually prove to be worthless, he can
claim income tax relief under section 574 of the ICTA 1988.
Ian Grant and Tony Foreman are tax partners with chartered accountant
Pannell Kerr Forster.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11419</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance &amp; the Family: Financial guidelines for exiles - How
to . . . prepare for living abroad
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GRASS is not always greener over there. But there are opportunities to
profit from leaving this country and working or retiring overseas.
Financial considerations alone are unlikely to force you into leaving the
country, but it could be lucrative, if you plan your finances carefully.
According to Hill Samuel Investment Services there are around 3.5m British
expatriates working abroad: 20 per cent in Europe, 26 per cent in Africa,
and 51 per cent in North America.
If you are staying with your employer, and are only leaving the country on
an overseas assignment, the tax position can be very complicated.
Fortunately, a new leaflet from the Inland Revenue (Going to Work Abroad?
IR58) offers guidelines on the possibilities.
Those who are abroad for a complete tax year (from April 6 one year to April
5 the next) and work full-time wholly outside the UK have a relatively easy
time. Providing they do not make visits to the UK which average 91 days or
more per year, they will be treated as not resident in the UK for tax
purposes.
If you are away for 365 days or more, but this does not include a complete
tax year, life is more of a headache. You may get a 'foreign earnings
deduction' of 100 per cent of your earnings for this period. This is
Revenue-speak for saying your earnings will be free from UK tax.
You can make return visits to the UK during a period abroad which qualifies
for the deduction, but no single visit may last for more than 62 consecutive
days and the total number of days spent in the UK must not be more than one
sixth of the number of days in the entire qualifying period.
This means that you will not always know at the time whether a given day, or
period, can be counted as part of a qualifying period. The more certain you
are about your travelling plans in advance, therefore, the better for your
financial health.
If your period working abroad does not extend for 365 days, you will almost
certainly be liable to tax in the UK in the normal way.
The greatest financial opportunities occur if you are away for more than one
tax year. You will also need to find out about your new country's tax
regime; there is obviously no financial point in moving to a high tax
country. And you must work out your plan in advance.
If you are selling assets and going to work abroad, it would be preferable
not to complete the sale until after you have left the UK. Great care is
required in this area and professional advice should be sought. Also defer
income, where possible, until you are non-resident. If a gain is realised
while you are still onshore, you will pay UK tax on it.
Those without a large capital gain still have a formidable financial
shopping list:
Your House. This can be a painful problem. Eric Le Rossignol, managing
director of Hill Samuel Investment Services' Jersey operation, explains that
the rental income after deductions, if you let it, will be subject to UK
tax. So the cost of hiring a good local estate agent is justified. If the
agent receives the rents and pays the expenses, the amount on which the UK
tax must be withheld can be reduced, according to Le Rossignol.
Ask a solicitor to draw up a lease which ensures the property can be
repossessed once you return to the UK.
Bank Accounts. Once overseas, you will need a bank account. 'Offshore'
accounts, based mostly in the Channel Islands and the Isle of Man, allow
roll-up gross of tax. James Higgins, of Chamberlain De Broe, says offshore
accumulators, such as Rothschilds or Hambros sterling money funds, should be
used for deposits. As their name implies, these funds accumulate, or
'roll-up' funds, and do not distribute income. If you can afford to do so,
it is worth putting money into such funds well before leaving the UK, as you
can then withdraw them, once you have left the country, free of tax.
Savings. Liberation from the UK tax regime allows various opportunities. As
Higgins puts it: 'The whole point of being offshore is that you have not got
a UK tax problem, and you can start choosing investments the way investments
should be chosen. You just don't need to worry about tax.'
Offshore centres have developed a formidable range of mutual funds, allowing
broad investment. As these funds have a favourable tax position, they
should, while they stay offshore, generally be able to beat onshore unit
trusts and life products.
Higgins suggests using offshore personal bonds, such as that offered by
Royal Life International on the Isle of Man, as a shell for holding
investments. Set-up fees need not be prohibitive if you use a non-commission
product, he says, and you can then manipulate the funds held within them -
they could even be used to hold building society accounts. However, the tax
position of these bonds is under review, and administrative costs can become
prohibitive - other advisers, such as Wilfred T. Fry of Worthing, are much
more dubious about them.
Le Rossignol also points out that distributor funds are a good home for
savings as they normally offer automatic reinvestment of dividends, but will
protect against liability for UK income tax on accumulated gains, if the
saver has to return unexpectedly to the UK.
Pensions. Many offshore products which call themselves 'pensions' are just
glorified and over-priced savings schemes, according to Higgins. On-shore
pension investment is usually only attractive for tax reasons in any case.
However, pensions under Section 49 of the Isle of Man Income Tax Act 1970
are attractive for those who know they will be returning to the UK, because
if taken as pension income, the annuity will be taxed like a normal annuity,
rather than a 'compulsory purchase' or 'pension' annuity. This significantly
reduces the amount of tax you need to pay.
Le Rossignol says it is worth continuing to pay Class 3 national insurance
contributions to ensure eligibility for a state pension when you return. He
adds that those who do not know their employment prospects when they return
might be best to advised to save their employer's annual bonuses and review
the situation later - UK pension law, for example, is prone to frequent
changes. This explains why most offshore products are single, rather than
regular premium.
Investment offshore is never risk-free, so beware inflated claims. As Le
Rossignol puts it: 'Common sense rules on risk and return are not left on
the ground at Heathrow.'
But offshore regulation is tighter than it used to be, and many
jurisdictions have tightened their regulations in the last ten years.
Finally, you will need to follow developments in what is one of the most
complicated areas of all financial planning. The Weekend FT carries regular
articles by Donald Elkin, of advisers Wilfred T. Fry, which clarify the
subtler technicalities of UK tax for expatriates. But talk to the Inland
Revenue first.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11420</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Sins of commission - The switch to
fee-based advisers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBBIE HARRISON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
RECENT concern over the role of commissionbased advisers in the pension
transfer market has led an increasing number of consumers to seek fee based
firms.
In 1991 alone, new business for individual single premium pensions was
valued at Pounds 4.2bn - a 250 per cent rise on the 1989 figure, and due
mainly to sales of personal pension transfer plans. At the same time,
regulators found that the number of complaints about transfers increased
dramatically.
There are three basic options for job-changers who have built up a pension
benefit in a former employer's scheme, only one of which involves
transferring the benefit to an insurance-based product such as a personal
pension. The first two options - namely, leaving the benefit in the old
scheme, and transferring the benefit to the new employer's scheme - may not
be considered fully, if at all, by a salesman who depends on commission from
sales of products.
The division between fee and commission based advisers is not always
clear-cut. For example, many firms charge a modest fee but retain a
percentage of the commission. This hybrid charging structure can be one of
the most difficult to understand, and leaves plenty-of-scope for pulling the
wool over a client's eyes.
To give an idea of the cost to the consumer it is worth putting a price on
the two main ways of paying for advice. Fee based advisers charge anything
from Pounds 50-Pounds 250 an hour depending on whether you go to a local
high street adviser or a leading firm of consulting actuaries. As a rough
guide, however, you can expect to pay Pounds 80-Pounds 130 an hour for good
pensions advice with an overall minimum of about Pounds 300-Pounds 500,
depending on the nature of the case and the seniority of the adviser.
If this sounds like a lot of money, consider how much a commission based
adviser might receive on the sale of a personal pension used to take a
transfer value of Pounds 50,000. Most providers pay about 5.6 per cent of
the value of the transfer in commission. In this example, the cost would be
Pounds 2,800. Looking at these figures, it is hard to justify the life
industry's argument that consumers feel more comfortable with commissions.
Where the hybrid charging structure is used, an adviser might make a modest
charge of, say, Pounds 200 and offer to rebate '100 per cent of Lautro
commission.' The old Lautro commission rate for transfers was 4 per cent, so
this means that the adviser is still getting a healthy commission on the
product sold.
In the example given of a transfer value worth Pounds 50,000, the override
retained would be worth Pounds 800 which, when added to the fee, gives the
adviser Pounds 1,000 for selling a personal pension plan.
Mitchell Philpott, director of Norex communications, says: 'Given the
general paucity of understanding of pension transfers, coupled with the
growth of this market, we do not believe commission based advisers can
demonstrate impartial advice.'
Of course, it is wrong to suggest that the consumer is guaranteed expert
advice by going to a fee based firm. Clearly, the firm also must specialise
in pensions and be able to demonstrate at the first interview that the
analysis will include: A thorough examination of the benefit options of the
previous company scheme.
What the new employer's scheme offers in terms of benefits. In particular,
it could offer good inflation proofing and excellent protection for the
scheme member's family in the form of widows' and children's pensions.
An assessment of the rate of growth necessary to match the benefits of the
previous scheme. This helps the adviser and the client to make a meaningful
comparison between the benefits of a company scheme and those of a personal
pension.
Any quotations from a life office must mirror exactly the benefit structure
of the previous scheme. If the scheme offers 5 per cent inflation proofing
and widow's benefits, the personal pension quotation also must do so. If a
life office quotation ignores these benefits, it can offer a much higher
projected pension.
If a transfer value is recommended, check that the commission charged is
rebated in full. Where the commission exceeds the fee - as will often be the
case with a transfer - the excess commission should be returned to the
client, either as a cash refund or in the form of enhanced policy terms. If
the latter is preferred, check that the entire amount is re-invested in the
policy.
If the fees charged by actuarial firms are beyond your means, it is worth
using the register of fee based advisers run by the monthly Money Management
magazine*. Its data bank holds details of more than 1,440 firms and has
handled more than 4,000 inquiries since it was launched less than 18 months
ago. Money Management will send a free list of six firms in your area and
the details supplied include a contact name.
One adviser on the register, Fraser Marr Financial Services, charges between
Pounds 80 and Pounds 150 an hour depending on the seniority of the
consultant and whether the business is conducted by the London office or one
of its regional branches. Tony Murrell, the managing director, says: 'Where
the commission generated exceeds the fee charged, we either rebate the
excess to the client in the form of a cheque or ask the product provider to
enhance the value of the policy.'
Russell Kitchen, managing director of Personal and Corporate Financial
Planning Ltd (also on the register), offers clients the same choice and
adds: 'The important point about fee charging is that the advice is
separated from the end result.'
*Money Management Fee Based Adviser Register, Financial Times Business
Information, Greystoke Place, Fetter Lane, London EC4A 1ND. Remember to
include your postcode since this is used to locate the nearest firms of
advisers in your area.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11421</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Life offices prune bonus pay-outs -
The reasons why policyholders are feeling the pinch on their endowments
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LOOK AT your bonus statements this year and you might not feel as well
endowed as you were. Life offices have completed their bonus announcements
for 1991 and two surveys - by Money Management magazine; and actuary Clay &amp;
Partners, in association with Money Marketing - show a downward trend in
returns.
No life company likes cutting bonuses; ultimately, the worth of the entire
product depends on the investment pay-out. But the actuaries who control the
pay-outs from endowment and pension contracts were confronted with a
dilemma.
Bonuses were maintained at high levels in 1990 - even though the UK stock
market fell that year - in hope of recovery. Shares did rise, but not nearly
as much as expected. Meanwhile, the new economic discipline of the exchange
rate mechanism has forced actuaries to downgrade their forecasts for future
returns. That, for many, meant bonus cuts.
This trend has been most marked on 10-year policies. These are not buoyed by
the strong returns equities enjoyed in the late 1970s. Over 25 years - the
term needed to back a mortgage  - the trend is more muted. Norwich Union was
the first office to declare and shocked observers by slashing bonuses 9 per
cent. But this proved to be out of line. While these cuts remain the
steepest made by any office, they have been attributed by actuaries to the
high share of property and general insurance in NU's funds. Some companies,
such as Commercial Union, General Accident and Scottish Life, even managed
significant increases. All have risen up the 25-year league table.
Everyone agrees that the final payout is the most important factor, as it
determines how well your endowment will perform as an investment. But, as
ever with life assurance, other important indicators lurk within the mass of
actuarial data.
With-profits contracts use two forms of bonus: reversionary, which are paid
annually and are irrevocable once announced; and terminal, which are paid
only when the contract has been completed. The terminal bonus is vulnerable
to a bad year on the markets so more-conservative companies, which pay out
most of their funds through reversionary bonuses, have appeal for people
averse to risks.
But high reversionary bonuses are funded by putting money into low-risk
deposits, so fund managers must sacrifice their investment freedom to pay
them. This helps to explain why Standard Life, with a traditionally high
terminal bonus rate, has done very well in recent years - it has topped
Money Management's 25-year survey since 1986. This also makes Commercial
Union's jump into second place, only marginally behind Standard Life, look
particularly impressive. If a monthly premium of Pounds 50 had been assumed,
CU would even have overtaken Standard, according to Money Management.
Meanwhile, when terminal bonuses are excluded, CU comes first in all the
four time spans surveyed by Money Marketing.
Another actuarial calculation derives a surrender value - the life assurance
term for the amount you will receive if you stop paying the premiums early
and ask for a cash sum. The costs of running the policy - including
intermediaries' commission and administration charges - are loaded at the
beginning of the term, so the value you will receive in the first five years
of a 25-year policy is awful. But what about surrender values after 24
years?
Last year's Money Marketing survey showed that these returns barely deserved
to be called 'with-profits' at all. Several companies offered only 40 per
cent of what investors could get by hanging on for another year. This year,
19 of the 32 companies surveyed increased 24-year pay-outs. But the table,
which shows 24-year values as a percentage of maturity values, still
includes some figures that are hard to justify. CU's presence in the bottom
five shows that conservative reversionary bonuses do not necessarily improve
values if you surrender early.
What of underlying investment performance? Past performance is never a guide
to future prospects, as most readers will know, and the past year has seen a
shake-up of the usual top payers. Last year, Money Management identified a
'Magnificent Seven' offices based on the consistency of their performances.
Standard Life, Friends Provident, Scottish Amicable and Scottish Widows are
still in the 25-year top 10 but Tunbridge Wells, Norwich Union and Clerical
Medical are not.
On Clay &amp; Partners' survey, four companies have been in the top 10 over all
time periods this year and last. They are Friends Provident, Standard Life,
Scottish Amicable and Royal London. Make of all these figures what you will.
Some patterns are clearer. Guardian Royal Exchange's performance shows an
alarming consistency over all periods - according to Money Marketing, GRE
has the worst endowment pay-out over 10, 15 and 25 years. Over five years,
it also has the worst pension performance, with an annualised yield of -1.8
per cent. In other words, after five years its fund is worth less than the
total value of premiums paid in.
Money Marketing also has valuable data on pension contracts and with-profits
bonds, both of which have seen feverish marketing over the past few years.
Reduced pay-outs have fed through to pensions, broadly in line with the
trend for endowments. But the offices at the top of the tables tend to be
pension specialists which do not figure in the endowment tables. Scottish
Equitable heads the league for personal pensions since the start of July
1988, when they were introduced, with Equitable Life, Sun Life and Pearl all
showing prominently.
Over 10 years (using figures for the old 'Section 226' self-employed pension
contracts), a Pounds 1,000 single premium would now have grown to Pounds
6,303 with Pearl, Pounds 6,191 with Scottish Life and Pounds 5,483 with
Scottish Equitable. Assuming monthly premiums of Pounds 35 over the same
period, Pearl would offer the best pay-out, of Pounds 15,131, followed by
Scottish Amicable on Pounds 12,619 and Norwich Union on Pounds 12,451.
Clay &amp; Partners sounds a note of caution on with-profits bonds. These take a
single premium, and bonuses are added each year in the usual fashion. But
offices reserve the right to make 'market value adjustments' if you
surrender early at a time when the market is falling. As security is the big
attraction of these bonds, compared with unit trusts these problems could be
critical.
Equitable Life and Legal &amp; General were the only offices surveyed which gave
precise dates at which they guaranteed not to apply a MVA. At the fifth and
each subsequent anniversary, the Equitable guarantees there will be no
downward adjustment, while L&amp;G makes a similar guarantee for the 10th
anniversary.
The judgement of John Jenkins, insurance partner with Clay &amp; Partners, is
unequivocal. 'I think there is an area here which independent advisers are
overlooking in not attaching enough importance to the guarantee,' he says.
'I would regard these offices' products as fundamentally better than the
others, for that reason.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                      TOP TEN ENDOWMENTS
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                            TEN YEARS
Exc terminal bonus    pounds    Inc terminal bonus   pounds
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
1 Commercial Union    6,997     Equitable Life*      9,543
2 Tunbridge Wells     6,604     Tunbridge Wells      9,434
3 Eagle Star          6,501     Pearl*               9,283
4 Clerical medical    6,422     Friends Provident    9,176
5 London Life*        6,414     Standard Life        8,983
6 Legal &amp; General*    6,350     Scottish Amicable*   8,959
7 Scottish Mutual*    6,335     Royal London         8,923
8 Standard Life       6,282     Clerical Medical     8,862
9 Scottish Provident  6,278     Norwich Union        8,831
10 Norwich Union      6,248     Commercial Union     8,746
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                    TWENTY-FIVE YEARS
Exc terminal bonus    pounds    Inc terminal bonus   pounds
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
1 Commercial Union    30,768    Standard Life        44,004
2 Eagle Star          25,074    Commercial Union     43,844
3 Norwich Union       22,857    General Accident     43,535
4 Legal &amp; General*    21,782    Scottish Life        43,163
5 Royal London        21,167    Royal London         42,418
6 Royal Life          20,218    Friends Provident    42,311
7 General Accident    19,699    Scottish Amicable*   41,924
8 Scottish Widows     19,250    Equity &amp; Law         41,726
9 Scottish Provident  18,663    Eagle Star           41,433
10 Clerical Medical   18,589    Scottish Widows      41,004
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Policies started by 29-year-old male non-smoker.  pounds35 monthly
premiums for ten-year term, pounds 20 monthly premiums for 25-year term.
Source:  Money Marketing
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                 24-YEAR SURRENDER/25-YEAR MATURITY
                 VALUE RATIOS ('91 and '90 figures)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
  Top five          %   %     Bottom five         %   %
1 Equitable Life   90 (91)    Royal London       71 (73)
2 Scottish Widows  90 (90)    Commercial Union   61 (63)
3 Prudential       88 (88)    Royal Life         50 (54)
4 Provident Mutual 88 (87)    London Life        43 (42)
5 Norwich Union    87 (87)    Tunbridge Wells    35 (n/a)
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11422</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: The Week Ahead
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ICI, The chemicals giant, announces its first quarter results on Thursday.
Pre-tax profits are expected to be between Pounds 195m and Pounds 225m
compared with Pounds 198m for the same period last year. The figures will
include an exceptional profit of between Pounds 15m and Pounds 20m on the
disposal of the salt business.
Analysts' attention will be focused on the pharmaceutical division which in
recent quarters has been producing most of the group's profits. Its trading
profits are likely to be up on a weak quarter last year, although the
results for this March are likely to be poor following price rises in the
US.
The performance of the agrochemicals division, which generates much of its
profits in March, will also be closely watched, as will industrial chemicals
to gauge the extent of the US economic pick-up .
Interim figures from Associated British Foods, the Sunblest bread to British
Sugar group, on Monday are hard to call following the change of year-end to
September last year. The half year will include a full contribution from
British Sugar, acquired in January 1991, but the income from the diminished
cash pile will be lower.
Milling and baking has been a difficult business so estimates are for a fall
in pre-tax profits from the Pounds 185m comparable figure. The range is
wide, from Pounds 160m to Pounds 175m.
Kwik Save, the discount food retailer, has been the subject of many rumours
recently, some of which - such as the management succession  - might be
explained with Thursday's interim figures. The expectation is for pre-tax
profits rising from Pounds 48.1m last time to around Pounds 52m. Bad debts
will be closely watched at Travis Perkins, builders' merchant, which reports
on Wednesday. It is set to reveal a sharp decline in annual pre-tax profits
from Pounds 20.4m to around Pounds 13m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11423</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance and the Family: Directors' Transactions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS MacDONALD, Directus Ltd
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Last week, we highlighted a large sale in Polypipe, citing it as one of the
few building material companies to have prospered in the recession.
Ironically, this week features a large sale in Spring Ram, the bathroom and
kitchen specialist, which has proved itself adept at bucking the trend in
that sector.
Last June, William Rooney, the chairman and co-founder, sold 22m shares at
105p. Since then, the share price has continued to rise, and Ronald Farr
sold 1m shares at 162p.
In terms of timing, it would be difficult to improve upon the sales of
Donald Lewin. As chairman of Clinton Cards, a greeting card retailer, he
sold a total of 500,000 shares in May last year at prices between 297p and
300p. In retrospect ,this marked the very peak for the shares, which have
since fallen sharply. The company slipped into the red in the year ended
January 1992.
Three other directors, including the managing director, have now bought a
total of 60,000 shares at 60p, 80 per cent lower than the level at which
their chairman sold.
For those who follow directors' dealings, Astec (BSR) has proved a rewarding
investment. Directors were buying at 10p in December, and accumulated more
stock in January at around the 12-13p mark. The latest purchases were at
17p.
Key to sectors: BdMa = Building Materials; Brew = Brewers &amp; Distillers; BuSe
= Business Services; C&amp;C = Contracting &amp; Construction; Cong = Conglomerates;
Elns = Electronics; EngG = Engineering General; Hlth = Health &amp; Household.
H&amp;L = Hotels &amp; Leisure; InsB = Insurance Brokers; InsC = Insurance
Composite; InTr = Investment Trusts; Med = Media; Misc = Miscellaneous; O&amp;G
= Oil &amp; Gas; OthI = Other Industrial Materials; Pack = Packaging; Prop =
Property; Stor = Stores; Text = Textiles.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
  DIRECTORS' SHARE TRANSACTIONS IN THEIR OWN COMPANIES (LISTED &amp; USM)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                   No of
Company              Sector    Shares   Value    directors
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
SALES
Black (Peter) Hldgs   Misc     10,000      13       1
Bodycote Intl         Cong      7,000      29       1
Boxmore Intl          Pack    200,000     576       1
First Leisure         H&amp;L     150,000     423       1
Granada Group         H&amp;L      41,467     105       1
Lowe (RH)             Text    100,000      10       1
Reckitt &amp; Coleman     Hlth      2,000      14       1
Sherwood Group        Text      3,500      27       1
Smith (WH) A          Stor    103,842     492       1*
Spring Ram            BdMa  1,000,000   1,620       1
Tribune Inv Trust     InTr     13,000      30       1
TT Group              EngG    200,000     397       1
United Newspapers     Med      30,000     120       1*
Watts Blake           OthI      4,100      16       1
Wv'hampton &amp; Dudley   Brew     10,900      64       1
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
PURCHASES
Astec (BSR)           Elns    450,000      77       2
Atlas Cnvting Equip   EngG     24,000     124       4
Automated Sec. Pref   BuSe    250,190     111       1
Bailey (CH) B         EngG     94,500      19       1
Brabant Resources     O&amp;G     104,750      27       2
Clayform Property     Prop    177,500      33       1
Clinton Cards         Stor     60,000      36       3
Gardiner Group        BuSe    250,000      53       2
General Accident      InsC     10,761      43       2
Heath (CE)            InsB     12,740      44       3
Holders Technology    Misc     50,000      36       1
Next                  Stor     14,200      10       1
Property Sec Trust    Prop     15,000      14       1
Taylor Woodrow        C&amp;C      10,000      13       1
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Value expressed in pounds 000s. Companies must notify the Stock Exchange
within 5 working days of a share transaction by a director. This list
contains all transactions, including the exercise of options (*) if 100%
subsequently sold, with a value over pounds
10,000. Information released by
the Stock Exchange  13 - 16 April  1992.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Directus Ltd, Edinburgh
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11424</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance and the Family: Correction
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
LAST week's piece 'The O'Higgins road to riches' incorrectly said that Asda
had passed its final dividend. In fact it maintained its final payout and
cut its interim dividend.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11425</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance and the Family: Get in gear for growth if you
believe in recovery - Fund managers' strategies for UK equities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A UK growth unit trust sounds almost the ideal vehicle for the small
investor who believes that equities will enjoy long-term benefits from the
re-election of the Conservative government. But recent trends have not been
encouraging.
The average trust in the sector has risen by a dismal 8.6 per cent over the
past five years, even after the re-investment of income. Even over 10 years,
the average growth fund has been outperformed by the average equity income
fund.
There is an argument, however, that these trends will not continue in the
1990s. If membership of the European Monetary System's exchange rate
mechanism creates a low-growth, low-inflation environment, then interest
rates will fall. Returns on equities may not be great in nominal terms, but
they will look good in real terms and compare well with the rates available
from building societies.
Within the equity market, dividends now form quite a high proportion of
corporate earnings, reducing the scope for many companies to increase
payouts substantially. The search will be on for companies which can produce
better-than-average profit growth; that ought to be the province of UK
growth fund managers.
There are more than 150 unit trusts competing for investors' funds in the UK
growth sector, with some Pounds 7.3bn under management at the start of
April. They range in size from Arkwright Recovery, with under Pounds 1m, to
M&amp;G's massive Recovery fund which, at Pounds 750m-plus, is more than 10 per
cent of the sector.
Over seven and 10 years, M&amp;G Recovery's record still looks good (10th out of
65 and ninth out of 45 respectively), but it has produced a below-average
performance over the past three years.
The same can be said for the Fidelity Special Situations fund, which is
second in the sector over 10 years. It is 106th (out of 124) over three
years, with an 18.8 per cent loss.
Anthony Bolton, who has run the fund since launch, says he has had a
difficult time over the past couple of years, and admits he has made some
mistakes as the recession has badly hit the balance sheets of some of the
companies in which he has invested.
Bolton says, however, that the early stages of recession are always likely
to hit his strategy. He tends to look for unfashionable stocks, and is
prepared to buy slightly more risky shares, and to be more aggressive, than
the average unit trust manager.
The Capability Special Situations fund, which has been the best performer in
the sector over 10 years, has also been remarkably consistent. It is fourth
in the sector over one year and ninth over the past five years. And Kenneth
Levy - who manages the fund - is also in charge of Capability Growth, the
fifth-best performer in the sector since April 1982.
Levy says that part of his secret is to look closely at price movements in
the key stocks that make up a large proportion of the fund. 'If they look
good on fundamentals but their price keeps falling, then we ruthlessly cut
them,' he says.
'It's arrogant to think that you know more than the market place.'
Despite this approach, Levy says the special situations fund trades stocks
less than the average unit trust. Of the two funds in the table, Levy
explains that the growth fund tends to stick to the large capitalisation
stocks, while the special situations has greater flexibility.
He has moved recently more towards medium-sized and smaller stocks (although
not very small companies; he feels many of these still have problems).
Over a shorter time scale, one fund which has seen remarkable success is
Pembroke, which is managed by the John Carrington group. Second over three
years, it is top of the sector over both one and five years.
Nigel Thomas, who co-manages the fund, says he looks for growth stocks which
can produce above-average earnings increases. He believes this strategy will
continue to be successful during the recovery.
Joe Mottley, who manages the AIB Grofund equity trust (top over three years)
with Eileen Fitzpatrick, attributes the success to running a concentrated
portfolio of only 35 or so stocks. A similar strategy is cited by Duncan
Trinder, who manages the British growth fund for Gartmore (third over three
years).
He has focused on only 25 or so large stocks, which has enabled him to
research them thoroughly and gives him sufficient liquidity to meet
redemptions.
Picking a fund manager is, of course, a hazardous business. Only a small
number ever produce returns which beat the index. One answer to this
conundrum, therefore, is to select a fund which attempts to track the
performance of the index.
Gartmore has been running such a fund since 1989, and this week announced
that it was abolishing the initial charge. There will still be a bid-offer
spread (of around 1.9 per cent); but with an annual charge of only 0.5 per
cent, this will represent one of the lowest-charging funds on the market.
The fund, which was launched in 1989, has so far tracked the FT All-Share
index within 0.15 per cent in 36 out of 38 months (in the other two months,
the errors were 0.2 and 0.3 per cent). Gartmore UK Index is classed as a UK
General fund by Finstat, and its 15.9 per cent growth over three years
places it 12th out of 85 funds in the sector.
The minimum investment in the Gartmore Index fund is Pounds 5,000; for those
with less to invest, Providence Capitol is launching a UK All-Share Mirror
trust with a minimum of just Pounds 500.
This fund will also try to track the All-Share and will have an initial
charge of 5.5 per cent and an annual management fee of 0.75 per cent. Those
who invest on April 29 will get a discount of 5 per cent on that day only.
Murray Johnstone's UK growth fund, while not indexed, has only a 1 per cent
initial charge. The fund is 31st out of 124 in the sector over three years,
with a rise of 9.7 per cent.
Anyone who wants to back any of these funds should be aware of the risks. It
is no good expecting to double your money in six months; indeed, you should
be prepared to take the risk that the market will fall 10 or 20 per cent in
the short term.
Investment is likely to bear fruit only over a five-year term; and, as the
period since 1987 has shown, even five years may not be long enough to bring
an investor healthy profits.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
         BEST UK GROWTH TRUSTS OVER 10 YEARS
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
                   % growth
Capab'ty Spec Sits  687.3
Fidelity Spec Sits  551.1
Arkwright Growth    522.6
Prolific Spec Sits  450.9
Capability Growth   448.6
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Finstat. Offer-to-bid with income reinvested.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
BEST UK GROWTH TRUSTS OVER 3 YEARS
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
                 % growth
AIB Grofund Eq    32.7
Pembroke          32.2
Gartmore British  27.7
Stand Life UK Eq  27.4
Aegis Technical   24.2
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Finstat. Offer-to-bid with income reinvested over 3 years to
April 1.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11426</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Markets: Thrills, spills and an end to recession - London
Markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARTIN, Financial Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Hello, good morning and welcome to Stockmarketland, the
fun-for-the-whole-family attraction that packs all the thrills and spills of
the financial markets into a single eventful day]
You start your tour at breakfast time on Thursday April 23. For the next
eight hours you will:
Gasp at the appetite of TI's Christopher Lewinton, as he tries to gobble up
an Pounds 800m company at a single sitting . . .
Thrill with fear at the German money supply figures . . .
Shudder as the tightrope-walking pharmaceutical stocks wobble on the high
wire . . .
Cheer as plucky little sterling scrambles fearlessly up the ERM rankings . .
.
Melt as romantic couple ICI and Du Pont find they have plastics in common;
and Lloyds Bank decides whether to press its stormy, Heathcliff-style
advances on Midland.
Take your places now]
* * *
In one day, indeed, the markets managed to pack in more excitement than most
investors experienced in the whole of 1991. The events were not merely
interesting in themselves, they also reflected some of the market's trends
for the next few months. One such theme is the end of the UK recession,
which showed up in two studies reported in Thursday's papers.
A survey by the British Chambers of Commerce showed that the services sector
resumed growth in the first quarter for the first time since the recession
started in mid-1990. And an IMF report said that Britain is about to move
into recovery, with gdp growth between the fourth quarter of 1991 and that
of 1992 forecast at 2.1 per cent.
Corporate financiers are doubtless hurrying to get takeover bids under way
before the end of the recession pushes potential targets out of reach. One
such deal came through on Thursday, as TI Group, the tubes and engineering
company, offered paper worth Pounds 482m for Dowty Group, the aerospace
components manufacturer.
If successful, the deal would nearly double TI's turnover overnight, though
planned disposals would then reduce the combined company to a size roughly
half as big again as the present group. Dowty has rejected the bid, but its
weak performance in recent years hampers its defence tactics.
The offer was thought to be a relatively generous one by the market,
intended perhaps to scare off any other potential bidders. At the moment it
was made, the offer represented a price of 191p for every Dowty share, with
a fully-underwritten cash alternative of 175p a share. At Wednesday's close,
with rumours of the bid already in the market, Dowty was priced at 145p (up
from 136p at the end of the previous week's trading), and TI Group at 716p.
By the end of the week, TI had dropped to 669p, its bid was worth 178.4p,
and Dowty was at 177p.
Smiths Industries, another aerospace components manufacturer which had also
been seen as a potential bidder, weakened after the TI bid, with the market
wondering if Dowty would turn to it as a potential white knight. Smiths
recovered by Friday, however, and closed at 310p, up 1p on the week.
Another recession-induced deal was announced on Thursday: ICI swapped its
fibres division for Du Pont's acrylics business and a chunk of cash. ICI's
fibres operation has been a problem area for years, but the group had hoped
to turn it around with swingeing cost cuts. The recession put paid to those
hopes, and they have gone to an owner with the necessary worldwide market
position in this product area. The market responded favourably to the news:
ICI closed the week at 1364, up 19p.
The perception of an end to the recession - only slightly dented by poor
trading comments from Abbey National and Legal and General - has led
investors to think seriously about which sectors will benefit most from
recovery. As the chart shows, the health and household sector of the
FT-Actuaries All-Share index, dominated by the big drugs companies, has at
last shed its role of market favourite. Sectors that might do better (or at
least stop doing worse) if the economy picks up have performed notably more
strongly in recent weeks - the chart shows examples such as Motors and
Construction.
Analysts at SG Warburg Securities argued on Friday that the market was in
danger of predicting the wrong sort of economic recovery, by bidding up
capital spending stocks rather than those oriented to an upturn in consumer
spending. An analysis of sector attractiveness from UBS Phillips &amp; Drew
reached a rather different conclusion: with economic growth likely to
continue sluggish, it argued, the big boost to profits would come in those
heavy manufacturing businesses which would benefit most from the cost cuts
of the past year.
The market's views on the speed of the recovery were influenced by two
offsetting factors this week. One was the strength of sterling, which on
Wednesday climbed decisively off the bottom of the ERM rankings. On the face
of it, this left scope for a relatively speedy cut in base-rates, if the
government wished.
This sentiment was badly affected, however, by Thursday's revelation of
unexpectedly rapid growth in the German money supply. M3, the broader
measure of money, rose by 9.7 per cent in March, nearly double the
Bundesbank's target for the year. This reinforced the view that a decisive
downwards move in UK interest rates - inevitably dependent on a similar move
in Germany - was likely to be delayed. Torn between these two views, the
stock market bounced briskly around on heavy volume, closing on Friday at
2643.0, up 2.8 points on the week.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11427</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Markets: Paying the price of mortgage certainty - Serious
Money
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN, Personal Finance Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHOULD homeowners fix their mortgage rates? The building societies are
falling over themselves to offer fixed rate deals at the moment, and those
who suffered from the high rates of the late 1980s may be tempted.
But as a hardened cynic, my suspicion is that the time when fixed rate deals
are widely available is the very time when borrowers should ignore them.
Obviously, all depends on the future direction of interest rates. And while
there may only be limited scope for rates to fall very far this year - the
UK is at the mercy of the Bundesbank's determination to squeeze inflation
out of the German economy - there is the chance of significant falls over
the next couple of years.
What sort of fixed rates are on offer? Alliance &amp; Leicester is offering 9.99
per cent, fixed for two years; Bristol &amp; West will lend at 10.5 per cent for
two years, or 10.75 per cent for five; Cheshire will fix the rate at 9.39
per cent for six months, followed by 10.39 per cent till end 1997; the
Chelsea is offering 10.25 per cent till September 1995; Cheltenham &amp;
Gloucester will lend at 9.9 per cent for two years; N &amp; P is offering
10.75-10.85 per cent till 1995 or 1997; Nottingham Building Society is
offering 9.1 per cent fixed till August 1, 1993; TSB will lend at 10.15 per
cent for three years, or 10.25 per cent for five.
In all cases, readers should check carefully for arrangement fees,
compulsory buildings insurance, and restrictions on the type of mortgage
which applies (some rates are only available on endowment or pension
mortgages).
Given that mortgage rates have been as high as 15.4 per cent within painful
recent memory, all those rates may seem highly attractive. They also look
good when one considers that the average interest rate on three month money
has been 12.25 per cent since Margaret Thatcher came to power in 1979.
But things may have changed for good following the UK's entry into the
Exchange Rate Mechanism of the European Monetary System. If the ERM
discipline works, then the UK should face a period of low growth, low
inflation and low interest rates.
The key is what level of real rates (interest rates minus inflation)
investors are prepared to accept. After a period of negative real rates in
1979-80, real rates have settled into a band between 4 and 8 per cent for
much of the Conservatives' period in office. For the moment, with interest
rates at 10.5 and retail price index inflation at 4 per cent, the real rate
is 6.5 per cent.
Now, of course, one can argue about the best index for measuring inflation.
If one excludes mortgage payments, the inflation rate is a rather higher 5.7
per cent, reducing the real interest rate to 4.8 per cent. That is still a
pretty decent return.
High real rates, in essence, represent the level of investor fears of the
prospects of future inflation. If investors expect inflation to come under
control, at least in the medium term, then one would logically expect
interest rates to fall.
Real rates might not fall dramatically. Simon Briscoe, analyst at Greenwell
Montagu, believes that financial deregulation and the greater sophistication
of consumers means a greater propensity to borrow. A price has to be paid
for this, he argues, and that price is strongly positive real yields.
Nevertheless, if real rates only fell to the bottom of the recent range (ie
4 per cent), then interest rates could easily drop to 8 per cent on current
inflation levels. That indeed is the prediction of Greenwell Montagu for the
end of 1993 (although the broker's inflation forecast for that period is 3.5
per cent, implying a real rate of 4.5 per cent).
Some encouragement for borrowers may also be found in the gilts market.
Traditionally, the yield on gilts has been higher than on short term
deposits, to compensate investors for the risk of making a long term
investment. This is known as a positive-sloping yield curve.
Since around 1984, however, short-term interest rates have been higher than
yields on long gilts, creating what in the jargon is known as an 'inverted'
yield curve.
In part this may have been caused by the government's healthy financial
position in the late 1980s, which allowed it to repay many gilt issues. By
creating a shortage of long gilts, this may have pushed gilt prices up (and
yields down).
Now, however, the government is back in financial deficit and is set to sell
around Pounds 2bn of gilts a month. Gilt yields, however, are only at 9-9.5
per cent, well below base rates.
If the historical tradition repeats itself, and the yield curve becomes
positive, or even merely flat, then there is scope for short term interest
rates to fall to 9 per cent.
Even with the margin over base rates set by building societies, that means
that mortgage rates could easily fall to 9.75-10 per cent. And if Greenwell
Montagu is correct, then mortgage rates could be 8.75-9 per cent by the end
of next year.
Of course, such optimistic predictions about inflation and interest rates
may be wrong, and borrowers may well be attracted by the certainty that
fixed rates provide. But they should be aware that such certainty may have
its price.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11428</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance &amp; the Family: Correction
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Weekend FT front page article on the Daily Telegraph on February 20 said
that Mr Conrad Black bought control of the group for Pounds 30m. We should
make it clear that after Mr Black bought a 14 per cent stake for Pounds 10m
in May 1985, as the article explained, he later acquired control via
diluting rights issues.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11429</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance &amp; the Family: Fillip for small companies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Small company shares have benefited from the general stock market euphoria
since the re-election of the Conservative government. The Hoare Govett Small
Companies Index (capital gains version) rose from 1119.96 on April 9 to
1206.61 on April 16, and 1219.13 by April 23, an 8.9 per cent increase since
polling day. The County Smaller Companies Index rose from 889.31 to 950.51
and 961.61 over the same periods, an overall increase of 8.1 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11430</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance &amp; the Family: Unit trust launch
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Foster &amp; Braithwaite is launching a new unit trust, called the High Income
Investment Trust fund. It will invest in the income shares of split capital
trusts and will aim for a yield double that of the FT-A Investment Trust
Index (currently about 3.7 per cent). The minimum investment is Pounds 1,000
with a 5.5 per cent initial charge and an 1.25 per cent annual charge.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11431</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance &amp; the Family: GA insurance offer
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
General Accident is now offering a direct sales service for both buildings
and home contents insurance. The contents policy comes in three versions
(the basic property plan with plus and deluxe versions) and two kinds of
building cover (standard and deluxe). Quotes can be obtained by calling
0800-121000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11432</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance &amp; the Family: NS certificates mature
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The 33rd issue of National Savings certificates will start to mature from
May 1. Investors should check carefully to see when their own certificates
mature: after five years, the certificates earn only the general extension
rate of 5.01 per cent. Matured certificates can be reinvested in the current
fixed interest and index-linked issues.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11433</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance &amp; the Family: Mixed signals
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
This week produced contradictory indicators on the state of the economy and
the housing market. Home orders picked up, and a British Chambers of
Commerce survey showed substantially increased optimism.
But Abbey National's share price endured a turbulent week. The stock had
boomed after the election as worries about the housing market eased, but
they were revived when Sir Christopher Tugendhat, the company's chairman,
told Wednesday's annual general meeting that: 'Arrears and repossessions are
at a higher level than expected and this in turn will mean a higher level of
provisioning.'
However, the 1,400 shareholders present, many of whom were also savers, did
hear some good news. Sir Christopher also announced that the company's
annual mailing will include 'a special insert giving the rates for all our
investment accounts, both current and unavailable. The leaflet directs
customer's attention to those which are no longer available'.
So, anybody receiving a letter from the Abbey in the next few weeks would be
well advised to read it - it might save them from continuing to leave money
in a moribund account on a low rate of interest.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11434</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Markets: The stock pot threatens to boil over - Wall Street
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AS THE first quarterly reporting cycle draws to a close, Wall Street was
left wondering whether the recent stock market rally may have been
overcooked.
The ingredients required for a sustained bull market are still there. Low
domestic interest rates, uncompetitive yields on alternative forms of
investment, unthreatening inflation, a recovering economy, improved
corporate earnings and continued large net inflows of investor cash all bode
well for stocks.
It is not the ingredients, however, that may be at fault. Rather, investors
may have turned the heat up too high under the equity pot.
This, at least, appears to be the conclusion of two influential Wall Street
market strategists - Byron Wein of Morgan Stanley and Michael Sherman of
Shearson Lehman Brothers - who this week announced changes in their asset
allocation recommendations.
Both reduced by 5 percentage points the proportion of an investor's
portfolio they recommend should be held in stocks. Wein now thinks
all-equity portfolios should be 80 per cent in stocks, and not 85 per cent,
and 20 per cent in cash. The Morgan Stanley strategist justified his shift
on the grounds that he believes the recovery in the economy and in corporate
earnings will not be strong enough to warrant stocks at current prices.
Shearson's Sherman now suggests that a balanced portfolio should have 55 per
cent in stocks, 40 per cent in bonds and 5 per cent in cash.
Admittedly, Sherman said the changes reflected a 'neutral' view of market
prospects over the next six to nine months, rather than a wholly negative
view. He also said the revision was based on an expectation that short-term
interest rates could soon rise, which would undermine the attractiveness of
equities relative to other short-term assets. His message: over the near
term the market has potential for as much movement on the downside as on the
upside.
While much has been said and written about fundamental market valuations -
stocks look pricey judged by trailing earnings, but affordable so long as
future earnings prove as strong as forecast - attention has switched to
technical indicators, some of which suggest equities are overvalued.
The number of stocks reaching 52-week highs has been steadily declining, an
indication of overheating, say analysts. Another bad sign is that the ratio
of stocks that rise each day to those that fall appears to have peaked.
Then there is the issue of why the broader market indices - the Standard &amp;
Poor's 500 and the Nasdaq composite index - have been lagging the
record-setting Dow Jones Industrial Average. The Dow is trading within a
hair's breadth of its all-time high, primarily because investors have been
so keen on big capitalisation cyclical stocks, while the S &amp; P 500 and the
Nasdaq composite languish some way below their records.
Analysts would like to see the broader indices catch up with the Dow before
calling the recent gains a deep and sustainable market rally.
Even more worrying is the rise in long-term bond yields, which this week
clambered back above 8 per cent as the Treasury market expressed its concern
about inflation, the ever-growing budget deficit and supply pressure from
the quarterly refunding round. With yields that high, and stock prices
wobbling at historically expensive levels, yield-hungry investors could be
lured from equities.
Certain sectors have had good runs, none more so than the long-beleaguered
banks, which hogged the limelight in a week that saw the completion of the
biggest bank merger in US history - the marriage of BankAmerica and Security
Pacific.
Financial sector analysts are increasingly positive about the outlook for
bank earnings. Some argue that an end to the long crisis in the industry may
be near. Judging by the latest quarterly results, that optimism may not be
misplaced. This week Chase Manhattan led the way with a 20 per cent
improvement in net income to Dollars 141m, followed by Citicorp, which
posted doubled profits of Dollars 183m, way ahead of market expectations.
Equally stellar performances came from Wells Fargo, BancOne, Bankers Trust
and Chemical Banking.
 -------------------------------------
Monday    3336.31  - 30.19
Tuesday   3343.25  +  6.94
Wednesday 3338.77  -  4.48
Thursday  3348.61  +  9.84
Friday    3324.46  - 24.15
 -------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11435</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Markets: ITV companies play musical boardrooms - The Bottom
Line
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAY SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE TIME to buy ITV shares was, emphatically, a year ago this month. The
bids for the 'blind crap shoot' - or competitive tenders for new Channel 3
licences, as it was known more properly - were about to go in. The
uncertainty was great. No ITV company, however grand, could be judged a
guaranteed winner and share prices were being held down.
The thing to do then was to put together a basket of ITV companies, picking
your way around those displaying hazard signs. Forecasting genius was not
needed to see that Thames Television was likely to face a potentially lethal
threat from Carlton Communications; or that both TV-am and TVS Entertainment
probably would have had to bet the shop to survive and would, therefore, not
have been very attractive investments.
Ironically, TV-am decided not to bet the shop and lost, while TVS did and
still lost. But a basket of the others - chosen in the near-certainty that
the Independent Television Commission was unlikely to kick out the majority
of existing contractors, and even more unlikely to get rid of more than two
of the big five programme producers - clearly would have produced dramatic
results.
Leaks that both Central and Scottish had bid dramatically-low sums -
confirmed later as Pounds 2,000 a year apiece - put springs under the share
price. Those who took notice were able to buy Central at around 625p in
mid-July, a stock that is now trading at more than Pounds 13.
But what now? Is there anything left? No, in the sense of dramatic killings
of the sort achieved by risk-takers last year. Too much is known now about
the ITV companies. Clearly, Central and Scottish are going to have a
considerable future, but that is reflected in the share price. There are
'bargains' such as Yorkshire and Tyne Tees but, again, the price merely
reflects the difficulties both will face living with the high bids they felt
they had to make.
There is, however, another raft of ITV companies which made lowish bids  -
such as LWT's Pounds 7.58m - but which also took early action to cut costs.
It was no coincidence earlier this month that LWT, despite the ferocity of
the recession, was able to announce a 21 per cent increase in pre-tax
profit.
Despite the continued uncertainty, and the threat of increasing competition
in a multi-channel future, there are unmistakable signs that ITV companies
can make at least another round of significant savings without harming
quality. The latest evidence for this emerged yesterday as Central announced
that Andy Allan, its managing director of broadcasting, was joining the
board of Carlton Television and that Carlton's chief executive, Nigel
Warmsley, was joining the Central board. Carlton has a 20 per cent stake in
Central. Central, in turn, has a 20 per cent stake and the right to two
directors on the board of Meridian, which won the south of England
franchise.
The daisy chain stretches even further. LWT, Scottish and Carlton are also
common shareholders in what was Sunrise and is now Good Morning, the
breakfast franchise. Advertising will have to be sold competitively, but the
links will make it much easier to establish common cause and common savings
in sharing non-contentious services such as computers, outside broadcasting
facilities, artists' contracts and perhaps even studios.
Although the gold rush days are over for ITV, Mark Beilby, media analyst at
Warburg Securities, believes that - excluding the ITV companies which are
part of larger groups - those who invest in companies such as Central, LWT,
Scottish or Anglia will not be dissatisfied in the longer term.
For the romantics there is always TVS, which ceases to be a broadcaster at
the end of this year. Its share price has just doubled to 7p. Apart from
programme libraries in the US and the UK, the company's main asset is the
determination of chairman Rudolph Agnew - the stubborn Irishman who once
chaired Consolidated Gold Fields - to bring it back from the dead. Agnew is
fired by what he sees as the lack of natural justice dispensed by the ITC.
And that might make him worth a small each-way bet.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11436</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / The Long View: Backwards to the future
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARRY RILEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
STOCK MARKET theorists have their thinking caps on. After all, the UK is now
firmly established within the European Monetary System, and many
uncertainties have been removed by the decisive general election result. It
is an opportunity to plan ahead.
So should British investors be making some fundamental adjustments to their
strategy? They certainly need to consider the implications should European
long-term interest rates remain for some years as high as they are now in
real terms. In particular, must the relationship between equity and bond
yields change? These questions, moreover, are not confined to the UK.
Equity-oriented British investors believe that even if bonds do well
equities will do even better, so why bother with bonds? That conventional
wisdom has again been confirmed recently: since just before the election the
UK equity market has risen by 9 per cent while long-dated gilts have climbed
by about 5 per cent.
However, the value relationship between gilts and equities is strained. With
long gilts yielding some 9.1 per cent the crude yield gap between the two
markets is now 4.4 per cent and the yield ratio is about 1.95. Already these
numbers are at the lower edge of experience during the past 20 years. Equity
salesmen argue hopefully that British shares are undervalued; but could we
be about to emerge into an era of quite different relationships?
There must be some kind of message in the high returns available on
index-linked gilts. At 4.5 per cent it is currently high enough to satisfy
the normal rate of return requirements of pension funds. Why buy equities on
a dividend yield of only 4.7 per cent? You cannot reasonably expect to get a
total return of more than about 6 per cent real on equities in the long run.
A fascinating paper by Sushil Wadhwani of Goldman Sachs starts by posing the
challenge of high real interest rates - a global rather than simply a
British or European phenomenon - and asks whether stock markets
internationally will have to fall sharply in order that the prospective real
returns on equities can be jacked up. In Japan the answer has clearly been
'yes' and plenty of people are worried about the prospects for Wall Street
on a dividend yield of under 3 per cent (though European valuations are
generally less extreme). Internationally, real interest rates are 2 or 3
percentage points higher than the long-run 20th century average and if
equity markets are forced to adjust there might be a 40 per cent tumble in
share prices.
In the event, Wadwhani uses elaborate arguments to come to the conclusion
that this is very unlikely to happen, and it is more probable that share
prices will in fact go modestly higher. He argues that in practice investors
respond to nominal rather than real yields. Only if investors should wake up
to real yields would there be serious trouble, he says. But here's a nasty
thought: if inflation drops to zero, the real and nominal returns become the
same, something which the dimmest investor could not overlook.
Meantime Mark Cliffe and Chris Dillow of Nomura's London office have taken a
closer look at the British situation. They point out that the yield gap
quite quickly opened up 25 years ago from about nil to 4 or 5 per cent (just
about what it is now) because sterling had become a weak currency, starting
with the 1967 devaluation and continuing with the floating regime from 1971
onwards. In these conditions profits and dividends grew more strongly than
before, making a wide yield gap logical.
Now, however, we are effectively back in a fixed exchange rate framework;
note that sterling in the past few days has been hoisted securely into the
centre of the EMS grid. Profits could come under long-term pressure. In any
case, one might add, British companies have been overdistributing: dividend
growth has already slowed to 3 per cent over the past year, down from 18 per
cent two years ago, and prospects are not good for at least the next year or
two. We have already seen what has happened to investment property, where
rentals have gone ex-growth and consequently prime commercial property now
yields as much as gilts. What would happen if the yield gap closed and the
equity yield had to match a gilt return of, say, 8 per cent (the rate on
German bunds)? Why, British share prices would need to tumble by 40 per
cent.
If this analysis is right, British investors are making a serious mistake.
They are looking backwards and are holding 1980s portfolios in the 1990s.
With the All-Share Index this week poised to break through its all-time high
of last September the fund managers whose portfolios are stuffed with
equities scarcely seem to have a care in the world (although the seasonally
aware will note that May, when shares traditionally reach their sell-by
date, is getting rather close).
Now, it is easy to pick holes in this kind of speculative modelling. We have
no reason to believe, for example, that profits in the UK will be
constrained in the 1990s as seriously as they were in the 1960s:
unemployment is much higher, the unions much weaker and in the absence of
exchange controls the return on capital cannot diverge greatly from
international levels.
My own view is that falls in interest rates and inflation may be enough to
keep the UK stock market relatively firm for the time being. Wall Street
will also get political support from a friendly Fed ahead of the November
election. But 1993 could be very different, as cyclical factors turn
unfavourable for the securities markets.
A 40 per cent fall in share prices seems an extreme view. Yet if governments
are determined to pump out bonds in vast quantities at real interest rates
of 4 or 5 per cent, stock markets are bound to have a very tough time.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11437</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / The Lex Column: Oil price
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Yesterday's Opec meeting in Vienna was always unlikely to produce a
significant shift by the cartel. Long before it happened, the meeting had
served its purpose of reassuring the market that Opec wanted to defend an
oil price floor. After February's chaotic meeting in Geneva, prices first
stabilised and then rose moderately, so that Brent crude has recently been
hovering below Dollars 19 per barrel.
While many of the smaller producers would doubtless prefer still higher
prices, the Saudis remain reluctant to cut their production. This is partly
because there have been tentative signs that demand is beginning to recover,
partly because Russian output is still tumbling. Firmer evidence of economic
recovery is unlikely to have arrived before next month's meeting to set
third quarter production targets. All the same, the fundamentals look
slightly more promising than for a while.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11438</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / The Lex Column: Barclays
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir John Quinton must take some comfort from the fact that he is not the
only top banker in recent times to find that his tenure has been shorter
than expected. The list, which includes the likes of Mr Tom Frost at
National Westminster and Sir Kit McMahon at Midland, is a long one. Most of
those on it would probably claim that they are direct or indirect victims of
the recession. But it is in the nature of recessions to expose the real
quality of management in banking. That is certainly true of Barclays, with
its ill-judged dash for growth when Sir John took the chair.
What is nonetheless perplexing is that the planned reshuffle involves the
promotion of the present managing director, Mr Andrew Buxton, first to chief
executive and then to chairman. There is room for doubt over whether the top
position should go to a scion of a founding family. And his present position
means he must take a share of the blame for the lax cost control which has
been a substantial part of Barclays' problem.
There is no obvious reason why Mr Buxton's elevation should of itself
reverse a trend which has seen Barclays' shares underperform the sector by
nearly 30 per cent over the past year. Barclays needs first a clear
separation of the roles of chairman and chief executive. Then, if the
non-executive directors want to make Mr Buxton chairman, they need to find a
banker with both practical ability and strategic vision to work alongside
him. With no outstanding internal candidate, it may be necessary to look
outside.
One answer might be for Lloyds, whose management has retained its reputation
throughout the recession, to take over Midland and for Mr Brian Pearse to
return to Barclays. Simpler still, Lloyds could merge with Barclays, a
partnership which was mooted in 1968, only to be thwarted by the competition
authorities.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11439</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / The Lex Column: Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The past week in the London market has confirmed the feeling of solidity
about the post-election rally. It is not just that the FT-SE ended the week
almost exactly where it started, after a run of heavy trading sessions.
There is a growing sense that the economic recovery, however feeble, is
definitely established. The switch from defensive stocks to cyclicals
continues accordingly. A year ago, the p/e on the consumer goods sector was
3 1/2 points higher than on capital goods. In the run up to the election the
graph crossed, for the first time since 1985. The gap has since widened, so
that the capital goods p/e is now higher by a full point. Granted, this is
as much a matter of shrinking earnings as of rising share prices. But from
the viewpoint of investor psychology, the effect remains the same.
The spirit of optimism is the more striking in that investors have plainly
accepted that UK interest rates are not about to be cut after all. Indeed,
it has become all too clear that it is in the government's interest to keep
a tight hold on monetary policy on political grounds. The last thing that is
wanted now is a boom that may turn to another slump in five years' time. As
the jargon has it, the economic and electoral cycles have to be brought back
into line. And with inflationary pressure still detectable in the domestic
economy - to say nothing of Germany - the government is quite able to defend
its conduct on the grounds of sound money. An anaemic recovery, in short, is
not only likely; it may be a matter of policy as well.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11440</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / The Lex Column: The long dark tunnel
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Judging by yesterday's announcement, negotiations between Eurotunnel and the
contractors are as delicately poised as ever. The financial position appears
rather worse. Granted, Eurotunnel has effectively disabled last month's
damaging ruling from the disputes panel by seeking time-consuming
arbitration on the small matter of the original contract. That levels the
score with the contractors, so for practical purposes the project's
commercial and operational future will once again be thrashed out behind
closed doors. To Sir Alastair Morton that must look reassuringly like
business as usual. But the future shape of its finances has arguably never
been less clear than now.
It must be a matter of partial relief for the banks that accusations of
mutual villainy which flew freely around two years ago are absent this time.
That said, the stakes are higher, if only because Eurotunnel's ability to
absorb funding problems gets smaller the nearer it gets to opening for
business. Its margin for error is already a mere Pounds 870m. Hence,
perhaps, the 5 per cent fall in the company's shares yesterday.
Until the tunnel is producing revenues, the banks will have to grant a
series of waivers to their funding agreements just to allow the company to
draw on its existing facilities. Any further disputes or delays - and
Eurotunnel hints there are plenty waiting to happen - will push back the
point at which the project breaks even. So at this stage, any increase in
the banks' lending looks decidedly unlikely. While the risk of outright
foreclosure is negligible, the danger is that the banks will demand a higher
price for their co-operation. For all his ingenuity, even Sir Alastair will
have his work cut out to protect shareholders' interests to the finish. An
eventual rights issue seems inevitable either way.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11441</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / World Stock Markets: A new relevance for an old set of
values - The changing Japanese market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
While Japan endures its worst slump in share prices and turnover since the
1960s, international investors might get some comfort from the fact that
Japanese equity valuations are finally coming into line with their overseas
counterparts.
In the past, investors in Japanese equities were forced to disregard
financial ratios due to the gross share price inflation in Japan. But now
that the asset inflation factor of the late 1980s has been eliminated by the
squeeze on liquidity, international valuations have become relevant.
The Nikkei average has fallen 56 per cent from its peak in the late 1980s,
and its price/earnings (p/e) ratio has fallen from 75 to 38. With Japanese
shares at their cheapest since the early 1980s, investors have a chance to
pick up blue chips at bargain-basement prices.
Mr Jason James, strategist at James Capel in Tokyo, says that blue chip
manufacturers are now on a multiple of 35, down from a peak of 66, and
compared with 22 a decade ago. The consolidated p/e ratio for Sharp has
fallen to 28 from an all-time high of 35, while the multiple for Matsushita
Electric Industrial has declined from 20 to 16.
Current levels indicate that Tokyo share prices have returned to a more
normal relationship with overseas stock markets. The p/e ratio for the
Nikkei average now stands at 38 compared to 23 in April 1982, while that of
the Standard &amp; Poor's 500 has risen from 8 to 25.
However, Japanese p/e ratios remain distorted by several factors, such as
the low liquidity created by Japan's stable shareholding structure - some 40
per cent of stocks are believed to be held by long-term investors.
Strategic equity stakes are held by companies belonging to the same group -
'keiretsu', or business partners. Main relationship banks are also stable
shareholders, as are life insurance companies, which usually manage the
pension fund of the company in which they have a stake. Individuals own only
20 per cent of all listed companies, while corporations, including financial
institutions, own more than 70 per cent.
Cross-shareholding distorts the stock market's p/e, which is calculated by
dividing the total capitalisation by the total net earnings. Since most
listed companies own shares in other listed companies, it would not take the
total capitalisation to buy the whole market. For example, when buying
shares in Matsushita Electric Industrial, one would also be buying into its
listed affiliates.
The total capitalisation of the Tokyo stock market is estimated at
Y275,000bn (Dollars 2,043bn). However, this figure is inflated by 40 per
cent, since only 60 per cent of the market is free to float.
Accounting differences are also cited as a reason for high p/e ratios in
Japan. Japanese companies tend to understate earnings due to their
accelerated depreciation policy. Furthermore, Japanese companies are only
required to report consolidated figures if subsidiaries contribute more than
10 per cent of group assets, sales and net income. As profits can be
manipulated by shifting income between subsidiaries, and to special
reserves, earnings figures are not always reliable.
Some of the accounting differences can be narrowed by using consolidated
income instead of parent earnings. This will increase earnings, the
denominator for the market p/e, by some 20 per cent.
With some of the 'distortion' factors stripped out, the p/e for the Tokyo
market works out at just under 20. The figure remains open to debate since
cross-shareholdings can improve business relationships, and profitability.
In some cases, quantifying accounting distortions is virtually impossible,
since earnings manipulation does not appear in company statements.
Advocates of the price to book (p/b) ratio - the share price relative to net
asset value - say that Japanese companies look attractive by this measure.
The number of shares whose p/b ratios are less than 1 has increased as a
result of the stock market's slump.
The consolidated p/b ratio for Matsushita is now 0.8, and 0.91 for Hitachi.
Some analysts argue that since Japanese companies do not revalue their
assets, the p/b ratio only reflects the share price movements.
Other commonly used valuation methods are market capitalisation to sales,
and price to cash flow. Using such measures, Japanese industrial blue chips
appear to be fairly valued compared with overseas counterparts. According to
James Capel, the market cap/sales ratio for Honda is 0.3, compared with 0.2
for Ford Motor and 0.3 for BMW. The price/cash flow ratio for Toshiba is 5,
while General Electric is 11.9 and GEC is 8.
However, with investor confidence severely battered, and evidence of a
slowing economy adding to the gloom, valuations may look even cheaper in a
few months' time. If the economy takes longer than expected to recover, even
blue chip manufacturing companies face the risk of a further downward
revision in sales, profits and cashflow.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11442</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Frankfurt steady as strike
threat looms
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SENIOR bourses regained their composure after the German money supply scare
on Thursday, writes Our Markets Staff.
FRANKFURT fell slightly but confounded dealers who had expected a steep
decline. The DAX index closed down 6.74 at 1,745.70 for a 0.2 per cent fall
on the week. The FAZ index, calculated at midsession, shed 3.76 to 710.81,
barely changed on the week. Turnover fell to DM5bn from DM6.1bn.
News that postal workers had voted to strike had no immediate impact, but
investors remained cautious ahead of the weekend when more ballot results
are expected.
Continental closed up DM3.50 or 1.3 per cent at DM281, off a new year's
intraday high of DM283.50. The tyre company was reported to have held a
presentation in London yesterday. Some analysts attributed Continental's
rise this week to expectations of good 1992 forecasts at its press
conference next month and to confirmation that European tyre prices are to
increase.
Chemical stocks fell ahead of next week's dividend payments. Hoechst fell
DM2.70 to DM263.50 and Bayer lost DM1.90 to DM287.10.
PARIS made another attempt to reach 2,000 on the CAC-40 index at the start
of the new account but subsided as follow-through buying failed to appear.
The CAC-40 index reached 1,995.03 in the morning before closing 6.77 higher
at 1,984.91. Turnover was moderate at FFr2.6bn.
Michelin rose another FFr3.60 to FFr208.40 but volume halved to 923,200
shares. Peugeot also gained, closing FFr16 higher at FFr758. It told
analysts in London that it did not believe Michelin planned to sell its 5.8
per cent stake in the car company.
Eurotunnel fell 90 centimes or 2.4 per cent to FFr37 with 2.2m shares
traded. Analysts were disappointed by yesterday's meeting which failed to
offer any reasons to buy the shares. They added that the share's recovery
was capped by outstanding equity warrants with an exercise price of FFr42.
Pechiney CI's eased FFr7.40 to FFr368 while Pechiney International added
FFr3.60 to FFr212 amid talk that the company was preparing for a rights
issue.
MILAN saw early gains wiped out by profit-taking and a fall in Stet. The
Comit index dropped 1.58 to 508.56, up 0.2 per cent on the week, in turnover
estimated at less than L82.6bn.
Stet fell L77 or 3.5 per cent to L2,120 on rumours, later denied, of a
rights issue. Sip fell L28 or 1.9 per cent to L1,458 in sympathy. Pirelli
continued to rise, adding L15 to L1,365, while Fiat put on L32 to L4,977.
ZURICH ended weaker. The SMI index closed down 5.4 at 1,874.7, but was up
0.18 per cent on the week.
The chemical sector saw the biggest losses. Roche certificates fell SFr50 to
SFr3,120 and Sandoz registered shares were down SFr50 to SFr2,620.
BRUSSELS was lifted by blue chips. The Bel-20 index gained 16.15 to
1,221.58. for a 2.1 per cent increase on the week.
Petrofina advanced BFr200 or 1.9 per cent to BFr10,900 with 14,800 shares
traded, while Solvay was up BFr100 at BFr12,750. Delhaize put on BFr190 or 2
per cent to BFr9,690.
AMSTERDAM attracted strong foreign interest. The CBS Tendency index rose 0.8
to 128.6, a gain of 1.66 per cent on the week. Turnover was Fl 729.4m.
Cyclical stocks and those with exposure to the US and UK were generally
stronger. Akzo put on Fl 2.50 or 1.6 per cent to Fl 154.80, while DSM
advanced 60 cents to Fl 111.70, but off the day's high of Fl 112.90. Akzo is
due to report first quarter results on Wednesday and DSM publishes its first
quarter figures next month.
US demand for Philips pushed its shares up 50 cents to Fl 37.30 while Daf
was 20 cents stronger at Fl 24.80 with UK interest reported.
STOCKHOLM made modest gains, thanks to a recovery in Astra and demand for
Asea and forestry shares. The Affarsvarlden general index rose 3.1 to 987.3,
little changed on the week, in turnover of SKr586m after SKr837m.
Astra rebounded in heavy trading. The A restricted rose SKr6 to SKr519 while
the B free was up SKr1 at SKr515.
The forestry sector was lifted by a government proposal to abolish the
general energy taxation on industry. Stora rose SKr4 to SKr301.
MADRID's general index was up 0.4 at 250.03 but down 0.8 per cent on the
week. Telefonica recovered Pta20 to Pta1,035.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                 FT-SE EUROTRACK 100 - APR 24
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Open     10 am    11 am    12 pm   1 pm    2 pm     3 pm     close
1167.83  1167.50  1166.56  1167.41 1168.00 1167.29  1167.95  1167.02
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Day's High  1168.14    Day's Low  1166.04
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Apr 23    Apr 22   Apr 21    Apr 16    Apr 15
1169.11   1171.34  1166.73   1169.83   1167.06
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value 1000 (26/10/90).
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11443</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Bargain-hunting lifts
Nikkei above 17,500
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Tokyo
INSTITUTIONAL buying and bargain-hunting helped to lift the Nikkei average
to its highest close this week, writes Our Markets Staff.
The index rose 140.40 to 17,542.45, but lost 2.3 per cent on the week. It
reached a day's high of 17,563.03 and a low of 17,120.63. Volume rose to
300m shares from 296m.
The Topix index of all first section stocks was down 1.12 to 1,313.91 with
advances leading declines by 574 to 426, with 139 issues unchanged. In
London the ISE/Nikkei 50 index eased 3.55 to 1,070.03.
Arbitrage-linked selling in the early afternoon led the market down but
prices then recovered on late buying by pension funds and investment trusts.
A rumour that the finance ministry had asked an industry association to
subscribe to investment trust funds also contributed to the recovery, some
traders noted. Several large investment trust funds are scheduled to be
launched next Tuesday.
However, many investors remained absent ahead of the public holidays next
week and the publication next month of some companies' earnings for the year
to end-March.
Bank shares were mostly weaker after the finance ministry's announcement on
Thursday that 21 large banks had bad loans. Mitsubishi Bank shed Y10 to
Y1,840, Sumitomo Bank lost Y50 to Y1,390, and Industrial Bank of Japan
dropped Y70 to Y1,810. Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank lost Y40 to Y1,350.
Canon was up Y20 to Y1,390 after a report that the company will seek a
cross-licensing agreement with Honeywell of the US to settle a dispute over
alleged infringements by Japanese makers of Honeywell's patents for
auto-focus cameras.
Elsewhere, Hitachi rose Y9 to Y845, Mitsubishi Electric gained Y6 to Y501
and Fujitsu was up Y5 to Y708. Car stocks were firmer with Toyota rising Y30
to Y1,460 and Nissan gaining Y9 to Y594.
Roundup
THE markets on the Pacific Rim closed the week mostly ahead as Hong Kong
climbed to its fifth consecutive closing high. Bombay remained closed as
brokers continued their boycott.
HONG KONG finished off the day's high on profit-taking. The Hang Seng index
rose 42.39 to 5,330.17, a gain of 4.8 per cent on the week. Turnover eased
to HKDollars 4.02bn from HKDollars 4.46bn.
HK Telecom rose 25 cents to HKDollars 9.35 on rumours that Cable &amp; Wireless
of the UK might sell an 8 per cent stake in the utility.
SINGAPORE rose on overseas demand for blue chips. The Straits Times
Industrial index advanced 6.09 to 1,408.36, barely changed on the week, in
turnover of SDollars 69.3m.
Singapore Press Holdings foreign improved 30 cents to SDollars 13.20 ahead
of half-year results while Rothmans rose 25 cents to SDollars 6.50 with
201,000 shares traded.
SEOUL rose on bargain-hunting in large capital shares. The composite index
gained 13.01 to 595.88, for a rise of 1.45 per cent on the week. Turnover
rose to Won466.2bn from Won381.8bn.
TAIWAN was lifted by the end of a five-day protest by opposition parties
demanding direct presidential elections. The weighted index gained 9.81 to
4,480.12, but was down 1.3 per cent on the week. Turnover rose to TDollars
14.27bn from TDollars 12.7bn.
MANILA closed mixed. The composite index shed 3.62 to 1,174.68, but was up
0.3 per cent on the week.
KUALA LUMPUR finished ahead but off earlier highs. The composite index
advanced 0.81 to 583.71, for a rise of 1.3 per cent on the week.
AUSTRALIA was firmer. The All Ordinaries index rose 1.8 to 1,609.6, up 1.2
per cent on the week.
NEW ZEALAND edged higher. The NZSE-40 index closed up 3.89 to 1,455.29 for a
3.1 per cent increase on the week. Turnover was estimated at NZDollars 41m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11444</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / World Stock Markets: Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
An editing error in yesterday's article on the Toronto stock market made it
appear that Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce could not easily absorb a big
write-down on its Olympia and York loans. In fact, the bank's chairman said
on April 15 that the property developer's troubles will have only a limited
impact on the bank's earnings. We apologise for the error.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11445</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHANNESBURG's gold index fell sharply as the price of bullion weakened. The
index closed down 17 to 1,006. Industrials fell 3 to 4,216 while the overall
index shed 5 to 3,371. SouthVaal was off R3 at R55 and Vaal Reefs fell R2 to
R172.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11446</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Sugar prices reach 16-month
highs - Week in the Markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD MOONEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
RAW SUGAR prices on the world market this week broke out of the
strait-jacket that had confined them for the past 16 months as fears of a
squeeze on nearby supplies prompted heavy short-covering by traders in New
York. Computer fund buying was also reported as the prompt May position in
New York moved above the psychologically-significant 10 cents-a-lb mark for
the first time since late 1990.
Thursday saw the prompt May position at the Big Apple's Coffee, Sugar and
Cocoa Exchange reach 10.28 cents a lb, up from at 9.59 cents at the end of
last week. A more cautious mood prevailed yesterday and in late trading the
May price had reacted to 10.05 cents a lb, but traders said the funds and
other speculators were still holding big long positions because of concern
about supplies of raws from Thailand and drought-hit South Africa.
That concern was clearly reflected in the premium of 36 cents for the May
position, which is to expire soon, over the July position. When May sugar
became the prompt position at the end of March it was trading at a discount
to July of 13 cents.
There were doubts in the world sugar market, however, about the
sustainability of the recent price upsurge. GNI Research noted that
Thursday's sharp rise at the London Futures and Options Exchange had
'inevitably' been magnified by short-covering and described the market's
strength as 'an ephemeral affair'. In yesterday's daily market report GNI
said that the South Africans had stressed that they had taken steps to
ensure that export obligations would be satisfied. 'There is mounting
speculation that a large proportion of the open position will be taken out
against actuals (physical deliveries) on their (the South Africans')
behalf,' the report said. 'This still leaves the specs and funds long in the
run up to next Thursday's expiry (of the May position). Since they are
unlikely to want to take delivery a heavy bout of long liquidation is on the
cards.'
GNI said it was also worth noting that the Japanese, who are big buyers of
South African sugar, had not reported any significant tightening of
conditions on the Tokyo market.
In its World Commodity Forecasts, published this week, the Economist
Intelligence Unit paints a fairly sober picture of the longer term sugar
price outlook. It estimates that it will average 8.5 cents a lb during the
present quarter and in the second half of this year, compared with 8.13
cents in the first quarter. For next year it sees a further modest rise with
the price average reaching 8.75 cents in first quarter and remaining at that
level in the second and third quarters. But that would still be below the
1991 average of 8.97 cents a lb and the previous year's 12.55 cents.
The EIU report describes a similar prospect for robusta coffee prices. It
forecasts the present quarter's average at 45 cents a lb, up from 44.8 cents
in the January-March period, rising gradually to 48 cents in the final
quarter and 50 cents in July-September 1993.
This week saw the July position on the London robusta futures market dip to
a fresh 17-year low of Dollars 782 a tonne - equivalent to 35.4 cents a lb -
as stale long-liquidation in a thin market touched off stop-loss selling
orders. The price rallied to Dollars 802 a tonne yesterday morning but came
under renewed pressure and closed at Dollars 787 a tonne, down Dollars 14 on
the week.
Cocoa prices slipped to 9-month lows meanwhile, with the July position
ending at Pounds 608 a tonne, down Pounds 11 on the week.
A proposal at UN talks in Geneva by the Ivory Coast, the biggest cocoa
producer, for a new international price-stabilisation agreement based on
export quotas made little impact. GNI described the plan as 'merely a
political face-saving manoeuvre as the consuming members have already said
that they will only consider a (stock) withholding scheme'.
Traders thought support might emerge around Pounds 600 a tonne mark, but
otherwise they saw little to prevent a continued decline in cocoa prices,
especially as manufacturer buying interest was conspicuous by its absence.
In a pretty routine week at the London Metal Exchange interest remained
dominated by the squeeze on zinc supplies for nearby delivery. This helped
to lift the cash price by Dollars 33.50 to Dollars 1,339.50 a tonne and
widened its premium over the three months price by Dollars 16.50 to Dollars
44 at one point. By yesterday's close, however, the premium had narrowed to
Dollars 35 a tonne.
 --------------------------------------
LME WAREHOUSE STOCKS
(As at Thursday's close)
tonnes
 --------------------------------------
Aluminium  +4,450 to 1,212,625
Copper     -4,375 to   282,925
Lead       -1,425 to   130,475
Nickel       -258 to    26,034
Zinc       +1,575 to   236,275
Tin          +240 to    12,125
 --------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11447</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / London Stock Exchange: Long account finishes on strong note
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER JOHN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A THREE-WEEK trading account that might easily have been expected to end
with a whimper closed with a burst of support for London equities yesterday.
After initial weakness, the FT-SE 100 Index surged ahead in afternoon
trading to end the day 33.2 points up, the high of the day, at 2,643. This
left the index 265 points better, since the account opened on April 6 - a
gain of more than 11 per cent.
Trading began with the sort of world weariness often associated with long
accounts. The market was still held back by weakness in the pharmaceuticals
stocks and there was an expectation that a Dollars 2bn-plus share offer from
General Motors in the US would lead to a weak start on Wall Street.
In London, the Footsie tailed off from a shaky opening and was almost 11
points off after the first 45 minutes as dealers locked in profits on
selected stocks. However, the Footsie was pulled up by derivatives markets.
Strong buying of FT-SE options led to a squeeze in futures which traded at a
strong premium to the cash market and pulled it back up.
Also, talk that oil exploration company Lasmo might attract a bidder
bolstered enthusiasm. Then, the GM share issue failed to dent Wall Street
and somewhat disappointing trade and retail figures were discounted. Dealers
who had been preparing to straighten their books ahead of the weekend
decided that there was still room to manoeuvre upwards and bought heavily,
particularly in quality stocks targeted for cyclical recovery.
Overseas clients were still happy to pour money into a market which they
continue to see as cheap. Mr Robert Rowland of institutional fund manager
Lazard Investors said: 'Although the price/earnings multiples of some
sectors have expanded to levels that don't look sustainable in the long term
in the UK, they continue to look attractive from an international
perspective.'
Despite the recent rush of buyers, there is apparently still a great deal of
money looking for a home and one senior marketmaker said buy orders
outranked sell orders by 20 to one. Even the hard-hit pharmaceuticals stocks
saw some interest later, although the sector has underperformed the Footsie
strongly since the election and, along with oil shares, appears to be on a
downward slope.
By the close 628.9m shares had been traded. This was up on the previous
day's 612.0m, which translated into customer business of Pounds 1.42bn.
Retail business in equities maintained the high levels seen throughout the
election account as money continued to pour in from overseas.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11448</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equity Futures and Options Trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOEL KIBAZO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A SQUEEZE in stock index futures sent the June contract on the FT-SE sharply
forward in heavy turnover and pulled the underlying cash market higher,
writes Joel Kibazo.
Having started the session at 2,653, June was sold down before independent
traders, having expected a quiet session, rushed to cover short positions.
The squeeze that followed was further fuelled by large buying of the Footsie
100 option. The combination of the two factors not only pulled the
underlying cash market higher, but saw June trade at a healthy premium for
most of the session.
June eventually closed at 2,688, up 41 on the previous session and 25 points
over its estimated fair value premium to cash of 22. Turnover reached 9,162
contracts.
In traded options, volume reached 50,380 lots. This was boosted by the total
volume in the Footsie 100 option - 28,764 lots. James Capel was reported to
have been prominent in the business, being responsible for 12,000 contracts
of that total.
Tesco was the top-traded stock option at 3,289 lots. This was followed by
Lasmo, in which bid talk was heard. It traded 2,887 lots and was followed by
Scottish Power at 1,282 trades.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11449</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / London Stock Exchange: Lasmo strong on bid talk
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOEL KIBAZO, COLIN MILLHAM and CHRISTOPHER PRICE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OIL EXPLORATION group Lasmo was the strongest performer in the FT-SE 100
index yesterday, the shares surging 26 to 233p - a rise of more than 12.5
per cent. Rumours of a possible bid by Total of France and also disposals
prompted particularly heavy turnover of 7.3m in the underlying market. It
also saw busy trading in options with 2,887 contracts traded - equivalent to
just under 3m shares.
Analysts tended to be sceptical about a full scale bid, but suggested that
Total might be interested in Lasmo's Californian refining operation,
inherited when it took over Ultramar last year.
Lasmo has around Pounds 1bn in debts and is known to be keen to reduce its
gearing. Mr Keith Morris at Carr Kitcat &amp; Aitken said that between Pounds
200m and Pounds 300m may be raised by disposing of the Californian refining
division and that this would be regarded as a key to getting Lasmo's gearing
back down.
MEPC in demand
Talk that Hongkong Land is eyeing MEPC, the UK's second biggest property
group, pushed the shares 12 higher at 351p. The rally in the property
sector, which started after the Easter holiday, was thought to be a delayed
reaction to the election result and perceived improvement in consumer
confidence over the vacation period.
However, the return of the Hongkong Land rumour - an old favourite which
reached its height a year ago, this time with Hammerson in the frame - has
helped to fuel the revival.
Hongkong Land is known to be looking for a UK vehicle to extend its property
interests and lessen its reliance on the colony for its asset base. Land
Securities, ahead 10 at 434p and British Land, up 6 at 213p, rose in
sympathy.
Eurotunnel falls
Eurotunnel bucked the market trend, the shares tumbling 18 to 368p, making
it the day's biggest fall in percentage terms.
The company did not make a cash call as some had feared but the market was
dissappointed by a 9.5 per cent increase in costs to Pounds 8.1bn.
Sentiment was also hurt by news that the company is prepared to offer up to
12 per cent of its equity to TML, the channel tunnel constructor, as a part
of a settlement in the current dispute between the two parties, though only
after shareholder approval. Turnover reached 2.5m with the usual support
from French investors said to have been absent.
Brisk turnover in Cable &amp; Wireless helped push the shares 15 higher at 574p
as fresh talk appeared that the telecoms group might be about to sell part
of its stake in Hongkong Telecom. Most in the market discounted the old
rumour, which this time had Cables selling an 8.3 per cent portion (taking
its share down to 50.1 per cent) to US Sprint, the US telecoms operator,
raising HKDollars 580m.
Another version had the Chinese state telecoms group Citic as the proposed
purchaser. A more likely reason for the strength was improved market
sentiment towards the stock, underpinned yesterday by a buy note from
securities house Hoare Govett.
BP lost 2 1/2 to 247 and Shell slipped 3 to 464p, following disappointing
first quarter results from the US oil majors, including Exxon on Thursday.
BP's first quarter figures are due on May 7.
Banks were actively traded as the market waited to see whether Lloyds would
top the offer for Midland from Hongkong and Shanghai Bank. Midland rose 8 to
375p with 13m shares traded while Lloyds gained 13 to 429p as it appeared
that Bank of Scotland, 2 up at 118p, was not about to smooth Lloyds path.
The Scottish bank denied that it had held talks on buying up to 500 bank
branches if Lloyds decided that this would help prevent the Monopolies and
Mergers Commission from blocking a bid for Midland.
A report that Sir John Quinton might step down as chairman of Barclays
boosted the shares 19 to 352p, although market observers were somewhat
doubtful that this will be announced at the AGM next Thursday. Some were
also less than sure that the market would be enthusiastic about any likely
replacement for Sir John, but said the shares had the biggest yield among
the clearing banks and were due for a recovery.
Talk that Smiths Industries could emerge as a white knight for Dowty Group,
fighting off a hostile bid from TI Group, was again doing the rounds.
However, UBS Phillips &amp; Drew sent out a note to clients yesterday arguing
that the bid was a 'full and fair offer unlikely to prompt a counter bid.'
Smiths followed the market up to end 2 firmer at 310p after an initial
decline. Dowty had a quieter session and closed unchanged at 177p. TI was
steady at 669p.
Siebe continued to benefit from switching out of TI and the shares added 11
to 697p having briefly touched 700p for the first time. Bid speculation in
the wake of Dowty continued to lift APV. The shares added another 7 to 126p.
Takeover speculation continued to surround Tarmac - with Minorco again the
favoured predator. In a buoyant building materials sector, Tarmac jumped 9
to 157p on heavy turnover of 7m shares. Other stocks on the move included
Blue Circle, also perceived to be a bid candidate, which climbed 9 to 275p,
RMC Group, ahead 8 at 666p and Redland, 6 stronger at 559p. Marshalls,
basking in the speedy take-up by institutions of Ibstock Johnsen's 4.2 per
cent stake, rose 8 to 96p.
The hangover from Wall Street's shunning of drugs stocks again affected
Glaxo Holdings, the shares shedding 7 to 721p, and Medeva, off 9 at 229p.
However, SmithKline Beecham strengthened on reflection of its results, the
shares jumping 27 to 827p.
Expectation that Union Carbide's upcoming presentations in the UK will
contain good news and reflect well on the gases section of BOC prompted the
latter to firm 14 to 705p.
Interest in the leisure sector again focused on hotel stocks, with both
Queens Moat Houses and Forte in demand. Queens Moat has been heavily tipped
as a good recovery stock. The shares rose 3 to 87p on turnover of 7.5m.
Forte gained 4 to 259p in brisk volume of 2.2m.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1992
NEW HIGHS (234).
BRITISH FUNDS (1) Tr. 3pc 1992, AMERICANS (4) Chase Manhatton, Chrysler,
Ford Motor, Tenneco, BANKS (4) Midland, NatWest., Royal Bk. of Scot., TSB,
BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (3) Bass, Invergordon, Mansfield, BUILDING MATERIALS
(14) BPB, Heywood Wllms., Kalon, Lafarge, Marley, Marshalls, Do. 6 1/2 pc
Cv., Pilkington, Roskel, Rugby, St. Gobain, Sharpe &amp; Fisher, Tarmac,
Wolseley, BUSINESS SERVICES (5) Capita, Comac, Gardner, Reed Exec., Sherwood
Comp., CHEMICALS (8) BOC, Br. Vita, Caird Pf. 2009, Courtaulds, Hickson,
Laporte, Leigh, Yorkshire, CONGLOMERATES (4) Goode Durrant, Trafalgar Hse.,
Do. A, Wassall, CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (10) Bell, Berkeley, Eve,
Hewden-Stuart, Persimmon, Raine, Rubicon, Tay Homes, Tilbury Dgls., Wilson
Bowden, ELECTRICALS (5) ASEA B, BICC, Delta, Jones Stroud, Volex,
ELECTRICITY (1) Scot. Hydro, ELECTRONICS (10) Acorn Cmptr., Bowthorpe, Cray,
Electrocomps., Eurotherm, Forward Tech., Hoskyns, ISA, Learmonth, Logica,
ENG. AEROSPACE (2) Hunting, Ipeco, ENG. GENERAL (13) APV, Brammer,
Concentric, Hall, Hampson, Kvaerner B, Ransomes 8 1/4 p Pf., Rotork, Senior,
Siebe, Wagon, Weir, Whessoe, FOOD MANUFCTG. (4) Clarke, Kakuzi, Nichols,
Unigate, FOOD RETAILING (5) Argyll, Iceland, Morrison, Do. 5 1/4 pc Pf.,
Sainsbury, HEALTH &amp; HOUSEHOLD (4) Comm. Hospitals, Kitty Little, Scholl,
Takare, HOTELS &amp; LEIS. (7) Airbreak, Airtours, City Centre Rests., Forte,
Ladbroke, Queens Moat, Do. 7 1/2 pc Pf., INSCE. BROKERS (1) Alex. &amp; Alex.
11pc Db. 2007, INSCE. COMPOSITE (1) Hibernian, INV. TRUSTS (42) Aberforth
Spl. Cap., Do. Uts., Abtrust New Dawn Warrants, Alliance, Beta Global Em.
Mkts., Do. Warrants, Brunner, Castle Cairn, Do. Warrants, China &amp; Eastern,
City of Oxford Zero Pf., Drayton Asia, Electra, Euro. Project, Five Arrows,
Do. Warrants, Flmg. Fledgeling, Gen. Cons. Stpd. Pf., Govett Strat.,
Greenfriar, I &amp; S Opt., Inv. Tst. of Guernsey, Jos, Law Deb., Lancs. &amp; Lon.,
Lloyds Smllr. Co's. Cap., Do. Uts., Lon. Atlantic, Majedie, Merchants, North
Br. Can., Pac. Horizon Warrants, Paribas French, River &amp; Merc. Smllr., Scot.
Natl. Stpd. Pf., Shires, Templeton Emrg. Mkts., TR City of Lon. Dfd.,
Throgmorton, Do. Warrants, US Smaller Cos. Warrants, Witan Warrants, MEDIA
(18) Carlton Comms., Do. 6 1/2 p Pf., Central, EMAP, Euromoney, Grampian A,
HTV, Headline Book, Independent, Int. Bus. Comms., LWT 3 15/16 p Pfd., News
Intl., Pearson, Ports. &amp; Sunderland, Scot. TV, Utd. News., Watmoughs,
Yorkshire, MERCHANT BANKS (3) Kleinwort Benson, Schroders, Do. N/V, METAL &amp;
METAL FORMING (4) Cook, Glynwed, Tinsley, Triplex Lloyd, MISC. (7) BAT,
Cosalt, Faber Prest, Frost, Halls Homes, Heritage, Rothmans B, MOTORS (13)
Appleyard, Avon Rubber, BBA, Do. 6 3/4 pc Pf., Caffyns, ERF, Euro. Motor,
Kwik-Fit, Laird, Lookers 8pc Pf., Lucas, Do. Warrants, Pendragon, OTHER
FINANCIAL (7) Ed. Fund Man., Henderson, INVESCO MIM, M &amp; G, Perpetual,
Rathbone, S &amp; U Stores, OTHER INDL. MATERIALS (9) Cookson, Elkem, McKechnie,
Morgan Crucible, Do. 7 1/2 pc Pf., Norcros, Scapa, Tomkins, Do. 5.6pc Pf.,
PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING (7) Arjo Wiggins, Blagden, Bowater, Br.
Polythene, Low &amp; Bonar, Portals, Smith, PROPERTY (2) St. Modwen, Southend
Stadium 5 1/2 pc Pf., STORES (9) Betterware, Burton, Colorvision, Etam, GUS
A, Hampden Homecare, Marks &amp; Spencer, T &amp; S, Wyevale Garden, TEXTILES (4)
Alex. Workwear, Baird, Dewhirst, Shiloh, TRANSPORT (2) Tibbett &amp; B,
Transport Dev., MINES (1) Melinga Res.
NEW LOWS (47).
BRITISH FUNDS (1) Tr. 10pc 2003 B, AMERICANS (3) Gillette, Merrill Lynch,
Pennzoil, CANADIANS (3) Am. Barrick, BCE, Echo Bay, BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (1)
Anheuser-Busch, BUSINESS SERVICES (1) Corp. Services, CONGLOMERATES (1)
Crean Uts., CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (1) Birse, ELECTRICALS (1) Bennett &amp;
Fntn., ELECTRONICS (1) Newmark, ENG. GENERAL (1) Clayton Son, HEALTH &amp;
HOUSEHOLD (6) Astra B, Glaxo, Hafslund A, Lilly (Eli), SmKl. Beecham A, Do.
Equity Uts., HOTELS &amp; LEIS. (3) Harmony, Quadrant, Savoy A, INSCE. BROKERS
(1) Marsh &amp; McLennan, INV. TRUSTS (2) Gen. Oriental, Independent Warrants,
MISC. (1) Eurocopy, OIL &amp; GAS (1) Crusader, PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING (2)
Olives, PrinTech, PROPERTY (1) Power, TELEPHONE NETWORKS (1) Telefonica,
TEXTILES (1) Youghal, MINES (14) Antofagasta, Blyvoor, Caledonia, Delta,
Elsburg, Grootvlei, Harmony, Hartebeest, Kloof, Metana, Southvaal, Vaal
Reefs, Welkom, Winklehaak.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11450</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / World Commodities Prices: Spices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Market is mainly unchanged after the Easter holiday, reports Man-producten.
Nutmegs - Indonesian s/a abcd US dollars 1,750 a tonne, shrivels dollars
1,325 and bwp dollars 900, mace broken 2 dollars 1,700; Grenada sound
unassorted nutmegs dollars 2,400 and defectives dollars 1050 - all cif
Europe, shipment May/June. Cassia unchanged. Seychelles cinnamon bark
dollars 1,350.  Ginger - Indian cochin dollars 1,100, Nigerian split
selected grade between dollars 600 and dollars 800 ex-warehouse. Pimento -
Jamaican spot Rotterdam dollars 2,450, shipment dollars 2,395 cif; Mexico
new crop dollars 1,750 Oct shipment.  Cloves - Madagascar at dollars 1,000
cif May/June shipment.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11451</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / International Company News: Penser keen to reclaim his stake
in Nobel
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Erik Penser, the Swedish financier forced to relinquish his shareholding
in the chemicals group Nobel Industries last August, looks set to stage a
SKr5bn (Dollars 829m) bid for his former interests.
This follows the announcement yesterday that Mr Penser had settled his
differences with Nordbanken, the Swedish bank which currently controls Nobel
Industries.
Mr Penser was forced to hand over his 70 per cent stake in Nobel Industries
to state-controlled Nordbanken after the collapse of Gamlestaden, a finance
company controlled by Nobel.
Gamlestaden suffered large credit losses in the property sector.
From the outset Mr Penser maintained that Nordbanken was wrong to seize his
shares in Nobel Industries, a company which he had built up over several
years, as collateral and that he was prepared to repay his debts to the
Swedish banks.
According to the agreement reached yesterday between Nordbanken and Mr
Penser, the Swedish financier has regained ownership of Yggdrasil, his
former holding company for a token SKr1. Yggdrasil owns shares in a handful
of small developing companies.
Nordbanken also said it would welcome a bid from Mr Penser for the 70 per
cent stake in Nobel Industries, which currently has a stock market
capitalisation of about SKr7bn.
Mr Penser said he would 'let the dust settle a bit' before announcing his
immediate plans, but indicated that he was keen to buy back his Nobel
Industries shares, which were valued at SKr5bn.
He added that several international institutions had indicated that they
would help him to finance the acquisition. As part of the deal, Mr Penser
has withdrawn his SKr3.8bn legal action against Nordbanken.
Posing for the cameras yesterday with a formal handshake, Mr Penser and Mr
Bjorn Wahlstrom, the chairman of Nordbanken, claimed that they had patched
up their differences over the affair.
Nordbanken has been strongly criticised for its conduct towards Nobel
Industries. However, Mr Wahlstrom yesterday denied that Nordbanken's conduct
was improper, saying that both parties had been keen to find a solution to
the problem.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11452</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / International Company News: Aetna Life &amp; Casualty improves
to Dollars 207m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AETNA Life &amp; Casualty, the largest shareholder-owned insurer in the US,
improved its profits performance in the first quarter of 1992 following
reduced losses from its property-related holdings and asset sale proceeds.
The company reported a Dollars 207m profit after tax in the first three
months, compared with Dollars 137m a year earlier. The improvement derived
from a turnround on net realised capital gains - with Aetna chalking up a
Dollars 76m profit after tax this time, compared with a Dollars 16m loss a
year ago. The company said without this its results would have been lower.
Like most of the large US composites, Aetna has been faced by souring real
estate investments recently, but yesterday it said that realised capital
losses from additions to reserves for mortgage and property write-downs were
Dollars 41m, against Dollars 52m a year ago.
Realised gains of Dollars 117m more than offset this - with Dollars 50m
coming from the sale of a portion of the company's interest in MBIA, the
bond insurer.
On the commercial property-casualty side, Aetna's first quarter earnings
were Dollars 60m, compared with Dollars 33m a year ago, but this included
net realised capital gains of Dollars 37m against Dollars 1m in the first
three months of 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11453</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / International Company News: Court clears way for Acil bid
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AUSTRALIA'S Federal Court yesterday cleared the way for an ADollars 127m
(USDollars 97.6m) bid for Australian Consolidated Investments (Acil) by two
companies associated with Sir Ron Brierley, the New Zealand entrepreneur.
The court validated an offer document issued by Rossington Holdings, the
vehicle for the joint bid by Brierley Investments (BIL) of New Zealand and
GPG, the British company acquired by Sir Ron in 1989.
The court extended until May 1 the deadline for Acil to send its response to
shareholders. The previous deadline expired on Tuesday.
Rossington lifted its stake in Acil to just under 20 per cent earlier this
week by buying 3.8m shares in the market at 20 cents each. However, the
company denied it was the buyer of a further 8m Acil shares which changed
hands yesterday.
Sir Ron launched the joint bid in February, but has faced strong opposition
from Acil, which has fought the offer in the courts and advised shareholders
to reject it.
In the Federal Court, Acil argued that Rossington's offer document did not
adequately state how the bid would be funded. Rossington told the court that
BIL would provide 90 per cent of the funding and GPG 10 per cent.
The ultimate success or failure of the Rossington bid will depend on a group
of banks which controls a 19.9 per cent stake held by the Adelaide Steamship
group and a 40 per cent stake formerly controlled by Mr Alan Bond.
Rossington's bid for Acil is the first joint takeover attempt by the two
companies with which Sir Ron is associated since he acquired GPG. He
resigned as Brierley Investments chairman in 1990, but remains a director.
Acil, formerly Bell Resources, was a vehicle for takeover activity by the
late Mr Robert Holmes a Court. It was later part of the Bond Corporation
Holdings group.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11454</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / International Company News: Banks cautious over O&amp;Y funding
for Canary Wharf
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT PESTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OLYMPIA &amp; York's bankers are likely to provide Pounds 15m (Dollars 26.55m)
to allow work at the Canary Wharf development in east London to continue to
the end of May only.
O&amp;Y had been hoping to receive a Pounds 110m facility from a group of 11
banks, which have provided loans of about Pounds 1bn for the Canary Wharf
project. This Pounds 110m would have been enough to finance Canary Wharf's
costs for 90 days, during which O&amp;Y hoped to conclude negotiations on a
reorganisation of its worldwide debt of CDollars 14.3bn (USDollars 12bn).
However, the 11 banks - including Citicorp and Manufacturers Hanover of the
US, Credit Suisse of Switzerland, Royal Bank of Canada, Canadian Imperial
Bank of Canada, Barclays and Lloyds of the UK - do not believe they have
been given good enough information on the financial health of Olympia &amp; York
Developments, O&amp;Y's parent company.
So they are only prepared to provide Pounds 15m, which they hope will be
sufficient to meet Canary Wharf's needs to the end of May. However, the
bankers who negotiated the deal have to receive the permission of their
senior directors before the money can be disbursed.
Therefore, O&amp;Y is unlikely to be told that it has been given the facility
till after the weekend. In case O&amp;Y runs out of cash before the Pounds 15m
facility is formally approved, bankers are providing a much smaller
emergency line of credit.
O&amp;Y tried to raise CDollars 100m (USDollars 84.7m) to finance its operations
in Canada, where it has its headquarters. But a group of Canadian banks,
including Royal Bank of Canada and Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce,
refused to provide the full amount. They are allowing O&amp;Y to draw on about
CDollars 20m.
Meanwhile, Mr Steve Miller, the investment banker who is in charge of O&amp;Y
negotiations with its banks, has returned to New York for a weekend meeting
to formulate the details of O&amp;Y's reorganisation plan.
Mr Miller has been concentrating on persuading banks to provide sufficient
new facilities to allow the company to continue working.
Now O&amp;Y, led by the founder Mr Paul Reichmann, has to provide banks with
detailed proposals relating to how much of its interest payments it needs to
defer and how long it wants to cease payments of principal.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11455</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / International Company News: Valmet acquires machine group
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
VALMET, the Finnish state-controlled paper machinery and engineering group,
is to acquire 91 per cent of Tampella Papertech of Finland, one of the
world's leading producers of board machinery.
Valmet plans to set up an operating group with annual sales of FM1.6bn
(Dollars 352m). This would combine its existing board, tissue and specialty
paper machine manufacturing companies and Tampella Papertech's board machine
production plants.
Valmet is paying for its shareholding in Tampella Papertech with 3m of its
own shares, worth about FM90m at current stock market prices.
In addition, Valmet has agreed to take over some of Tampella Papertech's
debts, increasing the value of the deal, although the size of the loans to
be acquired was not disclosed.
Tampella Papertech, which made a loss last year, has net sales of FM1.14bn
and 1,800 employees.
Its main production plants are in Finland, Italy and the US.
It is a subsidiary of Tampella, the heavily-indebted Finnish forestry and
engineering group which is controlled by the Bank of Finland.
The central bank was forced to take over Tampella last year following the
rescue from collapse of its previous owner, Skopbank, the Finnish bank.
The central bank owns 81 per cent of Tampella through Solidium, its holding
company.
Tampella will be able to reduce its level of debt - estimated to be about
FM6bn in 1991 - as a result of the deal.
Following the divestment, Tampella will have four main business areas:
forest products; mining and construction equipment; boilers for the pulp and
paper industry; and packaging.
The Finnish state's stake in Valmet is reduced from 81.4 per cent to 73 per
cent as a result of the deal.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11456</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / International Company News: AGF profits show little change
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ASSURANCES Generales de France (AGF), the French insurance group which has
run into controversy over its investment in Aachener &amp; Munchener
Beteiligungs (AMB) of Germany, reported profits of FFr2.69bn (Dollars 477m)
for 1991, little changed from the FFr2.7bn of 1990.
AGF is the latest in a line of French insurance groups to announce
lacklustre results for 1991. Axa, the largest private sector insurer,
disclosed a 28 per cent drop in profits to FFr2.4bn on Wednesday. Union des
Assurances de Paris (UAP) which is, like AGF, a state-controlled concern,
reported an 11 per cent fall to FFr3.77bn on Thursday.
The French insurers have been hit by intense competition within their own
domestic market and by the poor performance of some of their international
operations, particularly in the UK and Italy, where AGF is present.
AGF saw revenue rise by 20 per cent from FFr46bn to FFr55.3bn in 1991. The
rate of sales growth was slightly lower, at 9.7 per cent, on a comparable
basis.
It made nearly 40 per cent of its sales outside France where it reported a
good performance from its businesses in Spain, Switzerland and Germany.
The group saw earnings per share fall from FFr51.13 to FFr48.34 last year.
The board proposed an unchanged dividend of FFr13.70 a share.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11457</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Economic Diary
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
TOMORROW: G7 meeting in Washington, with Finance Ministers and Central
Bankers.
MONDAY: Central Statistical Office publishes engineering sales and orders at
current and constant prices (February). Eurailspeed 92 conference at
Brussels, organised by the Community of European Railways (until Wednesday).
G10 Finance Ministers and Central Bankers IMF-World Bank meeting. Japan,
March retail sales.
TUESDAY: CBI publishes Industrial Trends Survey (April). Institute of
Directors annual convention in London (speakers include the Prime Minister
and the Governor of the Bank of England). National Westminster AGM.
Agricultural ministers meet at Luxembourg to agree framework of reform of
the CAP (until Wednesday). US, Presidential primary in Pennsylvania, March
new home sales. Japan, March industrial production (provisional).
WEDNESDAY: Building societies monthly figures (March) and quarterly house
purchase finance statistics (first quarter). 1992 estate agents conference
in London. Commons Defence Committee report on European fighter aircraft.
US, March personal income, March personal consumption expenditure.
THURSDAY: Publication of new vehicle registrations (March). Department of
Energy publishes energy trends (February). Barclays AGM, British Gas AGM.
US, March factory goods orders, March factory goods shipments, March leading
indicators. Japan, March construction orders and starts.
FRIDAY: Bank of England publishes London sterling certificates of deposit
(March), monetary statistics (including bank and building society balance
sheets) (March), sterling commercial paper (March), money market statistics
(March) and provisional analysis of bank lending for house purchase (first
quarter). ICI AGM. May Day: most European markets (excluding UK) closed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11458</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / UK Company News: Forte to manage Balmoral Hotel
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SKAPINKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Forte is to take over the management of Edinburgh's recently-refurbished
Balmoral Hotel from Mr Peter Tyrie's debt-ridden Balmoral International
company.
Mr Tyrie, who spent Pounds 35m acquiring and refurbishing the hotel, said
the Gulf war and the recession had made it impossible for Balmoral to reduce
its debts of Pounds 30m.
The property, formerly the North British Hotel, has been sold to an unnamed
private company, whose owners include some of Balmoral's creditors and one
of its shareholders. The company has granted Forte a management contract,
with an option to purchase the hotel after five years.
Mr Tyrie would not disclose the terms, but said the transaction had wiped
out Balmoral's debt. Balmoral International still owns the Old Swan Hotel in
Harrogate.
Balmoral bought the North British and Old Swan from Queens Moat Houses in
1990. Queens Moat had acquired the properties when it won control of Norfolk
Capital, a rival hotel group, two years ago.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11459</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / UK Company News: Central TV beats City forecasts with Pounds
24.4m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WITH THE announcement yesterday of a near 28 per cent growth in pre-tax
profits at Central Independent Television, Mr Leslie Hill, the chairman,
revealed he had written to Mr David Mellor, the new secretary for National
Heritage, calling for a two-year extension to the moratorium on ITV
takeovers.
Under broadcasting legislation takeovers will become possible at the
beginning of 1994. Mr Hill believes the moratorium should be extended until
the end of 1995 because only then are the television takeover rules
throughout the EC likely to be fair.
Central has been campaigning against the fact that EC companies will be able
to take over ITV companies, whereas in most other Community countries there
are barriers to overseas takeover.
'I believe that UK companies should be allowed to grow at home, free from
the threat of takeover by EC media giants, at least until broadcasting
ownership rules in every country in the Community - instead of, uniquely, in
Britain - provide fair competition and fair opportunities for all,' Mr Hill
wrote to the National Heritage secretary.
The profit for 1991 rose 27.5 per cent and was ahead of market expectations
at Pounds 24.4m, compared with Pounds 19.2m. The shares moved up 40p to
Pounds 13.75.
Profit before the special exchequer levy was Pounds 44.8m (Pounds 36.6m),
the highest in Central's 10-year history and the best recorded by an ITV
company last year.
Turnover was 2.7 per cent lower at Pounds 306.6m, with advertising revenue
1.4 per cent down to Pounds 229.7m - although the share of ITV revenue was
maintained at 14.4 per cent. Operating costs were cut by nearly 29 per cent
to Pounds 62.8m.
Earnings per share increased to 56.1p. (44.2p). The final dividend is 23p to
make a total of 30.5p (28.5p).
Mr Mark Beilby, media analyst at Warburg Securities expects pre-tax profits
of Pounds 38m from the group this year with Pounds 45m in 1993.
Further signs of how costs might be cut came yesterday with the announcement
that Mr Nigel Walmsley, the chief executive of Carlton Television, is to
join his chairman Mr Michael Green on the Central board; Carlton has a 20
per cent stake in Central.
At the same time Mr Andy Allan, managing director of Central Broadcasting,
will join the Carlton Television board.
The Bottom Line Page XI
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11460</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / UK Company News: Loss mounts to Pounds 5.6m at Reed
Executive
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CHAIRMAN and execut-ives at Reed Executive agreed to take pay cuts of up
to 42 per cent as the employment agency's losses for the nine months to
December 29 deepened to Pounds 5.62m.
The pre-tax result compared with losses of Pounds 798,000 for the year to
March 31 as Reed has changed its year-end.
Mr Alec Reed, chairman, said that as part of a cost-cutting programme,
executive directors would restrict their emoluments to Pounds 80,000 this
year. This represented a 42 per cent decline in his salary and 33 and 20 per
cent for two other executive directors.
Mr Reed had some encouragement for investors, saying that the group was
experiencing a rise in activity which appeared to be slightly stronger than
the earlier - and unsustained  - one referred to at the interim stage. 'The
danger might be that it is only the honeymoon after the election,' he said.
Reed's exposure to the south and south-east of England meant that the
recession had taken a heavy toll on volume and margins. Turnover fell to
Pounds 63.9m in the nine months, compared with Pounds 119m for the previous
year. Margins had declined by about 20 per cent, said Mr Reed.
The supply of permanent employees continued to be the hardest hit, with
business down about 35 per cent. Temporary placements were about 25 per cent
lower, Mr Reed said.
During the nine months, Reed closed 10 of its 150 branches. This resulted in
an exceptional charge of Pounds 1.2m, while redundancies added a further
Pounds 119,000 in above-the-line costs.
The loss per share deepened from 1.5p to 8.5p, and there is no dividend.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11461</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / UK Company News: Hillsdown plans Canadian growth
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TORONTO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Maple Leaf Foods, Hillsdown Holdings' Canadian subsidiary, is laying the
groundwork for a large expansion in the North American baking industry by
offering to buy out minority shareholders in Corporate Foods, Canada's
biggest baking group.
Maple Leaf, which already owns 66 per cent of Corporate Foods, has proposed
paying 1.15 shares for each remaining CF share. At Maple Leaf's current
share price of CDollars 17.25, the deal is worth a total of CDollars 127m
(Pounds 60m).
CF has appointed a committee of its board to study the proposal. Mr Lewis
Rose, Maple Leaf's chief financial officer, said the merger would provide
extra flexibility for expansion, including acquisitions or joint ventures in
the US.
The buy-out of the minority shareholders will lower Hillsdown's stake in
Maple Leaf from 56 per cent to 51 per cent.
However, Mr Charles Bowen, Maple Leaf's president, said Hillsdown intended
to buy enough shares to restore its ownership position.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11462</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / UK Company News: Lamont seeks Pounds 16m to fund acquisition
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LAMONT Holdings, the Northern Ireland-based carpets and textiles group,
yesterday announced a 19 per cent drop in pre-tax profits, accompanied by a
Pounds 16m cash call to pay for its latest acquisition.
The one-for-four rights issue, pitched at 280p, will raise Pounds 15.9m to
pay for the 100-year-old fabric printer, Alexander Drew &amp; Sons. An initial
consideration of Pounds 16.4m will be supplemented by performance-related
outlay of up to Pounds 2m over the next 18 months.
The cash call, underwritten by Lazard Brothers, will enlarge Lamont's
existing share capital by 25 per cent.
Lamont's shares fell 11p after the announcement to 339p.
Sir Desmond Lorimer, chairman, said the acquisition of Drew - which was the
subject of a management buy-out from Coloroll in 1990 - would bring a
positive contribution to earnings per share. Last year earnings fell from
28.11p to 23.21p.
However, the purchase would also load Lamont with Pounds 7.4m in Drew's
debt. This would leave the enlarged company about 30 per cent geared, with
net borrowings of between Pounds 9m and Pounds 10m.
Speaking about last year's performance, Sir Desmond said recession had
continued 'at an ever increasing pace', although the group expected slow
growth in sales and margins this year. As a result the final dividend is
maintained at 8.5p, for a total of 12p.
Turnover was maintained at Pounds 109.1m, including 12 months of Bonded
Fibre Fabric - purchased in 1990  - compared with just nine months the
previous year.
A swing from Pounds 826,000 in interest receivable to charges of Pounds
68,000 helped depress pre-tax profits, which fell from Pounds 10m to Pounds
8.11m.
The sharpest decline came in the carpets division, which saw profits fall
from Pounds 4.6m to Pounds 3.3m; sales dropped from Pounds 56m to Pounds
52m. The linens and fabrics business raised its contribution from Pounds
2.6m to Pounds 3.2m, while turnover increased from Pounds 41m to Pounds 46m.
The other divisions, which include a small computing firm and an engineering
subsidiary, fell by Pounds 118,000 at the trading level to Pounds 894,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11463</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / UK Company News: Peugeot Talbot falls 54%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRE-TAX profits at Peugeot Talbot, the UK subsidiary of the French car
maker, fell 54 per cent last year to Pounds 50m, against Pounds 109m in 1990
and a record Pounds 135m in the preceding year.
The company out-performed most rival car makers in the UK, however, as Ford,
Rover, Jaguar and Rolls-Royce plunged into heavy losses in the face of the
steep recession in the new car market.
Mr Geoffrey Whalen, managing director, yesterday forecast a small increase
in that market this year to around 1.7m units, from 1.59m in 1991, the
lowest level since 1982.
'The car market is still sluggish but we believe that with the recent
reduction in car tax and the uncertainty of the General Election behind us,
overall sales will now pick up.'
He forecast that Peugeot's UK car sales would increase by about 10 per cent
this year to 127,000. and that output at its Rytonassembly plant would rise
3 per cent to 90,700.
Mr Whalen warned however, that profits would again be under pressure. in
1992. 'It will be difficult to improve on the 1991 position.'
Production at Ryton fell by 24.5 per cent to 87,965 (116,505). The company
was aiming to increase productivity at the plant by 10 per cent this year
following a 13 per cent improvement in 1991. Productivity had improved by 30
per cent in the last three years.
Total turnover fell by 10 per cent last year to Pounds 1.44bn (Pounds
1.59bn).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11464</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / UK Company News: McKechnie static at Pounds 10.5m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MCKECHNIE, the plastic and metal components maker, said it was beginning to
recover, although without help from the economy, as it reported pre-tax
profits slightly higher at Pounds 10.6m, against Pounds 10.5m, in the six
months to January 31.
Mr Michael Ost, chief executive, said the restructuring, including disposal
of the European metal businesses, had been completed. He expected growth in
operating profits in the second half despite continuing difficult trading
conditions. The shares rose 8p to 346p on the news.
He said the group had increased gross margins by being tough on suppliers
and resisting pricing pressure from customers. It had cut the cost base,
with another 300 jobs going in the six months; and it was maximising cash
flow which should be positive this year after dividends, tax and capital
expenditure.
The strong financial position, with gearing 6.9 per cent after disposals,
would allow bolt-on acquisitions, he said.
Sales in the six months fell from Pounds 153.6m to Pounds 139.9m, but this
was almost entirely attributable to disposals.
Pre-interest profits fell 18 per cent to Pounds 10.9m. Mr Ost said that the
underlying fall was 8 per cent or Pounds 1.1m, as the recessions in the UK
and US offset recovery in the Pacific area. Also affecting profits was the
absence of Pounds 600,000 of non-operating gains in the previous years
figures, and Pounds 700,000 of profits from the disposed businesses.
The loss of these profits was more than offset by a fall in interest
charges, of Pounds 2.57m to Pounds 323,000, also aided by a reduction in
working capital.
A fall in the tax rate from 35.4 to 32.3 per cent helped to give a small
rise in earnings per share to 9p (8.8p). The interim dividend is unchanged
at 5p.
The plastics divisions suffered the worst fall in operating profits, down 28
per cent to Pounds 3.78m, with the vehicle components business hit by
volatile demand. There were also development costs on new businesses in the
US.
Profits from the specialist products division fell 17 per cent to Pounds
4.3m, but Mr Ost said this was the result of the absence of profits from
disposed activities. Profits from the consumer division were barely changed
at Pounds 2.8m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11465</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / UK Company News: Daily Telegraph lent Pounds 33m to Conrad
Black's company
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY and RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DAILY Telegraph, the newspaper group seeking a stock market listing this
summer, lent Pounds 33m to its chairman's holding company, without gaining
approval from its other shareholders. Mr Conrad Black, chairman of the Daily
Telegraph, holds 83 per cent of its shares through Hollinger, his
international holding company.
The loan was revealed in a letter to Daily Telegraph shareholders from Mr
Black. The letter called a special meeting to approve proposals in
connection with the float, which is expected to value the group at between
Pounds 400m and Pounds 500m.
The letter says that the 'need for approval of this loan by the shareholders
of the Daily Telegraph, other than Hollinger, . . . was inadvertently
overlooked'. Already Pounds 18m has been repaid and the remaining Pounds 15m
will be eliminated by the sale to the Daily Telegraph of Hollinger's 13 per
cent stake in Trinity International Holdings, the publisher of the Liverpool
Echo and Daily Post.
The Daily Telegraph will pay up to Pounds 20.2m for this stake, the balance
over Pounds 15m being met through an issue of preference shares to
Hollinger.
Shareholders will be asked to approve the payment of a special 10p dividend
as a means of 'rewarding existing shareholders ahead of the proposed
flotation', which will see Hollinger's stake reduced to about 70 per cent.
The dividend will be worth Pounds 11.1m to Hollinger.
Mr Black said that the prospect of economic recovery made this an
appropriate moment to float the Daily Telegraph, which will change its name
to The Telegraph, if shareholders approve. The float will be through a
public offering in the UK, and possibly limited private placements overseas.
Mr Black said that Hollinger had no intention of selling further shares
after the float, and that Hollinger and the Daily Telegraph would have a
worldwide co-operation agreement.
The meeting will be held on May 18, and a pathfinder prospectus is expected
in the first half of June, with listing particulars following later that
month.
The document also shows that Mr Joe Cooke, the Daily Telegraph managing
director, is currently negotiating a service agreement for a fixed term
until August 1996. His gross annual salary is Pounds 263,000, excluding
pension contributions.
The Daily Telegraph yesterday announced an increase in pre-tax profits from
Pounds 7.9m to Pounds 9.5m for the first quarter of 1992. The increase is
exaggerated because the comparable period included the Gulf war when
advertising revenue was particularly depressed.
Mr Cooke believed that 'things are easing up a bit' in the advertising
market. 'At least the recession is not getting any worse,' he added.
The increased first quarter profits were achieved on turnover of Pounds
58.6m (Pounds 53.4m). Earnings per share rose from 4.5p to 5p.
In 1991 the Daily Telegraph made pre-tax profits of Pounds 40.5m on turnover
of Pounds 219m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11466</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / UK Company News: Joseph Holt shows all-round growth
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Joseph Holt, the Manchester-based brewer and hotelier, lifted turnover 26
per cent and pre-tax profit 11 per cent in 1991, and is raising the
dividend.
Turnover came to Pounds 22.5m (Pounds 17.8m) while the profit worked through
at Pounds 6.37m (Pounds 5.72m).
Earnings per share came out at 135.99p (123.99p) and a final dividend of 26p
is proposed for a total of 35p, against 31p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11467</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / UK Company News: Dowty chief spurns TI bid
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR BRUCE RALPH, chief executive of Dowty, the aerospace components company
facing a hostile Pounds 482m bid from TI Group, yesterday said that the real
battle would be over price.
As the company marshalled its resources to repel the 4-for-15 share bid, Mr
Ralph accused TI of opportunism. It had caught Dowty while vulnerable after
an expensive redundancy programme - 3,500 job losses - and after
restructuring to take account of defence spending cuts.
He rejected TI's claim that the companies would make a good business fit.
'We can see no business fit and no commercial logic from pulling the two
together,' Mr Ralph said.
TI's aerospace division supplied ring seals for gas turbine engines while
Dowty was already a world leader in aircraft landing gear. 'They have
different customers, different manufacturing techniques, different
technologies.'
He also dismissed TI's claim that its seals and Dowty's polymer businesses
would fit. TI was involved in mechanical engineering problems while Dowty
concentrated on materials technology. 'The only commonality is that they
both have seals in their names.'
Mr Andrew Large, a non-executive director, resigned yesterday. He is due to
become chairman of the Securities and Investments Board, a position Dowty
says he cannot hold while part of a company involved in a bid.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11468</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / UK Company News: Headington pensions suspended
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NORMA COHEN and ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PENSION payments to 240 former employees of Mr Robert Maxwell's Headington
Holdings due to be sent next week, were yesterday suspended by the pension
fund trustees because all funds may have already been spent.
Mr Geoffrey Booth of Headington's current trustees, Clay and Partners, said
that last week liquidators for the common fund manager of all the Maxwell
company pension funds had determined that Headington might have already paid
pensioners up to Pounds 655,000 more than the scheme's assets.
Last week Robson Rhodes, the liquidators, wrote to trustees of all the
Maxwell schemes detailing their share of the so-called Common Investment
Fund. Headington, which had all its funds in the CIF, may owe the fund money
or may have assets of up to Pounds 1.2m. Its liabilities are Pounds 2.5m.
Because of Headington's potential debts, Robson Rhodes has refused to
release any more funds to pay pensioners.
Meanwhile, solicitors for another Maxwell pension fund, MCP Trustees, said
its members would also have their payments suspended in June, unless the
Court ordered Robson Rhodes to free assets. It also might owe the CIF money
and Robson Rhodes has said it could not release any more funds. Mirror Group
Newspapers, which once employed the pensioners involved, will contribute to
the pension fund until the end of June to cover payments.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11469</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Letter: Proper use of engineers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr JOHN C CHICKEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Dr Murphy's letter (April 22) does not deal with all the problems of
employment of professional engineers in Britain. Having had experience in
both Britain and Germany I would add some points that should be considered
with the arguments Dr Murphy presented.
Having interviewed several early and mid-career engineers, with quite
reasonable university education behind them, I have been very disappointed
that many have been willing to accept jobs at the technician/technologist
level rather than struggle for positions as a fully responsible professional
engineer. This may mean that some employers use graduate engineers when they
need only employ technicians. It therefore must be recognised that, without
appropriate qualifications, official statistics of the employment of
engineers can give a misleading impression.
German employers try and use all employees, including engineers, as
efficiently as possible. This may partly account for German GNP/head of
population being considerably higher than Britain's.
The test for all employees should be: 'What is your contribution to the
commercial success of your employer?'
John C Chicken,
J C Consultancy,
68 Chapel Fields,
Charterhouse Road,
Godalming, Surrey GU7 2AA
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11470</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Letter: Grounds for a Lloyds bid for Midland are 'dubious',
says union
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr LEIF MILLS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, There has been much recent press speculation about the possibility of
Lloyds Bank making a bid to take over Midland Bank. The speculation is
allegedly based on sources from within Lloyds Bank. Your own editorial
(April 22) seemed to support the idea on the very dubious grounds that 'only
a full-scale integration of two banks is likely to bring about the scale of
cost-cuts the industry needs'.
We are the only union in Midland Bank and have some two-thirds of the staff
in membership. In Lloyds Bank, we have over 15,000 members, which again is a
significant proportion of the total workforce.
We have been involved in discussions with Midland Bank about the bid from
Hongkong Bank and have received a number of assurances, which we welcome. We
have had no discussion with Lloyds and I find it extraordinary that Lloyds
could even consider a merger with Midland without discussing the matter with
us, representing many thousands of staff in both banks.
If Lloyds were to merge with Midland there would be wholesale branch
closures and reductions of staff and - contrary to what your editorial said
 -this is not what the industry needs, nor is it what the staff needs.
There is a great myth being perpetrated that Britain is 'over-banked'. Such
myths carry credence when they are repeated, but there is no evidence for
that. In comparison with many other developed countries we are under-banked:
there are more people still paid in cash and there are more monetary
transactions carried out in cash than elsewhere. Staff numbers in the
various British banks have been cut fairly savagely in the last year and the
result is that existing staff margins and pressures have become extremely
acute. At the same time the pre-tax profit figures - without allowing for
the incidence of bad debts because of the economic recession - have been
extremely good and this is a direct result of the efforts of the staff in
branches up and down the country.
If Lloyds makes a bid for Midland, then I trust that the director-general of
the Office of Fair Trading will immediately call for a reference to the
Monopolies and Mergers Commission. I would hope, however, that Lloyds does
not make such a bid. If it does, it will add to uncertainty and confusion -
and this is the last thing that staff as well as customers need.
Leif Mills,
general secretary,
BIFU,
Sheffield House,
1b Amity Grove,
Raynes Park,
London SW20 0LG
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11471</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Letter: EC move on direct mail will create problems
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr PETER CHILCOTT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Andrew Hill's article on proposed EC data protection legislation ('Data
protection raises EC hackles', April 21) covers much essential ground in
this debate but misses some vital points. The proposed directive, in part
intended to protect consumers from 'junk mail', will have precisely the
opposite effect.
There is no doubt that a right to restrict the use of data on private
individuals should be enshrined in law. People should have the right to know
what data is held on them and who holds it. They should also have a right to
have their names removed from lists if they want.
The draft regulations with regard to direct mail will create far more
problems than they solve, however.
For example, the Commission's draft directive says that 'profiling' in the
use of computer lists will be forbidden. Thus, if an insurance company
selling policies specifically geared to women has a list of names and
addresses it will be illegal just to select women on the list  - the company
must mail to all the men also.
This is nothing short of ludicrous. It will add massively to the costs of
direct mail and these costs will ultimately be passed on to the consumer. It
will greatly increase the annoyance caused by direct mail because it will
truly become junk mail.
It is to be hoped that the Commission will take note of the European
parliament's concerns - and those of the many professionals in data use and
data protection who have made their views known - and amend the draft
directive accordingly.
Peter Chilcott,
Peterborough Mailing,
21 The Square,
Vicarage Farm Road,
Peterborough PE1 5TT
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11472</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / In the beginning . . .: The latest cosmic discovery
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLIVE COOKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Cosmology is in a ferment this weekend, as scientists study the first
pictures ever received of the young universe, expanding out of the Big Bang
which created everything about 15bn years ago.
The observations, made from space by a US satellite, show gigantic ripples
of matter forming from the original cosmic fireball. These are by far the
earliest signs of the 'lumpiness' of the universe, which gravity was later
to pull together into galaxies, stars, planets and the objects familiar from
life on earth.
The significance of the discovery, announced on Thursday, may not match some
of yesterday's fevered newspaper headlines, which suggested that the 'riddle
of the universe' was now solved. Even so, it is the most important event in
cosmology since 1964, when scientists detected microwave radiation coming
uniformly from all parts of the sky - a faint after-glow left over from the
Big Bang itself.
That evidence convinced most cosmologists that the Big Bang theory of the
universe was broadly correct and discredited the rival Steady State theory.
But it left several mysteries. How could everything become so evenly mixed
in the instant following the Big Bang? And how could this evenly distributed
matter then clump together?
This week's discovery - the result of 300m observations made over the course
of a year by Nasa's Cosmic Background Explorer satellite (Cobe) - will help
cosmologists to resolve these mysteries.
Cobe has found variations in the cosmic background radiation which had
previously seemed to come so evenly from all directions. Analysis by
computer proves that these are genuine fluctuations in the after-glow from
the Big Bang, rather than distortions caused by radiation from astronomical
objects.
The variations represent huge ripples of matter, stretching across billions
of light-years of space and dating back about 15bn years to when the
universe was just 300,000 years old. At that time all matter was as hot as
the sun today.
The most powerful telescopes have already shown objects such as quasars and
galaxies so far away that their radiation set out when the universe was 1bn
years old or less than 10 per cent of its present age. Cobe has in effect
taken a huge leap back in time to a universe 0.002 per cent of its present
age.
It may be impossible ever to 'see' further into the past than that; when the
universe was less than 300,000 years old it was too dense to allow radiation
to escape. But scientists will use Cobe's observations - which will become
sharper as the satellite spends more time in orbit - to extrapolate back to
within a tiny fraction of a second of the Big Bang.
Nasa scientists say the first fuzzy pictures from Cobe agree with a version
of the Big Bang theory known as 'inflationary cosmology'. It postulates that
the universe had a burst of unbelievably rapid expansion - faster even than
the speed of light  - during a period lasting less than one trillionth of a
second, immediately after its creation.
All the fundamental particles and forces we know today originated during
this inflationary micro-period. At the same time, minute fluctuations in the
density of matter arose, leading to the cosmic ripples seen by Cobe and
eventually the uneven universe in which we live.
The Cobe observations also support the widely held theory that the familiar
objects seen by astronomers - galaxies, stars, planets, quasars,
interstellar dust clouds and so on - make up less than 10 per cent and
perhaps as little as 1 per cent of all material in the universe today. This
is because the amount of gravity provided by the visible fluctuations is not
nearly enough to pull together galaxies and clusters of galaxies.
The remainder of the universe consists of mysterious 'dark matter'. Mr
Edward Wright, a Cobe scientist from the University of California, said this
'must be a new kind of matter, not yet detected. We need such invisible
matter to explain how galaxies formed in the early universe and gathered
themselves together into huge clusters. Ordinary matter would be attracted
into regions of concentrated dark matter and the universe as we know it
today could develop.'
Particle physicists have proposed a long list of exotic particles left over
from the Big Bang, as possible candidates to make up the dark matter. They
include heavy neutrinos, Higgsinos, gravitinos, axions, photinos and wimps
(weakly interacting massive particles).
The Cobe observations tell us nothing directly about the identity of dark
matter. But they give a basis for calculating how much dark matter there is
in the universe. That is the vital issue for the future of the universe.
Is there enough matter for gravity to stop the universe expanding and to
draw everything together again in a Big Crunch tens of billions of years
from now? Or will the universe continue flying apart for ever, as the stars
gradually burn out and everything spreads out into an infinite coldness?
The first reaction of some scientists to the Cobe results was that they
supported the idea of a 'closed universe' which would pull itself back
together. Others continued to support the 'open universe' theory. Professor
Martin Rees, director of Cambridge University's Institute of Astronomy, said
tentatively that they were consistent with a 'flat universe' precisely
balanced between being open and closed.
What is needed now to solve the riddle of the universe is more precise
observations from Cobe, backed up by ground-based instruments which Prof
Rees said would soon be able to detect irregularities in the background
radiation.
It is reasonable to expect that, by the end of the century, there will be a
scientific consensus about the ultimate fate of the universe. That may be of
no practical use to anyone, but it is bound to have a cultural and social
impact on humanity, knowing whether our ultimate future is in another cosmic
fireball or cold nothingness.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11473</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Man in the News: Trench fighter in the cockpit - John Cahill
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The inscription on the bulky grandfather clock in BTR's boardroom sums up
the simple philosophy of Mr John Cahill, the industrial conglomerate's
former chief executive: 'Think of rest . . . and work on.'
Mr Cahill, 61, was forced to step down last year after reaching BTR's
mandatory retirement age of 60. Instead of taking life easy in his homes in
Rhode Island, Florida and London, reading 18th-century English history,
listening to classical music or playing tennis - all of which he likes - he
has just agreed to take on probably the most difficult job in British
industry.
As the new full-time chairman of British Aerospace, he faces the daunting
task of rebuilding the badly dented reputation of the country's biggest
exporter of manufactured goods and restoring a sense of direction to the
group.
When he was running BTR, he once warned the 1990s would be a tough decade.
'The dinosaurs will roll over and die and the people who will survive will
be the ones who offer good service and have a good cost base,' he said.
For BAe, the 1990s have so far been tougher than for most other groups. The
company has been battered by the cyclical decline in its commercial
aerospace, cars and property and construction businesses while its core
military activities have been hit by post Cold War defence spending cuts.
Since its flopped Pounds 432m rights issue, the subsequent boardroom coup
and the ousting of the then chairman, Professor Sir Roland Smith, last
September, morale inside the company has been rock bottom.
With one foot still in plaster following a fall six weeks ago, Mr Cahill
seemed anxious on Thursday to get down to work. 'The man was not designed to
relax,' says one of his former BTR associates. 'He is a very bad retiree and
he doesn't like holidays.'
Lean and long, with an urbane, soft-spoken manner, Mr Cahill has always had
the reputation of a workaholic. He has already spent time studying BAe and
its current operations. Before accepting the job of chairman, he took
independent soundings of the state of the company. 'He came to see me and I
gave him a pretty grim expose of BAe's problems. I thought he would never
accept the job after what I told him,' says an aerospace consultant.
But the job offers Mr Cahill a big opportunity to turn BAe around. As an
outsider, and someone who has never been part of the 'old boy' network, he
can take a fresh look at the company's problems and engineer its
restructuring. 'He's nobody's fool. He thinks on his feet and he will
undoubtedly take a hands-on approach to the business,' says a City banker.
There is a question mark, however, on how much freedom he will have to
introduce new strategies. One of the conditions set by BAe for the job was
that the new chairman had to work closely with the company's existing top
management team to pursue the broad policy objectives set out in last year's
ill-fated rights issue document.
Mr Cahill confirmed he intended to work with Mr Dick Evans, BAe chief
executive, and the board. Tough decisions will have to be taken on
restructuring and these are likely to provoke tensions inside the company.
But Mr Cahill appears relatively optimistic and says: 'I understand the
philosophy of the industry; I don't regard aerospace as a 'has been'
business but a healthy one.'
The new BAe chairman is an old-fashioned capitalist in the American
managerial mould. He describes himself as 'a factory man'. He is not flash,
wears understated suits and quiet ties and he dislikes ostentation - a trait
that is in the parsimonious tradition of BTR.
His business credo is, in a nutshell, to keep a constant tight grip on costs
while improving operational and financial efficiency. 'I'm a trench
fighter,' he once said.
After leaving school, he worked for a few years in the City as a stockbroker
and then became a salesman peddling fancy goods. He joined BTR - then the
Birmingham Tyre and Rubber Company  - as a management trainee when he was
25. He worked there until last year with long spells in the US. He rose to
become chief executive in 1987. Even after taking charge of BAe, he is
maintaining his ties with BTR as a director.
But for all his rock-solid industrial background, Mr Cahill will have to
display more than his single-minded dedication to business if he is to make
a success of his five-year term at BAe. Although regarded as a very good
operational man ('He knows how to make a valve company more efficient,'
remarks an engineering industry analyst), some doubt whether he will have
the necessary vision to deal with the strategic issues facing BAe.
These include the need to find international partners for many of the
group's diverse activities, sell or dispose of other components of the
company and ultimately decide whether to retain the property and car
businesses or simply refocus the company around defence and aerospace.
Mr Cahill conceded this week that he was not a political animal and
suggested it was Mr Evans who had the political contacts. But it is
difficult to see how he can remain apolitical as chairman of a company whose
primary customers are governments throughout the world - the UK's and Saudi
Arabia's chief among them.
He will also have to prove he can be number one. Although chief executive,
he was always overshadowed at BTR by Sir Owen Green, the chairman.
With his appointment, BAe has picked a man with a proven record as a chief
executive. The irony would be to see his arrival create a chief executive
triumvirate at the top of the company consisting of Mr Cahill, Mr Evans and
Mr George Simpson, BAe's recently appointed deputy chief executive. That
would leave the company still looking for a chairman.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11474</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Leading Article: Prospects for Majornomics
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
IT'S DEJA VU all over again, as the late Sam Goldwyn might have put it. This
will certainly be a strong feeling among the finance ministers gathering in
Washington for the Group of Seven this week. They will look at an IMF
economic forecast - growth, but not just yet  - in which only the dates seem
to have been changed since last year, and wonder why they should believe it
this time. They will hear the familiar American call for economic
stimulation, and will no doubt offend Mr Nicholas Brady by giving the usual
answers about inflationary pressures.
This provides a rather grey setting for Britain's triumphantly grey prime
minister, Mr John Major. He would not ask for anything more stimulating, for
nobody hates inflation more than he does. His view will be influential, for
his prestige among his foreign colleagues is much enhanced. It is now based
on achievement rather than promise, and enviable achievement at that: he is
the one statesman in the world who has managed to retain popular support
while disinflating the economy.
His prestige certainly goes a long way, too, to explain the extraordinary
surge in sterling last week - a natural response to the end of political
uncertainty, but also something more. The historic parallel here is a little
more distant: it is a decade since another likeable advocate of the free
market first inherited a savage monetary squeeze, and then sought to revive
the economy through massive public borrowing. The markets loved Mr Reagan,
too.
Irresistible promise
The irresistible rise of the dollar from 1982 to early 1985 was propelled by
the developing country debt crisis. For worried investors, the American
promise of high real interest rates for lending to a sound, politically
stable economy was irresistible. Foreign investors eagerly bought the bonds
issued to finance a national deficit which had been denounced as ruinous and
irresponsible. (Did Mr Peter Peterson, the most insistent prophet of doom,
brief Mrs Thatcher during her US visit two weeks ago?) Foreign investors
went on to drive up an undervalued equity market. What went up did in the
end come down - but relatively smoothly, and years later.
The parallels are quite striking. What is happening now, as then, is
essentially a flight to quality. It was foreign demand for gilts which
powered sterling last week, making fools again of those who forecast a
funding crisis. The British are a self-deprecating race, so readers may find
the idea of a flight into sterling bizarre. But if you compare British
consensus and consolidation with German inflation and the threat of strikes,
or Mr Major's secure position with that of President Mitterrand - or even
President Bush  - it is not so implausible.
For the Japanese, still the world's main savers, the appeal is especially
strong. This line of thought leads on seductively. British equities look
significantly undervalued, compared at least with Wall Street. A full replay
of the Reagan experience would be a heady prospect for British investors. It
is time, before optimism gets out of hand, to list the differences between
Reaganomics and the choices open to Mr Major.
Currency gains
The most obvious is that while the dollar floats freely against the other
leading currencies - and in the end sank pretty freely  - sterling's
movements are constrained. Since investors tend to factor in currency gains
with market gains, this should ensure that sterling securities are less
internationally volatile than dollar securities, and so calm things down.
More important, Mr Major does not share Mr Reagan's comforting beliefs that
deficits don't matter, and can in any case be reduced by cutting taxes. He
will pursue a more conventional path, again with less dramatic results.
Finally, Mr Reagan had the luck to share a world boom; Mr Major's prospects
are dimmer.
All the same, they are favourable in many ways, and enviable in some. The
pain of the recession has produced real gains in efficiency, so British
competitiveness looks stronger (and German much weaker) than seemed likely
when sterling's ERM central rate was first chosen. British employment costs
are especially attractive within Europe, thanks to comparatively low social
charges and favourable demographics. Substantial inward investment is likely
to persist, providing jobs and future export growth, even if European growth
is undynamic.
This inward flow will help, too, to finance the British current account
deficit - indeed, as the US government used to argue, a current deficit is
the accounting counterpart of a foreign inflow. This is still the most
awkward corner Mr Major faces; for although the current account should in
theory be a mere memorandum item in a world of free capital movements, a big
deficit can still frighten the markets. Revived demand at home, and the
arrival of foreign capital equipment threaten such frights. But Mr Major has
one unique bit of luck: due to a bureaucratic shake-up, the British trade
figures will vanish altogether for half of 1993. Long live invisible trade.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11475</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Sillars condemns '90-minute patriots'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON, Scottish Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JIM SILLARS, deputy leader of the Scottish National party and a leading
campaigner for Scottish independence, has said that he now doubts whether
Scots have the 'character and ability' to face up to the responsibility of
making their country independent.
Mr Sillars, who lost his Glasgow Govan seat to Labour in the general
election, said Scotland had too many '90-minute patriots' whose national
outpourings were confined to big sporting events.
In a Scottish Television interview he said that Scots had twice mishandled
the chance of taking a decisive step forward - once in the referendum on a
devolved assembly in 1979 and again on April 9. It was very unlikely they
would get a third chance.
He complained that, from January, the people of Scotland had been telling
the world they were heading for independence and then in the end Mrs
Margaret Thatcher had been right when she had said that when it came to the
crunch Scots would hesitate.
Mr Sillars said he was not giving up the deputy leadership of the SNP, but
had no immediate desire to return to Westminster.
He said that the drive by opposition parties to secure a multi-option
referendum on Scotland's constitutional future was a post-election placebo -
it was dishonest to pretend that Scots would win devolution in such a way.
The revival of the Scottish Conservative party would continue at the next
general election.
The strength of popular demand for a referendum will be tested tomorrow when
Scotland United, the newly formed grouping of all non-Conservative parties,
holds a rally in Glasgow. It hopes to attract more than the 3,000 to 4,000
people who attended its first rally on the Sunday after the election.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11476</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Nucor sees 'interesting possibilities' in Scotland
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON, Scottish Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NUCOR, the US steel producer, is to investigate what it calls 'interesting
possibilities' for building a 1.2m-tonne-a-year steel plant on a greenfield
site in Scotland.
Mr Keith Busse, a vice-president of Nucor, said in Glasgow that the most
promising site was at Hunterston on the Firth of Clyde, where British Steel
has an ore-handling terminal, but other sites would be investigated.
He was speaking towards the end of a visit to Scotland, during which he
looked at British Steel's Ravenscraig plant, at Motherwell, Lanarkshire,
which is due to be closed in September.
He said the decision that it would not be economic to introduce Nucor's thin
slab compact strip production technology at Ravenscraig did not exclude the
use of other facilities there, such as the basic oxygen steel production
shop. It was unlikely to be the best location for the compact strip project,
though.
Mr Busse said Nucor would examine whether the costs of setting up a plant on
a greenfield site could be reduced to 'the competitive levels we have to
meet before putting forward a project'. That would take several weeks.
Mr Busse, who visited Scotland at the invitation of Scottish Enterprise, the
official development body, acknowledged that to build a plant at Hunterston
would require the co-operation of British Steel, which owned the terminal.
British Steel is said to be wary of allowing a competitor with low-cost
production methods to set up in Britain.
Mr Busse acknowledged that Europe still had overcapacity in steelmaking but
said Nucor's success in the US had been based on applying new technology in
markets where there was also overcapacity of older equipment.
The greenfield site plant would be a joint venture with a partner Nucor
would find in Europe. It would employ between 500 and 700 people and make
rolled strip products for the UK and Continental markets.
Mr Busse said he had spoken to Mr Allan Stewart, the Scottish industry
minister, and found him very supportive. But Nucor did not believe in
seeking government subsidies, nor would it try to obtain subsidised energy
prices.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11477</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Fowler favourite to be Tory chairman
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH and DAVID OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SIR Norman Fowler, a former cabinet minister and Mr John Major's 'minder'
during the election campaign, is odds-on favourite to succeed Mr Chris
Patten as Tory party chairman.
Mr Major is said to share Mr Patten's belief that the job should go to a
political heavyweight instead of - as sometimes happens just after an
election - a 'caretaker'.
Sir Norman resigned from Mrs Thatcher's administration early in 1990 to
spend more time with his family after a long cabinet career, but has
remained active as a senior backbencher at Westminster.
An announcement is expected soon, although Mr Patten will stay on until
after next month's local elections before taking up his post as governor of
Hong Kong in July.
Mr Jeffrey Archer, the author and former deputy chairman, who played a
vigorous role in the Tory election campaign and has been tireless in his
work for the party, is said to be a contender.
Another candidate who has been mentioned is Dame Angela Rumbold, who became
the party's deputy chairman and a privy councillor in the post-election
reshuffle.
The party chairman is necessarily someone who enjoys the prime minister's
trust, but the post does not carry automatic cabinet rank.
Since he left the cabinet Sir Norman has become a non-executive director of
NFC, the transport company, and Evered Bardon, the quarry products group.
Mr Patten is said to believe there are important and strategic decisions to
be taken over the next three to four years, not least in reducing the
party's overdraft. He is also believed to be confident that the organisation
was effective during the election campaign, for example in the targeting of
marginal seats.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11478</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Accountants face BCCI inquiry
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRICE Waterhouse and Ernst &amp; Young will be scrutinised as part of an
investigation into the Bank of Credit and Commerce International launched
yesterday by the accountancy profession's disciplinary body.
A committee of inquiry into the collapse of BCCI has been appointed by the
Joint Disciplinary Scheme, operated by the Institute of Chartered
Accountants in England and Wales, its sister institute in Scotland, and the
Chartered Association of Certified Accountants. The committee will examine
'the conduct and competence of members and member firms' in relation to the
collapse of the bank, which was closed by the Bank of England on July 5 last
year.
The remit is wide-ranging but is likely to examine the work of Ernst &amp;
Young, auditor to BCCI until 1987, and Price Waterhouse, which took over as
auditor to the worldwide group. It also has powers to examine the role of
any chartered accountants who were BCCI employees.
Such investigations are rare and launched only into serious issues that
command a high level of public interest. The only other current
investigations are into the circumstances surrounding Barlow Clowes, the
disgraced fund management company, and Alexander Howden and Minet, the
insurance companies criticised in a 1990 Department of Trade and Industry
report for diversion of reinsurance funds.
Mr Elwyn Eilledge, senior partner at Ernst &amp; Young, said: 'From our own
review, we are extremely confident about our role in BCCI. I don't feel we
have anything to hide.'
Mr Ian Brindle, senior partner at Price Waterhouse, said: 'There is a
certain inevitability to this investigation. We will co-operate as far as
the law allows. Our conduct was exemplary and our competence is of the
highest order.'
The investigation comes as the profession's disciplinary procedures are
being hardened. The most recent finding of the scheme was a Pounds 100,000
fine against Arthur Young for its role as auditor to Millbury, the collapsed
house-building group controlled by Mr Jim Raper.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11479</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / FT's David Lascelles wins award
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
DAVID LASCELLES of the Financial Times has been named senior financial
journalist of the year in the Wincott press awards for 1991. The judges
commended him for his 'masterly series' on the BCCI banking affair.
Mr Nigel Lawson, the former chancellor, presented Mr Lascelles with a cheque
for Pounds 1,500 yesterday. The awards are made in memory of the late Harold
Wincott, a former Financial Times commentator.
Neil Bennett of The Times was young financial journalist of the year and The
Daily Telegraph Business News was Business Journal of the Year. The BBC2
Money Programme was the best business programme and Peter Jay, the economics
editor, was praised for his contributions.
Paul Neild, of Channel 4 news, was broadcast business journalist of the
year. The BBC1 Troubleshooter series won a special commendation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11480</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Haulage group names chairman
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Martin Llowarch, who stepped down unexpectedly as chief executive of
British Steel last year, is to become chairman of Transport Development
Group, one of Britain's biggest road hauliers.
Mr Llowarch, who was regarded as a possible future chairman of British Steel
until he resigned last May, will succeed Sir James Duncan, who retires at
the end of August on reaching 65. Sir James has been chairman since 1975 and
has been on the board since 1960.
Mr Llowarch joined the board only in February. The decision to bring in an
outsider is another sign of the management shake-up at a company, where
profits have marked time for several years. Mr Alan Cole, TDG's chief
executive, joined in June 1990. He took over from Mr Jim Lockhart, another
TDG veteran who had been group managing director for 11 years.
Mr Llowarch, 56, also sits on the boards of Abbey National, Hickson
International and Johnson &amp; Firth Brown. Before embarking on his career as a
non-executive director, Mr Llowarch had spent 23 years at British Steel,
including a spell as finance director. Mr Cecil Parkinson, the former Tory
cabinet minister, has been appointed non-executive deputy chairman of
Starmin, the quarry products company.
Mr Peter Ryan is to take over the chairmanship of Torday &amp; Carlisle, the
engineering company.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11481</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Volkswagen falls out with Yanase
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Volkswagen, the German car maker, has fallen out with its Japanese importer,
Yanase, which said yesterday it would stop handling Volkswagen and Audi
models at the end of the year.
The decision by Yanase threatens to disrupt Volkswagen sales in Japan, where
Volkswagen claims the largest share of imported cars. Volkswagen, however,
has been expanding its own sales outlets. It has also begun to sell through
Toyota dealers and may be in position to bounce back.
Yanase, Japan's biggest imported car dealer, was unhappy at the prospect of
losing its near-exclusive sales of Volkswagen models and will attempt to
replace Volkswagen sales with other cars, possibly from Opel the German
subsidiary of General Motors.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11482</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / EC disputes Japanese claim on car export curbs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL and STEVEN BUTLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS, TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN has agreed to cut car and light commercial vehicle exports to the EC
by 6 per cent this year, Brussels officials said yesterday, contradicting EC
and Japanese officials in Tokyo who said the cut was likely to be 1.5 to 2
per cent.
A senior Commission official in Brussels said the EC would never have
accepted a cut of 2 per cent. Officially, neither side will discuss the
specific terms of the agreement, which involves Japan 'monitoring' its
exports to the EC, but there was confusion about the implications of the
deal, reflecting the sensitivity of the issue.
'The key thing here is that the Japanese have accepted to reduce exports,'
said Mr Antonio Menezes, spokesman for the delegation of the EC in Tokyo.
An official of the vehicle division of Japan's Ministry of International
Trade and Industry said: 'The EC and Japan both recognise that demand in the
EC will decline by 1.5 to 2 per cent compared to 1991. Japan will monitor
car exports so as not to cause market disruption.'
The official said that the agreement was made taking into account the
difficulties of European vehicle makers, and that it would be desirable for
Japanese exports to decline by slightly more than the contraction of the
market.
But it was maintained in Brussels yesterday that Japanese exports of cars
and light commercial vehicles would fall by 75,000 units to 1.185m this year
 -a drop of 6 per cent from 1.26m last year. The Japanese share of the EC
car and light commercial vehicle market would fall to 11 per cent this year
from 11.3 per cent last year. Earlier, the Japanese authorities had appeared
surprised by reports out of Brussels that they might reduce exports by 5 per
cent.
The 1992 agreement is the last before a longer-term agreement comes into
force, with the aim of opening the Community market gradually between 1993
and 1999. The 1993-99 deal is a similar 'gentleman's agreement' and - like
this week's accord - was called into question almost as soon as it had been
made.
European car-makers have been hit by the decline in demand and restructuring
costs, but it remains unclear how much relief the Japanese export curbs will
bring them, as production by Japanese manufacturers in the UK is to
increase. European production by Japanese companies is not covered by either
accord.
Meanwhile, a unilateral decision by the Japanese government to cut export
quotas to the US has been condemned in the US as inadequate. Japanese
exports to the US have declined steadily in recent years, but have been more
than replaced by increased local production.
The exports cuts are likely to prevent Japanese makers from boosting exports
at a time when the domestic market is declining. The Japan Automobile
Manufacturers Association yesterday reported that vehicle production in the
year to last month fell by 3.3 per cent, the first decline in five years.
While exports remained stable, domestic demand fell 4.8 per cent.
Mazda, the Japanese car maker, said yesterday it was cancelling night shifts
at its recently-opened plant in Hofu, Yamaguchi Prefecture, because of slack
demand. Toyota said this week it would suspend night shifts for some models
produced at its fourth Tahara plant in Aichi Prefecture. Japanese retail
sales in March were down 4.1 per cent on March 1991 as the slowdown in the
Japanese economy bit more deeply into consumer spending. This is the
steepest drop since 1965.
Luxury items were hard hit, but even clothing sales were down sharply by 3.2
per cent. Retailers blamed unseasonal weather.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11483</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Debt write-down urged
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN HUNT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A substantial write-down of the third world's debt to commercial banks was
urged yesterday by the World Commission on Environment and Development,
which has spent three days in London debating the Earth Summit to be held in
Rio de Janeiro in June, John Hunt reports. The commission said developing
countries' debts were forcing them to sacrifice environmental assets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11484</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Aid pledge for Pakistan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Western donors yesterday pledged Dollars 2.3bn in new aid for Pakistan, to
help it continue efforts to curb poverty while at the same carrying out
ambitious economic reforms, William Dawkins reports from Paris. The package,
which fell slightly short of the government's requests, was agreed at a
two-day meeting of the World Bank Pakistan Consortium. Donors also earmarked
Dollars 220m to help feed and resettle some of the 3.5m Afghan refugees.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11485</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Fed to relax its banking curbs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE US Federal Reserve yesterday said it was relaxing its rules to allow
bank holding companies to offer more kinds of financial services.
Ms Susan Phillips, a Fed governor, said the new rules would allow bank
holding companies and their non-banking affiliates to offer full brokerage
services for corporate clients, as well as to provide financial and
investment advice in certain areas.
The Fed will also broaden the types of leasing operations banks may
undertake.
The changes are among measures announced yesterday by the administration as
part of its 90-day effort to reduce regulations. President George Bush said
yesterday that he would announce more deregulatory moves next Wednesday.
Mr John Robson, treasury deputy secretary, also said the four federal
agencies which regulate banks in the US - the Fed, the Office of the
Comptroller of the Currency, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and
the Office of Thrift Supervision - would be working to harmonise supervisory
procedures.
The agencies plan to agree on uniform interpretations of banking regulations
and, in cases where a bank is supervised by two or more agencies, to
co-ordinate inspections in order to cut down on compliance costs.
Mr Robson also announced a new rule from the Environmental Protection Agency
which will clarify the circumstances in which lenders may have to assume
liability for cleaning up toxic waste sites under the Superfund law.
He said some banks had been unwilling to lend to companies because they
feared that if they later had to foreclose on the loan they could be held
responsible for the cost of cleaning up the company's polluted sites.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11486</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Bosnian capital enjoys a lull in ethnic fighting
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURA SILBER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BELGRADE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SARAJEVO, the capital of Bosnia-Hercegovina, yesterday saw a lull in the
fighting that broke out immediately after the leaders of Moslem Slavs,
Serbs, and Croats had agreed to observe a ceasefire brokered by the European
Community on April 12.
Sarjevo residents described it as the worst night of clashes since battles
erupted in Bosnia about seven weeks ago over its bid for independence from
Yugoslavia.
The EC team, led by Lord Carrington, the chairman of the EC peace
conference, said talks would resume in Lisbon on Monday if a ceasefire was
in place.
Meanwhile, Mr Boutros Boutros Ghali, the UN secretary general, said
yesterday no party was blameless for the situation in Bosnia-Hercegovina,
but it was not feasible to dispatch a UN peace-keeping force to the
strife-torn republic.
In western Bosnia, Croatian radio reported 94 federal soldiers killed in
fighting between Serb and Croat forces. But Tanjug, the Belgrade-based news
agency, said four soldiers had been killed and 50 wounded, and it claimed
Croat forces had suffered far greater losses.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11487</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / French budget deficit still rising
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE French government budget deficit will overshoot its budget target again
this year because of lower than expected tax revenues, Mr Pierre Beregovoy,
the prime minister, said yesterday.
He expected the deficit to reach FFr135bn (Pounds 13.7bn), as against the
FFr90bn government estimate on which the current year's budget was based,
and slightly ahead of the FFr131.7bn budget deficit in 1991. This will be
slightly less than 2 per cent of gross domestic product, said Mr Beregovoy.
However, he pledged not to raise taxes and risk putting a brake on growth,
expected to rise to an annual 2.5 per cent in the first half, according to
Insee, the state statistics body. He would instead seek continued curbs on
government spending.
Mr Beregovoy said the latest sign of the French economy's competitiveness
was the widening in the trade surplus to FFr1.38bn in March, announced by
the customs directorate yesterday. This compares with a FFr391m surplus in
February and brings to FFr5.29bn the positive balance for the first three
months of this year, as against a FFr14.28bn shortfall in the same quarter
of last year.
Exports rose strongly in March, to FFr106.86bn, from FFr103.88bn in
February, according to the customs directorate. This was helped by an
unusually large number of Airbus commercial aircraft deliveries. Imports
rose less strongly, from FFr103.49bn to FFr105.48bn in the same period.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11488</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / OECD sees Austria as a top economic performer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ZURICH
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AUSTRIA'S economy should continue to be one of the best performers among
industrialised countries, with real growth this year likely to be close to
last year's 3 per cent, according to the Paris-based Organisation for
Economic Co-operation and Development.
The OECD, in its annual examination of Austrian economic policies and
prospects, chides the country for some slippage in its medium term programme
to reduce public sector deficits and for grossly excessive and anachronistic
agricultural support policies, but otherwise gives it a remarkably clean
bill of health.
'The Austrian economy has continued to do well in terms of all major
macroeconomic performance indicators: growth, employment and external and
internal financial stability,' the report concludes.
While exports have declined with the slump in demand from Germany, tourism
earnings have remained high. Domestic investment, especially in
construction, has been resilient despite higher interest rates caused by the
firm link between the Austrian schilling and the D-Mark. The 24.5 per cent
share of fixed investment in GDP last year was one of the highest in the
OECD.
Wage settlements have moderated, and their impact has been softened by
continuing improvements in productivity, as Austrian industry prepares for
integration with the European community. Also, the large numbers of
immigrant workers entering the market are depressing average wage rates. The
OECD projects a 1 per cent decline in Austrian relative unit labour costs in
common currency terms in both 1992 and 1993.
Exports are expected to decline further this year and the investment climate
may be adversely affected by lingering high interest rates. However, the
OECD believes a strong backlog of construction orders should limit the fall
in capital spending, and GDP should grow at 2.8 per cent this year and 2.7
per cent next year.
Still, the report criticises the government for extending its target of
reducing the federal deficit to 2.5 per cent of GDP from this year to 1994
and for tolerating budget overruns.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11489</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Bonn spurns US criticism of budget policy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE German government yesterday angrily rejected US criticism of its swollen
budget deficit, setting the scene for a sharp confrontation over the issue
at this weekend's meeting of finance ministers from the Group of Seven
industrialised nations.
Separate statements yesterday by Mr Theo Waigel, the German finance
minister, and Mr Horst Kohler, his state secretary and chief international
negotiator, made it clear they regard the criticism as both untimely and
unjustified.
Mr Kohler directly attacked Mr David Mulford, the US treasury secretary, for
what he described as 'one-sided and partially false judgments' on the state
of the German budget deficit.
He rejected the US criticism as 'unacceptable' on the eve of the G7 meeting,
and quite contrary to the principle of G7 co-operation - that 'every country
should keep its own house in order'.
Mr Mulford warned on Thursday that Germany's large fiscal deficit, run up to
pay for the cost of unification and subsidising east German industry, could
prove structural and long-lasting. It was a direct cause of high interest
rates and low growth in Europe, and a factor contributing to unemployment,
he said.
The angry German response suggests that Bonn is not only acutely sensitive
on the point, but remains unwilling to bend to international pressure for
sharp spending cuts or tax increases.
Mr Waigel said he was committed to a moratorium on the level of state
spending until the mid-1990s: every new payment must be matched by an
equivalent saving. From 1993-96, combined public sector budgets must be kept
to a growth of under 3 per cent, or half the expected growth of nominal
gross national product.
He said the forecast German budget deficit this year, at 3.5 per cent of
gross domestic product, was well under the 4.7 per cent level in the US, 4.8
per cent in the UK, and 9.9 per cent in Italy.
Meanwhile, Mr Helmut Schlesinger, the president of the Bundesbank, revealed
that the German economy recovered to a probable 4 per cent annual growth
rate in the first quarter - albeit largely thanks to unseasonally mild
weather - after three successive quarters of decline.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11490</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Patten faced with need to rebuild colony's confidence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR CHRIS Patten, who will arrive in Hong Kong as governor with less than
five years to go before the colony reverts to Chinese sovereignty, will
discover that it has regained much of the confidence lost following the 1989
Beijing massacre.
But even setting aside the broad issue of relations with China before the
transfer, some pressing near-term difficulties will await his attention.
Mr Patten will be keen to meet Lu Ping, China's director for Hong Kong
affairs, and try to defuse a row with China over the colony's broadcaster,
RTHK, which the government wants to give corporate status. The UK has been
accused in the Chinese media of seeking to make RTHK independent so the
network can serve British interests after 1997.
Although the economy is performing strongly, the present administration has
lost key supporters in the business community. The new governor must
convince businessmen he is able to safeguard their interests.
Important contracts for the new airport are pending and must go ahead
smoothly while inflation must be further addressed. Government plans to
increase imports of labour will be attacked by trade unions and will lead to
continued tension.
One simmering dispute which will have to be addressed this year is Hong
Kong's proposed court of final appeal, which will replace the Privy Council.
The structure of the court has been agreed between Britain and China, but
Hong Kong is unhappy it was not consulted on the decision. Mr Patten will
have to decide whether to push ahead with legislation on the court early
next year, and anger Hong Kong, or anger China by asking for renegotiation.
Other likely arguments stemming from the work of the Sino-British Joint
Liaison Group include the future of military lands and air service
agreements between Hong Kong and third countries.
Morale must be restored among the 186,000-strong civil service, which no
longer sees the traditional rewards of colonial office - such as British
honours - as so desirable.
The service also needs to become more politically aware now it is being
challenged by democratically elected politicians, and to increase links with
China. Police morale is also low, and violent crime is on the rise.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11491</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Russian government to raise oil prices sharply
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN LLOYD
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
OIL prices in Russia are set to rise sharply in the middle of the year,
pushing consumer prices up by 150 per cent, Mr Andrei Nechayev, economic
minister, said yesterday.
After a cabinet meeting in Moscow, he said the government would impose an
effective ceiling of Rbs2,200 a tonne (with a floor of Rbs1,800), up from
the present subsidised price of Rbs350 a tonne.
Gas prices will also rise to Rbs1,100-1,600 per thousand cubic metres for
all except domestic users, who will continue to pay the subsidised price of
Rbs260.
The rise of energy prices, the largest price subsidy left on the budget, is
seen by the International Monetary Fund as an essential step towards
currency stability.
The cabinet was given budget deficit estimates for the first quarter of this
year of Rbs24.3bn and Rbs205bn for the second quarter. The latter does not
take into account the impact of flows into the country of expected financial
aid.
Mr Alexei Ulyukayev, an economic adviser to the government, said inflation
was likely to come down to 15-20 per cent a month, from a current estimate
of 30-40 per cent.
Mr Yegor Gaidar, the first deputy prime minister, flies to Washington this
weekend for the meeting of the IMF and the World Bank.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11492</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / The Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 -----------------------------------------
STOCK INDICES
 -----------------------------------------
FT-SE 100: 2,643.0 (+33.2)
Yield 4.60
FT-SE Eurotrack 100 1,167.02 (-2.09)
FT-A All Share 1,275.75 (+1.1%)
Nikkei 17,542.45 (+140.40)
New York: lunchtime
Dow Jones Ind Ave 3,341.91 (-6.71)
S&amp;P Composite 410.53 (-1.07)
 -----------------------------------------
US LUNCHTIME RATES
 -----------------------------------------
Federal Funds: 3 1/2 %
3-mo Treas Bills: Yld 3.745%
Long Bond 99 1/4 Yield 8.066%
 -----------------------------------------
LONDON MONEY
 -----------------------------------------
3-mo Interbank 10 9/16 % (same)
Liffe long gilt future: Jun 98 3/8 (Jun 98 7/32 )
 -----------------------------------------
NORTH SEA OIL (Argus)
 -----------------------------------------
Brent 15-day (June) Dollars 18.85 (18.675)
 -----------------------------------------
GOLD
 -----------------------------------------
New York Comex Dollars 337.5 (339.3)
London Dollars 336.55 (338.75)
 -----------------------------------------
STERLING
 -----------------------------------------
New York lunchtime: Dollars 1.772
London:  Dollars 1.772 (1.765)
DM 2.925 (2.93)
FFr 9.8825 (9.8925)
SFr 2.715 (2.7225)
Y 238.5 (237.25)
Pounds Index 92.3 (92.2)
 -----------------------------------------
DOLLAR
 -----------------------------------------
New York lunchtime:
DM 1.6505
FFr 5.5745
SFr 1.531
Y 134.55
London:
DM 1.6505 (1.6605)
FFr 5.5775 (5.605)
SFr 1.5325 (1.542)
Y 134.55 (134.45)
Dollars Index 64.9 (65.1)
Tokyo close: Y 134.65
 -----------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11493</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0B8AAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Iraq acts to curb price rises
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BAGHDAD
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Iraq removed import duties on meat and potatoes yesterday to check a sharp
rise in prices since its Gulf war defeat, Reuter reports from Baghdad. The
most essential foods such as rice, flour and cooking oil were already exempt
but pre-war duties had remained in force on items for which the government
had wanted to encourage local production. Luxury foods, including tinned
goods, will still have high tariffs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11494</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0B8AADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Investment rising in Romania
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VIRGINIA MARSH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUCHAREST
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE LEVEL of foreign investment in Romania showed a modest increase in the
first quarter, according to the country's development agency.
A further Dollars 54.4m had been pledged by the end of March, bringing the
total in the period beginning January 1990 to Dollars 323.1m, said the
Romanian Development Agency (RDA), a state-funded body responsible for
attracting foreign investment.
Western European investors continue to provide the bulk of foreign capital -
66 per cent - followed by the US with 12 per cent, and Middle Eastern
countries with 8.5 per cent.
Small and medium-sized companies, mainly concentrated in the trade and
tourism sectors, remain the principle conduits for foreign investment.
Foreign partners were now participating in more than 10,000 local companies;
only 42 companies had secured foreign investments of more than Dollars 1m
apiece.
However, the RDA believes larger companies were becoming more interested in
Romania. Colgate-Palmolive, Siemens and Alcatel had recently stepped up
their involvement.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11495</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0B8AACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Albania and IMF agree economic reform plan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES PETTIFER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TIRANA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
OFFICIALS from the International Monetary Fund in Tirana have agreed an
outline economic reform plan with the newly elected democratic party
government in Albania led by Mr Sali Berisha.
The plan emphasises the need for the rapid closure of uneconomic state
enterprises and an end to the current system of state subsidies.
The new government inherited a disintegrating economy with annual inflation
running at over 500 per cent and industrial production at less than a third
of capacity due to shortages of water and breakdowns in electricity supply.
Part of the key mining sector is at a standstill.
Official unemployment is put at 20 per cent of the labour force but
thousands of workers produce little in factories crippled by raw material
and component shortages but are still being paid 80 per cent of their wages.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11496</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0B8AABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Paris backs off student reforms
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN DAVIDSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Jack Lang, education minister in the new French government headed by Mr
Pierre Beregovoy, has moved swiftly to suspend the implementation of the
university reforms proposed by his predecessor, Mr Lionel Jospin.
Mr Lang yesterday praised the purpose of the Jospin reforms: 'Their
objective is good,' he said. But since they had led to misunderstandings, he
was postponing their application.
The 'misunderstandings' of the Jospin reforms led to waves of mass protest
demonstrations by university and secondary school students.
The centre-piece of the reforms was to have been a simplification in the
choice of first-year degree subjects, from 45 to around 12. In addition, a
modular form of credits was proposed, coupled with a new University Studies
Certificate which would be available at the end of the first year, for those
students who wanted to take a break.
Mr Lang has also backed away from moves to cut down on the teaching of
classical languages. At present, Latin is said to be studied by some 350,000
students, and Greek by 30,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11497</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0B8AAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Japan moves to allay fears on health of banking system
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEFAN WAGSTYL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE JAPANESE ministry of finance made an unprecedented attempt to quash
doubts about the health of the country's banks yesterday by issuing a
detailed report on their financial performance.
The ministry released estimates of the banks' financial results for the year
to March 31, saying Japanese banks were 'very sound'. They would have no
difficulty in coping with the fall in the Tokyo stock market or with a sharp
rise in bad loans, the ministry said.
'Our banking system is very sound. Excessive concern is unnecessary,' a
senior official added.
The ministry's action followed the recent plunge in bank share prices and
reports of growing overseas concern about the condition of some Japanese
financial institutions.
Although the statement was issued after the stock market closed, speculation
about its contents had helped to boost the Nikkei average of leading shares
which rose 562.93 to 17,402.05.
Foreign bankers said any improvement in sentiment could be short-lived
because the figures in the ministry's statement were largely in line with
expectations. They said that, in giving data for profits and bad debt
provisions for last year, the ministry had not allayed fears about
write-offs in 1992-93, which could be much larger.
The finance ministry said operating profit for all 153 Japanese banks rose
26.8 per cent to Y3,659bn (Dollars 27.5bn), boosted by declining interest
rates. Pre-tax profits fell 17 per cent to Y2,799bn, because of aggressive
write-offs for loans and investment loans, including those related to the
property market. Net after-tax profits fell 24 per cent to Y1,379bn.
Banks' valuation losses on share portfolios surged 500 per cent to Y1,734bn
and the write-off for bad loans rose to Y639.3bn.
Analysts said write-offs for 1991-92 gave little indication of the larger
write-offs which were likely in the current year.
Acknowledging this concern, a senior ministry official said the large
national banks - including 11 city (commercial) banks, three long-term
credit banks and seven trust banks - had Y7,000bn-Y8,000bn in bad loans at
the end of the fiscal year.
This meant loans on which no interest had been paid for six months. However,
all but Y2,000bn-Y3,000bn was covered by collateral, the ministry said.
Banks could easily cope with bad loans because, even after recent stock
market falls, they had unrealised portfolio gains of Y17,000bn.
The figure for bad loans is considerably lower than analysts' estimates of
Y20,000bn-plus, but much depends on the precise method by which bad loans
are calculated.
The ministry said all except 'one or two' leading banks cleared the 8 per
cent capital-adequacy ratio which has been set by the Bank for International
Settlements.
The ministry gave figures for different categories of bank but not for
individual banks, which will publish their own results next month.
World stocks, Back Page, Sect 2
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11498</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAG3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / London Stock Exchange: Rights issue fears overshadow shares
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVE THOMPSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AN EARLY powerful per-formance by London's equity market, triggered mostly
by the first big post-election takeover bid, ran out of steam in reaction to
three bearish factors yesterday.
These were bad money supply figures from Germany; a steep slide in the
Footsie's important pharmaceutical stocks after US group Merck was suspended
for a while on Wall Street due to a backlog of selling orders; and worries
that a hefty rights issue from one of the Footsie constituents is imminent.
The FT-SE 100-share index ended a volatile day only marginally higher on
balance, up 2 at 2,609.8. For much of the session, however, the market had
run ahead, with buying spurred by suggestions that UK interest rates could
be set to fall in coming months. The interest rate stories had been fuelled
by sterling's strong performance of late, with the currency consolidating
its position yesterday.
Added to the currency's firmness was a feeling of confidence generated by
recent surveys on the UK economy suggesting it is fast emerging from
recession.
The day's most positive news, however, came with the much-heralded takeover
bid for Dowty Group, launched by TI Group, which prompted a flurry of
bid-inspired activity in other areas of the market.
The Footsie, which began the day around 3 points higher, picked up momentum
as the morning wore on and reached the day's peak of 2,630.1, or 22.3 points
to the good, just after midday.
This coincided with bad money supply figures from Germany, which many
observers said dented lingering hopes of Frankfurt interest rate cuts and
could postpone rate cuts elsewhere, including the UK.
The news 'knocked the stuffing out of equities', as one dealer put it, with
the Footsie future coming under pressure. The emergence, later in the day,
of the rights issue worries, together with a poor opening on Wall Street and
a big drop in Merck shares, put the skids under London, with the Footsie
relinquishing all of its hard won gains and dipping into negative territory
 -posting a 2.1 decline at one point - before stabilising.
The slide in Merck shares on Wall Street caused a wave of selling pressure
in Glaxo, SmithKline Beecham and Wellcome, which together accounted for
nearly eight points on the Footsie.
Rights issue speculation centred on, among others, Kingfisher, BTR and
Courtaulds.
Dealers were heartened by the increased levels of activity in the equity
market. Turnover topped 612m shares. Stock Exchange figures revealed that
the value of customer business on Wednesday exceeded Pounds 1.5bn. Tuesday,
when attendance in the market was affected by the Easter holiday, has been
the only post-general election session in which the value of retail business
has fallen below Pounds 1bn.
The strategy team at UBS Phillips &amp; Drew remains bullish of the equity
market. Mr Mark Brown said: 'With the Tories back in, the last party for the
UK equity market is on again. Yields can fall further in response to a
better mix of inflation and growth.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 38
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11499</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAG2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Dow rallies after early fall
with drug stocks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
SHARE PRICES recovered yesterday afternoon as investors turned their
attention to cyclical stocks, following a morning sell-off in drug issues
which depressed US equities for most of the day in a market that was already
nervous following the flood of corporate results, writes Karen Zagor in New
York.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average closed a net 9.84 up at 3,348.61 after
having fallen more than 25 points at midsession. New York SE volume was a
fairly heavy 237.9m shares. The more broadly based Standard &amp; Poor's 500 was
finally 1.79 ahead at 411.60 but the Nasdaq composite of over-the-counter
stocks shed 2.18 to 576.05.
In addition to the pressure from the quarterly corporate results, the market
was depressed by higher yields for longer-dated bonds. The yield of the
Treasury's 30-year bond continued to climb above the 8 per cent mark in the
morning following a report that initial jobless claims had fallen in a week
when economists had expected an increase. In late trading, the long bond was
quoted  3/16 down to yield 8.04 per cent after falling about  5/8 earlier in
the day.
Big board trading was dominated by pharmaceutical stocks. Johnson &amp; Johnson
tumbled Dollars 2 1/8 to Dollars 90 7/8 , reflecting disappointment with its
first-quarter results. The healthcare products company had a net income of
Dollars 464m or Dollars 1.38 a share, compared with Dollars 418m or Dollars
1.25 a share a year ago. The 11 per cent improvement was weaker than
expected. Sales increased by about 7 per cent to Dollars 3.36bn from the
year earlier figure of Dollars 3.15bn.
Shares in Merck also took a beating, although the company had no corporate
developments or news to report. The issue lost almost Dollars 5 before
recovering somewhat to close Dollars 2 5/8 lower at Dollars 139 3/4 .
Among other actively traded pharmaceutical stocks, Glaxo Holdings declined
Dollars  3/4 to Dollars 25 5/8 but Bristol-Myers Squibb ended Dollars  3/8
ahead at Dollars 73.
Citicorp shares, which initially gained about 13 per cent after the bank
posted strong first-quarter results on Tuesday, started to correct
yesterday, with the issue slipping Dollars  1/2 to Dollars 19. Trading was
also active in Chase Manhattan, which rose Dollars  1/2 to Dollars 27.
A flood of results from technology companies fuelled active trading in the
sector. Tandem Computers slipped Dollars  7/8 to Dollars 12 3/8 following
second-quarter earnings of 8 cents a share, against 17 cents.
In the secondary market, Sun Microsystems rose Dollars 1 1/4 to Dollars 27
1/2 , reflecting the company's better than expected third-quarter income of
60 cents a share, compared with 56 cents a year earlier.
Canada
TORONTO stocks put on a steadier performance yesterday, helped by some
recovery in bank, real estate and construction issues.
Traders said that nervousness over the debt troubles of Olympia &amp; York had
eased, after the company said it had arranged a loan of USDollars 20m.
The composite index picked up 3.7 to close at 3,371.5, but declining issues
outnumbered advances by 306 to 245. Trading volume amounted to 28.9m shares.
Financial services had the day's best gain, up 1.1 per cent. The real estate
and construction index recovered 0.6 per cent.
BCE lost CDollars  1/2 to CDollars 44 3/8 . The company's BCE Telecom
International unit said it agreed to acquire a controlling interest in East
London Telecommunications, a British cable television company.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 35
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11500</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAG1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Money Markets: Interbank rates up
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE announcement of Germany's higher than expected money supply figures
dampened expectations of a cut in interest rates on the UK money markets,
causing rates to rise marginally.
Interbank rates ended the day a touch higher. The three-month rate, a key
indicator of future base rate movements, stood at 10 9/16 - 7/16 per cent
after ending yesterday at 10 1/2 - 7/16 per cent.
Short sterling futures finished a fraction lower, implying expectations of
higher interest rates. The June short sterling contract ended at 89.63 after
opening at 89.80. Yesterday's closing figure indicates an implied interest
rate of 10.37 per cent.
In the discount market, attention focused upon the overnight rate after the
Bank of England again forecast a liquidity shortage of around Pounds 1.15bn.
In the morning, the rate touched 11 per cent and subsequently stuck to
around 10 3/4 - 5/8 per cent, as the market spurned the Bank's help at that
stage.
In later trading, however, the market mounted a concerted effort to dispose
of the shortage. The Bank purchased bills totalling Pounds 1.107bn, of which
Pounds 707m were outright Band-1 bank bills at 10 3/8 per cent and Pounds
400m for resale to the market in equal amounts on May 11 and 12 at an
interest rate of 10 7/16 per cent. In the afternoon session, the Bank
purchased a further Pounds 40m of Band-1 bank bills at 10 3/8 per cent.
Trading in the discount market remained quiet, however. Few operators
believe that the Bank of England wants to ease interest rates, in spite of
sterling's gains on foreign exchange markets this week. 'The Treasury and
the Bank of England would like to see further gains in the sterling exchange
rate before they signal a cut,' said one market analyst yesterday.
German call money was quoted slightly below Thursday's levels, with
sufficient funds in the market to allow rates to ease away from the 9.75 per
cent Lombard rate.
Overnight funds changed hands at 9.60/70 per cent, with most trading taking
place at 9.65 per cent. The market quietened after worries that liquidity
would be in short supply after the Bundesbank had drained DM1.9bn from the
market in this week's securities repurchase tender.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11501</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAG0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Foreign Exchanges: D-Mark gains on M3 figures
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE announcement of German money supply figures for March, which one market
analyst described as 'horrendous', dashed any thoughts yesterday on the
foreign exchanges of German interest rate cuts, writes James Blitz.
The 9.7 per cent jump in Germany's annual March M3 growth dwarfed forecasts
of an 8.0 per cent increase, and encouraged investors back into buying
D-Marks yesterday. Many wondered if the next move in German rates might be
upward.
'This is an astounding jump in lending,' was the comment of one analyst on
the figures. 'It delays a cut in interest rates there, because money supply
is a key concern of the Bundesbank.'
As a result, most of the action in the markets yesterday focused on
dollar/D-Mark trading after Wednesday's heavy buying of sterling. The German
currency ended the day a touch higher against the dollar in European trading
at DM1.6605, after a previous DM1.6635. It finished in New York last night
at DM1.6585.
In this situation, a favourable set of US weekly jobless and durable goods
data offered little comfort to dollar holders. Although these figures looked
agreeable to the market, and pushed the dollar up a little at the close,
they were not enough to boost the US currency significantly.
According to one market analyst, investors are waiting for a batch of
important economic figures from the US before revising their view on the
dollar. The US statistics, due next week, include real GDP for the first
quarter of this year and home sales.
The only comfort for dollar holders was in trading against the yen, with the
US unit ending in London at Y134.45 after a previous close of Y134.15.
However, traders said the improvement was mostly a by-product of yen selling
for D-Marks. The dollar rose to Y134.62 in New York.
The D-Mark also gained against other European currencies, recovering a small
part of recent losses against the French franc and sterling. It ended at
FFr3.3787, up from the previous night's FFr3.3773. The Italian lira, beset
by doubt over who will form Italy's new government, gave up more ground. It
closed at L752.55 against the D-Mark, from L750.90 previously.
By contrast with its popularity on Wednesday, sterling mostly consolidated
its position yesterday. The pound again ended third from the bottom of the
ERM, while finishing against the dollar at Dollars 1.7669 from Dollars
1.7648. It was finally Dollars 1.7678 in New York.
Against the D-Mark, the pound closed around half a pfennig lower at
DM2.9277.
A bank dealer commented: 'The pound is still the most wanted currency,
though the authorities need to wait for more strength before thinking about
a cut in UK base rates.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11502</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Government Bonds: Surge in money supply casts cloud over
German bonds
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS, KAREN ZAGOR and SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, NEW YORK, STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A SURPRISE leap in the German money supply hit German government bond prices
yesterday and sent reverberations around other European bond markets.
The message from March's 9.7 per cent leap in German M3 was simple: any
hopes for interest rate cuts in Europe will have to be put on hold for some
while yet. The growth rate was well up on the 8.6 per cent of the previous
month, and far outside the Bundesbank's stated target range.
The news may have killed hopes of an early German rate cut, but failed to
arouse fears that the Bundesbank would move to raise rates in the near
future.
A further slight tightening of German monetary policy had been signalled on
Wednesday, when at its weekly repurchase auction the Bundesbank had set a
minimum rate of 9.6 per cent, up five basis points from last week. But
yesterday's Bundesbank meeting passed without any change in the official
stance.
Coming after a quiet day's trading, the news led to a flurry of activity on
the futures market, with the Liffe contract falling from its opening of
87.89 to 87.34 by the end of the day. The benchmark unity bond maturing in
2002 fell from 100.49 at lunchtime to 100.1 in late trading, pushing the
yield up to 8 per cent.
THE French government bond market, which had been looking for a cut in
interest rates, reacted worse than most to the news from Germany, with the
move to shorter-dated securities of recent days being partially reversed.
The yield on 10-year OATs jumped five basis points to 8.71 per cent, keeping
the spread between French and German markets at over 70 basis points.
THE UK government bond market, which in recent days has come to believe that
an interest rate cut is still some way off, reacted less sharply to the
German monetary position. Shorter-dated paper moved less than in other
markets, with the benchmark 10 per cent bonds due 1994 losing only  5/32 to
100 27/32 , for a yield of 9.53 per cent.
Meanwhile, longer-dated paper suffered losses of around half a point. The 9
per cent bonds due 2011 fell to 99 5/32 , a yield of 9.09 per cent, while
the yield on ten-year bonds rose to 9.22 per cent.
US Treasury prices were narrowly mixed yesterday afternoon after moving
lower in the morning following a drop in initial jobless claims and a bigger
than expected increase in March durable goods orders.
Treasuries moved off their lows of the day following the five-year note
auction and the afternoon release of an unexpected drop in domestic car
sales for mid-April. In late trading, the benchmark 30-year bond was 7/32
lower at 99 13/32 , yielding 8.05 per cent after falling about 5/8 point
earlier in the day. The two-year note was  1/32 higher to yield 5.39 per
cent.
The Federal Reserve refrained from operating in the open market during the
morning. Fed funds, the rate at which banks lend to each other, were trading
at 3 5/8 per cent during the Fed's usual intervention period.
Selling started earlier in the day on the back of a report that initial
jobless claims had fallen 12,000 in the week ended April 11. The decline was
the third in a row and sparked fears that April's employment report might
show an improvement. In addition, March durable goods orders rose by 1.6 per
cent, slightly above the 1 per cent increase the market had expected.
The market was also concerned about supply ahead of the afternoon's auction
of Dollars 10.25bn of five-year notes. The auction went reasonably well,
with an average yield of 6.93 per cent.
SWEDEN'S government bond market saw a sharp rise in yields yesterday morning
on fears of an unexpectedly high budget deficit for 1992.
According to Swedish press reports, the government will forecast a budget
deficit of SKr111bn for 1992 when it presents its supplementary budget
today, well above analysts' expectations and nearly double the 1991 figure
of SKr61.6bn.
Traders said there was a marked sell-off when the bond market opened. The
five-year benchmark bond, the 10.75 per cent bond due January 23 1997, moved
to a closing yield of 9.97 per cent, compared with 9.85 per cent on
Wednesday.
However, bond prices picked up slightly in after-hours trading on
unconfirmed reports that the Swedish central bank wants the Swedish krona to
fluctuate by no more than 2.25 per cent against the currencies in the
Exchange Rate Mechanism of the European monetary system.
The Swedish krona is already tied to the Ecu, but there has been speculation
in recent months about closer links.
Traders said the news was seen as positive for the Swedish government bond
market as it would mean more stability for the currency and would help to
reduce the large swings in capital movement in and out of Sweden.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11503</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Bonds: Adverse conditions unsettle Eurobond
new issues
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ADVERSE conditions in European bond markets yesterday afternoon unsettled
new offerings in the Eurobond market.
Wednesday's huge Pounds 500m five-year offering for Hanson, the UK
industrial conglomerate slightly outperformed a weaker gilts market,
however. The deal was bid at 99.50, down from its fixed reoffer level of
99.71, which compared quite favourably with a  1/4 point fall in five year
gilts, but prompted some speculation that lead manager Credit Suisse First
Boston was supporting the deal quite heavily. However, CSFB said only a
small amount of paper was yet to be placed.
Meanwhile, two more offerings emerged in the sterling sector. Avco Trust,
the UK consumer finance arm of US-based Avco Financial Services, launched a
small Pounds 60m three-year deal, arranged by Warburg.
The single-A rated company is not well known by European investors, who
showed little interest in the transaction. However, the deal met some demand
from banks: the company is authorised under the UK Banking Act, and
consequently has only a 20 per cent risk weighting for bank investors.
This means that banks which buy the paper have to hold substantially less
capital against it than for corporate debt, which has a 100 per cent risk
weighting. When banks purchase this sort of paper, they typically swap the
proceeds for floating-rate assets.
In the floating-rate sector, Cheltenham &amp; Gloucester Building Society
launched a Pounds 175m issue of four-year floating-rate notes via Kleinwort
Benson. The deal met strong demand, partly because of a lack of paper in the
sector. As a floating-rate note issue, it was not affected by the weakness
in the gilts market.
Abbey National Treasury Services acted as a co-manager in the transaction,
the first time the treasury arm of the UK bank has taken such a role. An
official pointed out that the bank had taken no underwriting risk, since its
portion of the deal was to be held as an investment. Abbey National may take
the same approach to other sterling transactions, he said. The move allows
Abbey to own the paper at a lower price than it would have to pay in the
market.
An official at C&amp;G said the society had been waiting to tap the fixed-rate
market for some time; however, the floating-rate market offered
substantially cheaper funds than could have been achieved by tapping the
fixed-rate market and swapping the proceeds.
C&amp;G, which so far has Dollars 100m outstanding on its recently established
Dollars 1.5bn Euro-medium-term note programme, will continue to keep an eye
on opportunities in the fixed-rate sector.
The surge of activity in the sterling bond market does not appear to be
over, despite yesterday's decline. A number of UK companies are believed to
be ready to tap the market. In addition, the European Investment Bank is
preparing a Pounds 150m-Pounds 200m 10-year deal, likely to emerge next
week.
Elsewhere, a L500bn 10-year offering for the World Bank via Istituto
Bancario San Paolo was considered aggressively priced. Even taking into
account the tax benefits for Italian investors, for whom the name is exempt
from withholding tax, dealers said that demand was likely to be subdued.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11504</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: All eyes on The Equitable's
transformation - Nikki Tait reports from the troubled US insurer's
demutualisation process hearings
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Two years ago, Mr Claude Bebear, the colourful chairman of France's Axa
insurance group, tried to acquire Farmers Group, the US insurance subsidiary
of BAT Industries of the UK. He spent months testifying before state
insurance commissioners across the US - and got nowhere.
This week, his new US target, The Equitable, started public hearings in a
complex demutualisation process which could ultimately transform Axa's
earlier Dollars 1bn investment in the ailing US life insurer into a 49 per
cent stake. The process lasted half a day, and no one from Axa was even
visible.
The difference is that this is a friendly deal. The worry is not whether
Axa's influence on The Equitable will be benign or malevolent, but whether
confidence in America's fourth largest insurer has recovered sufficiently to
permit a smooth sale of its shares later this year.
The demutualisation process, however, is important. On the one hand, it is
setting down markers which other US mutual insurers may seek to follow. On
the other, it has provided the first readily-comprehensible insight into
Equitable's financial affairs.
Demutualisation is the procedure by which a mutual insurer - that is, one
controlled by its policyholders - turns itself into a 'conventional'
company, owned by shareholders.
The motive for undertaking such a complex legal manoeuvre is simple. A
shareholder-owned company can easily raise new funds on the stock market,
while a mutual's access to new capital is limited. As Mr Dick Jenrette,
Equitable's chairman, has noted, this basic advantage has already prompted a
sharp decline in mutuals' market share. Twenty years ago, mutuals accounted
for 50 per cent of the capital in the US life industry; today the figure is
just 30 per cent.
A few demutualisations have occured in the US before, and many state
insurance departments now have guideline rules governing the process. But
Equitable, with total assets under management of Dollars 140bn, is by far
the largest American insurer to tackle the task, and it is doing so when the
need to bolster capital resources is widespread within the US insurance
industry.
It is also being supervised by the New York State Insurance Department,
probably the best state regulatory agency. In short, everyone knows that a
textbook case is being written notice some other mutuals represented in the
room,' remarked Mr Salvatore Curiale, the New York insurance superintendent,
underlining this point as hearings began.
The tricky part of any demutualisation is to divide up the current worth of
the insurance business between policyholders in a manner that is fair. In
Equitable's case, matters are complicated by the Dollars 1bn capital
infusion which Axa provided last summer, when the US insurer's need for
funds was acute. In return, the French negotiated the right to between 40
and 49 per cent of Equitable's equity once demutualisation - and an
associated offering of shares to outside investors - was complete.
With all this in mind, Equitable's approach has been to collect existing
dividend-paying policies into a 'closed block' and to assign a
clearly-defined portion of its assets to support them. This has demanded
some fancy actuarial footwork, and the use of a generous 9.9 per cent
reinvestment rate - for cashflows from these investments - has already
provoked some comment.
Equitable advisers, however, contend that the rate is consistent with that
implicit in the 1991 dividend scales. If it is over-optimistic, they admit,
dividends will have to fall - but that would have happened regardless of
demutualisation.
As for the allocation of shares in the 'demutualised' company, Axa's
investment agreement determines its portion. It is, perhaps, worth noting
that the French insurer stands to earn a hefty 22 per cent annual return on
the Dollars 1bn investment.
However, before anyone complains about such generosity, the bankers point
out that the return is delivered in risky equity - not solid cash payments -
, and Equitable counts as 'a substantially leveraged investment'. No-one
else, they also observe, wanted to supply a Dollars 1bn cheque.
Among policyholders, shares are allocated on two principles: everyone gets
three shares, regardless of the size or type of policy, to reflect their
'ownership' interest; further shares are then appropriated on the basis of
each policy's contribution to Equitable's surplus. This, in turn, has
promoted yet more complex actuarial arithmetic.
Again, there has been some modest controversy. Why, it has been argued,
should so many shares - perhaps almost a quarter of those going to
policyholders - be allocated on the fixed basis? After all, certain types of
policies - such as the 'guaranteed investment contracts' (GICs) - have
caused The Equitable to lose hundreds of millions of dollars.
On the second score - Equitable's financial health - the insurer's
prospective stockmarket debut has brought a wholesale accounting change.
Like all stock market companies, The Equitable must now restate its earnings
under the more rigorous SEC's GAAP accounting rules; previously, in common
with most mutual insurers, it reported under the statutory system used by
the state regulators.
For the layman, this means that the figures take on a far more familiar
format - and look none the prettier for that. Equitable produced an
after-tax loss of Dollars 453.8m in 1990 under GAAP rules, and then another
Dollars 651.1m deficit in the first nine months of 1991.
In truth, things were not quite that bad. The nine-month loss contained only
a Dollars 146.5m deficit from continuing operations. And that, in turn, was
struck after adding Dollars 368m to valuation allowances to cover impaired
assets, plus a Dollars 29.7m write-down for publicly traded securities.
The more damaging Dollars 493.5m deficit from discontinued operations
referred to the GIC business, with the Equitable attempting to provide for
future losses as these contracts run out. The GIC loss provisions were then
increased by a further Dollars 103.6m in the fourth quarter. Total loss
provisions, says the insurer hopefully, now 'represent the estimated present
value of all future losses on GIC contracts'.
Still, in the first nine months, individual insurance and annuity surrenders
were still running at Dollars 1.88bn - up 53 per cent on the previous year -
although Equitable says the position has improved since then. Meanwhile, at
end-September, equity real estate investment accounted for 12.6 per cent of
the core investment portfolio; junk debt and equity interests, 14.2 per
cent; and mortgages, 29 per cent.
All that noted, some of the US rating agencies monitoring the insurer
closely now seem relatively sanguine about prospects. Standard &amp; Poor's, for
example, says it found nothing surprising in the financial information. It
still had the company on 'creditwatch', but with developing rather than
negative implications.
Meanwhile, Equitable's 2.2m policyholders, who get to vote next month on the
demutualisation proposal, seem understandably baffled by the bulky
documents. The insurer had logged 95,000 calls by the end of last week,
largely from people seeking to discover whether their policies would be
affected.
Nevertheless, aside from the inevitable policyholder lawsuit and a handful
of letters to the insurance department, scepticism rather than objection
seems to be the order of the day. What guarantee was there, demanded one man
at the hearing, that any new money raised would not be put to equally bad
use?
'I can't guarantee that we won't make mistakes in the future,' replied Mr
Jenrette, 'but we do have a new management team'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11505</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Philip Morris Czech deal
approved
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From ARIANE GENILLARD
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PRAGUE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PHILIP MORRIS, the US tobacco company, is to become the second largest
foreign investor in Czechoslovakia. The Czech government yesterday approved
its offer for Tabak, the former tobacco monopoly in the Czech republic.
The US tobacco giant has pledged Dollars 395.8m in cash and capital
expenditures to become the eventual majority shareholder of Tabak.
Volkswagen of Germany last year offered to invest DM9bn (Dollars 5.40bn) by
the year 2000 for Skoda, the local car manufacturer.
Philip Morris will buy an initial 30 per cent of Tabak for Dollars 104.4m,
and has offered a similar amount for another 30 per cent of the company. The
US company has also pledged to invest an additional Dollars 187m in the
local company.
Under the terms of the tender, which attracted the world's biggest tobacco
companies, the Czech National Property Fund, the state body holding Tabak's
remaining shares, has the option to sell the additional 30 per cent to
Philip Morris. The sale will be possible once a Monopoly Act dating from the
Austro-Hungarian empire, and defining Tabak as a state-owned monopoly, is
repealed.
The Czech government could then allow Philip Morris to own 60 per cent of
Tabak. This stake could also be raised to 65 per cent pending further
negotiations.
The choice of a final buyer comes after months of controversial negotiations
over the sale of a former monopoly in the republic. International tobacco
companies have bitterly complained about the recent government decision not
to sell Tabak's plants separately to competing buyers.
'We have contractual guarantees that Philip Morris will maintain existing
facilities and business operations for a number of years,' said Mr Bruce
Bybee from Crimson Capital Corporation, the Czech government adviser.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11506</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: American Express dips on poor
core business
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AMERICAN Express, the financial services group, yesterday reported a 6 per
cent dip in comparable first-quarter net income as a drop in profits from
its core charge card business outweighed improved performances from most
other subsidiaries.
Net income was Dollars 249m, or 51 cents a share, compared to Dollars 264m,
or 55 cents, in the same period last year, broadly in line with
expectations. However, the adoption of a new accounting standard for income
tax boosted the latest income figure to Dollars 465m, or 95 cents a share.
The group's core travel related services division, which includes charge
card operations and travellers' cheques, saw income drop 23 per cent, from
Dollars 162m to Dollars 125m on slightly higher revenues.
American Express said the results were helped by lower interest rates and a
smaller provision for charge card credit losses. However, these factors were
offset by the cost of increased marketing and promotion.
The company's cards are involved in a severe battle with Visa and MasterCard
credit cards. American Express said it had scaled back marketing activities
in early 1991 but increased them in the second half of last year.
The number of cards in force dipped from 36.7m a year ago to 36.1m, but
business billed rose from Dollars 25.4bn to Dollars 27.7bn.
The group's Shearson Lehman Brothers securities arm produced net income of
Dollars 71m (Dollars 140m after the accounting change), compared to Dollars
51m a year ago, on revenues 16 per cent higher at Dollars 1.6bn.
The IDS financial services unit saw income rise 19 per cent to Dollars 61m,
helped by an increase in management fees and net investment income. American
Express Bank saw profits fall from Dollars 31m to Dollars 18m, but the First
Data Corporation reported an 18 per cent increase in income to Dollars 30m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11507</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: American Barrick improves 49%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AMERICAN Barrick, the Toronto-based gold producer, has credited active
hedging and rising output from its flagship Goldstrike mine in Nevada for a
49 per cent jump in first-quarter earnings.
In spite of the sagging bullion price, Barrick lifted earnings to USDollars
23.2m, or 16 cents a share, from Dollars 15.6m, or 11 cents, in the first
quarter of 1991. Revenues climbed to Dollars 81.5m from Dollars 73m.
The company said that it was raising its annual dividend to 13 cents a share
from 11 cents.
Barrick has hedged its output until the end of 1994 at an average price of
Dollars 425 an ounce. This was the price it received in the first quarter,
in spite of the average Comex price of Dollars 351.
Production from the five mines in which Barrick has an interest grew to
202,505 ounces from 171,980 ounces. Almost the entire increase was due to a
38 per cent rise in output from Goldstrike.
Barrick said that Goldstrike's production would continue to rise in the
second half. It expects total 1992 output to be about 1.2m ounces.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11508</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Ercros to spin off fertiliser
and mining arms
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER BRUCE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MADRID
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ERCROS, Spain's largest chemicals, fertilisers, mining and explosives
company, has reached an agreement in principle with Freeport McMoRan of the
US under which Ercros would spin off its troubled fertiliser and mining
divisions into a new company controlled by the US chemicals group.
The Spanish government is likely to insist that the agreement include a cash
injection by Freeport of up to Dollars 350m into Ercros's loss-making
fertiliser operation, Fesa-Enfersa, and its copper mining company, Rio Tinto
Minera (RTM).
Under the agreement, announced in Madrid last night, Ercros will transfer
these assets into a new holding company in which Freeport will hold 51 per
cent. Ercros said the deal would only go ahead if the government supported
it.
The Torras group, the main Spanish investment vehicle of the Kuwait
Investment Office (KIO), is Ercros' largest shareholder with 40 per cent. A
group of investors led by the Catalan financier, Mr Javier de la Rosa, who
is KIO's chief adviser in Spain, has another 20 per cent. About 35 per cent
of Ercros is traded on the stock market.
The Spanish government takes a close interest in Ercros because the company
has a virtual monopoly in fertilisers in the country. Two years ago, it
merged its businesses with the fertiliser operations of INI, the state
holding company.
The government also became involved in the late 1980s when Torras bid for
the then Union Explosivos Rio Tinto (ERT), a leading supplier of explosives.
Torras merged ERT with its Cros fertiliser group to form Ercros.
Ercros has found it almost impossible to make the most of its control of the
fertiliser market in Spain. Losses in the fertiliser division accounted for
more than 80 per cent of its Pta16bn (Dollars 153.47m) pre-tax loss last
year.
Madrid has insisted that if more of Ercros were to be sold, it would have to
be done by finding an industrial partner.
Freeport is a leading producer of phosphates and natural gas used in
fertiliser production and will be able to supply Fesa more cheaply.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11509</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Noranda returns to profit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NORANDA, the Canadian resources group, returned to the black in the first
quarter thanks to a glimmer of recovery in some forest products markets,
lower costs and a lighter debt-servicing burden.
Net earnings were CDollars 17m (USDollars 14.4m), or 1 cent a share,
compared with CDollars 15m, or zero per share, in the first quarter of last
year.
The company, which has interests in mining, forestry and energy, suffered
heavy losses in the second half of last year. Revenues were virtually
unchanged at CDollars 2.1bn.
Earnings from metals and minerals fell to CDollars 31m from CDollars 58m,
due largely to lower copper, gold, nickel and aluminium prices. Forest
products posted a profit of CDollars 5m, the first in almost two years.
While newsprint prices remain under pressure, the company said that markets
were improving for some other products.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11510</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Northern Telecom gains for 13th
consecutive period
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TORONTO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NORTHERN Telecom, the Canadian telecommunications equipment maker, has
posted its 13th consecutive quarter of profit growth, with an 11.2 per cent
rise in first-quarter earnings.
However, management's cautious outlook and a recent drop in Northern's share
price suggest that the long climb in profits may be difficult to sustain
much longer. A mainspring of improved performance over the past year has
been the USDollars 2.6bn acquisition of STC, the UK telecoms group, which
took effect on March 1, 1991.
Nortel declines to disclose the precise contribution of STC, which has been
integrated into its European operations.
Mr Martin Mand, chief financial officer, said yesterday an
'apples-with-apples' comparison would not be possible until the third
quarter of this year. Nortel sold three STC businesses shortly after the
takeover.
Nortel earned Dollars 104.2m, or 41 cents a share, in the first quarter, up
from Dollars 93.7m, or 36 cents a share, a year earlier.
Revenues edged up to Dollars 1.9bn from Dollars 1.86bn. Order input rose 18
per cent to Dollars 1.63bn.
Much of the growth came from sales of telephone equipment to private
customers in the US, where the company said it had been gaining market
share.
On the other hand, sales of central office switches and transmission
products fell slightly.
Mr Paul Stern, chairman, expressed satisfaction with the first-quarter
performance, but added that 'continuing uncertainty in worldwide economies
causes us to maintain a cautious outlook'.
Nortel expected its joint cellular phone venture with Motorola to start
taking orders within the next month or two. Mr Mand said the process of
agreeing on a business plan, setting up an organisation and assigning jobs
was 'right on schedule'.
Nortel's shares were trading at CDollars 53 on the Toronto stock exchange
yesterday morning, below their record of CDollars 58.50 reached earlier this
year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11511</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Strong medicine restores US
banks - The changing fortunes of a hard-pressed financial sector
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Pandemonium. Feeding Frenzy. Panic Buying. Those are some of the more
colourful adjectives being bandied around Wall Street this week to describe
a remarkable rise in the price of bank shares following the industry's
release of surprisingly strong first-quarter figures.
Shares in Wells Fargo, the large California-based banking group, stood over
19 per cent higher at yesterday's New York close than on Tuesday, just
before it announced far better than expected figures. Shares in Citicorp,
the nation's largest banking group, were 13 per cent higher than before its
results announcement.
Analysts have been scrambling to raise their 1992 banking profits forecasts.
Mr Ronald Mandle, an analyst at Sanford C Bernstein said he had raised
estimates on 60 per cent of the businesses he tracked.
Why the sudden surprise? After all, the fundamental forces reshaping the US
banking industry have been visible to industry observers for some time.
For the past 18 months the sector has been grappling with crisis levels of
commercial bad debt, the result of imprudent lending to the over-heated US
property sector in the 1980s and the more general impact of recession on
businesses' ability to service loans.
The banks have clearly been on a slow, gradual path to recovery as they have
taken large doses of medicine, including heavy bad debt provisioning,
slashed dividends, mergers, the sale of non-essential assets and big cuts in
their bloated operating costs.
What has surprised Wall Street this week is the speed at which these actions
seem to be producing results. This, coupled with a singular absence of nasty
shocks during this reporting season, has reinforced the perception that the
industry has turned the corner. The outlook was brighter than at any time in
the past five years, said one analyst.
That may be so, yet the capacity of individual banks to produce some
unpleasant surprises over the next few months should not be under estimated.
The property market, in particular, could produce more problems,
particularly in southern California.
Three factors lay behind the greater-than-expected profits increases of the
last quarter.
A stabilisation, or drop, in banks' provisions for bad commercial loans. For
example, Chemical Banking, which merged with Manufacturers Hanover at the
end of last year, saw its loan loss provisions drop from Dollars 450m in the
fourth quarter to Dollars 375m, some Dollars 50m below the market's
expectations.
Citicorp, the largest US bank, which has suffered severe credit quality
problems, reported a rise in net loan loss provisions from Dollars 1.15bn at
the end of last year to Dollars 1.23bn. Its heavy exposure to bad property
loans was underlined by the fact that Dollars 588m of the total involved
North American commercial real estate, up from Dollars 562m the previous
quarter.
However, there appears to be light at the end of the tunnel. Mr John Reed,
the chairman, said the domestic real estate portfolio had stabilised and
while he was forecasting commercial credit write-offs this year at roughly
the same level as 1991, the position was expected to improve in the second
half.
Yet analysts remain uncertain as to whether the precipitate drop in real
estate values over the last few years has touched bottom, or whether there
could be further to fall.
Particular doubt surrounds heavily overstocked southern California, where
many analysts believe the property market is still weakening. Wells Fargo,
in spite of its strong first-quarter operating performance, nevertheless
suffered a 9 per cent rise in non-performing assets, compared to the fourth
quarter, and many analysts remain cautious about its outlook.
Improving net interest margins. This is the difference between what a bank
pays to borrow funds and what it charges to lend money. Margins have been
generally improving, albeit with substantial regional variations, for much
of the past year. This was helped by the Federal Reserve's lowering of
short-term interest rates and lesser reductions by banks in the cost of
borrowing.
Cost cutting. Financial crisis has forced banks to slash their costs, either
through internal shake-ups or mergers with rivals. The positive effects of
these moves showed up strongly in first-quarter figures.
For example, Citicorp, which cut its workforce by about 1,000 people during
the quarter, to about 85,000, produced a 6 per cent cut in expenses.
Chemical said it saved Dollars 50m during the quarter thanks to workforce
reductions following the merger with Manufacturers Hanover. Its ratio of
non-interest operating expense to total operating revenue improved to 62.6
per cent from 65.5 per cent in the fourth quarter and the bank said it was
on target to realise Dollars 750m of savings by 1995.
These factors, together with asset sales, have helped banks repair their
capital ratios, with even laggard Citicorp showing a substantial improvement
in the quarter. Its total risk-based ratio stands at 8.12 per cent, above
the regulatory minimum, while its Tier One ratio - which must be above 4 per
cent by the end of the year, according to the Basle agreement - rose to 4.06
per cent.
Wall Street expects the sector's earnings to continue growing for the rest
of this year and into 1993 as provisions decline, interest margins remain
strong and expense cutting works its magic.
Rising interest rates could dent the performance, as could a trend to lower
rates on credit card receivables. But by next year, assuming the economy
continues its recovery, these factors should be outweighed by a resumption
of loan growth.
Yet for all this week's euphoria, much of the sector still has a long way to
go to restore its profits and ratios to levels which are satisfactory by
historic standards. Citicorp may have doubled its quarterly net income to
Dollars 183m, but this is small for a bank with assets of Dollars 217bn and
it would probably have lost money without a hefty contribution from asset
sales.
Mr Reed said that there was still a great deal to do when he told Citicorp's
annual meeting that the group aimed to restore its normal earnings capacity
by the end of this year and put its capital problems behind it by the end of
1993.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
US BANK RESULTS
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                 1st Quarter        Per cent     Net interest
                   1992 net          change       margin (%)
                income DollarsM     on year    1st Q 92 v 1st Q 91
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Banc One              179             +38         6.82       6.17
BankAmerica           303              +7         4.64       4.32
Chase Manhattan       141             +21         3.93       3.83
Chemical Banking      260             +44         3.72       3.07
Citicorp              183             +97         3.76       3.66
NationsBank           310             +95         3.89       3.81
Wells Fargo           119             -22         5.70       5.06
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Compiled by Rivka Nachoma, New York
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11512</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Sara Lee rises to Dollars 138m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SARA LEE, the large Chicago-based consumer products company, yesterday
announced a 13.9 per cent rise in after-tax profits, to Dollars 137.6m, for
the three months ended March 28.
The increase came on a 5.4 per cent rise in sales to Dollars 9.84bn, and
takes Sara Lee's profits for the first nine months of its financial year to
Dollars 590.4m. This compares with Dollars 366.1m in the same period 12
months earlier.
Earnings per share were 12.8 per cent higher in the third quarter, at 53
cents, and up by 51.9 per cent, at Dollars 2.34 for the nine months.
Quaker Oats has reported a net profit of Dollars 56.6m in the third quarter
to the end of March, down from Dollars 63.1m for the same period a year ago.
Sales were static at Dollars 1.33bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11513</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: O&amp;Y likely to win fresh funding
for Canary Wharf
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT PESTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OLYMPIA &amp; York's bankers said yesterday they were likely to provide the
property developer with new borrowings to continue work on the Canary Wharf
project in London's Docklands, but would give far less than the Pounds 110m
(Dollars 193m) requested by the company.
However, by late yesterday bankers had still not made a final decision. They
were meeting with their advisers - the accountants Ernst &amp; Young and the
property surveyor Hillier Parker - to assess O&amp;Y's financial prospects.
They are unlikely to communicate their decision to O&amp;Y until this morning.
Mr Steve Miller, in charge of O&amp;Y's negotiations with its banks, said it
would be 'only a modest disappointment' if O&amp;Y got less than it wanted.
O&amp;Y requested Pounds 110m to cover Canary Wharf's building and fitting-out
costs for the next 90 days, during which O&amp;Y hoped to arrange a complete
reorganisation of its CDollars 14.3bn (USDollars 12.1bn) debt.
However, the 11 lenders to Canary Wharf are expected to provide funds to
meet requirements for a much shorter period, pending a thorough assessment
of the value of O&amp;Y's properties.
O&amp;Y may be granted a facility of less than Pounds 50m. 'There is a wish to
keep the lights on (at Canary Wharf),' said a banker. However, he said that
the banks - which include Citicorp of the US, Credit Suisse of Switzerland,
Royal Bank of Canada, Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce, Barclays of the UK
and its rival Lloyds - were baulking at a request from O&amp;Y that they commit
their existing loans for five or six years.
'At the moment we are in no position to see if there are any black holes (or
sources of potential losses) at O&amp;Y,' the banker said. He said that if the
banks provided new money, they would not hand it over in one tranche to O&amp;Y.
The property developer would have to submit claims for expenses to Ernst &amp;
Young, which would then decide whether the expenses should be paid.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11514</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Monsanto slips in first quarter
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MONSANTO, the US chemicals company, yesterday posted a 3 per cent decline in
first-quarter net income to Dollars 161m, or Dollars 1.28 a share, on sales
down 1 per cent to Dollars 2.19bn.
A year earlier, Monsanto had net profits of Dollars 166m, or Dollars 1.31,
on sales of Dollars 2.22bn. The Missouri-based company said 1992 sales had
excluded revenues from several businesses involved in its restructuring.
Mr George Krug, an analyst at Oppenheimer, had expected weak earnings
comparisons for 1992, and Wall Street's reaction to the results was muted.
Monsanto's shares closed Dollars  1/4 lower at Dollars 67 3/4 .
Monsanto's agricultural division turned in operating income of Dollars 149m,
just below the Dollars 151m reported last year, in spite of sales that rose
to Dollars 515m from Dollars 499m a year ago. The decline was blamed on
non-recurring factors.
Mr Richard Mahoney, chairman and chief executive, said group income had
actually increased in the quarter when adjusted for non-recurring factors
and a disposal.
The company's chemical unit achieved operating income of Dollars 87m on
sales of Dollars 896m, compared with operating income of Dollars 83m on
sales of Dollars 927m a year ago. The business benefited from lower raw
material and manufacturing costs and higher sales volumes which offset a
decline in selling prices.
The Searle pharmaceuticals division had first-quarter operating income of
Dollars 23m, against Dollars 19m a year ago, on sales which rose to Dollars
363m from Dollars 341m in the 1991 quarter.
Operating income from Fischer Controls fell 38 per cent to Dollars 13m,
while sales eased nearly 7 per cent to Dollars 215m from Dollars 230m.
Operating income from the NutraSweet artificial sweetener business was
nearly static at Dollars 38m, against Dollars 39m a year ago. Last year's
figures included a Dollars 10m reorganisation charge. Sales in the 1992
quarter fell to Dollars 199m from Dollars 226m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11515</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Delta Air posts another large
loss
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DELTA Air Lines, the large US carrier which acquired Pan Am's European and
US east coast shuttle operations last year, yesterday posted a Dollars
151.6m loss after tax for the three months to end-March.
Delta's deficit outstrips the Dollars 84.1m deficit which the company posted
in the same period a year earlier - when the Gulf war depressed traffic
volumes and led to losses in the airline industry worldwide.
It is the second of the US carriers to report results for the first three
months of 1992, and its large loss contrasts with the modest Dollars 20m
profit which American Airlines, one of its big rivals, managed to accrue.
At the operating level, the 1992 deficit is significantly larger than the
after-tax loss - amounting to Dollars 199.3m. This compares with a Dollars
115.1m loss in the 1991 first quarter.
Operating revenues increased from Dollars 2.29bn to Dollars 2.81bn, partly
reflecting the inclusion of the Pan Am routes. However, operating costs
jumped more sharply, from Dollars 2.41bn to Dollars 3.01bn. This was in
spite of a slightly lower fuel bill, at Dollars 350.8m, against Dollars
376.3m.
A notable 39 per cent increase came in the miscellaneous cost item, up from
Dollars 322m to Dollars 434.7m - with the explanation lying partly in 'costs
related to bringing the operation of acquired international routes up to
Delta's standard'.
Delta also blamed the large quarterly loss on 'relatively weak domestic
traffic', and the increased costs associated with the acquisition of the
transatlantic and intra-European routes.
Throughout its history, Delta has been primarily a domestic carrier,
well-respected for its conservative style. The Pan Am deal, however, took
the company into Europe in a big way for the first time, and laid down
Delta's marker as a third international US carrier, to compete with American
and United Airlines.
Underlining the continued undercutting by ailing airlines in the US, Trans
World Airlines said yesterday that it planned to establish an Atlanta 'hub'.
TWA, which is in bankruptcy, said it also would operate services to nine
other US cities, with introductory one-way fares of Dollars 69 to Dollars
89.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11516</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Dr Pepper expects Dollars 600m
from issue
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DR Pepper/Seven-Up, the third largest US soft drinks concentrates company
after Coca-Cola and PepsiCo, expects to raise around Dollars 600m through a
previously announced initial public offering of shares, writes Nikki Tait.
Of the 29.8m shares being sold in the offering, 1.8m are coming from
existing institutional shareholders; the rest are new shares being sold by
the company.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11517</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Linotype falls into red and
omits payout
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FISHER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
LINOTYPE-HELL, the German printing equipment manufacturer, will not pay a
dividend for 1991 after falling into the red as a result of weak export
sales and heavy restructuring costs.
It announced a group net loss of DM9.9m (Dollars 5.95m) compared with a
profit of DM37.5m in 1990. The decision to leave out the dividend follows a
cut of DM2 to DM13 a share in the previous payment.
Mr Wolfgang Kummer, chief executive, described 1991 as an 'extraordinarily
difficult year'. Turnover had risen from DM806m to DM1.2bn, but this was
entirely because of Linotype's merger with Rudolf Hell, formerly owned by
Siemens, the German electrical and electronics group, which has a one-third
stake in the enlarged company.
Excluding the effect of the merger, sales were 19 per cent lower; incoming
orders fell at the same rate.
Problems in the world economy masked progress made in restructuring the
group and in improving its product range. Because of the slump in foreign
business, the export share of turnover dropped to 60 per cent from 70 per
cent.
Mr Kummer expressed optimism about 1992 after a 15 per cent rise in orders
in the first quarter. He hoped the company would be able to resume dividends
this year on the basis of 'a markedly improved profit situation'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11518</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / 1991 Results Season: Companies strive to maintain dividends
against the odds
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DIVIDEND CUTS seemed to be accidents waiting to happen at the start of the
results season.
Pay-outs on average were covered less than twice by depressed earnings per
share, a level lower than in the last recession. Balance sheets had been
stretched and cash conservation was a priority.
There was no economic upturn to back up a message of confidence and the
severity of the recession had increased the prospective level of investor
understanding for cuts.
In the market, several companies had double-digit yields, indicating that
cuts had been discounted.
But the abiding impression of recent results is of companies maintaining
payments against the odds, particularly in cases where the year's total was
uncovered by earnings.
Of the FT-SE 100 constituents, 47 reported results for the calendar year
1991. As might be expected, the financial strength of these groups and their
spread of businesses, particularly outside the UK, meant less pressure on
dividend payments, which tend to be very small compared with both turnover
and shareholders' funds.
Thirty raised their total payments, 15 held them and only two - Guardian
Royal Exchange and Midland Bank - showed overall declines. In both cases the
share price responded favourably to news that was less bad than feared.
Two other cutters, however, fell out of the FT-SE: Royal Insurance - which
surprised the market by paying no final - and Tarmac.
Otherwise, the second 100, or Tootsie stocks, in the FT-A All-Share index
proved just as loath to cut, with only Vickers and Bunzl joining Royal and
Tarmac. However, the numbers holding their total payment equalled those
raising it at 18 apiece.
The slump in the UK housing market provided a link between the insurance
companies, which were hit by mortgage indemnity losses, and the builders,
which did produce a series of dividend cuts.
Although George Wimpey held its dividend early in the season, the cutters in
the construction sector included Costain, which passed its final, Mowlem and
Higgs &amp; Hill.
Taylor Woodrow said that maintaining the payment out of reserves was 'a
simple it matter of honour' because of the intention it had stated at the
time of last April's Pounds 162m rights issue.
At least Taylor Woodrow's gearing was moving in the right direction, down
from 30 to 23 per cent, whereas Tarmac's increased from 39 to 51 per cent.
For those companies maintaining dividends in spite of slashed earnings, or
even losses as was often the case in the insurance and construction/property
sectors, the key factor was having the cash available to pay.
Wimpey, for instance, had brought its debt down by about Pounds 100m through
disposals and working capital cuts.
Several others - Costain, Amec, Higgs &amp; Hill, Mowlem and Ibstock Johnsen -
had joined Taylor Woodrow in replenishing their funds via rights issues. Of
these only Amec had net cash at the year-end and it managed a tiny dividend
increase.
The general pain in the construction-related sectors is reflected in
dividend cover of about one for building materials with contracting being
uncovered, according to Mr George Hodgson at SG Warburg.
He pointed out that to restore cover to an average of 2 to 2.2 over the
cycle, companies would have to build up cover to significantly more than
that during the good years, which would delay the resumption of dividend
growth.
So while cuts have been few and far between, dividends could stay flat for a
couple more years. When this is added to the two years of minimal rises that
have already been a feature of the recession-hit groups, the effect will be
that many companies will have gone for four or five years of virtually
frozen dividends, rather than take one step down to a base from which the
payments can grow again.
Mr Paul Myners, chairman of Gartmore Investment Management, said the
expectation of modest dividend growth over the next few years was implicit
in the market being in the unusual position of yielding more than the rate
of inflation.
On the other hand, he derived some encouragement from the paucity of
dividend cuts in the latest series of results. 'Companies must have looked
at their business prospects and their capital requirements and decided that
they had the resources to pay.'
Even among smaller companies cuts were fewer than feared. The James Capel
'Trixie' index, covering roughly numbers 200 to 600 in the FTA-All Share,
showed 23 cuts, 65 holds and 121 rises among the 209 companies reporting
1991 results so far.
However, worries remain that reluctance to cut is based more on fear of the
effect on the share price, and hence the company's susceptibility to a
takeover bid, than on a sounder appraisal of a company's finances and
prospects.
And the danger of cuts remains for companies facing a second year of
uncovered payments. Even those which have conserved cash well during the
recession, when there has been less call for working capital, may find it
more of a precious commodity on the way out as the level of activity grows.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11519</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Cost control behind Etam's 40% advance to
Pounds 11.8m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TIGHT CONTROL on costs helped Etam, the fashion retailer in which Oceana
Investment Corporation of South Africa has a 34 per cent stake, to increase
pre-tax profits by 40 per cent in the 53 weeks to February 1.
The improvement, from Pounds 8.45m to Pounds 11.8m, followed a rise in
turnover of only 3 per cent to Pounds 213m (Pounds 207m) as the number of
shops was reduced to 240 (251). Most closures came in the Peter Brown
menswear chain where losses were reduced. Etam is dominated by the eponymous
women's fashion stores and also includes the SNOB and Tammy shops.
Mr Keith Miles, finance director, said the group's cost-cutting action,
which had included a wage freeze and a further cut in stock, had paid off.
It had avoided the excesses of high street discounting before Christmas.
The outlook for costs had also improved because the 'juggernaut effect' of
the huge rent rises imposed in the late 1980s was abating, as was general
inflation. Relief on business rates would save the group Pounds 500,000 this
year.
He said the group was avoiding becoming too specialised. It had extended its
appeal to women over 25, who now comprised more than half its customers, and
had also moved a little up-market, although it remained at the cheaper end
of the fashion spectrum.
He was cautious about current trading. Sales were marginally ahead on a
like-for-like basis, the bottom line was better, but the progress was a
little behind budget.
Earnings grew to 11.2p (7.51p). A final dividend of 5.1p (4.65p) makes 6.6p
(5.85p).
An extraordinary charge of Pounds 1.17m was made to cover the defence
against a Pounds 121m hostile bid from Oceana.
COMMENT
Etam's share price has almost quadrupled since Oceana Investment started
buying shares in mid-1990 and yes-terday's closing price of 239p is 54p
ahead of the offer, which failed last August. With this year's pre-tax
profit forecast to grow to Pounds 14m, the prospective earnings multiple is
nearly 18. While Etam deserves its small premium to the stores sector
because of its cost control and Pounds 5m in the bank, the attention of
recovery seekers may soon swing to other parts of the market. It is also
opera-ting in a highly competitive field, where every chain seems out to woo
the suddenly fashion-conscious mature woman. And one or two previously
wounded players, such as Next, are making a comeback. While Etam is a
quality stock, the bid premium may wear thin and the price looks quite high
enough.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11520</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Relief and sadness abound in ICI's
manufacturing heartland - The reaction on Teesside to news of the deal with
Du Pont
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRIS TIGHE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE news of the ICI and Du Pont deal was met yesterday with a mixture of
relief and sadness on Teesside, home to the highest concentration of ICI's
manufacturing assets in the world.
It is likely to secure many jobs in fibres which ICI might otherwise have
abandoned and to add jobs through the acquisition of Du Pont's acrylics
business world-wide.
But sadness was expressed at the departure of fibres, a long standing
business, from ICI's portfolio. Concern was also raised by workers that Du
Pont will be less paternalistic an employer than ICI.
While Du Pont's arrival diversifies ownership of Teesside's chemicals
industry, the deal also underlines the continuing ebbing of ICI's profile in
the area. It is still the dominant local employer, but with 11,000 on its
present Teesside payroll it employs fewer than half the number it did before
the 1979-'82 recession.
Mr Sandy Anderson, general manager of ICI's Teesside operations, was bullish
about the agreement yesterday, saying that it would enhance prospects for
both businesses, ensure a secure future for their employees and broaden
Teesside's employment base.
Mr Anderson was 'very confident' about the prospects of ICI's Fibres
employees on Teesside retaining their jobs under Du Pont. The deal was also
good news for the 500 employed at Billingham by ICI Acrylics.
Mr David Walsh, chairman of the development committee of Labour-controlled
Cleveland County Council, said there was some sadness among the workforce
and the general public, that ICI was pulling out of a business long regarded
as a cornerstone of its operations in the area.
Workers leaving the Wilton complex near Middlesbrough early yesterday
afternoon had heard about the deal during the morning.
Fitters mate Mr Alan Taylor summed up the mood of many, saying: 'On balance,
it has to be the best thing, as long as the nylon plant is kept open. It's
better for us - ICI was going to shut down. It didn't have a future without
Du Pont taking it over.'
About 650 people work in the nylons production area at Wilton, on the
southern side of the river Tees. A further 100 work across the river at ICI
Fibres' engineering plastics section in Billingham.
However, linked to yesterday's announcement was confirmation of ICI's
intention to close its adiponitrile (ADN) plant - part of its nylons area at
Wilton - with the loss of 120 jobs. A further 50 jobs will go from the
site's support services section. This means that the total number of ICI
Teesside employees transferring to Du Pont will be about 580.
Also to be transferred are the 85 employees at Workington, Cumbria, making
non-woven material under the Camtex banner, along with fibre production
staff and sites at Pontypool, Doncaster, and Gloucester in the UK and
employees and assets at Oestringen in Germany and Rozenburg in the
Netherlands. ICI's former fibres head-quarters building at Harrogate is not
included in the deal; it is on the market for sale. ICI Fibres has 6,100
employees in total, of whom 3,600 are in the UK.
The first nylons development at Wilton was in 1957. Mr Wayne Barnacal, the
nylons area production manager, said ICI had invested Pounds 40m there in
the last five years, including about Pounds 5m on environmental
improvements. The ADN plant is being closed because of its old technology.
The six nylons plants at Wilton to be transferred to Du Pont would be the
sub-ject of spending of 'some millions' of pounds, 'in double figures', over
the next five years to meet rising environmental standards.
Mr Anderson insisted that the nylons area at Wilton was important to Du
Pont. 'They aren't taking over the nylons business at Wilton to shut it
down,' he said. 'Having Du Pont in Teesside and committed long term to that
global business has got to be good. They obviously recognise in the quality
of the assets what Teesside has to offer, and much more importantly the
people.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11521</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Paying the price of a loss of focus: TI's Pounds 482m bid
for a UK aero-engineer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY and PAUL BETTS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Since Mr Christopher Lewinton took charge of TI Group six years ago, he has
briskly reshaped one of the pillars of British engineering.
Now Mr Lewinton, TI's chairman and chief executive, is hoping to repeat the
trick, with a hostile Pounds 482m bid for the Dowty Group, another British
engineering group which has known better times.
Dowty rejected the bid yesterday, as it rejected Mr Lewinton's three offers
of a friendly merger last year. But staying independent will not be easy.
The late Sir George Dowty founded the company in Cheltenham in 1931 in
frustration at the British government's failure to recognise home-grown
innovation. He had invented a suspension system for landing gear but neither
the Royal Air Force nor his employer, the Gloster aircraft company, believed
it would work. Only after Kawasaki of Japan bought the idea did a red-faced
RAF begin using the system.
Dowty parts flew in every RAF aeroplane in the Second World War. The impetus
for the company's growth, however, came from an application of the same
technology: hydraulic pit props. Aviation was still close to the company's
heart: in 1958 it bought the propeller business of Bristol Aircraft and
Rolls-Royce, and built a successful aerospace business.
In recent years, however, it has lost its way. Last December, it announced
that interim profits had collapsed from Pounds 38m to Pounds 10m and that
its earnings would not cover the dividend. The news confirmed the damage
caused to the company by recession in the aerospace industry. It also
underlined the weaknesses of Dowty's attempted diversification into
information technology and electronic systems. Dowty began looking
vulnerable to takeover.
In the event, the bid has come from TI. Yesterday, Mr Lewinton argued that
the two companies fitted well together. TI already has a substantial
aviation business, making engine rings. If the bid goes through, the Dowty
name would live on within TI as part of a strengthened UK aerospace
industry, he said. 'Dowty is a lovely name - probably better than TI.'
Dowty's diversification had sapped management time and short-changed
shareholders, he said. 'We are taking a company back to its core origins and
away from diversification.'
TI would dispose of the information technology division, which has turnover
of Pounds 180m and which Dowty already says it is trying to sell. It would
also get out of most of the electronics systems business, which control
engines for aircraft and missile systems. In total, businesses with total
revenues of about Pounds 300m would probably be sold.
This is the sort of restructuring Mr Lewinton has overseen at TI. He sold
the group's Raleigh bicycles subsidiary and its household goods division
soon after taking over in 1986, and focused the business more on tubing,
from which its original name, Tube Investments, had stemmed. TI's market
capitalisation (less new shares from rights issues) has grown from Pounds
330m in 1986 to Pounds 1.1bn; Dowty's has fallen from Pounds 479m to about
Pounds 340m over the same period.
For TI, says Mr Lewinton, a Dowty acquisition would be more of the same: in
effect, two 'bolt-on' acquisitions and a divestment programme. 'I always
thought that if we could have a group with an aerospace, an industrial and
an auto arm then we were going to win,' he says.
Combining the aerospace divisions would create a business under the Dowty
name with sales of Pounds 400m, four times TI's current level of aviation
revenues. There would be big head office savings at TI's headquarters at
Abingdon or at Dowty's in Cheltenham.
Dowty's polymer business, which has sales of Pounds 100m, would be brought
together with TI's John Crane International, which makes mechanical and gas
seals. The linked businesses would have sales of Pounds 400m.
TI's third leg would remain the Bundy tubes operation in the US, which has
sales of a little less than Pounds 400m and which is now the group's
strongest business.
A successful takeover would leave TI diversified away from the UK in the way
that Mr Lewinton, who has dual British and US nationality, quickly sought
after taking the helm. After disposals, North America would account for
about 40 per cent of sales, just above the current level, and the UK would
shrink to 20 per cent.
TI says the deal would have a broadly neutral impact on earnings in 1993,
the first full year after the acquisition. It would dilute earnings this
year, the company says, but not by enough to hinder dividend growth.
Mr Bruce Ralph, Dowty's chief executive, gave an immediate, 'emphatic'
rejection of TI's overtures. Stockbrokers' analysts however, compared
Dowty's position to that of Hawker Siddeley, caught out by a bid from BTR
last year. Trapped at the bottom of the cycle in two industries heavily hit
by recession, Dowty's plans for rationalisation risk being seen as too
little too late.
For watchers of the aerospace industry, now undergoing the most severe
conditions in 40 years, TI's bid was not surprising. The industry has
already consolidated, and may have further to go. Worldwide, there are only
three main airframe makers: Boeing, McDonnell Douglas and Airbus. There are
three aero-engine makers: Pratt &amp; Whitney and General Electric of the US;
and Rolls-Royce. In avionics, there are four big competitors: Honeywell and
Rockwell Collins in the US; Smiths Industries in the UK; and Sextant of
France. But two of these, Rockwell and Smiths, are in talks about close
industrial co-operation.
Such concentration was likely to spread through the industry to the
component makers. As one analyst said yesterday: 'TI brings more to Dowty
than BTR brought to Hawker Siddeley - TI is actually buying something that
makes strategic sense.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
DOWTY
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Founded 1931 by the late Sir George Dowty.
1958 acquired propeller business from Rolls-Royce and Bristol Aircraft.
1987 created information technology division making modems and VDU
terminals.
1991 lost crucial contracts with Fokker and Boeing for landing gear.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
TI
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Formed 1919 from amalgamation of two tube manufacturers.
By 1939 it was the largest maker of precision steel tube in the world.
1967 turned to consumer goods after nationalisation of steel interests.
1986 sold Russell Hobbs; 1987 sold Raleigh and other cycle interests;
1988 acquired Bundy Corp, the US tube manufacturer.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Sources: FT analysis, Datastream
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11522</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Eurotunnel to seek waiver for banking covenants
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT PESTON and ANDREW TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EUROTUNNEL will disclose today that it is in breach of its banking
covenants, or is in technical default, which means it is being forced to ask
its 206 banks for permission to continue work on the Channel tunnel.
Although bankers said yesterday they were hopeful that the banks would give
this permission - in the form of a waiver to the covenant - they said they
viewed Eurotunnel's technical default as serious.
Eurotunnel's agent banks, which include National Westminster and Midland,
were yesterday in Paris to discuss the issue.
The company, which has Pounds 8bn of credit facilities, is in technical
default because it has increased its forecast of cash outflow over the next
year. It has become more pessimistic in this respect because the tunnel's
opening has been delayed from June 1993 until autumn next year and a full
railway service will not operate until summer 1994.
As a result, Eurotunnel's revenues in the opening months of operation will
be less than it had expected. But the company hopes demand for its services
over the longer term will be greater than its earlier expectations. However,
the contractor working on the project, Transmanche Link, has warned
Eurotunnel that the tunnel may not be ready to open until the end of next
year.
Eurotunnel's chief executive, Sir Alastair Morton, is expected to refute
speculation that the company needs to raise new funds, either from a rights
issue or extra bank facilities, over the short term. Eurotunnel is expected
to have around Pounds 1bn of unused bank facilities by the time the tunnel
opens.
However, the company may launch a rights issue after the tunnel has opened.
Bankers said the process of obtaining waivers would be more difficult in the
light of Eurotunnel's setback last month in its long-running dispute over
building costs with TML.
An independent disputes panel ruled that Eurotunnel should triple its
monthly progress payments to the contractors to more than Pounds 70m. The
first payment is due next Thursday. Eurotunnel is likely to challenge the
ruling.
Bankers said these additional payments to TML have not yet been built into
Eurotunnel's financial projections.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11523</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / IMF warns Moscow of delay in financial support for rouble
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN, Economics Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FINANCIAL SUPPORT for Russia from the International Monetary Fund could be
delayed if the government in Moscow dilutes its macroeconomic and monetary
policies, Mr Michel Camdessus, the IMF managing director, warned yesterday.
He told a press conference in Washington that the creation of the planned
Dollars 6bn (Pounds 3.3bn) stabilisation fund for the rouble 'could take
some time'. During this period Russia and the other countries in the
so-called rouble zone would be expected to establish some market credibility
for the rouble and comply with conditions set by the IMF.
Although the fund wanted to move ahead with providing Russia with a proposed
Dollars 4bn standby credit as quickly as possible, this too could take time
if the IMF were to be faced with a weakening of Russia's economic reform
policies, Mr Camdessus added.
Russia is hoping agreement on the standby loan can be reached next month in
a move that would unleash extra financial support from the west and set in
train a rescheduling of the official debts of the former Soviet Union by the
Paris Club of creditors.
Mr Camdessus spoke against a background of growing concern in Washington
that Russia might be backsliding on its commitments to low inflation,
currency stability and economic reform.
At another news conference, Mr David Mulford, the US Treasury undersecretary
for international affairs, said the reported dilution of Russia's economic
policies would be 'one of the issues at the top of the agenda' when Mr Yegor
Gaidar, Russia's deputy prime minister, joined part of Sunday's discussions
among the Group of Seven finance ministers and central bankers.
Both the IMF and US Treasury will want Mr Gaidar to tell them what policy
changes, if any, are under way in Russia. So far their only information,
including the suggestion that Russia should adopt a crawling peg (adjustable
exchange rate) for the rouble, has come from press reports.
A meeting of ministers from the Group of Ten industrial countries is
expected next Monday to activate a dormant IMF financing facility, known as
the General Arrangements to Borrow, so that a stabilisation fund can be set
up.
But Mr Mulford made clear that there was no agreement yet about when the
fund should be operative. Mr Camdessus underlined that there were many
hurdles to be overcome before Russia and the other rouble zone countries
among the former Soviet republics - those which have chosen to retain the
old Soviet currency - could benefit from the fund.
Mr Camdessus said Russia would have to implement credible macroeconomic and
monetary policies. The rouble would have to be backed by realistic interest
rates, control over credit policy and support in the markets. The members of
the rouble zone would have to be committed to monetary co-operation, with
arrangements in place to manage the currency properly, he said.
A weakening of monetary policy would not help the creation of a rouble
stabilisation fund, Mr Camdessus said. Nor was he enthusiastic about the
idea of a crawling peg. The fund was intended to provide an anchor for the
rouble. But if the exchange rate were to be adjustable under a crawling peg
arrangement, the rouble would have a 'sliding anchor', and that was not what
the IMF had in mind.
Incomes and output decline in Russia, Page 2
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11524</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Disclosure rules for MPs need tightening, says report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MEMBERS of Parliament should be forced to disclose much more information
about their business dealings as part of a tightening of the rules for
registering financial interests, an all-party House of Commons committee
says.
The committee's tough report, published yesterday, proposes that MPs should
set out the nature of the business conducted by companies of which they are
directors. They should give more details about any consultancies they hold,
including the names of clients with which they are personally involved.
They should also declare their membership of specific Lloyd's of London
insurance syndicates.
MPs would be required to declare relevant interests if they were leading
sponsors of a parliamentary expression of opinion in the form of an early
day motion. Shareholdings with a nominal value of Pounds 25,000 or more
would need to be registered, as well as those amounting to 1 per cent of a
company's value.
There would also be stricter regulation of gifts, travel and benefits, with
requirements to register acceptance of these extending to MPs' staff.
The proposals follow a review of the rules prompted by a debate in February
1990, in which the Commons upheld complaints against Mr John Browne, former
Tory MP for Winchester.
In the last parliament, MPs' links with Lloyd's, the insurance market, were
highlighted when MPs were in the forefront of those pressing the government
to investigate allegations of malpractice by market insiders. About 40 MPs
registered as members of Lloyd's, although it is only the new requirement
that would make this compulsory.
The committee agreed that, when an MP resigns from Lloyd's, the entry should
remain in the register until all outstanding obligations have been met and
benefits realised.
'We also believe that membership of individual Lloyd's syndicates can be of
considerable significance,' the report says.
The paper, finalised at the end of the last parliament, is the third from
the committee awaiting debate by MPs. There is likely to be some delay
before it can be discussed but it would be difficult for MPs to reject it as
too Draconian.
The rule on giving details of syndicates was proposed by Mr Bob Cryer, and
supported by fellow Labour committee members. Two Tory members, Mr Peter
Viggers and Mr Robert Adley, declared their interests as mem-bers of Lloyd's
and did not vote.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11525</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Scientists hail US discovery of 'Holy Grail of cosmology'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLIVE COOKSON, Science Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A US SATELLITE has found gigantic ripples of matter near the edge of the
universe. The discovery promises to explain how stars and galaxies evolved
from the Big Bang - the cataclysmic explosion that created everything about
15bn years ago.
The finding, announced last night at a meeting of the American Physical
Society in Washington, is the most important event in cosmology since 1964,
when scientists detected a faint after-glow of the Big Bang.
'What we have found is evidence for the birth of the universe,' said Mr
George Smoot of the University of California at Berkeley, who led the
National Aeronautics and Space Administration team that made the discovery.
The Cosmic Background Explorer (Cobe) spacecraft, launched in 1989, has
detected variations within the after-glow. These arose from fluctuations in
the universe one-trillionth (million-millionth) of a second after its
creation.
The discovery points the way to a solution to one of the greatest puzzles in
science: how did matter that was uniformly spread in the original Big Bang
start clumping together to produce stars, galaxies and clusters of galaxies?
Professor Michael Turner, a University of Chicago physicist at the
Washington meeting, said the significance of the Cobe find 'cannot be
overstated - they have found the Holy Grail of cosmology'.
Mr Smoot said the ripples, which are very wispy clouds of matter, were the
largest and most ancient structures in the universe, stretching across
billions of light-years of space and dating back about 15bn years to when
the universe was just 300,000 years old
The ripples were created by the universe's rapid expansion after the Big
Bang. Then gravity made increasing amounts of matter clump together,
eventually creating galaxies and stars.
Evidence collected by the satellite after 300 million measurements of
background radiation from the Big Bang also supports the theory that up to
90 per cent of the universe is invisible 'dark matter' which scientists have
not been able to identify, Nasa said. The temperatures and sizes of the
variations in the radiation agree with a theory called 'inflationary
cosmology', which explains how minute fluctuations after the Big Bang
created the pattern of the universe as we know it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11526</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Observer: Work study
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
As Britain's industrialists were urging one another to lead the charge to
recovery, two British Rail workmen on Greenwich station were shovelling
debris into a motorised cart on caterpillar tracks. 'Better than a
wheelbarrow,' observed a waiting passenger. 'Must hold three times as much.'
By the time the train was due, the cart was full. One workman rested, while
the other started it up and steered it at snail's pace up the platform which
is separated by a railing from a strip of grass. 'But much slower than a
wheelbarrow,' the passenger added, 'though it must cost a dozen times more'.
As the train arrived, five minutes late, the workman was inching down the
ramp at the platform's end. And by the time the train pulled out, he was
edging up the ramp to the strip on the other side of the railing.
'Blimey, they're going to dump it on the grass,' said the passenger. 'They
don't even need a wheelbarrow - they could just shovel the stuff straight
over the fence.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11527</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAGAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Observer: Boy George
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
When Graeme Gilchrist, Union Discount's former boss, left in February after
unveiling hefty losses, a first stab at mending fences was the arrival, as
joint deputy chairman, of Sir George Blunden, highly respected former deputy
governor of the Bank of England.
Now George Blunden junior, who has been running S G Warburg's discount
operation, turns up as chief executive. Do not assume it was merely the
name.
Central banking relationships have their uses - as John and James, two of
BoE governor Robin Leigh-Pemberton's five sons, respectively at Smith New
Court and Warburgs, would attest. But it seems that Blunden, earlier the
bright boy at Seccombe Marshall &amp; Campion, quickly earned himself the
reputation at Warburgs as being too big for the job. He apparently
understands the market, is tough - but his route to the top, including three
years' community work with the London Adventure Playground Association, is
hardly the most conventional.
Sir George resigns because he feels it is 'inappropriate to remain following
the appointment of his son'. Young Blunden may be an excellent choice and
even if it sounds a touch nepotistic, discount houses always have been
rather odd animals.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11528</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAF9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Observer: Milking time
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Fancy being a gentleman, or gentlewoman farmer? All you need to go with your
green wellies is a bigger than average garden and Pounds 27.50, and the
National Farmers Union will welcome you to its flock with open arms.
The aim of its new 'countryside' membership is to milk subscriptions worth
Pounds 2.75m a year from an estimated 100,000 holders of land 'somewhere in
size between a garden and a small farm'.
If they breed the odd sheep or pig, harvest fruit or run a riding school, so
much the more authentic. Mind you, not being properly commercial, they won't
get a vote when the union's real farmers are deciding policy.
'Maybe we are grabbing a tiger by the tail, but who knows, maybe we can
harness the tiger to work with us,' the NFU's David Hellard says.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11529</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAF8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Observer: Dirty work
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
So what are Britain's customs and excise officials now spending inordinate
numbers of work-hours doing? Poring over imported pornographic books,
pictures and such, says the National Audit Office's report, adding that
every item suspected of obscenity has to be examined in detail.
'This can take a great deal of time. It is also a stressful and extremely
unpleasant task. . . and staff have to be rested from the work at regular
intervals.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11530</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAF7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Observer: BAe lands its man
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
If the British Aerospace chairmanship is such an attractive job, why has it
taken seven months to fill? With a workforce of over 100,000, BAe is
Britain's biggest manufacturing exporter but it also poses one of the
country's biggest management challenges.
Its main strength - defence - is a declining industry, and it is weak in
most other areas. Perhaps its status as a national industrial asset with a
questionable long-term future is the reason the best and brightest of
British business (foreigners were excluded) have not rushed to take up this
public duty. Maybe the risks of failure outweigh even the almost certain
knighthood.
In the past the job has been done by an oilman (Sir Austin Pearce), and a
management professor (Sir Roland Smith), with mixed results. Sir Graham Day,
who has been doing the job on a temporary basis, was a favoured candidate.
But he has his own reasons for not wanting the post.
Against such a background, BTR stalwart John Cahill is as good a choice as
any. Admittedly, he is in his early 60s, has never chaired a plc company
before, and has not even sat as a non-executive on other boards. However, as
chief executive of BTR - one of Britain's industrial success stories - he
headed a workforce considerably bigger than BAe's.
As an operational man, Cahill is hard to better. A sprawling business like
BAe is bound to benefit from his attention to costs and margins.
Even so, whether he has the right skills to be chairman, as opposed to chief
executive of BAe, is uncertain. He does not have any feel for dealing with
the world's defence/military establishments, and it is far from clear that
he has the vision needed to establish BAe as a force to be reckoned with in
the next century.
Given this weakness, one of his first jobs should be to strengthen his board
of directors which lacks the sort of depth one would expect in a company of
BAe's size. Provided he does so, and in particular appoints an effective
finance director, BAe might well have chosen the right man.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11531</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAF6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / The Property Market: Conversion factor adds up for builders
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The tide may be turning for office development in London. After decades of
domination by the needs of commerce, central London may have to find new
uses for its unwanted offices and buildings. 'There should be a fundamental
revision of land use in central London', says Mr Geoff Marsh of APR, a
property consultancy.
Developers are starting to consider the feasibility of introducing hostels,
flats and houses into less popular office districts. Commuters, tired of
long journeys and keen to live nearer their place of work, could be the
source of fresh demand in what is still a depressed housing market.
The notion of turning offices into housing smacks of woolly-headed idealism
and, indeed, the process is fraught with practical difficulties. But the
dire state of the commercial property sector is forcing property owners to
think again about office schemes. Scores of empty offices and buildings, on
which huge bills for rates, interest payments and maintenance are incurred,
are virtually worthless because they may never find tenants.
The record number of vacant office buildings - and the still greater number
of office proposals in the pipeline - will satisfy demand well into the next
century. Yet as Mr Marsh says: 'For some of these sites, there is no
prospect of a viable scheme for the next 20 years.'
The argument that inner city land is too expensive to use for anything but
offices has been turned on its head. Office rents need to be at least Pounds
22 per sq ft for land to have any value at all, says to Mr Ralph Pearson of
Chesterton, a property adviser. In parts of central London, land earmarked
for offices could have a negative value for years to come.
Developers, architects, planners and surveyors have given a cautious
approval to the idea of converting unwanted office buildings and development
sites.
'There are plenty of cases where it will work,' says Mr Richard Saxon, head
of architecture at BDP, a design company. Converting offices to houses is no
less feasible than the once-radical idea of building flats in old warehouses
in the London Docklands, he says.
Yet any change of use for office buildings will be neither cheap nor easy.
'Conversion costs are high,' says Mr Michael Campbell of Peaston, an
Edinburgh-based developer which has built flats and hostels in office
buildings, warehouses and disused mills throughout the country. 'You have
got to give the buildings a residential feel. You can't just put up
partitions.'
Modern office blocks throw up the greatest hurdles. The air-conditioned,
glass blocks erected in the 1980s, with large floor spaces and wall-to-wall
sealed windows would need to be virtually rebuilt to be used for housing.
Conversely, the slab-type office blocks of the 1950s and 1960s are far more
suitable for change of use because they have shallow floor spaces with
plenty of light and windows that open.
Ironically, these features mean they have fallen out of favour for office
use. 'The buildings which are most convertible are at the bottom of the heap
of desirability for offices,' says Mr Saxon.
But even converting those buildings which lend themselves to a change of use
would still be expensive. The walls might need to be reclad - 'the cost of
replacing the cladding is crazy,' says Mr Campbell - some windows would have
to be taken out, new plumbing and electrical wiring would have to inserted
from top to bottom and independent heating systems would have to be
installed in every flat. 'Conversion of a radical nature sometimes costs as
much as starting from scratch,' says Mr Saxon.
Nonetheless, the sums appear to add up for cheap, old office blocks which
have little hope of ever finding a tenant again. An added incentive is that
the conversion of an office block would generate a higher density of housing
than would normally be allowed.
But developers will have to contend with planners. And although most London
authorities would welcome additional housing, some could express
reservations. Boroughs that are unsympathetic to the property industry may
be unwilling to let hard pressed office builders off the hook; in others
boroughs, the need to attract business may over-ride the need for houses.
One authority that has already weighed up the issues is Islington, in north
London, which straddles an area where both offices and housing are in high
demand. The borough has already given planning permission for a couple of
schemes to covert office sites into student hostels. City University, for
example, is planning to use Glaxo's former offices and laboratories in
Graham Street as accommodation for its students.
In principle, Islington welcomes such schemes. Mr Bert Newbrook, the
borough's assistant head of planning, says the proposals to build hostels
instead of more offices takes pressure off the housing stock and also gives
a boost to small shops in fringe areas. Conversion into hostels is a
particularly suitable proposition for former offices largely because hostels
have no need for gardens or garages.
Nonetheless, hostels can be unpopular with local residents. A proposal by
Rosehaugh Copartnership to convert an office courtyard scheme in Tyndale
Terrace, Islington, into a student hostel for the Polytechnic of Central
London may yet be rejected by Islington planning committee when it considers
the application next week. 'The committee has no problem with the
principle,' says Mr Newbrook. 'But the residents are very fearful of the
noise the students will make.'
These first tentative steps towards finding other uses for offices show just
how complicated the exercise can be. Conversion work can be expensive,
unpopular and unsuitable, with many potential sites or buildings ruled out
by their location or design. Moreover, many developers are unwilling to
countenance such a radical change of land use while there is any prospect of
a recovery in land values.
For all that, a more realistic approach to new development proposals, along
with the conversion of a small proportion of existing office buildings,
could make a significant inroad into the problem of over-supply that is
afflicting the office market. Then, says Mr Stuart Lipton of Stanhope
Properties, the surplus of poor quality space will disappear. 'The property
market is like a fruit market: the bad products will be turned into juice.'
Fewer offices and more housing could bring an even deeper benefit to the
London office market. In particular, it could address the potential threat
to London posed by many companies' difficulties in retaining a workforce fed
up with high house prices and lengthy, unreliable journeys to work.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11532</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAF5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Management: Entrepreneur in his natural habitat - Lucy
Kellaway finds Sir Terence Conran as busy as ever / My Office
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LUCY KELLAWAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
According to Sir Terence Conran, the age of the office is over. The man who
introduced Britain to stylish interiors sees a future in which people will
work from home, meeting up for a friendly lunch in revamped Lyons' coffee
houses. 'Imagine suffering the indignities of Network SouthEast to arrive at
work in one of those towers,' he makes a disdainful gesture out of the
window at the City of London.
'You would think: 'What the bloody hell am I doing here, sitting at a screen
all day when I could be doing the same thing at home?''
This is vintage Sir Terence: bold, visionary and unrealistic. It is also a
bit rich for him to speculate on the nightmares of working life as he sits
in an office which he describes as 'perfect', adding that he 'feels quite
embarrassed about it'.
But he looks anything but embarrassed as he surveys his magnificent room.
Some 50 feet long and 35 wide, it has large windows looking over the Thames
and is light, comfortable and stylish.
The room is part of a converted warehouse at Butler's Wharf, part of a
Conran development that went bankrupt a year ago. Indeed, since Sir Terence
resigned from his Storehouse retailing empire in 1990, he has suffered a
good many blows.
But you would not guess it from his poised look as he sits behind his desk -
a huge piece of polished wood which he designed himself, and had workmen
knock up in his private furniture factory in the country.
He maintains that he is just as busy now with his scores of individual
projects as he ever was running Storehouse: he has restaurants, a design
company, his own foundation, the Conran shop, his books, chairmanship of the
Design Museum.
He runs through the list twice; evidently he does not think he is washed up
and he is damned if anyone else is going to think it either.
As one would expect, Sir Terence has strong feelings about what an office
should be like. Its occupant 'must feel relaxed and comfortable in the
space, which must reflect their personality. Work is a part of life.'
So what does his office reflect about him? What would he think if he walked
in for the first time?
'I'd think, how nice to have fresh air coming through the window. How
interesting that the secretary almost shares the office with him, with only
a sliding screen separating them.'
Sir Terence makes much of the importance of nice surroundings for everyone.
He says his suite of offices (originally designed as an apartment) work well
for his staff of 10 or so.
'The communal kitchen is marvellous for them,' he says. 'They can make their
toast in there in the morning.'
In fact the kitchen is aggressively high-tech, and has nothing so homely as
a table or chair. The secretary sits in a windowless anteroom, and the other
staff are squeezed into small, plain rooms at the back.
Until you see the boss's office, you might think you were in a start-up
design company, cramped yet pleasantly informal: in the cupboard housing the
photocopier, a bottle of wine serves as the doorstop.
'This is obviously the office of someone who likes art, pictures and
sculpture,' he says, returning to his own room, 'and who has a sense of
humour'.
He points at a huge model of Tower Bridge on the sleek white board table; at
the bronze Michelin man on the coffee table. But funniest of all is an
ethnic bird, which he says is a jeweller's blow lamp. 'It makes me laugh
like anything,' he says.
The outsider might miss the joke, but what they could not miss is the
identity of the occupant. The room could belong to no-one else but Terence
Conran. Everywhere are signs of his successes and failures.
There is the faultless good taste: an idiosyncratic combination of old and
new, high-tech and ethnic, smooth and rough surfaces apparently put together
effortlessly. There is the model of the Food Hall for Canary Wharf, a Conran
project that went wrong.
There is a shelf of children's books, published by Conran Octopus, of which
he is still chairman. There is a large collection of books on design and
taste, almost all of which he has written himself. He proudly holds out the
latest to be examined and admired.
There is a basket of swatches of coloured Indian cottons and some collages
put together by prospective buyers for the Conran shop. Both betray a
fanatical attention to detail that is fine for the head of a small company,
but is misplaced in the boss of a big retailer.
The room is littered with sculptures and pictures, many propped in piles on
the floor, waiting for the right spot in one of his successful restaurants.
Conran gives a bronze pillow with a fish on top a gentle kick: 'I bought
that in the Islington crafts fair last week. I'm not sure what I want to do
with it yet.'
His desk is a happy jumble of colourful cigar boxes, a fat stub is burning
in a glass ashtray, pens and pencils, photographs, catalogues, and piles of
paper.
There are empty cups of the strong coffee that his secretary makes, grinding
the beans freshly each time.
'I try to keep things tidy, but there is so much stuff that crosses this
desk.
'I have learnt that if you put things in an in-tray and let them mature,
they self-destruct.' There are no desk drawers, no filing cabinets,
certainly no computers.
Sir Terence is no great organiser. The room is exactly as he likes, and one
gets the impression he does what he likes.
He may no longer be a powerful man in big business; judging by his office,
he was never meant to be.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11533</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAF4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Rover cuts dealer margins
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GRIFFITHS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ROVER GROUP is cutting dealers' profit margins on its Rover 800 executive
car range to 10 per cent from an average of 17 per cent, John Griffiths
writes.
The move provides Rover with a price increase while allowing retail prices
for the range to remain unchanged.
Rover said yesterday it had taken the action in consultation with, and with
the support of, its dealer network. Dealers are to be eligible for
'development bonuses', equivalent to an extra 4 per cent profit margin, in
order to help them secure fleet sales for 800 models.
Rover increased prices for the rest of its cars by an average of 3.5 per
cent in February. The 800 range was not included, because of uncertainty
about how executive cars might be affected by the Budget last month.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11534</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAF3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / PowerGen nears radical shake-up
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SMITH, Labour Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
POWERGEN has won backing from union leaders for a radical shake-up of pay
and collective bargaining procedures. It is the first UK electricity company
to win union approval on a local pay and conditions package after the
break-up of national arrangements.
The proposals include harmonisation of terms and conditions for all
employees, increasingly flexible working and introduction of 'single-table
bargaining' - the company's six unions negotiating together rather than in
the four forums under the national negotiating machinery.
If the company's 6,500 employees agree to the changes, many will move to
higher salaries. Nalgo, the public-services union, estimates that clerical
assistants and typists on Pounds 9,631 will receive Pounds 1,087 and
computer operators on Pounds 15,943 will receive Pounds 450 on top of the
5.5 per cent agreed in the national pay talks.
Also, all employees will have one-off payments of Pounds 400 plus 2 per cent
of salary for moving to the new structure.
All 18 UK electricity companies are in talks about changed pay systems after
giving notice that this year's national negotiations would be the last. Most
want single-table bargaining, although National Power, the biggest
generator, is among those which want to retain separate negotiations for
different groups of staff.
Like PowerGen, all companies will seek to negotiate pay systems that would
exclude possible claims from predominantly female groups for pay equal with
that of male staff.
Mr John Hart, PowerGen personnel director, said the new structure would
increase potential for teamwork and flexibility.
Members of Nalgo and the other five unions will be balloted on the offer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11535</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAF2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Electricity surplus of 60 per cent is predicted
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JULIET SYCHRAVA and CHRIS TIGHE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ENGLAND and Wales will have a 60 per cent surplus of electricity by 1997,
the National Grid Company (NGC), which manages the countries' electricity
system, disclosed in its annual statement yesterday.
More than 10,000MW of plant - the equivalent of 10 medium-size power
stations - would have to close to achieve a more reasonable 30 per cent
margin, the company's figures show.
That will support British Coal's fears that the many gas stations being
built will force older coal-fired stations to close.
Twenty-eight power stations are due to be built in England and Wales by
1997, the company said. All except the Sizewell B nuclear station will run
on gas. NGC emphasised, however, that some of the planned stations could be
cancelled. Half will be built by small private-sector generating companies
that have emerged since the electricity industry was privatised two years
ago. The remainder will be built by National Power and PowerGen, the two big
generators created at privatisation. Their construction is controversial
because British Coal, National Power and PowerGen think many will be more
expensive than existing coal-fired plant and should not be built. They
believe the new gas stations will survive only because they have managed to
sign contracts to sell power to regional electricity companies at what will
prove to be above market prices. That means they will take market share from
National Power and PowerGen's older stations, although those may actually be
generating cheaper power.
Most vulnerable are smaller coal and oil-fired stations, such as National
Power's Padiham, Willington, Uskmouth and Staythorpe stations, and
PowerGen's High Marnham and Drakelow B stations. National Power said it
would fight to keep good coal stations open. Nuclear Electric is on course
for another profitable year, Mr John Collier, the company's chairman, said
yesterday. Results for the financial year just ended, which will be
announced in July, would be 'very rosy indeed'.
The state-owned company, which owns and operates the nuclear power stations
of England and Wales, produced a record amount of electricity in the year to
last month, Mr Collier said. It generated 45,000 megawatt-hours of
electricity, compared with 42 the previous year. Offer, the electricity
industry watchdog, yesterday amended the market rules to allow more
companies to choose their electricity supplier, rather than having to buy
from their local company.
The rules allowed only companies buying more than 1MW to choose their
supplier. The amendment enables companies that are subsidiaries of the same
group and occupy the same site to add together their purchases to push them
over the 1MW limit.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11536</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAF1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / 500 jobs to go at GEC Alsthom
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRIS TIGHE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UP TO 500 jobs are to go at GEC Alsthom's Large Steam Turbine Group at
Trafford Park, Manchester, because of a sharp drop in orders as a result of
the move to combined-cycle power stations, Chris Tighe writes.
GEC Alsthom, a Franco-British company jointly owned by GEC and Alcatel
Alsthom, is to concentrate all its UK steam turbine production at its other
British steam turbine plant in Rugby, Warwickshire.
The 500 job losses will be over the next two years. A total of 150 employees
will be retained at the site, to service low-pressure turbines. Yesterday's
announcement does not affect other parts of the Trafford Park site, where
GEC Alsthom employs 2,450 people.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11537</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAF0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Market forces curb audit fees
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AUDIT FEES are falling back towards levels of two years ago, a study
indicated yesterday.
Bills for 42 quoted companies with year-ends on or after December 1991 have
dropped 2.7 per cent to Pounds 53.7m, according to JDH Consultants, the
Glasgow-based firm.
That compares with a rise in audit bills for the same companies of 5 per
cent to Pounds 55.2m last year, up from Pounds 52.6m in the previous 12
months.
The study, which used figures from the annual reports of companies that have
reported so far this year, provides evidence of the competition between
accountancy firms.
It comes as companies are increasingly putting their audits out to tender -
or threatening to do so - in an attempt to cut costs in the face of the
recession.
The trend is depressing news for the accountancy firms, which traditionally
rely on audit fees during a downturn, when income from other sources such as
corporate finance and management consultancy declines.
Mr Dennis Henry, JDH managing director, said: 'This study emphasis the fact
that auditors are not escaping the pressures placed on their clients.'
The largest declines include a 46 per cent fall at Alfred McAlpine from
Pounds 565,000 to Pounds 305,000 - which changed auditor from Touche Ross to
Price Waterhouse - and 44 per cent from Pounds 1.6m to Pounds 900,000 for
English China Clay, audited by KPMG Peat Marwick.
The highest fee in the study is from BTR, the industrial group, audited by
Ernst &amp; Young, which has remained static at Pounds 7m for the past three
years.
Report on audit fees of UK public companies. JDH Consultants, 11 Clydebrae
Drive, Bothwell, Glasgow G71 8SB. Pounds 250.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11538</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Tories pressured on private health
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN PIKE, Social Affairs Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE government should 'strongly affirm' the importance of private medicine
in Britain, Mr Roy Forman, chief executive of a leading medical insurer,
said yesterday.
Mr Forman, of PPP Group (Private Patients Plan), contrasted ministers'
defence of the National Health Service with their attitude towards the
private sector.
He questioned comments by Mr John Major, the prime minister, and other
ministers that they wanted to make the NHS so efficient that no-one would
need to use the private sector.
Mr Forman's comments present a dilemma for Mrs Virginia Bottomley, the new
health secretary. Ministers are smarting from Labour allegations that the
Tory general election victory would lead to privatisation of the NHS. They
want to demonstrate their commitment to state medicine, but some private
providers feel that such support denies them fair treatment.
PPP announced a pre-tax profit of Pounds 18m in the year to December. Income
rose 15 per cent to a record Pounds 404m, although PPP's solvency margin
(net worth as a percentage of premiums) dropped slightly to 51 per cent.
Mr Forman said PPP had in a broadly static market increased its subscribers
by 3.7 per cent to 918,000, giving it a 29 per cent market share.
PPP, like other UK insurers, has been required by the Policyholders'
Protection Board to provide 0.5 per cent of its 1990 insurance income - in
PPP's case Pounds 1.6m - after the collapse of London United Investments.
Sir Peter Gadsden, PPP chairman, calls in the annual report for a review of
the levy system.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11539</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / First shots fired in council elections: Tories stress
prudence - Labour fears for democracy / MPs worried about poor interest
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BOTH MAIN parties launched their local government elections campaigns
yesterday with the Tories emphasising authorities as 'enablers' rather than
providers of services. Labour responded with a warning that local democracy
was threatened.
Both main parties were united in asserting that they were confident of
running vigorous campaigns, although the elections follow so soon after a
fiercely fought general poll.
Privately, however, MPs in both parties admit that motivating not only their
supporters but also the electorate is likely to be difficult.
The elections, on May 7, are taking place for all seats in the 53 district
councils in Scotland and for a third of seats in 155 of the district
councils in England and Wales. There are no elections in London or for
county councils.
Launching the campaign, Mr Michael Howard, the environment secretary, and Mr
John Redwood, the local-government minister, said that only the Tories could
stop councils being 'captured by service providers' and achieve services
local communities wanted at prices they could afford.
Labour, Mr Howard added, was 'in no position' to claim any interest in the
quality of services, as the party's leading figures were 'grubbing around
for the votes of public-service unions' in the leadership election.
Mr Bryan Gould, shadow environment secretary, rejected the charge and said
that the government's drive towards centralisation and privatisation in
local services would intensify. In the campaign, Labour plans to emphasises
the role of local councils as a check on central government.
Producing illustrative figures for the council tax, which will replace the
poll tax next year, Mr Gould warned that the new system would mean people in
the south facing higher bills than under the poll tax.
Both Labour and the Tories emphasised that in some cases only a handful of
votes could change the political control of a council. Mr Chris Patten, the
Tory party chairman, said the party would be looking for some gains in
controlling councils rather than at a particular total for the number of
seats overall. Mr John Cunningham, Labour's campaigns co-ordinator,
underlined the objective of consolidating a strong position from when those
seats were last contested in 1988.
In terms of gains, Labour will be looking to areas where it did well in
parliamentary seats. The Tories pointed out that in some places where the
Liberal Democrats had failed to take long-standing target seats in the
Westminster elections, their local authority base might be more vulnerable
than before.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11540</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Lloyd's syndicate may face more legal action
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MERRETT syndicate 417/418, one of the biggest syndicates at the Lloyd's of
London insurance market, faces the prospect of further legal action by Names
over its loss-making 1985 year.
Names are individuals whose assets back underwriting at Lloyd's. They are
organised into more than 280 underwriting syndicates.
Merrett already faces possible action from Names who joined 417/418 in 1984
and 1985 over allegations that the syndicate's underwriters should not have
closed the 1982 year of account during which loss-making US liability
insurance contracts were underwritten.
Names who joined the syndicate before 1984 have been excluded from the
action on the grounds that they may have a conflict of interest. Now,
pre-1984 Names - who number about 2,000 - have formed an action committee.
Mr Lawrence Overend, its provisional chairman, has written to all 4,000
Names who were members of 417/418 in 1985 suggesting that they may have much
broader grounds for legal action.
Meanwhile, figures compiled on behalf of members of the Lime Street Names
Association show that the agency's working Names - those who had jobs at the
insurance market - were placed on fewer loss-making catastrophe syndicates
than the agency's outside Names.
More than 300 Lime Street Names - about two-thirds of the total - have
accumulated more than seven years of losses from syndicates managed by
Feltrim, Gooda Walker, Devonshire and MacMillan agencies. A group of 28 Lime
Street Names faces losses from 16 years of underwriting by these syndicates.
By contrast only four of the 14 working Names face losses from more than
seven years of underwriting by the same syndicates.
The data also show that Lime Street's overseas Names are heavily represented
on loss-making syndicates.
Eleven of the 28 Lime Street members who face losses from 16 years of
underwriting by the catastrophe syndicates are North Americans.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11541</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Agreement on ITV proposals
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ITV companies will today deliver their detailed proposals to the
Independent Television Commission on how the regional TV system will be run
over the next 10 years.
After months of negotiation, the 15 companies said they had reached
agreement on everything from how the new central scheduler system will
operate to relations with independent producers.
The detailed proposals now have to be agreed by the ITC, although the
general principles have already been accepted.
The package will then be submitted to the Office of Fair Trading, which is
expected to hold hearings and announce its verdict by the end of the summer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11542</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / SIB acts against Manx company
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NORMA COHEN, Investments Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Securities and Invest-ments Board has appointed provisional liquidators
for the assets of Asset Management Ltd, an Isle of Man-based investment
company in which between Pounds 2m and Pounds 2.5m of investors money is
believed to be missing.
At least 20 to 25 investors are believed to have invested sums through AML,
an associate company known as Financial Centres Ltd, based in St Albans,
Herts, and through Mr Roger Shrubb, a director of both companies. None of
the three is authorised to conduct investment business under the UK
Financial Services Act of 1986. Mr Shrubb, AML and Financial Centres Ltd
have also been barred by court order from disposing of any assets.
Allied Dunbar, the life insurance and financial services company, said that
Mr Shrubb was a so-called tied agent for the company from December 1987
until July last year.
'Any investor who purchased a bona fide Allied Dunbar product through Mr
Shrubb has nothing to worry about,' Allied Dunbar said.
The company noted that Mr Shrubb was not employed directly by Allied Dunbar,
but was self-employed and sold its products exclusively.
Mr Shrubb's contract with Allied Dunbar was terminated for 'poor
performance' - a term used by life insurers to describe sales agents who
either sell too few policies or who have unacceptably high numbers of
policies cancelled in the first few years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11543</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Treasury shuffles the regulation pack: The implications of
changing the ministry responsible for policing financial services
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MOVING ministerial responsibility for the regulation of financial services
sounds simple enough. Shifting 50 people and their filing cabinets across
Parliament Square from the Department of Trade and Industry to the Treasury
is not one of the biggest departmental reshuffles of recent years - but its
long-term effects might be far-reaching.
The announcement of the switch earlier this month threw a series of
questions into the air like a pack of cards. The answers will determine how
London's financial markets are regulated and how some of its biggest
financial institutions are structured.
Will the Bank of England take a more direct role in overseeing the City's
investment markets? Will the Securities and Investments Board be left to
wither away, or will it be beefed up to become a UK version of the
Securities and Exchange Commission in the US?
Will London move further towards the sort of universal banking culture that
already dominates on the Continent?
The City has so far been given no clues to the answers - indeed, there is a
widespread view that Treasury ministers have yet to think through the
implications of the switch, foreshadowed in the Tory manifesto and due to
take place at the start of June. Both the Bank of England and the SIB say
they have been given no clear idea of what changes are planned, if any.
One City regulator commented yesterday: 'It really all boils down to what's
in ministers' minds. I'm not sure they are sure themselves yet.' According
to another, the Treasury is already discovering that the questions raised by
the switch are more complex than it had imagined.
Mr Robin Hutton, director of the British Merchant Banking and Securities
Houses Association, said: 'It's very early days yet, so we're trying to be
tolerant.'
One of the biggest effects of the move will to be bring together, under the
Treasury, two very different methods of overseeing wholesale financial
markets. London's short-term money markets, and those for foreign exchange,
gilts (government securities) and bullion come under the control of the Bank
of England. For those responsibilities the Bank has a loose informal
relationship with the Treasury.
The Bank's control of the markets is firm but informal. For instance,
participants in the money market have to comply with the Bank's
non-statutory code of conduct. Repeated failures would result in a firm
being struck off the Bank's recognised list, removing its exemption from the
Financial Services Act.
On the other hand, the wholesale investment markets, such as the stock and
bond markets, are governed by a rigid statutory framework with clear formal
reporting lines. The SIB, created by the 1986 Financial Services Act,
reports directly to ministers.
The two different approaches may not last. The Bank already has informal
involvement in the operation of the stock and bond markets.
Also, investment regulators have been striving for the past three years to
reduce the rigidity introduced to wholesale markets by the Financial
Services Act, in an effort to rekindle a more traditional informal
regulatory style well known to the Bank.
The switch of responsibility to the Treasury has now fuelled a strong belief
among some regulators that the Bank will eventually become more directly
involved in overseeing all London wholesale markets.
The Bank might also take on greater responsibility for overseeing London's
securities firms. Historically, the UK securities industry has operated
under different rules and regulations from the banking industry, a
distinction that was not removed after London's Big Bang, when commercial
banks were allowed to buy stockbrokers for the first time.
The Bank, as 'lead regulator', remains ultimately responsible for brokers
owned by banking groups. Also, proposed European legislation on the capital
backing needed by broking firms might eventually encourage more banks in
London to scrap broking subsidiaries and conduct securities business off
their balance sheets.
Under former corporate affairs minister Mr John Redwood, the DTI fought hard
to prevent European legislation that could undermine the structure of the
UK's securities industry, replacing it with a Continental-style universal
banking culture. Whether the Treasury will fight as hard has yet to be seen.
If the Bank of England's future role is open to question, then so is the
SIB's. This investment watchdog has always sat uncomfortably between
government and the investment industry, looking to the industry to pay the
costs of its upkeep but remaining answerable to ministers.
A change of political master could upset that delicate balance -
particularly if the Bank of England encroaches further on SIB territory.
Much depends on Mr Anthony Nelson, the new economic secretary at the
Treasury, who will take on responsibility for financial regulation. He is
seen in the City as a fan of the SIB, having personally introduced the
amendments to the Financial Services Act, which created the body.
One former DTI official involved in the passage of the act commented: 'He
kept pushing for more powers to be given to the SIB. He wanted things to be
centralised, and was a great critic of the City 'club'.' That aim seems to
have lain behind a clause which he tabled which gave SIB the power to make
rules directly on behalf of self-regulating organisations if it felt fit.
Mr Nelson might be the man to do what a growing number of people are arguing
for: to centralise the assorted investigatory powers that currently leave a
raft of self-regulating organisations, government officials and police all
pursuing the same fraud investigations. The SIB would then come to look far
more like the US Securities and Exchange Commission.
Under current plans, though, the DTI will remain responsible for carrying
out company and insider-dealing investigations. The complex web of
regulatory relationships that has grown up in the City is unlikely to be
swept away overnight.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11544</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Interest cut urged
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Federation of Master Builders yesterday urged the government to cut
interest rates and to release local-authority capital receipts from council
house sales to help builders out of the recession.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11545</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Tube ballot starts
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE RMT rail union yesterday started its ballot of members at London
Underground over industrial action in protest at plans which it says will
change working practices and cut up to 5,000 jobs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11546</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Bifu claims dispute victory
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BIFU, the banking union, claimed victory yesterday after the Royal Bank of
Scotland lifted the suspension of staff sent home for refusing to work
'contractual overtime' in a pay dispute.
The union said the bank had agreed to more talks at Acas, the conciliation
service.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11547</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / BP to reduce staffing at HQ
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH PETROLEUM is to reduce its headquarters staff in London and Harlow,
Essex, by 700, including about 250 redundancies.
About 100 staff will be moved elsewhere in the group. BP hopes the remainder
will find jobs with companies to which work is to be contracted out.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11548</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / 'Modest' inflation forecast by bank
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN is on course for its best inflation performance in three decades,
according to Lloyds Bank's monthly economic bulletin, published today.
It said the next four years would be characterised by 'modest' inflation as
pay settlements continued to fall and the pound steered clear of
devaluation.
Pay settlements were expected to fall to nearly 3 per cent by the middle of
next year, if the recovery followed the trend of the last recovery in the
early 1980s.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11549</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / US steel producer rules out plant deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HOPES evaporated yesterday that Nucor, the US steel producer, would salvage
part of British Steel's complex at Ravenscraig, Lanarkshire. Nucor officials
visiting Scotland told shop stewards that the plant was not suitable for its
needs, James Buxton writes.
Nucor did not rule out building a mini-mill in Britain to produce sheet
steel by the thin-slab casting process. Hunterston on the Firth of Clyde,
where British Steel has an ore handling terminal and two mothballed steel
plants using the direct reduction process, is a possible site.
Mr George Quinn, a shop steward at Ravenscraig, which is due to close in
September with the loss of 1,200 jobs, said Nucor thought the cost of
refurbishing the coke ovens and blast furnaces at Ravenscraig made its plans
unviable.
The Nucor executives are expected to meet Mr Ian Lang, Scottish Secretary,
or Mr Allan Stewart, Scottish industry minister.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11550</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Smith calls for reformed party leadership race
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN SMITH last night called for reform of Labour's electoral college for
choosing the party leader, as he and Mr Bryan Gould, the main contenders in
the battle to replace Mr Neil Kinnock, made conciliatory speeches.
In a wide-ranging address to the general council of the Scottish Trades
Union Congress, Mr Smith, the favourite for the leadership, advocated
opening up membership of Labour's Plant Committee on electoral reform to
other political parties and called for a new bill of rights.
Mr Smith, who is backed by 14 of the 18 members of the shadow cabinet,
reiterated his invitation to 'all our affiliated organisations' to ballot
members before deciding who to support.
That followed a request by Ms Ann Clwyd - one of the shadow cabinet members
supporting Mr Smith who is herself contesting the deputy leadership - for
union leaders not to vote in the contest without balloting their members.
The executive of the AEU engineering union has said it will not hold a
ballot, because of the cost and the difficulty of carrying out a ballot in
time.
Mr Smith said he did not believe Labour would wish to maintain the present
electoral college for choosing the leader.
He said: 'My own view is that a college comprised of all the individual
members of the party and the elected members of parliament would be the most
legitimate and representative method of democratic choice.'
Mr Smith's remarks came as Mr Gould was defending his candidacy partly on
the grounds that it had ensured the demise of the system of 'block votes
substituting for the participation of individual trade unionists and party
members'.
Speaking in his Dagenham constituency, he added: 'If I were to be run over
by a newly deregulated London bus tomorrow, my intervention would have been
justified by that alone.'
In an address with few new policy pronouncements, Mr Gould made a number of
comments calculated to appeal to supporters of his rivals for the deputy's
post, particularly Ms Clwyd and Mr John Prescott, shadow transport
secretary.
'We neglect the grass roots of our party at our peril,' he said,
highlighting the main theme of Mr Prescott's campaign.
He echoed Ms Clwyd's call for Labour to broaden its appeal to women.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11551</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Watchdog faults Customs over sales of seized goods
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CUSTOMS AND EXCISE lacks an incentive to sell the goods that it seizes to
boost revenues to the exchequer, according to a report released yesterday by
the National Audit Office. Local offices on tight budgets had no motivation
to incur the costs of arranging sales, and would rather destroy the goods
they held.
Government accounting rules - which prevent proceeds of sales being retained
 -deter staff from selling items such as the vehicles used in connection
with smuggling, the government expenditure watchdog found.
The volume of goods seized by Customs grew during the 1980s, but revenue
from sales of the goods was Pounds 4m in 1990-91, compared with Pounds 4.7m
in 1988-89 and Pounds 3.8m in 1986-87. Customs expects smuggling to increase
with the creation of the single European market at the end of 1992.
There was no attempt at any office inspected by the audit office to
establish the cost of sales and only two of the eight visited kept detailed
records.
Little attempt was made to establish likely staffing, storage and indirect
costs in handling the goods, and procedures introduced this year will not be
sufficient to determine whether it is cheaper to destroy rather than sell
goods.
Drugs are generally burnt, but few of the 12 incinerators operated by
Customs meet the requirements of the 1990 Environmental Protection Act.
Because capacity is limited, some drugs have been burnt off site. Since very
high temperatures are required, the drugs are not always completely
destroyed and have sometimes caused health hazards when burnt. Transporting
drugs around the country and giving publicity to hauls was criticised by
some Customs staff concerned about security.
The Scottish courts' requirement for all drugs seized to be stored until
proceedings were complete posed 'severe security problems', although the
audit office found no evidence of any significant breaches.
Vehicles raised most money in sales but were often stored in the open, where
their resale value fell rapidly.
National Audit Office. HM Customs and Excise: custody and disposal of seized
and detained goods. HMSO. Pounds 5.80.
Observer, Page 17
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11552</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Colombian emergency over electricity crisis
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Agencies
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BOGOTA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Colombian government yesterday declared a state of economic and social
emergency to allow it to take urgent measures to counter an electricity
crisis, agencies report from Bogota.
The decree, signed by President Cesar Gaviria and his cabinet, said the
emergency would take effect immediately and last until midnight on Monday.
It lets the government issue decrees to counter an energy crisis without
seeking Congressional approval.
This is Colombia's first economic emergency, provided for under a new
constitution enacted last year.
The government has been imposing power cuts of up to nine hours a day in
Colombian homes because a severe drought has sharply reduced the generating
capacity of hydroelectric plants, which provide most of the country's
electricity.
Media estimates have power rationing costing the Colombian economy about
Dollars 33m (Pounds 18.7m) a week.
Local news reports say the government will use the emergency to issue bonds
worth up to Dollars 250m, to be used to restructure the electricity sector
and install new generating capacity. The official aim is to install 400,000
kw of new capacity by the end of the year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11553</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Rise in orders points to mild US recovery
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A RISE in orders for durable goods and a fall in claims for unemployment
insurance were seen yesterday as further evidence that a mild US recovery is
under way.
The Commerce Department said new orders for durable goods rose 1.6 per cent
last month, slightly more than expected in financial markets. In early
April, weekly claims for unemployment insurance fell to just above 400,000,
their lowest level since October.
Figures released by the International Monetary Fund this week indicate that
a hesitant US economic recovery is under way, partly as a result of a
loosening of fiscal policy by the Bush administration.
The increase in durable goods orders last month followed a flat report for
February and a 2.4 per cent gain in January. Orders are running 9 per cent
higher than in March last year.
The increase last month, however, mainly reflected a surge in orders for
aircraft, which tend to be volatile. Excluding transportation, orders rose
only 0.1 per cent.
The rise in orders follows other signs of a gradual upturn in manufacturing,
including sluggish growth of industrial production last month and a rebound
in the Purchasing Managers' Index.
The Labour Department said claims for unemployment insurance fell to 404,000
in the week to April 11, the third consecutive weekly decline and the lowest
level since last October. The steady decline points to a slight improvement
in employment prospects this month.
The IMF's latest World Economic Outlook expects measures such as an
acceleration of federal spending and a cut in personal tax withholding rates
to contribute to a net fiscal stimulus this year equivalent to about 0.8 per
cent of gross domestic product. This is a larger stimulus than assumed by
most private sector analysts and follows a mildly contractionary fiscal
policy last year.
The IMF, however, believes the loosening of fiscal policy will undermine
growth in the longer term, partly by inhibiting a decline in long bond
yields.
The outlook says a US recovery is under way after a setback last autumn.
However, officials describe the upturn as 'hesitant' and 'modest'.
The IMF expects US gross domestic product to register annual growth of 1.6
per cent this year, rising to 3.5 per cent next year. This would be well
below the pace of most previous recoveries.
Feature, Page 16
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11554</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Tribal people demand forest lands in Ecuador
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AP
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   QUITO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THOUSANDS of tribal people from the the Amazonian jungle in eastern Ecuador,
many wearing colourful feathered headdresses, marched into Quito, the
country's capital, yesterday to demand control of their rainforest lands, AP
reports from Quito.
Singing and carrying banners protesting at what they see as government
neglect, an estimated 2,500 members of indigenous tribes gathered, after a
12-day trek up to the mountain city, in a central square. Some wore war
paint and carried bows and arrows, but the gathering was peaceful.
Later, President Rodrgio Borja met a delegation of about 100 tribespeople to
hear their complaints. The meeting was open to the media and the tribal
leaders spoke for more than two hours. Afterwards, Mr Borja said he would
order the agriculture ministry to give them property titles to the lands
they use.
The trekkers also demanded that the constitution be reformed to give their
communities autonomy over a vast section of the Amazon jungle. The president
said such a demand was beyond his authority, but he would relay their demand
to Congress.
Mr Manuel Salgado, Congress president, said later he would convene a special
session to discuss the tribal people's demands.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11555</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Mexican blast probe begins
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JEANNE GRANT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MEXICAN President Carlos Salinas de Gortari yesterday ordered a probe into
possible criminal negligence by public officials in the gas explosions that
killed about 200 people and injured some 1,500 others in Guadalajara,
Mexico's second city, on Wednesday.
Mr Salinas did not elaborate, but a spokesman for the Jalisco state
government said that the state oil company, Pemex, was among the targets of
the investigation. Earlier, Pemex had denied allegations that the explosions
were caused by petrol that somehow leaked into the sewer system.
Hundreds of workers yesterday were clawing through tons of debris, searching
for survivors of the series of explosions which had wrecked a 20-block
section of Guadalajara.
Locals demanded to know why volatile gas had been allowed to build up in the
sewer system, and why the government had failed to react quickly to reports
of a petrol-like smell permeating the area before the explosions on
Wednesday.
The precise cause of the nine blasts, which gouged deep trenches in the
streets of the poor La Reforma district, was still unclear yesterday.
A cooking oil factory, La Central, said it had nothing to do with the
blasts. It denied dumping hexane in the sewerage system. This is a highly
volatile liquid paraffin hydrocarbon which can be used to extract edible oil
from seeds. Some technical observers said the characteristics of the
explosions point to hexane rather than petrol as the cause.
The local authorities' failure to prevent the disaster and their handling of
its aftermath have met heavy criticism, while national industrial safety
standards have been called into question.
A gas or fuel leak in the area was detected the day before the catastrophe.
Staff from the local water and sewage department, and from Pemex, are
reported to have investigated complaints but been unable to find the leak's
source.
On Wednesday, 10 minutes before the first explosion, the Guadalajara chief
fireman told a local newspaper reporter that there was no problem.
The authorisation of the use of heavy earth-moving machinery, while people
were still being found under the debris, has also been sharply attacked.
Mexican law requires industrial safety standards matching international
norms, but enforcement is a problem. Mr Homero Aridjis, head of the Group of
100 environmental monitoring group, is reported to have said that the
Mexican government had been very lax about industrial safety.
The government requires new companies to undertake an environmental risk
evaluation, but some older ones have not complied. Many of the companies
created during the early years of Mexican industrialisation now have old
facilities.
President Salinas toured the scene late on Wednesday and pledged his
government would do all it could to help the victims. After the poor
official response to the 1985 earthquake in Mexico City, the governing
Institutional Revolutionary Party suffered severe political repercussions.
On the international level, the disaster may reinforce the negative image of
Mexico among opponents of the North American free trade agreement being
negotiated by Mexico, the US and Canada.
US trade unions, concerned about the possible loss of jobs to enterprises
south of the border, have painted Mexico as a backward, corrupt country
where repeated statements of environmental concern are mere words.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11556</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World Trade News: Frustration in Geneva at failure to break
deadlock
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FRANCES WILLIAMS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GENEVA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE failure of the Washington meeting to break the farm subsidies deadlock
has cast a pall of gloom over negotiations in Geneva, where trade officials
have been struggling to stitch together detailed country-by-country deals on
tariff cuts and services liberalisation.
These talks ground to a halt before Easter when it became clear that the US
and the EC were still far from resolving differences over farm trade, the
crux of the Uruguay Round for most countries.
Trade officials said yesterday they did not expect serious negotiations to
resume in Geneva until there were signs of a breakthrough in the bilateral
talks on agriculture.
'Without a significant development at the political level we're not going to
make progress,' one diplomat said.
There is deep frustration among smaller Gatt members, both rich and poor,
that nothing can move until the two biggest traders have sorted out their
differences.
Even if Washington and Brussels could reach accord by the end of June, their
agreement would have to be endorsed by all 108 participants in the round.
Officials warn that other outstanding issues may not fall into place as
easily as has been assumed.
In the negotiations on market access for goods, progress has been blocked
principally by the failure of the US and the EC to agree tariff cuts for
industrial and farm products.
In services, Washington has angered trading partners by proposing to exempt
a range of services from multilateral market-opening measures.
US officials say that some of these proposed exemptions would be scrapped if
other countries improve their offers to open domestic markets to foreign
services suppliers.
But Washington's insistence on keeping its maritime shipping out of a
Uruguay Round agreement, a key sector for many countries including Japan and
EC members, remains a serious threat to the negotiations.
Officials also say that new areas of disagreement have begun to appear as
they comb through the legal text of the draft 'Final Act', the package of
rule-based accords presented last December after five years of negotiations.
In particular, the US and some other countries are having second thoughts
about the role and functions of the proposed Multilateral Trade
Organisation, which would incorporate the General Agreement on Tariffs and
Trade, and administer the proposed accords on services and intellectual
property.
In addition, the possibility remains that, if changes are made to the
agriculture text in the draft 'Final Act' at the behest of the EC, other
countries will try to secure their own amendments.
This could provoke a general unravelling of the carefully balanced text. For
instance, the US administration is under strong pressure from industry
lobbies at home to toughen the proposed rules on intellectual property
protection and anti-dumping, while Japan, South Korea and some other
countries oppose proposals to convert all farm import barriers to tariffs.
Officials in Geneva agree there is no chance of a Uruguay Round package
coming into force at the beginning of next year as envisaged. A failure to
reach agreement in the Uruguay Round would not only hit the world trading
system, it could also damage financial markets, Mr Michel Camdessus, IMF
managing director, said yesterday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11557</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Kabul waits in fear of an ethnic explosion
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID HOUSEGO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KABUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
IN KABUL - a city that has lived on its nerves all week, uncertain whether
it faced attack, liberation or ethnic strife - there seemed yesterday to be
a great longing for peace.
'God willing, peace will come. There will be no fighting,' said Gul Afghani,
a vegetable seller in the Kote Sanghi market who took an optimistic view of
the city's fate in the coming days. Far more apprehensive were the girls at
a Kabul University hostel, some of them daughters of provincial party bosses
or army leaders. 'We are very frightened,' said Zarmina. 'We are more afraid
than ever before.'
Even so, vegetable prices have fallen in the last two days and the Afghan
currency has been strengthened - a sign that popular sentiment believes that
a peaceful end to the immediate power struggle for Kabul is possible.
Those who have most to fear from the mujahideen taking over the city - which
now seems inevitable, whether or not they are united among themselves - are
the top officials of the former communist regime. 'I think I owe it to
myself to stay to see the end of the film,' said one such former official
yesterday. He has refused to leave but has sent his family abroad. 'When I
decided to stay, I accepted the worst of eventualities - that is, the death
sentence. I think I will not regret it.' To the north of Kabul are the
Tajik, Uzbek, and non-Pathan forces of Mr Ahmed Shah Masood, the leader of a
northern-based alliance of guerrilla groups now working hand-in-hand with
the army and paramilitary forces.
Together they have thrown a cordon around the city. Advancing through Logha
province to the south of the city are the Pathan-dominated Hezb-i-Islam
forces of Mr Gulbuddin Hekmatyar. The Hezb, the most fundamentalist of the
Islamic guerrilla groups earlier this week threatened to attack Kabul.
Afghan officials and diplomats in Kabul do not believe that Mr Hekmatyar can
take over Kabul by force. But what they fear is that he could conspire with
disaffected army, militia or Pathan groups to stage another coup in the
city. They see him as encouraging ethnic strife.
Kabul is now the only city in Afghanistan where power has not been
transferred to a guerrilla-dominated coalition that includes representatives
of the armed forces.
But as the capital, it is obviously the most important city. It is also the
one where the ethnic mix is the greatest - and thus where the risk of
explosion is also the largest. The mujahideen will soon enter to claim the
prize of 13 years of civil war. But the city's population prays for a
peaceful transition.
The Afghan government said last night a dialogue had been opened with all
Islamic guerrilla groups for transfer of power to an interim mujahideen
administration, writes David Housego. The statement came after Gen Mohammed
Rafi, one of four vice-presidents, met Mr Gulbuddin Hekmatyar, leader of the
fundamentalist Hezb-i-Islam group which had earlier threatened to attack
Kabul.
Gen Rafi said Mr Hekmatyar had proposed that an interim administration be
formed from those acceptable to the different guerrilla groups. This does
not significantly differ from the proposal of his main rival Mr Ahmed Shah
Masood, head of the northern-based alliance, for a 20-man council to run the
country. Mr Hekmatyar also advocated an interim administration of guerrilla
commanders around Kabul. The aim was to strengthen his own position in any
post-war settlement.
The proposals came as the International Red Cross announced that it was
reducing by half its 70-man presence. An official was shot dead on Wednesday
by a guerrilla apparently belonging to the Hezb group.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11558</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Police break up Taiwanese demonstration
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TAIPEI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ANTI-RIOT police dispersed about 1,000 demonstrators in central Taipei at
dawn today, ending a five-day street protest mounted to demand democratic
reform, Reuter reports from Taipei.
Thousands of helmeted police, wielding clubs and firing water cannon,
dragged the protesters out of a makeshift camp built by the opposition
Democratic Progressive Party (DPP) outside the capital's main railway
station.
Police punched and kicked the demonstrators, some of whom resisted and were
injured, witnesses said. The protesters were released several blocks away.
The DPP had occupied the street outside the station since Monday in a
demonstration to demand direct presidential elections.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11559</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Indonesia to allow foreign ownership
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM KEELING
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JAKARTA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FOREIGN investors are to be allowed to hold 100 per cent equity in new
companies in Indonesia, the government has announced. The new directive will
delight international donors, such as the World Bank, pressing for further
deregulation of the economy.
The directive applies to investments with a paid-up capital of over Dollars
50m in Java and Sumatra. Projects with less capital must be in remote
provinces to qualify. Previously, 100 per cent foreign ownership was
permitted only for export-oriented industries in the bonded zone of Batam
Island.
Foreign companies had also been allowed 95 per cent ownership of joint
ventures which exported at least 65 per cent of production, but their equity
had to be reduced to 49 per cent within 15 years. For existing joint
ventures, under the new directive this period has been extended to 20 years.
The directive requires future investors to sell at least 5 per cent of
equity to an Indonesian company or individual within five years and to
transfer 20 per cent within 20 years. There is no export requirement.
The move follows a decision to allow a Dollars 1.6bn petrochemical plant to
proceed under foreign ownership. Construction had been suspended on the
grounds that, with domestic ownership, foreign loans would count toward
Indonesia's soaring international debt. Officials are confident loans raised
for wholly foreign owned projects will not be viewed as Indonesian debt,
estimated at Dollars 75bn. Bankers say the trade-off demanded by opponents
of the petrochemical project included the extension of foreign ownership
across the board.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11560</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UN pursues search for Afghan accord
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FARHAN BOKHARI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ISLAMABAD, PAKISTAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Boutros Boutros Ghali, the UN secretary-general, will visit Pakistan
today in an effort to encourage the formation of a council of mujahideen
guerrilla representatives which could peacefully take power in Afghanistan.
The visit comes at the end of a week of growing concerns about the failure
of an earlier UN peace plan, as well as of something of a diminution in the
organisation's role in resolving the Afghan dispute.
The ousted Afghan President Najibullah has been in hiding at a UN office in
Kabul since his fall last week. This has affected the organisation's image
of impartiality in the eyes of mujahideen commanders, according to western
diplomats and senior government officials.
'The world can huff and puff as much as it wants, but Afghans have their own
way of doing things' said one western diplomat.
Scepticism about international diplomatic activities has also been raised
because of the Pakistani government's unsuccessful efforts to persuade
groups of mujahideen based here to agree on a council to take power in
Kabul.
Mr Benon Sevan, the special UN envoy for Afghanistan, is continuing his
efforts to secure a safe passage for President Najibullah, according to a
senior Pakistani official. But the task has become 'a very, very difficult
one', in view of a refusal by militiamen in control of Kabul airport to let
him fly out.
However, UN officials continue to defend the role of their organisation in
the peace efforts, arguing that the failure of the peace plan and the
presence of President Najibullah at a UN office in Kabul do not mean the
organisation can play no further role in finding peace in Afghanistan.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11561</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Policemen guilty of mass killing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATTI WALDMEIR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A SOUTH AFRICAN court yesterday convicted five policemen of murdering 11
black funeral mourners in 1988 - the first time security force members have
been found guilty in a mass killing, writes Patti Waldmeir.
The judgment is likely to embarrass the government of President F W de
Klerk, who has long denied claims that police have been involved in violence
that has left 11,000 people dead since 1984.
In the court judgment, Mr Justice Andrew Wilson accepted prosecution
evidence that policemen killed 11 people, many of them women and children,
at a funeral vigil after an official of the Inkatha Freedom Party, the
conservative Zulu group, asked police to help eliminate political rivals in
the area.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11562</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / De Klerk plan for ruling council
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATTI WALDMEIR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SOUTH AFRICAN President F W de Klerk yesterday made new proposals for a
multi-racial government to rule the country in the transition to a
post-apartheid constitution, with South Africans of all races electing as
soon as possible a five-member council to govern in the transition.
The proposal is an attempt to break a deadlock in negotiations over interim
government.
The ruling National party and the African National Congress, had agreed that
such a council should be appointed, not elected. But they disagreed over its
powers.
Mr de Klerk said the proposed elected council would comprise one member from
each of the three to five biggest political parties, and would have a
rotating presidency, changing twice a year.
He gave no date for the election, but said it could precede a universal
franchise vote for a new parliament to replace the current, race-based
assembly.
The ANC had no immediate comment but its officials are known to favour an
appointed rather than elected council, which would rule for a short time and
limit itself to preparing the ground for parliamentary elections rather than
taking full responsibility for government. It seems unlikely to accept the
proposal.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11563</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAFAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Secret world of the penniless emperor: Japanese politicians
fear more disclosures in a trucking scandal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEFAN WAGSTYL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN'S ruling Liberal Democratic Party is braced for embarrassing
disclosures as the public prosecutor's probe continues into the Sagawa
Kyubin affair - involving links between gangsters, politicians and a
trucking company, Sagawa Kyubin.
So many financial and political scandals have surfaced in Japan in recent
years that new allegations have lost some of their capacity to surprise.
But the Sagawa Kyubin affair is attracting attention for the scale of
alleged wrong-doing. The public prosecutor's office is investigating alleged
breach-of-trust offences involving Y528bn (Pounds 2.2bn), dwarfing the 1989
Recruit stocks-for-favours scandal and the Lockheed bribery affair of the
1970s.
The affair shows how a fast growing cash-rich company can attract the
attention of politicians and gangsters alike. In the tightly regulated
trucking world, companies often call on politicians for help in negotiating
red tape. Yakuza (gangsters) hover around the margins, preying on companies,
hoping to extract money for 'settling' disputes arising from traffic
accidents.
At his peak, Mr Kiyoshi Sagawa, the group's 70-year-old founder and a former
building site foreman, dined with prime ministers and wrote a grandiose
autobiography entitled The Penniless Emperor. Now he is sick - too weak, he
has claimed, to give evidence before a Diet committee. His most powerful
aide, Mr Hiroyasu Watanabe, 57, is under arrest, as is Mr Jun Saotome, Mr
Watanabe's lieutenant, both on charges of embezzling Sagawa Kyubin funds.
Mr Sagawa drove himself and others relentlessly. Drivers were expected to
work up to 18 hours a day and to act as salesmen and account managers.
Experienced drivers could earn much more than manual workers. But the
penalty for failure was the sack.
Starting in Kyoto, Mr Sagawa expanded across Japan mainly through
acquisition, which enabled him to circumvent some trucking regulations.
Until a rule change in 1990, companies needed two kinds of licences. One
allowed long-haul operations on a set route, the other permitted deliveries
within a region. The transport ministry took up to 12 months to process
licence applications but a company that took over another's operations could
also take over its licences.
Mr Sagawa's most important deal was struck with Mr Watanabe, then head of a
large Tokyo trucking company, who in 1974 merged with Mr Sagawa in return
for continued control over Tokyo operations.
Mr Sagawa achieved his ambition of building a national network. He toured
the country, often in a red Rolls-Royce, talking of little but work, money
and sex. In his autobiography he wrote: 'This is a one-man company. My
decision is absolute and perfect.' In fact, he owed more than he would admit
to Mr Watanabe, whose Tokyo business accounted for a quarter of the group.
Mr Watanabe proved adept at handling the company's complex relations with
banks, financial companies, gangsters and politicians. But, the
smooth-talking Mr Watanabe eventually came to resent playing second fiddle
to the brash Mr Sagawa.
As it grew into Japan's second biggest delivery group, Sagawa Kyubin ran
foul of the authorities. The transport ministry warned it repeatedly about
drivers' hours for fear of traffic accidents. In 1986 it was banned from
trucking for 25 days after its practices were criticised in a Diet transport
committee. It also twice paid fines for tax offences.
Sagawa Kyubin tried to improve its record. It cut drivers' hours and
increased holidays. But like many Japanese companies, it came to rely on
politicians to help smooth relations with officialdom. Like other groups, it
rewarded helpers with political donations.
Mr Sagawa's political links date back to the 1960s, when he hired the
speaker of the Diet's upper house as an adviser. By the mid-1970s, with Mr
Watanabe's aid, he had won the favour of Mr Kakuei Tanaka, then prime
minister, who also became a Sagawa Kyubin group adviser.
Mr Watanabe never looked back. According to Japanese newspapers, Sagawa
Kyubin supplied up to Y80bn to over 100 politicians, including Mr Tanaka and
other past and present ministers.
Stories of deals between Mr Watanabe and top politicians abound. But very
little evidence of wrong-doing has emerged, despite efforts of the public
prosecutor's office.
Sagawa Kyubin's links with yakuza originate in the practice of employing
gangsters to settle disputes over traffic accidents. Perpetrators of
accidents are expected to pay compensation to a victim, separately from any
insurance payments. Yakuza frequently act on behalf of victims and take a
cut for their services.
The public prosecutor's office is investigating allegations that Sagawa
Kyubin bought off yakuza en bloc by making payments to their national bosses
 -especially to Mr Susumu Ishii, former head of Inagawakai, the country's
second largest crime syndicate.
As Sagawa Kyubin prospered, so did the relationship with Mr Ishii. Using
dummy companies, Mr Watanabe channelled a total of Y528bn in loans and loan
guarantees out of the company for speculative property and stock
investments. The biggest share, Y114bn, went to Inagawakai. According to the
public prosecutor's office, a further Y59bn went to companies in which Mr
Watanabe had a personal interest and Y85.7bn to companies linked to his
lieutenant Mr Saotome.
The links were exposed by the 1990 crash in Japanese stock prices. With the
value of their assets plunging, recipients of Tokyo Sagawa Kyubin's largesse
could no longer repay their debts.
Mr Watanabe might have hoped to conceal some of his secrets. But, say former
employees, a row erupted between Mr Watanabe and Mr Sagawa. Mr Sagawa was
shocked by the extent of Mr Watanabe's financial operations and he postponed
his planned retirement to ensure the group did not fall into Mr Watanabe's
hands.
Mr Watanabe and Mr Saotome resigned last summer and were arrested. Sagawa
Kyubin fears much of its loans may never be returned. It plans to merge
Tokyo Sagawa Kyubin into other group companies so as to spread the financial
burden. The political party bosses have found alternative sources of funds,
but few will supply money as freely as Mr Sagawa and Mr Watanabe.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11564</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAE9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / US warns Bonn over high fiscal deficit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM and ANDREW FISHER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON, FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR DAVID MULFORD, the US Treasury under-secretary for international affairs,
warned yesterday that the German fiscal deficit could persist for much
longer than previously anticipated, creating a lasting drag on world
economic growth.
'Germany has a large fiscal deficit and a tight monetary policy, and this is
having a major spill-over effect in Europe,' Mr Mulford said. 'It's causing
high interest rates and low growth, and contributing to unemployment,' he
said.
The International Monetary Fund's World Economic Outlook report this week
also called for cuts in the German deficit to enable European interest rates
to fall.
However, Germany's money supply continued to grow well outside its target
range last month, giving a clear signal to participants at this Sunday's
Group of Seven meeting in Washington that the Bundesbank will hold firm on
monetary policy.
Mr Helmut Schlesinger, Bundesbank president, will attend the G7 meeting of
leading industrial countries with Mr Hans Tietmeyer, his deputy, but
economists do not expect them to come under serious pressure to cut rates as
a stimulant to the world economy.
The Bundesbank has stressed its concern with the high rate of money supply
growth compared with the target range of between 3.5 and 5.5 per cent set
for this year. In March, M3, the broad monetary aggregate, grew at an annual
rate of 9.75 per cent after 8.5 per cent in February and 9 per cent in
January. Propelling M3 higher has been heavy bank lending, much of which has
been to finance corporate investment in the east.
Cloud over German bonds, Page 27; D-Mark gains on M3 figures, Page 29;
German data frightens senior bourses, Page 35
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11565</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAE8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Ghost of Nazism rises to haunt Austrian election:
Accusations of pro-Nazi leanings in an ironic reversal of roles
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ERIC FREY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN President Kurt Waldheim last summer announced he would not run for a
second term, Austrians thought they would be able to escape the shadows of
the Nazi past.
But the issue, which has dogged Mr Waldheim's six-year term following
allegations that he lied about his war record, has come back to haunt the
campaign for the presidential election this Sunday.
In an ironic role reversal, it was Mr Joerg Haider, the chairman of the
right-wing Freedom Party, who accused Mr Robert Jungk, the leftist candidate
for the Green Party, of having shown pro-Nazi leanings as a journalist in
Switzerland during the Second World War.
Mr Jungk, 78, is a Berlin-born Jew who was forced into exile in Switzerland.
Mr Haider, his unlikely accuser, was ousted as governor of the state of
Carinthia last year after praising the 'orderly employment policy of the
Third Reich.'
Mr Jungk published his critical reports on Nazi Germany under a pseudonym,
and to evade Swiss censorship, he sometimes resorted to the nationalist
idioms of the time. It was a reference in 1942 to the Nazi's
'volks-biologically progressive health policies' which stressed the genetic
purity of the population in Germany which Mr Haider cited as evidence for Mr
Jungk's sympathy for the Hitler regime.
Mr Haider has been ordered by a court to retract the accusations, and it is
unlikely that the controversy will have any significant impact on the first
ballot round on Sunday.
Mr Jungk never had a chance of getting more than 5 to 8 per cent of the
vote. And Mrs Heide Schmidt, 43, the eloquent candidate of the Freedom
Party, has seen her chances of making it into the second round fade in a
recent row between Mr Haider, her party leader, and critics from the party's
liberal wing to which she is aligned.
Mrs Schmidt was forced to downplay her disapproval of nationalist tendencies
in the party after Mr Haider threatened to withdraw his support for her.
But even a poor showing by Mrs Schmidt is unlikely to dent the future
prospects of Mr Haider.
His right-wing populist message is dominating the political debate and
headlines.
Mr Rudolf Streicher, the former minister of transportation and candidate for
the Social Democratic Party, and Mr Thomas Klestil, a 60-year old career
diplomat who is running for the conservative People's Party, are expected to
draw the most votes in the first round of balloting.
Mr Streicher, 53, is ahead in the polls, but is unlikely to gain a clear
majority. Such an outcome would result in a run-off on May 24, in which Mr
Streicher would again be the favourite.
A former factory worker who worked his way up the ranks to become chairman
of one of Austria's largest companies Amag, before joining the cabinet in
1986, he is one of Austria's most popular politicians.
His folksy style and his musical hobby - he is an accomplished conductor -
appeal to the electorate which is looking for a surrogate emperor figure to
fill the largely ceremonial post of president. Mr Streicher compares his
concept of the office to that of a fireman who stays out of day-to-day
politics but intervenes when something goes wrong.
But Mr Klestil's spirited campaign has enhanced the standing of the People's
Party, the Social Democrats' junior partner in the coalition government.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11566</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAE7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Deadlock on German public sector pay
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WESTERN GERMANY braced itself for widespread public sector strikes after the
authorities yesterday refused to raise their pay offer and trade unions
reported growing militancy at strike ballot centres. An indicator of the
mood among the 3m public servants came with the announcement that 91 per
cent of postal workers had voted to strike.
The postal union urged the public not to send letters, warning that
collections could not be guaranteed. It also threatened to cripple the
network of savings banks controlled by the Bundespost.
Rubbish clearance, kindergartens, motorway maintenance and local and
regional public transport are also expected to be hit immediately. Emergency
services will not be affected. Airport authorities prepared to mobilise
staff formally classed as civil servants - and not entitled to strike - to
ease expected traffic and passenger bottlenecks.
Voting among the main public sector unions ends today and the results,
expected to confirm forecasts of a big majority for action, should be known
by tomorrow. Stoppages affecting all public services are expected on Monday.
For months the authorities have been bombarding the population with charges
that Germany is living beyond its means, and that spending cuts at all
levels are necessary.
In an unusual show of solidarity, the employers' leading negotiators - Mr
Rudolf Seiters, the Christian Democrat interior minister, Ms Heide Simonis,
an opposition Social Democrat minister from Schleswig-Holstein, and Mr
Richard Klein, the SPD chief executive of the Duisburg local authority -
called a press conference yesterday at which they flatly refused any advance
on their last offer.
'Precisely because we want to avoid conflict, we have gone to the outermost
justifiable limits,' Mr Seiters said. The unions had refused to recognise
the economic realities of 1992. The 4.8 per cent package, parts of which
have already been imposed in some areas, would add DM15bn (Pounds 5bn) to
west German public sector spending, he added.
The unions are insisting on implementation of a 5.4 per cent deal proposed
by an arbitration council last week.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11567</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAE6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Warring parties ignore Sarajevo truce: Oil refinery reported
set ablaze in fighting on Bosnia's northern frontier
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURA SILBER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HEAVY firing broke out last night in Sarajevo, capital of the republic of
Bosnia-Hercegovina, only hours after leaders of its ethnic groups had signed
a ceasefire.
The truce among Moslem, Serb and Croat leaders was brokered by Lord
Carrington, chairman of the European Community peace conference on
Yugoslavia, and Mr Joao de Deus Pinheiro, the foreign minister of Portugal
which holds the EC presidency.
However, there were immediate reports of renewed fighting, with mortar fire
from Moslem areas of the city being answered by recoilless cannon fired by
Serb militia around the hotel Bosna, which houses the EC mission
headquarters and foreign journalists.
Belgrade television also said that the oil refinery in Bosanski Brod, on
Bosnia's northern frontier with Croatia and the only such installation in
the republic, had been hit and set ablaze as fighting in the area between
Serb and Croat forces continued for the third successive day.
The federal army command in Sarajevo agreed with the Bosnian government to
send all available fire-fighting equipment.
The parties had agreed to sign last night's declaration to observe a truce
originally reached on April 12 but subsequently ignored.
Mr Pinheiro warned that fresh peace talks to be held in Lisbon on Monday
would take place only if the ceasefire was respected.
Federal army tanks and armoured vehicles ringed the airport in Sarajevo,
capital of Bosnia, where the EC team met the Bosnian leaders.
'Everybody is to blame for what is happening in Sarajevo and the sooner we
get a ceasefire there will be no need to blame anybody,' Lord Carrington
said later on arrival in Belgrade for talks with Mr Slobodan Milosevic,
Serbian president, and General Blagoje Adzic, federal defence minister.
Diplomats feared the fighting could engulf the newly independent republic. A
western diplomat said: 'The amount of destruction and number of deaths is a
very small illustration of what is possible'.
Sarajevo radio said 48 people had been wounded in two days of fierce clashes
in Bosanska Krupa, in the north-western Moslem heartland. Local authorities
agreed to a ceasefire to take effect from midnight last night.
At least 21 people have been confirmed dead in the last 24 hours of fighting
between Serb irregulars and Moslem units in Bosnia.
Unconfirmed reports after fierce fighting on Wednesday in Sarajevo said at
least 20 people were killed and 77 wounded. Eyewitnesses reported heavy
damage.
In Bonn, Germany and the Netherlands stepped up pressure on Serbia to end
the conflict or face international isolation, calling for an urgent meeting
of the UN Security Council to discuss the crisis.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11568</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAE5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Walesa moves to regain initiative after press attack
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BOBINSKI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WARSAW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT Lech Walesa moved swiftly yesterday to regain the political
initiative after an unprecedented attack in the widely-read Gazeta Wyborcza
newspaper.
Mr Walesa dismissed the article, which described him as out of his depth and
surrounded by incompetent advisers. He called it 'a base and low thing done
by low people'.
His response came amid growing uncertainty about the stability of the
centre-right government of Premier Jan Olszewski.
The president hinted last night that he was considering a non-party
government of experts. 'It becomes more and more evident that I will have to
form an extra-party cabinet to solve problems,' he said on television. 'I
don't want to replace Olszewski, but democracy has to be effective,' he
said, adding that he planned to consult the prime minister about his
involvement in the process of government-building.
Last night the government faced a vital vote in parliament on a motion to
reimburse pensioners and public servants for pensions and incomes cut last
year. If passed, the bill would overturn this year's budget calculations and
could force the government's resignation.
Mr Andrzej Olechowski, finance minister, appealed to parliament 'to use its
common sense' on the decision and warned that the repayments due could go as
high as Zl 60,000bn (Dollars 4bn) if voted through, 'marking a catastrophe
for the government's financial situation'.
The debate came the day after the collapse of seven weeks of talks with
opposition parties on broadening the right-of-centre minority coalition in
preparation for tackling tough budgetary measures.
In denying that he was becoming politically isolated, Mr Walesa gave strong
support to his closest aide, Mr Mieczyslaw Wachowski, who was criticised in
the newspaper for protecting former communists in the armed forces and the
security apparatus.
He described his aide as 'one of the best people who took the blame for
everything that went wrong'.
In spite of the president's bravado, the situation is dismaying political
observers in Warsaw. The Rzeczpospolita newspaper warned: 'We could find
ourselves without a government, without parliament, with a president
stripped of all authority and an unstable army.'
Earlier, Mr Walesa met briefly Mr Tadeusz Mazowiecki, the leader of the
Democratic Union and the spokesman for the three opposition parties which
decided this week not to accept the terms offered by Mr Olszewski for
entering government.
He also met Mr Leszek Moczulski, the head of the populist KPN party and
conceivably a potential coalition partner for the present government.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11569</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAE4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Italian duel over parliament jobs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Foreign Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Italian parliament yesterday held its first session since the general
election this month. But there was no resolution of the deadlock between the
main parties over the choice of candidates for president of the Senate and
leader of the Chamber of Deputies.
The disagreements. which will probably require further rounds of voting
today, may also postpone the planned resignation of Mr Giulio Andreotti, the
prime minister.
However, signs of a compromise, at least between the Christian Democrats and
the Socialists, were emerging as politicians canvassed the names of Mr
Andreotti as Senate president, and Mr Gianni De Michelis, foreign minister,
as lower house leader.
The choice of the two men, which would maintain the delicate balance between
Christian Democrats, Mr Andreotti's party, and Mr De Michelis's Socialists,
could still be upset by disagreements among the other party leaders.
The sharpest differences have emerged between the Socialists and the
Democratic Party of the Left (PDS), led by Mr Achille Occhetto. Mr Occhetto,
who is trying to exploit the sharp fall in Christian Democrat and Socialist
support in the election, says any compromise on candidates would have to be
linked to a clearer picture on the composition of the government.
However, the PDS itself has suffered from sharp internal differences
following its decision to back Mr Giorgio Napolitano, a senior member, as
Chamber of Deputies leader. The choice has angered veteran PDS member Ms
Nilde Iotti, who has had the job for virtually the past 13 years.
It was incorrectly reported in the FT on Wednesday that Ms Iotti had been
Senate leader and Mr Giovanni Spadolini leader of the Chamber of Deputies.
Mr Spadolini was in fact the leader in the Senate.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11570</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Incomes and output decline in Russia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN LLOYD
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GRIM figures on Russia's living standards and industrial production were
published by its state statistics committee yesterday, as medical staff and
teachers began a wave of strikes. At the same time Mr Nursultan Nazarbayev,
president of Kazakhstan and an enthusiastic supporter of the Commonwealth of
Independent States, warned that the organisation was in danger.
The lack of agreement between CIS members has aggravated the desperate
economic plight of each - though no mechanisms for closer co-operation can
be agreed.
Mr Nazarbayev, speaking after a summit meeting of the Central Asian states
in Kirghizia, gave two reasons for his concern: statements by the Ukrainian
government after the CIS summit meeting in Kiev last month which suggested
Ukraine might leave the grouping; and proceedings in the Russian Congress,
where many deputies called the CIS unconstitutional and demanded the return
of the Soviet Union. Mr Nazarbayev said the next CIS summit, on May 15,
would be crucial.
The Russian figures show that gross national product dropped by 14 per cent
and output by 13 per cent in the first quarter compared with a year ago. Oil
and gas production dropped by 15m tonnes, and coal by 1 per cent.
More than 50m people, or one-third of the population, had incomes of Rbs900
or less in the first quarter. Rbs900 is the level of the new minimum wage
which Mr Alexander Shokhin, deputy prime minister, has promised to introduce
by May 1. However, the statistics committee says that the monthly
subsistence level now stands at Rbs1,200.
Unemployment remains relatively low - up from 70,000 at the beginning of the
year to 118,000 by the end of last month. But the combination of low wages
and high prices is triggering more strikes. Stoppages lost the economy
260,000 work days in the first quarter.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11571</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / TI launches Pounds 482m hostile bid for Dowty
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TI GROUP, the specialist engineering company, yesterday launched a hostile
Pounds 482m takeover bid for Dowty Group, the aerospace components
manufacturer which made the landing gear for every RAF aircraft in the
Second World War.
If successful, the bid could significantly consolidate the UK's aerospace
industry which - along with its global competitors - is in the midst of the
toughest recession in 40 years.
Mr Bruce Ralph, Dowty's chief executive, emphatically rejected the bid as
underestimating Dowty's potential and is meeting his board this morning to
discuss a response.
Dowty's advisers said Mr Christopher Lewinton, TI's chairman and chief
executive, was only offering the same strategy of cost-cutting and the sale
of non-core businesses that Dowty had already outlined last year when it
reported pre-tax profits down 73 per cent at Pounds 10m.
TI's four-for-15 share offer values the Cheltenham-based Dowty at Pounds
482m, or 178.4p a share, after the 47p fall in TI's shares yesterday to
669p. Dowty shares closed up 32p at 177p, just 2p above TI's fully
underwritten cash alternative.
The acquisition would give TI a third strategic branch in addition to its
automotive tubes and industrial seals divisions. Since he took over in 1986,
Mr Lewinton has strengthened these areas, while disposing of old businesses
such as Raleigh Bicycles.
Aerospace experts said a successful takeover was unlikely to disrupt the
industry, where TI was already well known. It might be welcomed by some
airframe and aeroengine makers as strengthening an important supplier.
The London stock market had been expecting a bid for Dowty since last year
as the 60-year-old company was pushed into financial difficulties.
Analysts' initial reaction was that TI had priced the bid at a generous
level designed to be a knock-out blow. Dowty might have to struggle to find
a white knight to come up with a friendly alternative deal, they believe.
Mr Lewinton said he had approached Dowty three times last year with a
detailed plan for a friendly merger but was rebuffed both by Mr Ralph and
his predecessor, Mr Tony Thatcher, who left in June.
Mr Lewinton said he would 'lie in a ditch' for a friendly merger but that,
after three attempts to show the logic of his plan, he was turning to
Dowty's shareholders.
'We think Dowty shareholders will welcome this opportunity to join with TI
Group shareholders in creating one of the UK's leading specialised
engineering companies,' he said.
The acquisition would also enable the combined polymer businesses, which
make specialised seals, to compete worldwide. Mr Lewinton said that the bid,
the first of any size since the general election, had been dusted off as
soon as the Conservatives were returned to power.
Since taking over at TI, Mr Lewinton has developed a City following as a
result of the substantial reorientation of TI away from the UK. In a series
of deals, TI has been refocused, returning to its core industry in tubing.
It has developed a global market with a strong sales in the US.
Mannesmann, the German engineering group with a 7 per cent stake in TI, said
it will participate in the underwriting of the offer so that its stake is
not diluted.
In addition to the one-for-four ordinary share offer, TI is offering 45
ordinary shares for every 400 Dowty convertible preference shares.
TI is advised by Baring Brothers and Dowty by Lazard Brothers.
Lex, Page 18
Paying the price of a loss of focus, Page 19
London stocks, Page 38
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11572</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / BAe appoints ex-BTR chief as chairman
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH AEROSPACE ended its seven-month search for a chairman with
yesterday's announcement that Mr John Cahill, former chief executive of BTR,
will take over from Sir Graham Day next month.
Sir Graham has been acting chairman of BAe since Professor Sir Roland Smith
was forced to resign in a spectacular boardroom coup last September after
the failure of the company's Pounds 432m rights issue.
Other possible candidates are believed to have been approached but to have
been reluctant to take the job because they would have had to continue
working with BAe's existing top management team.
Sir Graham insisted that 'only one offer was made; John was the man. We are
very pleased'.
Mr Cahill said that he intended to work closely with Mr Dick Evans, BAe's
chief executive, and the company's board, but he would not be drawn on how
he planned to tackle the specific problems and issues facing the company.
Sir Graham said Mr Cahill would be a full-time chairman because 'you can't
do this job as a part-time chairman'.
Mr Cahill's immediate challenge will be to restore the credibility and
reputation of the company which was badly dented by the failure of its
rights issue, the ensuing boardroom turmoil and the resignation of Sir
Roland.
BAe's new chairman takes over as the company is refocusing on core defence
and aerospace businesses, under pressure because of defence cuts and the
slump in civil aviation. Mr Cahill regards defence 'as the main thrust' of
the company. 'We have an opportunity to pick up some market share in this
business,' he said, adding that he considered defence and aerospace as a
'healthy business'.
BAe will also announce the appointment of a finance director to replace Mr
Dudley Eustace, who resigned last month, at its annual shareholder's meeting
next Thursday.
The City welcomed the appointment of Mr Cahill, 62, an experienced
international businessman who was chief executive of the BTR industrial
engineering group from 1987 to 1991. BAe's shares closed yesterday 5p higher
at 348p after rising at one stage by as much as 16p.
After a review of BAe's activities, aerospace analysts expect Mr Cahill to
speed up the restructuring process spelt out in last year's rights issue
document.
Mr Cahill will work closely with Mr Evans and the present BAe senior
management, but is also expected to adopt a hands-on approach, examining
every business in BAe's portfolio.
'He is no soft touch, and he has a big opportunity to turn the company
around during the next five years,' one City analyst said.
Sir Graham said the search for a new chairman had involved finding 'someone
who was British with a solid business record and with international
experience'.
Observer, Page 17
Lex, Page 18
London stocks, Page 38
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11573</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Stock and Currency Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 -----------------------------------------------------------
STOCK INDICES
 -----------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE 100:                2,609.8             (+2.0)
Yield                        4.65
FT-SE Eurotrack 100      1,169.11            (-2.23)
FT-A All Share           1,261.24            (+0.2%)
FT-A World Index           137.21            (+0.9%)
Nikkei                  17,402.05          (+562.93)
New York:
Dow Jones Ind Ave        3,348.61            (+9.84)
S&amp;P Composite               411.6            (+1.79)
 -----------------------------------------------------------
US RATES
 -----------------------------------------------------------
Federal Funds:             3 5/8%             (same)
3-mo Treas Bills: Yld      3.745%            (3.76%)
Long Bond                 99 7/16           (99 1/2)
Yield                      8.044%            (8.04%)
 -----------------------------------------------------------
LONDON MONEY
 -----------------------------------------------------------
3-mo Interbank           10 9/16%          (10 1/2%)
Liffe long gilt future:  Jun 98 7/32  (Jun 98 25/32)
 -----------------------------------------------------------
NORTH SEA OIL (Argus)
 -----------------------------------------------------------
Brent 15-day (June)  dollars 18.675          (18.70)
Gold
New York Comex        dollars 339.3          (339.1)
London               dollars 338.75          (338.7)
 -----------------------------------------------------------
STERLING
 -----------------------------------------------------------
New York:
Dollars                      1.7678         (1.7625)
London:
Dollars                       1.765          (1.763)
DM                             2.93         (2.9325)
FFr                          9.8925            (9.9)
SFr                          2.7225         (2.7175)
Y                            237.25          (236.5)
Pound Index                    92.2           (same)
 -----------------------------------------------------------
DOLLAR
 -----------------------------------------------------------
New York:
DM                           1.6585        (1.66225)
FFr                           5.604         (5.6155)
SFr                           1.539         (1.5415)
Y                            134.62        (134.235)
London:
DM                           1.6605         (1.6635)
FFr                           5.605          (5.615)
SFr                           1.542         (1.5415)
Y                            134.45         (134.15)
Dollars Index                  65.1           (same)
Tokyo open:               Y  134.73
 -----------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11574</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World News in Brief: Royal divorce granted
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Princess Anne was granted a 'quickie' uncontested divorce at Somerset House,
London. The end of her 18-year marriage to Captain Mark Phillips comes two
years after they legally separated.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11575</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World News in Brief: Church plea to Sinn Fein
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Protestant churchmen, who disclosed they had met Sinn Fein president Gerry
Adams and urged him to help stop IRA violence, are to press ahead with a
second round of talks with Republican leaders.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11576</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World News in Brief: Heath made Knight of Garter
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Edward Heath, the prime minister who led Britain into the European
Community, is to join Britain's highest order of chivalry. The Queen has
appointed the MP for Old Bexley and Sidcup and father of the House of
Commons a Knight Companion of the Most Noble Order of the Garter. He will
now be entitled to be known as Sir Edward. The honour also goes to Lord
Sainsbury of Preston Candover and Viscount Ridley.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11577</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / ICI and Du Pont to swap nylon and acrylic interests
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL ABRAHAMS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IMPERIAL Chemical Industries of the UK and Du Pont, the US company,
yesterday said they were swapping their worldwide nylon and acrylics
businesses after two years of negotiations.
ICI will also receive an estimated Pounds 250m in cash. A final figure will
be agreed once the two companies have examined the businesses in more
detail.
The deal, which has to be cleared by the European Commission, would make Du
Pont the largest manufacturer of nylon in Europe. The group would control 25
per cent of world and European markets, according to Mr David Williamson, Du
Pont's European president. The company would also supply about a third of
all nylon to the European carpet industry.
ICI would become the world's largest producer of acrylics, an area which the
company has defined as one of its core businesses. The enlarged unit would
have annual sales of more than Pounds 500m a year.
Mr Williamson warned: 'Europe must not kill its textile industry by
fragmenting and weakening its fibre suppliers. The European industry needs
someone who will invest. At the moment all the growth is going to Asia.'
Both Mr Williamson and Sir Denys Henderson, ICI chairman, said they were
optimistic the deal would be cleared by the regulatory authorities in both
Europe and the US. If the move is given the go-ahead it should be completed
by the end of the year.
Du Pont will acquire a business with sales of about Pounds 600m a year and
take responsibility for 6,100 employees in the UK, Germany and the
Netherlands. The operations incurred a loss last year, but are now breaking
even, according to Sir Denys.
Mr Williamson was hopeful about the future of the ICI plants. Du Pont
planned to invest Dollars 8bn in nylon fibres over the next decade, and the
former ICI sites would benefit from that. He said the company had no plans
to rationalise the operations and denied there was a problem of
over-capacity in Europe.
Sir Denys said the deal was positive news for both companies. It played to
the strengths of each and would allow them to focus resources on their core
businesses.
ICI has made two acquisitions in the US acrylics sector during the past
three years. The company is doubling capacity in Taiwan and the UK.
Du Pont's acrylic businesses, which had a turnover of about Pounds 160m last
year, make monomers - raw materials for acrylic - resins and acrylic sheets.
The business is almost entirely in the US, where ICI previously had little
presence. Du Pont is keeping its Corian acrylic business which supplies
materials for kitchen and bathroom fittings.
ICI has not sold Du Pont its polyester plant in Zaragoza, Spain. The company
said it would like to sell the business. However, if the local authorities
and Spanish government helped, the business could be maintained within ICI.
Raw materials of a promising deal, Page 17
Lex, Page 18
Relief and sadness in Teesside, Page 20
London stocks, Page 38
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11578</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (33): Postscript
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Are equities really the best place for long-term investment? The arguments
look rather hollow when set against the unit trust figures revealed in the
accompanying tables.
An investor in the average smaller companies fund, for example, is still
losing money on his initial investment after five long years. And the UK
growth sector has produced a pitiful 8.6 per cent average increase
(including reinvested income) over the five-year period.
What makes these figures doubly sad is that early 1987 was one of the great
boom periods for unit trust sales. Many investors' first trust experience of
equity investment will have been a disappointment. Only those who backed the
Far East (excluding Japan) sector will have had a good chance of beating the
building society.
Investment trust shareholders did rather better - the average international
capital growth fund rose 32.6 per cent over five years, compared with 8.4
per cent for the unit trust equivalent. But even so, only the Far Eastern
funds produced returns to make building society or national savings
investors envious.
All this may change, of course. The five-year period covered by the
statistics included the stock market crash of October 1987, the Gulf crisis
and the recession. Historically, equities have proved themselves as better
long-term investments than building societies.
Whether the same patterns will recur is another question. During the 1980s,
equity income funds tended to outperform their capital-growth brethren. But
over the past year or so, many high-yielding shares have had problems
maintaining their dividends. The average UK equity income trust has fallen
almost 13 per cent during that time.
Dividend pay-outs are currently high in relation to corporate profits by
historical standards, so income funds may have problems in producing income
growth over the next years.
Analysis of individual fund managers' performance produces evidence for the
'random walk' theory of investment. More than 90 management groups have a
top-20 sectoral performance to boast about, but none achieves a ranking in
all of the 14 sectors.
Sixteen groups have five or more funds in the top 20s, with allied Dunbar,
Capel-Cure Asset Management (via the Capability and N&amp;P ranges), Invesco MIM
and Fidelity standing out with the most appearances. Only one group, Abbey,
has a first-place ranking in two sectors.
Looking back at the tables in our first Quarterly Review (October 1990),
what is striking is how many of the top unit trusts have changed. Of the top
10 UK general trusts in that issue, only two are still among the best 10.
So if you want to back a trust, you must resign yourself to taking your
chance on the performance of both the general market and the individual
manager. Good luck.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXXI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11579</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (32): Programmes can
play extra time - Alternative Investments / Values are limited, but there
are signs that soccer's memorabilia is coming into its own
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THOUSANDS OF soccer fans will treasure programmes bought at this month's FA
Cup semi-finals and next month's final. They may become heirlooms, but will
they appreciate in value?
Football programmes are an untilled field for the investor-collector. Unlike
cricket or golf, there has been limited interest in the memorabilia of
soccer.
This has the advantage that prices for football programmes are low and
within the reach of any interested buyer, and the disadvantage that they are
unlikely to prove potential money spinners.
Angus Gull, of Phillips (which, along with Christie's in Scotland, offers
the occasional important football programme in its sporting memorabilia
auctions), constantly has to let down gently collectors who approach the
saleroom about the possibility of disposing of their group of 300 or so
programmes of Chelsea or Aston Villa. They would barely make Pounds 100,
which is Phillips' cut-off point for a lot.
The fact is that many football supporters hang on to their programmes, which
means there are millions of them piling up from the 1970s and 1980s, and
virtually all of them are valueless.
Collecting programmes is very much like collecting stamps - to get you
started, dealers will sell you a job lot of 500 different programmes for
perhaps Pounds 30. But once interest has been aroused the serious collector
starts to specialise, and then larger sums are involved.
As with stamps, most collectors choose their particular subject - usually
the programmes of the club they support - and then try and build up a
comprehensive archive of past programmes.
Some branch out down interesting by-ways: clubs no longer in the League, a
programme from every League club - or even every non-League club.
One golden rule is: the older the programme, the higher its value; although
condition is very important, and a pre-war programme which is creased, held
together by sticky tape, or which has rusting staples, loses much of its
appeal. Even the entry of team changes in pen or pencil will reduce the
price.
As well as age, the importance, or peculiarity, of the match is paramount.
FA Cup finals, international matches, benefits, matches which were in some
way odd (third replays or abandoned games), the first or last matches of a
team in the Football League (if you have Aldershot's last one, hang on to
it), or involving teams no longer in existence - all of these are positive
price factors.
Programmes can be acquired through supporters groups, from club shops, from
dealers who congregate at collectors' fairs or who advertise in football
magazines or in Exchange and Mart and comparable journals.
What sort of programme would excite the dealers, prompting them to use the
tantalising tag, 'offers in advance of Pounds 50 considered'?
Last October, Christie's in Scotland sold an FA Cup Final programme from
1897 for Pounds 1,760, which could well be a record for a football
programme. It had been hidden away as a bookmark and was in good condition.
It is unlikely that any items which we would recognise as programmes were
produced before the 1890s, and for the next few decades they were often
flimsy, unimaginative documents.
Another obvious rarity, a programme from the first Wembley Cup Final, in
1923, between West Ham United and Bolton Wanderers, was sold recently at
Phillips for Pounds 308. A programme from this match appears every year or
so, and can make up to Pounds 370, depending on its condition.
Other high prices at auction include the Pounds 165 paid for the programme
for the benefit match of the celebrated Celtic player Patsy Gallaher; Pounds
297 for the England-Scotland 1928 international, when the Wembley Wizards
dazzled the crowd; and Pounds 990 for a bound Royal Box programme from the
1923 Cup Final. However a complete run of Sheffield Wednesday programmes for
1906-07 failed to reach its Pounds 1,000 target, attracting bids of just
Pounds 850, probably because they, too, were bound together. Programmes
which cannot be split up are less valuable than loose items.
Arsenal is far and away the most collected team; and London clubs generally
attract higher prices than Liverpool and Manchester United, perhaps because
Londoners have more money or are prepared to spend it frivolously.
Christie's in Scotland was surprised to get a price of over Pounds 500 for
just 75 West Ham and Arsenal programmes of the 1940s and 1950s.
As you move down the divisions, prices fall, although when the disc jockey
John Peel picked up the Scottish team Meadowbank Thistle and mentioned it in
his radio programme there was a flurry of interest in its programmes.
As a rule of thumb, programmes from the 1970s and 1980s are of little or no
value; programmes of important matches from the 1940s might go up to Pounds
10; of the 1930s to Pounds 30; and the 1920s for Pounds 40. Anything dating
from before 1914, and especially pre-1900, is very rare and worth serious
money.
For anyone interested in soccer, collecting programmes offers a cheap and
intriguing hobby which, over time, could prove a good investment.
The market is fairly flat at the moment, thanks to the recession, but there
are signs that football memorabilia is coming slowly into its own. Here are
some typical prices quoted by a leading dealer (Collectables , 335, High
Street, Rochester, Kent):
FA Cup Final of 1920-21 between Tottenham and Wolverhampton (Pounds
550-Pounds 600); QPR versus Oldham 1965 (50p-Pounds 1); Arsenal v Sparta
1946 (Pounds 2-Pounds 4); Manchester United v Leeds, FA Cup semi-final 1970
(Pounds 1-Pounds 3). Obviously there is little in this price range to
frighten off potential buyers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11580</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (31): As house
prices fall, so do old certainties - Do we still need to buy our home? / The
financial case for renting is strong, but don't overlook the psychological
factors
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THIS MAY sound like heresy in a land of property-owning democracy. But who
needs to buy a house?
The general arguments in favour of home-ownership are well rehearsed - it
offers you extra freedom and independence, and also provides you with a
tradable asset.
Start a mortgage, and you are making regular payments towards buying
something which could stand as an investment in its own right.
Pay the rent, and the money goes down the drain. You have successfully
sheltered yourself, but it is no more an investment than the money you spend
on bus fares. Sadly, the repossessions crisis and the sudden trough in
housing prices, has forced people to look at the argument again.
Certainly, if you were a homeowner in the 1980s, you would have been well
placed. The Halifax House Price Index (see page 33), set at 100 in 1983,
stood at 223.1 at the beginning of 1989. During 1988 prices rose 20.8 per
cent, and in the previous year the index had risen by 23.3 per cent. All of
this capital appreciation came from an investment which you could use,
happily, every day of your life.
What made a house such a good investment? Peter Smith, of the advisers Hill
Martin, identifies three factors which fuelled the domestic housing market:
Loans to buy housing have benefited from very favourable tax treatment.
Mortgage Interest Relief At Source (Miras) was once available for an amount
sufficient to cover most mortgages, at the borrower's top marginal rate of
tax.
Now, Miras has been allowed to 'wither on the vine' at Pounds 30,000, which
is no longer enough to fund the average mortgage. It has also been limited
to the basic 25 per cent rate of tax.
Mr Smith concludes that buying a house with a mortgage can no longer
realistically be called tax-efficient.
Housing has traditionally been in short supply, which helps to force prices
up. Again, this is no longer the case, following the Thatcherite reforms of
the early 1980s.
Credit for house-buying has always been cheap, allowing for truly 'geared'
investment. Now, high real interest rates (compared with inflation) are the
norm. Quite apart from dampening the demand in the market, this also makes
it tougher to benefit to the full from selling a house for a profit when you
have only parted with a fraction of its original price.
Add these factors up, and it has been possible over the last two decades to
make significant profits from what Mr Smith describes as 'geared
tax-efficient investment in speculative markets'. None of the conditions for
this now seem to apply. This might explain why the Halifax index had dropped
to 214.7 by the beginning of this year.
Some would argue that the housing market is set for further depression,
which might tilt the argument more steeply against buying rather than
renting. Why buy now if the house will be cheaper in a year's time? But this
line of argument can get very complicated.
It might be simpler to assume that a house will now do no more than keep
pace with inflation, like most commodities in the economy. Several building
societies currently seem to be working on this hypothesis.
If you make this assumption, renting becomes a viable option. It also gets
much easier to decide which is the easier move. Financially, all you need
look at is the relative cost per week. If it is cheaper to rent, do so.
Coming down to the numbers like this can seem too simple. If you would feel
psychologically better in a house of your own - as would many young families
 -that could be sufficient reason for buying a house.
Those with a taste for garish interior decor, or who want to use their home
as a base for breeding rottweilers, might also find the terms of a rental
lease too restrictive. But David Kauders, a Taunton-based financial adviser
specialising in gilts, can point to two cases where renting looks much more
attractive.
First, he points to a client who had paid off her mortgage, and then
continued to live in her cottage.
On Mr Kauders' advice, she sold it, realising about Pounds 90,000, and put
this into a portfolio of government securities. The rent on her new (larger)
property was around three-quarters the net income from the government bonds,
meaning that the remaining quarter was hers to spend as a supplement to
income. She also had no exposure to declining property values - needless to
say, the price of her old cottage has dropped since she left.
This manoeuvre was possible, according to Mr Kauders, because residential
property was still overvalued - hence bond yields are much healthier than
the rental yields from residential property.
His other scenario concerns a family which has still not joined the property
ladder. If that family has children to whom it wants to provide a settled
environment, the general and psychological advantages of ownership become
considerable.
But otherwise, a young family will probably want flexibility. They will also
be happier about paying the deposit on rental accommodation than for a
mortgage. Add to this, the 'sunk costs' in terms of time spent searching,
legal fees, and (unless you buy in the next few months) stamp duty, and
renting looks sensible.
None of this means that you should immediately sell the family home in which
you are happily settled. Neither does it mean that you should not back your
hunch if you find what you think is a very cheap house in a good situation.
But the presumption that you should always buy if you are able to do so has
surely gone.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
SELLING AND RENTING: THREE EXAMPLES (POUNDS)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                      A         B               C
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Capital value                     90,000    75,000            120,000
Replacement property:             Larger    Similar   Same house, let
Rental, incl
             insurance             4,500      3,300             4,800
Gross income from government
securities                        *8,120      7,100            11,400
Net income (25% tax)               6,090      5,325             8,550
Income gain from renting           1,590      2,025             3,750
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Example A is the case referred to in the article. B is estimated from
current price levels and rental costs of a similar property to the
bungalow sold. C is based on a case, using price paid in 1990 by the
landlord, deflated by 20% and current rental.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
* 2/3 gilts, 1/3 US Treasury bonds; other cases, gilts only.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: David Kauders
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11581</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (30): When to take
the money - Commuting your pension / Ought one to exchange part of a taxed
pension for a tax-free lump sum? Most people do - and the Max factor
provides a new incentive
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ERIC SHORT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TO COMMUTE or not to commute? The question faces most people at retirement.
It applies if they have contributed to a company pension scheme; or if,
whether employed or self-employed, they are taking the benefits from an old
retirement annuity contract or a new-style personal pension.
Every person about to receive benefits from a private pension arrangement,
whether his own or his employer's, has the attractive option of taking part
of the benefits as a tax-free cash sum.
More than 95 per cent take the cash, usually without a second thought. But
are they making the right decision?
There are four basic reasons why taking the cash can be a good choice:
1. In general, you are converting taxable income into tax-free cash - a
conversion that must be favourable, particularly to higher-rate taxpayers.
2. Even if you need income at retirement, you can usually take the cash sum
and buy an annuity that will provide a higher overall net income than taking
the full pension benefits.
3. With the advent of independent taxation, although an individual cannot
split his pension with his wife, he can transfer the cash sum to her to
invest, usually saving tax in the process.
4. A pension is one family asset that cannot be passed on to the next
generation. It dies with the husband and wife. But the cash sum can be
taken, invested and added to the family estate, to be passed on in due
course.
There is also a further, less practical, attraction: commutation represents
the only occasion in many people's lives when they can accumulate, at a
stroke, a substantial capital sum, part of which can be spent on holidays or
other extravagances that were just dreams while they were working. For many
the reality of cash in the bank simply provides a feeling of security.
The Maxwell saga has added a further dimension to taking the cash sum, for
at least that part of the pension is secured, irrespective of what might
subsequently happen to the scheme. It is to be hoped that the proposed
reforms in pension legislation will secure the pension scheme assets against
a rapacious employer.
Even so, one should not take the cash sum automatically, but consider first
the options available and then what one would do with the money.
The commutation rules laid down by the Inland Revenue are different for
personal pensions and company pensions.
Personal pensions
With personal pensions, old and new, the individual can effectively take the
tax-free cash from the accumulated value of the pension contract, up to the
Inland Revenue limits, and then buy an annuity with the remaining value.
With new-style personal pensions, he can take up to 25 per cent of the
accumulated value as tax-free cash. But with the old-style retirement
annuity contracts, the cash limit is more complex - the amount of cash taken
must not exceed three times the annual pension secured by the remaining
value.
Since annuity rates increase with age, the later the individual takes the
benefits under the contract, the greater the proportion of the accumulated
value that can be taken as tax-free cash. Also, since annuity rates are
lower for women than for men at the same age, the cash limits are lower for
women than for men.
The decision whether to take the cash is straightforward for those who have
contributed to personal pensions. The answer is almost certainly 'yes', even
if they require maximum income.
There are two types of annuity: an annuity purchased with the proceeds of a
pension arrangement, known as a pension annuity; and an ordinary life
annuity, known as a purchased life annuity, bought with other assets.
Both types offer the same range of annuities - level, increasing,
index-linked and so on.
Pension annuity rates are slightly higher than ordinary annuity rates, but
this is more than offset by the more favourable tax treatment of the annuity
payments on an ordinary annuity.
So, even if one needs the maximum income, it usually pays to take the cash
sum and buy an ordinary annuity similar to the pension annuity bought with
the remaining value. The Inland Revenue does not treat the investment of the
tax-free cash sum as being from the proceeds of a pension contract.
Company pensions
Under company pension schemes, the mechanics of commutation are different.
At retirement, an employee has the option of converting part of his or her
pension into a tax-free cash sum. The Inland Revenue sets limits on the
amount of tax-free cash that the employee can take, and three different
limits are currently in operation.
But for employees retiring with at least 20 years' service in the scheme,
the maximum cash sum is one-and-a-half times the employee's earnings at or
near retirement. The limits, including the earnings 'cap', imposed in recent
years will affect employees who retire well into the future.
The amount of pension given up to secure the required cash sum, known as the
commutation factor, is determined by the scheme's actuary, taking into
account mortality, investment returns and future pension increases. There is
an overall Revenue limit on the commutation factor that can be used. A
growing number of schemes now use unisex commutation factors.
It is not easy to decide, on financial grounds alone, whether or not to
commute. The employee should receive a benefit statement prior to
retirement, showing full pension entitlement and the alternative maximum
cash sum and reduced pension. So he can see how much pension is given up for
the cash sum, though he may not know whether it is worth commuting.
However, in most schemes the spouse's pension is not reduced by commuting.
So an employee only has to judge the merits of the pension foregone during
his or her own lifetime.
A rough judgment can be made by checking what annuity on the employee's own
life could be secured by the cash sum, and ascertaining whether this would
replace the pension given up.
However, this is not an easy exercise. The employee must compare like with
like, and consider the cost of an annuity that would provide increases in
payment similar to the expected increases in the underlying pension.
Generally, taking the cash sum gives the employee flexibility and control
over that part of his pension. But those approaching retirement ought to
decide in advance what they intend to do with the cash - save it or spend
it, or both.
Above all, they need to think not only of the immediate future after
retirement, but the likely situation when they reach their mid-70s - the
so-called 'Fourth Age' - and may need every penny they possess to pay for
care services. They may wish to invest the capital to produce income in
their later years.
Employees in public-sector pension schemes have a different decision to
make. They receive, as part of the benefit structure, an automatic tax-free
cash sum (maximum one-and-a half times final salary) and a reduced pension
(maximum half final salary). This is broadly equivalent to the maximum
pension of two-thirds of final salary provided by private-sector schemes.
The decision for these employees is whether to use the cash sum to boost
their pension - remembering that their pension receives annual increases
linked to the rise in the retail price index and that index-linked annuities
are expensive.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
THE ALTERNATIVES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
For a man aged 65, with Pounds 100,000 available from his retirement
annuity contracts
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                     Net monthly income
                                                           at 25% tax
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
A:
Invests the Pounds 100,000 in a level pension annuity,
gross monthly income Pounds 1,120:                           Pounds 840
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
B:
Takes the maximum cash of Pounds 30,536, and invests it
in an ordinary purchased life annuity. Gross annual
income (paid monthly) Pounds 3,964. This is divided into:
 1, Capital content (tax-free)        Pounds 1,740
 2, Interest content (subject to tax)        2,224
    Tax at 25% on interest content            (556)
    Net annual income                        3,408                  284
The remaining value of the contracts is used to buy a level
pension annuity of Pounds 778 a month gross; net, at 25 per cent
tax:                                                                583
Total monthly income:                                       Pounds  867
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Thus, by taking the cash sum and investing it in an ordinary annuity,
the individual has increased his monthly income by more than 3 per cent
compared with investing all the value in a pension
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Equitable Life
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11582</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (29): Bondlike
qualities with tax postponed - In spite of 11 per cent yields, analysts warn
investors also to look at 'cover'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NORMA COHEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INVESTMENT TRUSTS have sprouted numerous bells and whistles in recent years,
in an effort to broaden the consumer base for the product.
For the risk-averse, the most attractive fillip has been the zero-coupon
preference share, a key ingredient in a formula designed to offer the
highest possible returns to those who are willing to take some equity risk.
Zero-coupon securities are precisely that: they will pay zero interest, or
dividends, during their life. However, upon maturity, the investor is
entitled to receive a sum far greater than the initial investment. The
maturity sum is paid for out of the capital appreciation of the share
portfolio.
If one were to calculate the rate by which the capital had appreciated each
year during the life of the trust, the yield would approximate to a rate of
interest.
Part of the attraction of zero-coupon preference shares is their tax status.
Investors incur no tax on the implied gain in value of their securities, and
only pay capital gains tax upon maturity.
Thus, their tax status makes them particularly unattractive for inclusion in
a personal equity plan, warns Lewis Aaron, investment trust analyst at
Barclays de Zoete Wedd.
'The value of a Pep is to avoid paying tax on the dividend stream,' he
notes. So when there is no dividend or interest stream, it is nonsensical to
try to protect it against taxation.
Effectively, 'zeros' supplant the role of bank debt within an investment
trust, Mr Aaron says. They allow borrowing to occur and, because there is no
interest paid, the investment trust can use funds which otherwise would have
serviced bank loans to pay higher dividends to holders of income shares.
Zero-coupon preference shares carry the chief characteristic of bonds - a
fixed rate of return to maturity. Often, they are the highest ranking
security, with investors having first claim on the investment trust's assets
in the event of failure.
However, purchasers are warned to read the small print, to learn where they
would stand in the queue of creditors. Among the few investment trusts which
do not rank preference shareholders on top is Scottish National Investment
Trust. There, stepped-preference shareholders and debenture holders have
first charge on the trust's assets in liquidation.
And while the majority of preference shares currently are offering yields of
around 11 per cent per year, net of tax, analysts warn that it is not enough
for investors to look at yield to maturity: they must also look at 'cover',
and gauge the ability of the fund manager to produce returns that grow
sufficiently quickly. If cover is insufficient upon maturity, investors will
get back less than was promised on issue.
Among zero-coupon preference shares with the worst cover are those of Olim
Convertible Trust, which in early February yielded 12.73 per cent to
maturity, while the trust's assets were only sufficient to cover 71 per cent
of the preference shares' face value at maturity.
The fund manager must earn returns of 4 per cent a year to cover preference
shareholders, Mr Aaron notes.
At the other end of the scale, River Plate &amp; General was offering a yield to
maturity in 1996 of 9.4 per cent, but the redemption value was covered 2.15
times by the assets of the trust. 'That means the market could fall by 50
per cent and you would still get your money if you held the preference
shares,' said Mr Aaron.
However, if the final maturity year of an investment trust's zero-coupon
preference shares coincides with, say, an October 1987-type stock market
crash, 'you're up the creek without a paddle,' he added.
Meanwhile, some investment trust analysts have pointed out that there may be
conflicts of interest between holders of zero-coupon preference shares and
those who hold the income-producing ordinary shares. John
Korwin-Szymanowksi, analyst at SG Warburg, points out that, in some
investment trusts, fund managers have purchased high-income producing shares
 -which by definition are often those of weaker companies - to the detriment
of preference-share holders who benefit from capital appreciation. Mr Aaron
notes: 'If you're looking for high-yielders, you can be picking some pretty
dreadful stocks.'
Recently, Tor Investment Trust took the unusual step of appointing a new
fund manager, Sun Life. Sun Life is a holder of Tor's income shares but has
a still larger stake in the capital shares. According to Mr
Korwin-Szymanowski, Tor's capital shares had risen only 27 per cent in the
past five years, producing an inflation-adjusted loss for shareholders.
Meanwhile, its income shares had well outperformed the market.
'You require a strong board of directors to keep the fund in line,' he said.
Indeed, the second largest stock holding in Tor's investment portfolio in
July 1990 was the now-defunct Polly Peck.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11583</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (28): The wind-up
value matters, too - Income shares / Confusion arises because these shares
are in three categories. Be sure you know which you are buying
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE INCOME shares of investment trusts have been highly popular in recent
years. The prospect of a high yield, especially when such shares are held
within the tax-free confines of a personal equity plan, has prompted many
private investors to buy them.
But income shares are more complex than might be assumed; and some experts
wonder whether all investors have known precisely what they were buying.
Income shares are one of the core elements of a split-capital investment
trust. Most income shares will receive all the revenue of the trust; in some
cases, there are stepped preference shares, which have a prior claim on
revenue.
What may cause investor confusion, however, is the repayment value of the
shares when the trust is wound up. There are essentially three types of
income share.
First, there are those where the repayment value of the shares is fixed at
maturity. In the initial years of the trust's life, the trading price of the
shares may rise well above this maturity value, because of the attractions
of the high income. But as the maturity date approaches, the trading price
will steadily decline towards the repayment value.
In late March, for example, the trading price of M&amp;G Second Dual Income
shares was 170p; the 1997 redemption value was 50p.
The danger for private investors is that they may be lured by the high yield
into buying such shares at the peak price. They will then find, to their
cost, that the capital value of the shares will steadily deteriorate.
The second kind of income share is designed to have a repayment value of
virtually nil. In this way, they resemble an annuity, a financial instrument
which converts capital into income.
Again, unwary investors may be attracted by the high income without
realising that they face a capital loss.
The third type of income share is normally called the geared, or ordinary,
income share. This type is normally linked with zero-coupon preference
shares (see facing page) in a two-class split-capital trust.
Investors in such shares will be entitled to the assets of the trust after
the zeros have been repaid. Thus, the repayment value is highly dependent on
the extent to which the managers can grow the trust's assets. If growth is
slow, or non-existent, the geared income shares may prove worthless on
maturity. If the managers perform well, however, investors could enjoy
substantial capital growth.
Calculation of the 'yield' on such shares depends on an assumption of an
asset growth rate which is highly subjective. For example, in late March,
County NatWest was quoting a gross redemption yield of 27.8 per cent on the
Jove Income shares - provided the assets could grow at 7.5 per cent a year.
What is clear from all this is that private investors should make sure that
they receive advice from a good stockbroker before plunging into this
market. Income shares are not immune to the age-old principle that high
rewards are associated with high risk.
There is also the general worry about whether the 1990s will be as
favourable to the income concept as were the 1980s. As a class,
split-capital trusts have tended to purchase high-yielding stocks, as a
means of maximising their appeal to income-seeking shareholders. In late
March, County NatWest figures showed the average yield on split-capital
trusts to be 6.45 per cent, compared with 3.85 per cent across the whole of
the investment trust sector.
The high-yield strategy brought both income and capital growth in the 1980s.
Dividend pay-outs had been restricted in the 1970s, and corporate profits
had slumped as a proportion of gross domestic product. As the UK emerged
from the early 1980s recession, profits grew substantially and the takeover
boom persuaded directors to increase dividends in order to retain
shareholders' loyalty.
Now that Britain has joined the Exchange Rate Mechanism, economic and
corporate profit growth may be much slower in the 1990s. Part of the reason
for the 1980s profit revival was that the pound fell steadily in value, with
a resulting increase in both margins and orders for exporters. This
'devaluation effect' cannot be achieved within the confines of the ERM.
Dividend cover (the amount by which pay-outs are covered by profits) has
reached quite low levels in historical terms. In spite of the recession,
many companies fought hard to maintain their dividends in the early 1992
results season; but that may prove to have been at the expense of limiting
the prospects for dividend growth in later years.
All this may mean that dividend growth for income shareholders will also be
limited. Particularly, this could be the case in respect of those trusts
with a stepped-preference class of share, which has an initial (and growing)
claim on the income stream. And if asset growth is much lower in the 1990s,
those with geared income shares may have to reduce their expectations for
capital returns.
In the short term, investors who have locked away income shares on a
double-digit yield within a Pep may feel they are sitting pretty. But there
are long-term worries that they should not ignore.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11584</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (27): Poor relations
await the right moment to perform - Capital shares / But if you believe that
the UK economy is on the verge of recovery, they could help you profit from
it
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONE OF the most basic rules of investment is to buy at the bottom, and then
hope to sell at the top.
Some would argue that this applies to capital shares, which, over the past
year, have come to look like the poor relations of the investment trust
world.
They cannot offer any income, and they do not have the fixed growth so
useful for financial planning which comes with zeros (see page 25). Instead,
they offer a more risky version of an investment trust share aiming for
capital growth - they will only be repaid after the claims of other shares
on the assets of the trust have been met.
They are not, therefore, shares to invest in during times of uncertainty. As
Christopher Whittingslow, of Exeter Fund Managers, puts it: 'They are a bull
market play.' A bear market will severely affect their repayment values.
This may explain why they have suffered severe neglect over the past few
years, as markets have failed to mount a prolonged rally, and political
uncertainty has intensified.
There are more technical reasons for capital shares' under-performance. The
recent enthusiasm for personal equity plans has placed emphasis on the tax
advantages of income shares. The zeros have attracted those seeking to use
up their capital gains tax allowances. Capital shares have been neglected in
the rush.
With private investor enthusiasm low, lack of liquidity has caused capital
share prices to fall sharply. As Lewis Aaron, of Barclays de Zoete Wedd
(BZW), put it: 'When the turnover dried up, the marketmakers just didn't
want to hold any stock.'
He continues to point out that a second reason for their unpopularity, in
recent weeks, has been political risk. Nervous investors have not felt like
buying highly geared investments.
Finally, split-capital investment trusts tend to invest heavily in
'high-yielding' stocks in order to pay the dividends required by the income
shareholders. As Mr Aaron puts it: 'High-income shares have been the
worst-performing shares in the market for the last year, and they've been
underperforming by a huge margin. Obviously the performance of capital
shares has been bad as well.'
So it is not surprising that the BZW Capital Share Index, shows a drop of 25
per cent in the year to March 23 (a period which avoids the sharp
fluctuations caused by the Gulf war), while the total return on the FT-A All
Share index rose by 5 per cent.
Could this be one of those fabled opportunities to buy at the bottom of the
market? Many analysts seem to believe that it is - particularly now the air
of political uncertainty has been dispelled. However, you need to choose
carefully, because share performance can be affected by technical factors,
rather than underlying investment performance.
For example, the level of discount assumes more importance as a trust nears
expiry. Thus, if a trust is a matter of months away from closing and showing
a percentage discount to its asset value in double figures (at the time of
writing, this applied to both City &amp; Commercial and Yeoman), the
opportunities for short-term profit are obvious, and tempting.
Exeter's Capital Growth unit trust, which invests exclusively in investment
trust capital shares, aims to do precisely this, and had heavy holdings in
both these trusts.
However, Mr Aaron points out that this is not an easy game for the private
investor - there is an opportunity cost involved in locking into these
short-term gains, while for ease of management it is simpler to lock into
one of the longer-term established trusts, such as River &amp; Mercantile.
Certainly, discounts might seem to offer some very good bargains on
longer-term stock - for example, M&amp;G Income, one of the most spectacular
products of the Pep boom, was standing at a 73.8 per cent discount; while
Gartmore Scotland, also launched last year, was on 75.2 per cent.
Most stood at between 30 per cent and 50 per cent - considerably greater
than the average for ordinary shares, which is around 16 per cent. Of
course, this greater discount reflects what is perceived to be a much
greater risk.
Sometimes, discount figures can appear misleading. Scottish National was so
heavily geared in March that the capital shares had a net asset value of
zero. This meant that the shares traded at a premium - the only capital
shares to do so.
Mr Aaron described these shares as being 'almost like a warrant', with a
highly geared exposure to stock market movements. In other words, the shares
are only suitable for those with strong nerves and a conviction that the
market will rise substantially.
In short, it is the investment fundamentals, rather than technical features,
which might attract investors to buy capital shares. Historically, they have
a tendency strongly to outperform in bull markets.
If you believe, after all the political argument of the past few weeks, that
the UK economy is on the verge of recovery, then capital shares should offer
one of the best routes to profit from it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11585</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (26): Risk in a warm
climate - Geographical specialists / Investment trusts offer the only
practicable way to invest in underdeveloped markets on the periphery of
areas which currently have strong economies
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NOBODY IS suggesting that you should put all your life savings into the
Foreign &amp; Colonial Latin American Investment Trust.
Even the fund's own managers are quite happy to admit that that would be too
risky.
But if you had put some 'risk' money (ie, funds you were prepared to lose)
into it at end of last January, it would have done very nicely - the trust
rose 120 per cent over the next 12 months, according to Micropal, to make it
the most successful of all investment trusts over the time period.
It would be unwise to be seduced by investment performance over such a short
period, and the fund has not yet been going long enough to provide a
definitive record. But numbers like that command attention.
Latin America has been the star performer of late. But other areas ripe for
the specialist treatment include the Pacific Basin, and southern and eastern
Europe. All have underdeveloped markets, but stand on the periphery of areas
with currently strong economies.
If you want to cash in, investment trusts offer virtually the only
practicable vehicle. Illiquidity makes 'open-ended' funds such as unit
trusts inappropriate, because the size of the fund is allowed to fluctuate
in accordance with payments and withdrawals by investors. Heavy redemptions
could make life impossible for the fund manager, if it is difficult to find
buyers for large blocks of funds.
The strictures of regulators mean that many of these funds stay 'offshore',
rather than tempt too many novice investors into risky investment waters.
Managers that specialise in exotic narrowly based funds include:
Tyndall, whose stable includes First Philippine and Korea Liberalisation;
Lloyds Bank, which offers the First Spanish and the German investment
trusts; and
John Govett, which offers a whole array, mostly based offshore, such as
Mexican Horizons, Malaysian Emerging, Singapore SESDAQ and the Hungarian
Investment Company.
The companies take differing attitudes to the marketing of the products.
John Govett regards its funds, which tend to invest in highly illiquid
markets, as being for institutional use. Richard Royds, managing director,
points out that the minimum investment in its ground-breaking Hungarian
trust at launch was Pounds 25,000, while the average size of deals since has
been Pounds 20,000 - not within reach of the 'small' investor.
Govett's aim is to allow pension funds and other institutional investors the
chance of exposure to markets with particular growth opportunities. However,
it hopes in time to offer the funds to the mass market. Tyndall takes a
similar line.
F&amp;C, unlike Govett, offers a regular savings scheme for investors in both
its Latin American and German investment trusts. Audley Twiston Davies, who
manages the Latin American fund, remains bullish about future prospects for
the region, and sees the area as offering a broad investment spread. For
example, the trust has recently taken on its first exposure to Peru, and
plans to move into Ecuador.
He points out that growth for the next 10 years is forecast at an annual 5
per cent, by the International Monetary Fund, and he sees other moderately
defensive qualities. 'In Latin America, you have a nice mix of economies
which have substantially gone through a restructuring process. You can start
to value them more like a mainstream stock market. And they don't look too
expensive.'
It should be obvious to any reasonably sensible investor that the investment
story for these markets in itself makes the potential risks and
opportunities greater than they might otherwise be. But the extra risks
bequeathed by the technical factors which determine investment trust pricing
might be more awkward to detect.
Most investment trusts trade at a discount to their net asset value, which
is largely fuelled by market sentiment. Sudden events which rocked
confidence in a specific geographical area could be disastrous for the value
of shares in a geographically specialist investment trust.
More awkward still, some of these trusts even stand at a premium. This tends
to amplify further the risks and opportunities associated with the trusts.
Robin Angus, investment trust analyst at County Nat West, puts it this way:
'Of course, there's much more volatility with a geographically specialist
trust. Naturally the trust is more likely to move to a discount or a
premium, because you have not got checks and balances within your
portfolio.'
He points out that exceptions can be made for trusts specialising in the UK,
as this tends to be the home for UK money; and also for trusts such as
Fleming Overseas, which specialise in overseas investment but give
themselves a broader spread.
But Bruce Ackerman, a director of several Lloyds Bank investment trusts,
points out that, while markets are difficult to enter, institutional
interest will remain high: 'There is a high correlation between small
discounts and the closedness of the market to outside investment.'
Once the markets open up more, institutions might even lose interest because
they can invest direct. He is therefore less nervous than Mr Angus about the
volatility of share prices compared with net asset value.
Also, discount volatility can always work in the investor's favour, if
shares move to a premium from a discount. But Mr Angus' view is still clear:
'I would never advise any individual to put more than a small punt on a
specialist trust. If you want to back a hunch, that's fine, provided you've
got maybe 10 times that much in one of the big broadly spread trusts.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11586</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (25): Raised ceiling
clears the air - Personal equity plans / Abolition of the Pounds 3,000 limit
has simplified tax-free investment
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE INVESTMENT trust sector succeeded in getting most of what it wanted with
Norman Lamont's Budget. The Pounds 3,000 limit on an investment or unit
trust in a personal equity plan was abolished in favour of the full Pounds
6,000 allowance.
Shares held in a Pep are free of income and capital gains tax. The industry
had been lobbying hard for a 'level playing field' with direct equity
investment.
The Pounds 3,000 ceiling on collective funds had arguably worked against the
interests of the private investor and against the government's own policy of
encouraging wider share ownership. It meant that private investors were
exposed to the performance of a handful of Peppable shares, instead of being
able to spread their holdings in collective funds.
The Association of Investment Trust Companies welcomed the change in the
Budget, and said it hoped that it would encourage investment trusts to
launch more Peps.
The abolition of the Pounds 3,000 band simplifies the Pep structure for
investment trusts. There are now only two levels for investment through a
Pep - the maximum Pounds 6,000 and Pounds 1,500. What the investment trust
industry was hoping for, but did not get, was the abolition of this lower
limit, which applies to 'non-qualifying' trusts.
A trust must hold at least half its funds in shares in the UK or another EC
member state in order to qualify under the Pep regulations. Of the 250 or so
investment trusts on the market, only 96 currently qualify under the Pep
rules.
The category most affected by Mr Lamont's decision not to abolish the Pounds
1,500 level, apart from the investment trusts which invest specifically in
areas outside the EC, is the large international general trusts. These
invest in different markets worldwide, lessening the private investor's
exposure to a single market. 'The big general international trusts are still
excluded, yet they are the ideal place for the first-time investor,' said
the AITC.
Six of the eight trusts managed by Foreign &amp; Colonial are 'non-qualifying',
including its general international fund, the largest investment trust. This
has about 50 per cent of its assets in the UK and the EC; but to qualify, it
would have to commit itself to raise this to about 55 per cent in case it
needed to sell stock in one of these markets.
'The whole thing is a nonsense,' said Jeremy Tigue, of Foreign &amp; Colonial.
'It's a crazy distinction to make. Our good results have been due to our
flexibility.'
Foreign &amp; Colonial started to offer Peps last October and has sold 3,500 so
far. Only two funds - the Eurotrust and German investment trusts - are
qualifying. F&amp;C 'tops up' its Pep to Pounds 6,000 with the others by adding
blue-chip shares - BT, BTR, BAT, Lloyds Bank and Shell - to cover the
remainder.
Mr Tigue estimates that, as a result of the non-qualifying rule, F&amp;C loses
out by Pounds 4,500 for each Pep sold - a total of Pounds 15.6m. He says
that F&amp;C, while reluctant to become a qualifying trust, is leaving its
options open.
But the abolition of the Pounds 3,000 Pep ceiling will put more pressure on
the non-qualifying trusts, believes Hamish Buchan, head of investment trust
research at County NatWest WoodMac. 'It suddenly opens up the gap between
the qualifying and non-qualifying trusts,' he says. 'Those such as Foreign &amp;
Colonial and Alliance may find themselves at a competitive disadvantage as a
result.'
However, the industry as a whole can only benefit from the abolition of the
Pounds 3,000 ceiling. In 1991-92 investment trusts concentrated on new
issues, to take advantage of the loophole in the Pep rules that allowed such
trusts to qualify for the Pounds 6,000 limit.
M&amp;G launched two new issues - Income and Recovery - and there were many
other issues from managers such as Fidelity and Robert Fleming.
Many such issues had split-capital structures, and a high income, offering
particular attractions to a Pep investor. For example, M&amp;G Income offered a
6.55 per cent yield, equivalent to 11 per cent gross for a higher-rate
taxpayer.
Split-capital issues also helped prevent the shares dropping to a discount
to net assets on trading, a problem with investment trust new issues. But
now that it is possible to put a full Pounds 6,000 into an existing trust,
investors can buy assets at a discount.
New issues may well be squeezed out of the Pep market as a result of the
abolition of the Pounds 3,000 ceiling, and unit trusts, with their freedom
to advertise, may once more take the lion's share of the Pep market.
Of the Pounds 4.5bn invested in Peps in the year to April 1991, only Pounds
180m went into investment trust Peps, compared with Pounds 1.44bn in unit
trusts. Unit trusts can usually afford to spend more on promotion, because
of their higher charges, while investment trusts are quoted companies and
therefore are not allowed to advertise their shares. (However, this
restriction does not apply to their savings plans.)
With the uncertainty of the election out of the way, the future of Peps
looks secure and investors can expect an increased number of investment
trusts to offer Peps.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11587</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (24): A simple route
for the private investor - Savings schemes / You are spared the anxiety of
timing, as well as the need to buy your shares through a broker
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SAVINGS SCHEMES may have been the saviours of the investment trust industry.
They were only introduced in 1984, after investment trusts themselves had
been alive for rather more than a century, but now companies are keen to
offer them.
According to the Association of Investment Trust Companies, savings schemes
are available for 118 trusts, managed by 18 different management groups.
Take-up in the past few years has been extraordinary - Pounds 119.5m was
invested by 130,700 savers last year, up from Pounds 90.9m in 1990. In 1988,
the figure was only Pounds 22.5m, while in the early years of the schemes
the money invested was insignificant - for example, only Pounds 89,000 in
1984.
The raising of the annual limit on investment trust personal equity plans to
Pounds 6,000 is likely to increase demand. This regular flow of money
through savings schemes has helped to erode discounts and shore up
investment trusts' defences against possible takeovers.
Catering for small savers is a new departure for management houses, which
had previously been geared for marketing trusts to institutions. But as far
as private investors are concerned, a savings scheme is likely to be a more
useful way to invest.
Convenience is important. Until 1984, you needed a broker in order to buy
and sell shares in an investment trust. But stockbrokers are not always the
easiest people for small savers to get hold of, and the charges they levy
for small transactions can, quite reasonably, be high.
With a savings scheme, you simply make out a direct debit from a bank, and
the trust administers a small savings account on your behalf. The trust buys
as many shares as can be afforded each month, and holds any cash balance
left over to be invested the following month.
Saving schemes also release investors from the tricky problem of timing,
which can otherwise be crucial to the return on the investment. For example,
if you had put Pounds 1,000 into a trust in September 1987, just before
Black Monday, you would now be doing a lot worse than if you invested in
November 1987.
Under a savings scheme, 'pound-cost averaging' works in your favour. When
prices are low, your regular monthly payment buys more shares; when prices
are high, it buys fewer - so that, provided the long-term trend is upward, a
temporary fall in the value of your investment can even be good news.
Pound-cost averaging ensures that the cost of your total holding will be
lower than the average of the monthly prices on the day you invest. Had you
continued to pay the same amount into such a scheme during 1973 and 1974,
you would have picked up a lot of cheap stock, which went on to gain
heavily.
Low annual administration charges are savings schemes' other big advantage.
In some cases, trusts make no charge at all, and none charges more than 1.5
per cent. This is cheaper than you could manage through a broker, while also
more convenient.
All of this helps to account for the increased interest in savings schemes,
which itself has improved performance by contributing to discount erosion.
Should demand for savings schemes now be choked off by higher taxes, as
seems possible, the trend could go into reverse - discounts might widen if
this regular source of demand were diminished.
Even so, the performance of these schemes still stands up well to scrutiny.
Unlike some of the more complicated financial vehicles mentioned in this
survey, the aim of these schemes is very simple - long-term capital growth.
This is not a way to provide yourself with an income. Therefore the
accompanying figures, from Micropal, assume that income is re-invested (as
it can be automatically under most schemes).
The figures are hypothetical to an extent, as the schemes only started in
1984, and some later still. They show how your investment would have fared
if you had invested Pounds 50 each month for the last five and 10 years. The
five-year timescale catches the worst of Black Monday.
Over five years, total investment of Pounds 3,000 would on average have
become Pounds 3,519.57 - not perhaps all that impressive. But over 10 years
a total of Pounds 6,000 invested would on average be worth Pounds 13,089.83.
This is an impressive return.
Only trusts whose managers offer savings schemes are included in the table,
and charges are not included. Several investment trust Peps have a regular
savings option, which could save you a capital gains tax bill in the long
run.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
THE TOP SAVINGS SCHEMES' 10-YEAR PERFORMANCE
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                          Management                      Value at
Trust                       group                          March 1
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Law Debenture             Law Debenture              Pounds 18,092.73
TR City of London         Touche Remnant                    17,412.79
Bankers                   Touche Remnant                    17,076.24
Lowland                   Henderson Administration          16,739.17
Murray Smaller Markets    Murray Johnstone                  16,308.94
Securities Trust of
 Scotland                 Martin Currie                     15,974.34
Fleming Claverhouse       Flemings                          15,942.76
Foreign &amp; Colonial        Foreign &amp; Colonial                15,638.25
Moorgate                  Moorgate                          15,439.83
F&amp;C Eurotrust             Foreign &amp; Colonial                15,343.36
Murray Income             Murray Johnstone                  15,275.51
Temple Bar                Guinness Mahon                    15,028.89
Alliance                  Alliance Trust                    14,982.19
Second Alliance           Second Alliance Trust             14,926.48
English National          Henderson Administration          14,594.81
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Assumes Pounds 50 invested monthly since March 1, 1982, dividends
re-invested.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Micropal
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11588</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (23): A broad
investment that will let you sleep at night - The international generalists
/ In the industry's biggest sector, you should expect neither to make a
killing nor to incur a huge loss
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE FASHION for clever and complicated split-level investment trusts has
turned attention away from the large international general trusts in recent
months.
The general trusts aim to produce balanced income and growth, and are
usually regarded as one of the least risky ways for the private investor to
enter the investment trust sector.
Assets are held in stock markets in different parts of the world, which
should cushion the fund against sharp falls in a single area. Up to 80 per
cent of assets can be held in any one geographical area, but most of these
funds hold half or the majority of their assets in the UK (to a rough
maximum of 70 per cent) and the rest in the US, Japan, the Far East and
Europe.
The general international investment trust sector is the largest of all
investment trust sectors in terms of market capitalisation. In March, the
average investment trust was capitalised at Pounds 281.9m, on a yield at 4
per cent.
The spread of risk in the international funds means that this is not a
sector in which you would expect either to make a killing or to incur a huge
loss. 'You'll always find one sector outperforming it,' according to Philip
Middleton, investment analyst at Smith New Court. 'But it is a
sleep-at-night investment.'
This is borne out by figures published by the Association of Investment
Trust Companies. If you had invested Pounds 100 in an international general
fund over 10 years, your lump sum would have grown fivefold to Pounds 585.80
by February 28 (mid-market to mid-market, with income reinvested). The
return is much better than the average for the UK general sector (Pounds
498.40), but has been outperformed by both the UK capital growth (Pounds
618.40) and UK Income growth (Pounds 666.10) sectors.
However, if you had put all your money into North America, your investment
would have grown to only Pounds 370.20 over the same period. By contrast,
someone who had invested in Japan would have been cock-a-hoop, having seen
his initial investment grow to Pounds 603.30.
The average performance of the international general funds has bettered that
of the average of all investments trusts over 10 years, five, three and one
years - which is one reason why these trusts have gained a reputation as a
solid, if not too exciting an investment. A further advantage for many
private investors is that market exposure and individual stock selection,
can be left to the investment managers.
Lewis Aaron, head of Investment Trust research at BZW, expects the sector to
become even more popular, largely as a result of the change to the personal
equity plan rules in the Budget. These raise the annual limit on unit and
investment trust Pep holdings from Pounds 3,000 to Pounds 6,000.
'The Pep change means a potential Pounds 3bn could go into the generalist
trusts,' he said, because private investors, hitherto limited to only Pounds
3,000, are now likely to sell some of their individual company shares in
order to get a better spread in collective funds.
However, the largest of these funds, Foreign &amp; Colonial, only qualifies for
a Pounds 1,500 Pep, because it will not commit itself to keep more than half
its funds in EC member states. Instead, Foreign &amp; Colonial's Pep scheme tops
up a Pounds 1,500 holding with blue-chip shares. Alliance Trust is also a
'non-qualifying' international general investment trust.
Industry analysts seem to agree that the average discount to net assets of
14 per cent in the international general funds, is quite wide at the moment,
making the sector attractive to private investors. Philip Middleton believes
the funds are 'very cheap and very good quality'.
How should you go about choosing a fund in this sector? 'I can't think of a
better investment vehicle for private individuals, so long as they pick a
good management group with a good long-term record,' said Lewis Aaron.
Some of the best known and well-performing names include Foreign &amp; Colonial,
Bankers Investment Trust, and Alliance Trust. The discount to net asset
value on Bankers was 7.1 per cent on March 16, 9.3 per cent on Foreign &amp;
Colonial and 11.7 per cent on Alliance. The trick is to choose a good
performer with a wide discount.
Some investors may be tempted to go for a fund with a very wide discount, in
the hope that it will fall prey to a takeover. But Lewis Aaron warns that,
'you should not buy a trust because of its discount only - it's a trap that
many people fall into. A fund may be on a big discount because it is an
awful performer.'
Two years ago, the British Coal Pension Funds succeeded in a Pounds 1.11bn
bid for the mighty Globe Investment Trust. If discounts increase above 20
per cent, there is a possibility that the sector could become vulnerable to
the kind of predatory action it saw in the 1980s.
However, predatory action may be bad news for the industry, because it means
less diversity and less stock, but it is not bad news for the private
investor. 'Corporate activity is good,' said Lewis Aaron. 'It takes the poor
performers out of the market.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11589</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (22): Back to rejoin
the mainstream - In spite of problems brought by the recession, investment
trust professionals believe the sector is returning to its roots as a
vehicle for small investors to enter the equity market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INVESTMENT TRUSTS have been enjoying a revival. After years of being the
poor relations of the fund management industry, they were flavour of the
moment for much of the 1991-92 tax year.
There were two reasons. The first was personal equity plans. Whereas unit
trust Peps were limited to Pounds 3,000 in 1991-92, an investment trust new
issue qualified for a full Pounds 6,000 Pep.
The result was a proliferation of investment trust launches with a
'tax-free' label, notably the Pounds 246m raised by M&amp;G's Income trust.
Norman Lamont may have put a stop to this trend, by allowing all unit and
investment trusts with 50 per cent of assets in the EC to qualify for the
Pounds 6,000 limit. It will now make more sense to put Pounds 6,000 into an
existing trust - and acquire assets at a discount - than to invest in a new
trust and pay a premium for assets (after issue expenses).
The second boost to investment trusts has been the decision of some to pay
commission, which has attracted independent financial advisers who had not
previously recommended investment trusts.
The change casts doubt on the notion that consumers receive 'best advice'.
How can it be best advice to recommend investment trusts with a 3 per cent
upfront charge, when it was not best advice to recommend trusts when they
carried no charge at all?
To be fair, advisers have also been attracted to trusts by the revival of
split-capital structures, which have made investment trust shares highly
flexible tools for private investors.
Income shares, in particular, when placed in a Pep, can offer double-digit
tax-free yields. Zero-coupon shares offer steady capital growth, which gives
investors an efficient way of using up their capital gains tax allowance.
Capital shares are a vehicle for those who want to speculate on a quick rise
in the market.
But there are dangers in these structures. To date, the gains have been made
by the zero and income shareholders, with the capital shares tending to
drift down in the absence of a bull market.
One must also question whether all those who have bought income shares have
known exactly what they have been buying. In some cases, income shares are
deliberately designed as an 'annuity'. They will have virtually no capital
value on wind-up. Investors may be delighted with the high yields on offer,
but how many of them realise that a good chunk of the income is simply the
return of their capital?
Other structures have zero shares attached to so-called 'ordinary income'
shares. The latter get all the income of the trust but will only be repaid
after the claims of the zero holders have been met. If equity returns are
low in the 1990s (and some believe this will be the case), the remorseless
upward growth in the zeros may eat away at the redemption value of the
ordinary income shares.
And even the zeros are not guaranteed to be redeemed at full value. A
collapse in the stock market at the wrong moment might hit a trust's ability
to repay the zeros, and cause a nasty shock to those who thought they had
acquired 'safe' investments.
New private investor recruits to the sector may also be disillusioned if a
combination of falling stock markets and widening discounts creates
substantial plunges in trust share prices. Such losses could easily wipe out
the tax privileges available to Pep holders.
One need only look at the losses incurred by shareholders in some of those
trusts which have large unquoted holdings in their portfolios, as asset
values have dropped and discounts have widened in the recession.
Despite these potential problems, most investment trust professionals are
delighted that the sector is returning to its roots - of being a vehicle for
small investors to enter the equity market. The launch of trusts by groups
such as M&amp;G and Fidelity will have widened the market, according to Paul
Manduca, chairman of the Association of Investment Trust Companies.
Investment trusts still have an important role to play in specialist
geographical markets. Institutions are still prepared to sub-contract
investment management in areas such as south-east Asia and Latin America,
and for private investors, a collective fund is the only practicable means
of access to such markets.
The challenge for the 1990s is to maintain the momentum - to prevent the
cycle of over-supply of trusts, widening discounts and predatory action
which shrinks the sector. There are still predators around. Despite the
general narrowing of discounts, a number of trusts have been taken over or
reconstructed, notably Govett Atlantic. If managers slip in performance,
they will need to keep an eye on their share registers.
A further battle may be needed to allow international generalist trusts,
such as Foreign &amp; Colonial, to qualify for the full Pep allowance. At
present, unless such trusts commit themselves to keep more than 50 per cent
of their assets in the EC, their Pep allowance is just Pounds 1,500. This
dissuades private investors from backing what are acknowledged to be good
first-time investment vehicles.
There will certainly be intense competition for private investors' cash in
the 1990s. The advantages of unit trusts, which were struggling to compete
in 1991-92, may be rediscovered. Now that investment trusts are paying
commission, they have lost some of their cost advantage over their unitised
rivals, especially if other unit trusts follow the lead of Murray Johnstone
and reduce their front-end fees.
The narrowing of discounts, which boosted the relative performance of
investment trusts vis-a-vis unit trusts in the late 1980s, will not be
repeated in the early 1990s.
But at least investment trusts, after years of being in the backwaters of
the financial services industry, are back in the mainstream.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11590</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (21): 'No results,
no fee' for the investors' first-aider - Hindsight / Too many Fimbra members
give bad advice, claims Toby Micklethwait, whose organisation tries to help
savers who have lost money to pursue compensation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TOBY MICKLETHWAIT's life changed when a friend of his lost Pounds 50,000
through dealing with a Fimbra member.
Fimbra is the acronym for Financial Intermediaries, Managers and Brokers
Regulatory Association - the regulatory body for independent financial
advisers.
A chartered accountant, who had been a finance director in business, Mr
Micklethwait set about trying to obtain compensation for his friend.
That led to the formation of the Association of Investors, a loose
organisation which consists of professionals who are engaged in trying to
help those fighting for compensation from the financial services industry,
and the team leaders of groups of investors who have lost money.
'Our aims,' says Mr Micklethwait, 'are to see the quality of advice improve
dramatically, and not be wrongly motivated; to ensure that compensation
system operates quickly and fairly; and to see a reduction in the quantity
of thefts.'
Those who attended the association's first conference, in October 1991,
included solicitors Alexander Tatham, Hewson Clark, Hodkinsons and J Keith
Park; also the Consumers' Association, Age Concern, the Association of
Lloyds Names, and Paul Cooper, a financial journalist who campaigns in this
field.
To earn a living, Mr Micklethwait asks for a percentage of the compensation
received, and works on a 'no-results, no-fee' basis, rather like an American
lawyer. The fee can vary between 10 and 30 per cent, depending on the
prospects of achieving success.
However, he says: 'This is not a race in which it is particularly pleasant
to be the leader. Cash flow is a problem. It can take years to get a
result.'
A further difficulty can occur after compensation has been secured.
Investors who readily agreed to pay a percentage when hope of compensation
seemed small, may then turn round and say with hindsight: 'It wasn't so
difficult.'
Nevertheless, Mr Micklethwait says he believes that contingent fees are very
advantageous. 'Many of these people have no money for legal fees, and cannot
get legal aid,' he says.
Questioned about how future problems for investors can be avoided, he is
forthright: 'Fimbra is a very bad profession. There are no proper entry
controls; no exams; anyone can become a member. It is very slow to throw
people out. Far too many Fimbra members give very bad advice.'
Most advisers are paid by the commission system, under which insurance
companies reward intermediaries through a percentage of the premiums paid by
the consumer. Mr Micklethwait thinks this system is unacceptable.
'Good advice does not mix with commission being paid by the supplier of the
product.' he says. 'We must stop Fimbra members taking commission.
'We need a huge publicity campaign to make people very uncomfortable with
the concept of free advice. SIB (the Securities and Investments Board),
rather than sitting helplessly, could ask for money to mount a campaign.
Fimbra and Lautro are not going to stop commissions on their own.'
He doubts the efficacy of the various warning notes which regulators have
placed in documentation. 'People can't go through life reading the small
print.'
The alternative system to commission is for the consumer to pay a fee to the
adviser direct, based normally on an hourly rate for work done. Many
advisers say that they cannot persuade consumers to pay a fee, and that they
would go out of business without commissions.
'I don't care,' says Mr Micklethwait. 'It seems to me that accountants can
handle the whole business of financial advice; they have exams and strict
entry procedures.'
What has the association achieved though its campaigning? Mr Micklethwait
claims some successes, such as the Dale Greaves investors who had bought
fake bonds. Many, but not all, have now been paid compensation. His original
friend now has a fighting chance of repayment; the Fimbra member has been
declared in default, the first step towards obtaining compensation.
Another achievement is that a number of campaigners, including Mr
Micklethwait, have succeeded in getting Aylesbury Associates declared in
default. Aylesbury was one of many companies selling home-income plans,
which have proved the bane of many elderly investors.
The aim of these plans was to unlock the capital tied up in the homes of old
people. The biggest problems have arisen with schemes which involved
insurance bonds. In essence, the schemes involved the investors remortgaging
their houses and using the proceeds of the loan to buy a bond. That bond was
supposed to provide them with enough income to meet the interest payments
and with further income on top. Rising house prices would, meanwhile, reduce
the significance of the mortgage.
Instead, the values of the bonds and of the houses fell. Interest rates rose
and the income from the bonds could not keep up. The investors found their
position steadily worsening, with the mortgage assuming a greater and
greater proportion of their homes' value.
Mr Micklethwait thinks that nearly all those who have been involved in what
he calls 'home gambling' schemes will have to sell their homes. Half of
those who entered an Aylesbury scheme already had a mortgage - that alone,
says Mr Micklethwait, scuppers their financial positions.
Many of those people who were involved in home-income plans are still
fighting for compensation, and a number of victim support groups have been
established.
Although he says he obviously has a conflict of interest, Mr Micklethwait
feels that those pursuing claims against financial companies should sign up
with professionals such as himself. Clients need a great deal of help on day
one, he says: often they have not heard of the investors' compensation
scheme.
Contact names and numbers for those who feel they have a claim: Toby
Micklethwait, Association of Investors, 0932 873557; Anthony Gold, of
solicitors Alexander Tatham, 061 236-4444; Paul Stafford, of solicitors
Harrison Clark, 0905 612001; Neil Stevens, of solicitors Trethowan, 0722
412299. Paul Cooper, journalist, runs an advice business called Claims (081
947 6046). Hillary Morgan, of Aylesbury Victims Support Group, 0732 61704;
Marjorie Gumbley, of East Kent Home Income Scheme Action Group, 0304 372835;
Peter Dawson, of Gloucestershire Home Income Scheme Action Group, 0285
740527.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11591</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (20): An evergreen
chartist with an eye for healthy growth - Serious riches / Christmas is a
year-round business for John St George Syms, who runs the family tree
plantation.  And so, too, is investment - mainly in equities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CHRISTMAS does not necessarily come only once a year
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
it's a year-round business for Mr John St George Syms.
Mr Syms, a 79-year-old, who spent his career balancing the very different
pressures of the Bar and a country farm, is also a founder of the UK
Christmas Tree Growers Association, and its second chairman.
He provides the Christmas tree for Number 10, Downing Street each year.
Initially, he had hoped to set up a competition, modelled on a similar
scheme in the US where different growers compete to provide the White House
tree. But now Mr Syms he finds that his peers are happy to leave the
responsibility to him, so it has become an annual job.
As the photograph on this page, taken last month, confirms, shows, Christmas
trees grow around the year, and Mr Syms still pays there is still close
attention to his plantation, situated on the edge of the estate, to the
south of London.
This estate has itself been the subject of a number of legal transactions,
starting in 1967. Mr Syms passed the estate on to his son by his first wife
(he is now married for the second time). This was not as radical a measure
as it sounds, because he has retained a life interest - 'He can't get rid of
me until I'm 92, so I'm pretty secure.'
In many ways, Mr Syms' his life has revolved around the family estate, which
his father bought in 1921. He bought the neighbouring estate, twice as large
as the estate he inherited, in 1953, and it has since grown more or less in
his own image. Thus there are fishing lakes (which several years ago he sold
to his son) and also the Christmas trees.
This business grew up almost by accident. Mr Syms' father started the
plantation fairly unscientifically. Then a traveller asked to buy some trees
for Christmas. One of his father's clients, an American businessman, then
gave him some advice that he has never forgotten: 'When you grow older, you
will realise it will pay you to employ someone else to do that work you are
doing.'
The business is still growing, and an extra five to ten acres is planted
each year. Tending the plantation is a full-time job, now in the hands of Mr
Syms' son, Mark.
Investment is, similarly, a year-round job requiring diligent attention.
While Mr Syms has always enlisted the advice of brokers, he also leans
heavily on investment research.
In his own words, he is an avowed chartist. The particular charts that he
has consulted for more than two decades now are produced by Investment
Research, of Cambridge. They indicate the performance of both general
sectors and specific shares relative to their appropriate index.
For a chart to tell Mr Syms to buy, in broad terms, it needs to have started
to outperform its index. Wait too long and the opportunity may be lost, he
believes.
Having consulted the runes of the chart, Mr Syms will pick up the phone and
consult his stockbroker, who is Neil Pedley, of James Capel.
This is an 'advisory' relationship, which means that Mr Pedley is within his
rights to try to argue Mr Syms out of a stock selection. He can also
telephone with good ideas of his own. But he does not have discretion to
make transactions unless specifically authorised.
However, it is a mark of the respect between the two men that Mr Pedley does
have discretion to make sales when he sees fit, and to give advice.
'When the crash came in 1987, I bailed out of everything,' recalls Mr Syms.
'I'm not saying I was right. Then, after two years, I decided it was time I
got reinvested again.'
He spent a year in gilts during 1989, and then took the decision to buy
shares again. By now, he was out of contact with the City, so he turned for
advice to his accountant, who recommended Mr Pedley.
'We don't have a stereotyped arrangement,' explains Mr Syms. 'I subscribe to
Investment Research, so every now and then, if I see something I like, I
tell him to buy it. We talk on the telephone about two or three times a
week.'
Equities now make up 90 per cent of his portfolio, with 10 per cent in cash.
He no longer holds any gilts.
This tends to suggest that age has not coloured his investment outlook with
too much conservatism. A look through the individual shares in his portfolio
further bears this out. For example, one of his strongest performers is
Eurodisney.
However, the bedrock of the portfolio is in solid stocks. 'I would say about
50 per cent of my stocks are in the FT-SE 100. I try to avoid speculation.'
If he does want to speculate, he uses traded options.
While Mr Syms' standard holding in a company is Pounds 7,500, he only risks
Pounds 1,500 when putting money into options. He had already developed a
taste for this form of investment from previous successful forays into
commodity futures.
One of his most recent choices shows a gambler's instinct, both for making
the right choice and for quitting while he was ahead. He bought a call
option in Midland Bank for June. This was an execution-only deal  - Mr
Pedley could not advise him on it, because James Capel is owned By Hongkong
&amp; Shanghai Bank. As Mr Syms puts it:
'For a period of time, it was 50 per cent down. Then I checked, and it had
had an enormous rise. I rang up and said to take the profit once it had
doubled. I think the thing's gone up more since.'
The principle, of course, is to take your winnings while you are ahead. This
was before the takeover of Midland by Hongkong &amp; Shanghai, which would
probably have helped increase the value of the option further.
This judicious mixture of strong investments, having made decisions based on
fundamentals, plus a sensible gambler's instinct for profit at the more
speculative margins, stems naturally from Mr Syms' upbringing.
He is a 'fifth generation' lawyer, the son of a solicitor. Following school
at Harrow, he went on to Magdalen College, Oxford, where he read history,
and thence to the Bar, where he specialised in divorce law.
At this time, as in childhood, his great interest was horse racing. It
remains so, and a painting of the racehorse Desert Orchid now adorns his
wall.
His experiences during the war may also have helped to sharpen his instinct
for shrewd investment: he was a gunner in Catalina flying-boats, and saw
service in the North Atlantic at the height of the U-boat war, and then in
India. The plane in which he was a crew member shadowed the Bismarck for
seven hours.
Mr Syms has another investment which at the moment might seem a little
risky: he is a Lloyd's Name. This is an investment he has maintained for 42
years, since first being introduced to a syndicate by a friend from Oxford.
This year, he incurred his first loss, and he is still more than satisfied
with the value the investment has offered over the long term.
He has short shrift for the Names currently serving Lloyd's with writs.
'I've got no sympathy with that at all.' However, he admits that many of the
newer Names have not had the chance to build up reserves as he has done.
But his defence of Lloyd's is resolute, and he remains greatly impressed by
the Task Force's report which was published in January.
He does not believe it has been dominated by insiders, but he adds: 'It is
absolutely wrong that if agents have been guilty of malpractices the
financial burden should fall on the Names.'
At the age of 79, could caution now be seeping into his investment
attitudes? Not a bit of it.
One of Mr Syms' latest investments is a greyhound called Miller's Crossing.
On February 5. it won the 9.00 at Wembley, netting Pounds 500 for its proud
owner.
Why buy a greyhound? Mr Syms' answer is simple: 'Because I couldn't afford
to buy a racehorse.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11592</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (18): Optimism over
UK equities - The professionals / The four look forward to interest rate
cuts that will be a precursor to recovery from recession
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID DODWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHN MAJOR's general election victory in the UK drew deep sighs of relief
from our professionals, all of whose performance depends critically on that
of the UK equity markets.
Howard Beaufort, at Newton, was probably not untypical in saying that the
Conservative victory was 'a necessary prerequisite for an economic recovery
in 1992'.
The only one to react materially was Douglas McDougall, at Baillie Gifford,
who lifted UK equity holdings to by 4 per cent in the wake of the result.
But then, Baillie Gifford has the smallest UK holding of all our
professionals, so its response was perhaps not unexpected.
Over the first quarter, portfolio performances were bound to have been
muted, because of their heavy dependence on the London market: this has
drifted, with a tumble after the budget being recouped in the rally
following Mr Major's victory.
Elsewhere, the past quarter has been mixed. Gains in Europe and South East
Asia (particularly Hong Kong) have been more or less neutralised by traumas
on the Tokyo market. Bond markets have drifted down. While the US markets
have trodden water, a strengthening dollar has provided a boost for
sterling-based investors.
Turning to the quarter ahead, a cautious mood still prevails. 'Markets at
the moment seem to be for long-term investors only - those who are both
prepared and can afford to live with short-term price volatility,' says Tim
Howe, at Singer &amp; Friedlander.
All are nevertheless now optimistic about prospects for the UK equity
markets. The pressure on sterling - and on interest rates - that had been
predicted in the event of a Labour election victory is expected to abate.
All are looking forward to interest rate cuts that will be a precursor to
recovery from recession.
Other European markets remain pinned down by high German interest rates, and
the cost of German re-unification: hopes now focus on interest rate cuts in
the second half of the year. 'There is a risk of short-term consolidation,
but the upside is too great to merit being too clever,' says Paul Myners, at
Gartmore.
There is altogether more caution about prospects in the US, where they feel
the equity market has run ahead on the expectation of a recovery that is
likely to be more anaemic than forecast. As Tim Howe notes: 'The market now
needs evidence of an earnings upturn to justify current prices. If the
forecast recovery does not take place, political uncertainty will grow ahead
of the November election.'
Howard Beaufort nevertheless points out that a lack of investment
alternatives in the US will continue as interest rates remain so low. He
feels the 'sheer weight of money' may drive Wall Street 'significantly
higher' in the weeks ahead.
The small Japan holdings have been burning a hole in all portfolios, but
none of our professionals is willing at this stage to sell.
Elsewhere in Asia, prospects are seen to be good, with strongest interest in
Hong Kong, where a re-rating is under way as investors come to grips with
the territory's potential gains from economic liberalisation in China.
There is consensus that European bonds will be good performers over the
coming quarter, though US bonds will not. Their French bonds remain sturdy
performers.
Douglas McDougall, at Baillie Gifford, boosted his UK holdings by 4 per cent
to 44 per cent in the wake of the election, predicting an early interest
rate cut and a return of confidence among markets, consumers and businesses.
He sold 2 per cent of his European equity holdings, and 2 per cent in South
East Asia.
Paul Myners, at Gartmore, has kept his portfolio unchanged. He is avoiding
UK gilts, but otherwise favours bonds. In the US, he is switching to big
cyclical stocks from small growth companies. In spite of strong performance
by his Pacific Rim holdings, he 'sees no reason to take profits . . . The
heavy overseas exposure has worked well, and remains our preferred option.'
Howard Beaufort, at Newton, has halved his French bond holdings to 6 per
cent in order to buy a 4 per cent holding in Far East equities. His cash
holdings - all sterling and Deutsche Marks - have been lifted to 10 per
cent. 'Emerging markets as a whole, in Asia and South America in particular,
should enjoy a very good year in 1992,' he notes.
Tim Howe, at Singer &amp; Friedlander, has similar thoughts on the Pacific: half
of his 4 per cent holding in the Pacific region is now in Latin America:
'Both are areas of potentially dynamic growth, but the high risk/reward
nature of investment suggests the use of collective investment schemes to
spread the risk.'
He has cut 1 per cent from his UK equity holdings, to 60 per cent. US equity
holdings are up by 2 per cent to 5 per cent, while Japan has been cut by 2
per cent to 4 per cent. He has sold his 5 per cent UK bond holding, instead
boosting his holding of continental bonds by 4 per cent to 12 per cent. Cash
holdings have risen by 2 per cent to 5 per cent.
 ----------------------------------------------
HOW THEY ALLOCATE THEIR ASSETS
 ----------------------------------------------
BG
 ----------------------------------------------
                           %
1 UK Equities             44
2 Europe Equities         23
3 SE Asis Equities        13
4 Japanese Equities        5
5 Long French Bonds       15
Last time: UK Equities (40%), Europe Equities
(25), SE Asia Equities (15), Japanese Equities
(5), Long French Bonds (15)
 ----------------------------------------------
GARTMORE
 ----------------------------------------------
                           %
1 UK Equities             50
2 European Equities       15
3 Pacific Rim Equities    12.5
4 US Equities              5
5 Jap. Equity Warrants     5
6 French Franc Bonds       7.5
7 Cash Dollars             5
Last time: UK Equities (50%), Pacific Rim
Equities (12.5), European Equities (15), US
Equities (5), Japanese Equity Warrants (5),
French Franc Bonds (7.5), Cash Dollars (5)
 ----------------------------------------------
NEWTON
 ----------------------------------------------
                           %
1 UK Equities             44
2 US Equities              8
3 Far East Equities        4
4 Japan                    4
5 France                   4
6 Spain                    4
7 Switzerland              8
8 Sweden                   4
9 Netherlands              4
10 French Franc Bonds      6
11 Cash DM Pounds         10
Last time: UK Equities (44%), US Equities (8),
Japan (4), France (4), Spain (4), Switzerland
(8), Sweden (4), Netherlands (4), French
Franc Bonds (12), Cash Dollars Pounds (8)
 ----------------------------------------------
S&amp;F
 ----------------------------------------------
                           %
1 UK Equities             60
2 European Equities       10
3 US Equities              5
4 Japanese Equities        4
5 Pacific Equities         4
6 European Bonds          12
7 Cash Pounds              5
Last time: UK Equities (61%), European Equities
(10), US Equities (3), Japanese Equities (6),
SE Asian Equities (4), European Bonds (8),
UK Bonds (5), Cash Pounds (3)
 ----------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11593</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (19): There are
changes in the line-up ...
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
DURING THE past quarter, Mercury Asset Management have decided that, since
their portfolio is now settled, with few reasons for major change, they can
no longer contribute valuably to the Professionals' review. We have opted
not to replace them, because this would make comparison invidious.
Also, David Poole has been headhunted by another leading London merchant
bank, and Tim Howe, director of Singer &amp; Friedlander, has agreed to
contribute in his place. Since Mr Howe has been closely involved over the
past year in managing Singer &amp; Friedlander's 'portfolio', continuity has
been assured.
. . . but the rules remain the same
THIS FEATURE is not a competition, but an allocation exercise, the purpose
of which is to see how four professional fund managers manage a Pounds
250,000 portfolio on behalf of a hypothetical client of their choice. In
each case, the client is assumed to be either a wealthy individual or a
small self-administered pension fund.
All the fund managers emphasise that they are investing for the long term
(10 years or more) rather than for short-term gain. The exercise started at
the beginning of October 1990. The portfolios given here were drawn up as at
the beginning of this month, and will be reviewed at the end of June.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11594</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (17): Good news and
bad about charges - Unit Trusts / Murray Johnstone's decision to reduce the
front-end load may increase competition
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COMPETITION HAS shown its face in the unit trust industry during the past
quarter. Murray Johnstone, the Glasgow-based fund management group, cut the
initial charges on its trusts to 1 per cent, substantially reducing the cost
of investing.
This was not the first time in the industry that initial charges had been
reduced. Lazards does not have so-called 'front end loads' on its trusts;
but the minimum investment for its funds is Pounds 5,000, whereas the Murray
Johnstone funds require a minimum of just Pounds 500.
Initial charges are included within the 'bid-offer spread' that unitholders
pay. Investors pay the offer price, but on selling receive the bid price,
which in the average trust is 6 per cent lower. In other words, the fund in
which the unitholder invests must grow by 6 per cent before he breaks even.
On the Murray Johnstone trusts, spreads will vary between 1.78 and 4.22 per
cent. This means that investors in its funds will have a head start: their
investments will have to grow by only between 2 and 4 per cent before they
earn their money back.
But the news is not all good. Murray Johnstone is clawing back some of this
gain by increasing its annual management charge from 1 to 1.5 per cent.
A higher management fee will act as a drag on performance over a long
period; however, there are plenty of other management groups which already
charge a 1.5 per cent annual fee on top of a 5 per cent-plus initial charge.
Other fund managers will doubtless claim that they can produce better
investment performance than Murray Johnstone, which has a moderate long-term
record (although its funds did well in 1991). But the change may prompt
other fund management groups to follow suit, and thus create greater
competition in the industry.
In the US, 'no load' mutual funds are common, as are 'low load' funds, such
as Murray Johnstone's, where initial charges are below average.
In the UK, the industry has been held back by the fact that most unit trusts
are sold by tied agents and independent financial advisers. For such people,
the incentive to sell is a 3 per cent commission, which the management
company reclaims from the unitholder via the initial charge.
Without an initial charge, therefore, the management company cannot pay an
initial commission, and thus may find that its products are not sold.
Murray Johnstone hopes to get round the problem in three ways. Some advisers
already charge fees, or rebate commission, and so may not be put off by
Murray's charging structure. Some investors will buy direct from the
company. The third route is that Murray Johnstone will use its extra 0.5 per
cent annual management fee to pay 'renewal commission' to those advisers who
keep client money in its trusts for a year.
It will be a while before Murray Johnstone's move can be properly judged.
But if its funds move up the performance tables over the next year, then,
under 'best advice' rules, more advisers may be forced to recommend them.
A boost for Peps
THE BUDGET change in personal equity plan rules released unit trusts from
the shackles that had previously chained them. At last, investors can place
a full Pounds 6,000 in a unit trust Pep.
Unit trust managers M&amp;G and Fidelity had both moved into the investment
trust market during 1991-92, to take advantage of the fact that investment
trust new issues qualified for the Pounds 6,000 limit.
Now they can concentrate their marketing firepower on promoting their
existing unit trust ranges. Fidelity, for example, is offering nine Peps,
eight of which are linked to the following trusts: UK Growth, Special
Situations, Recovery, Growth &amp; Income, Income Plus, European, 1992 European
Opportunities and the International Pep. The ninth is linked to its European
Values Investment Trust.
The change is likely to mean a decline in the old top-up Peps, in which a
selection of blue-chip shares was added to a Pounds 3,000 unit trust
investment to make up the full Pounds 6,000. Now companies will simply offer
a unit trust covering the full Pep allowance.
Another possibility is that the ability to attract Pounds 6,000 into a Pep
will allow unit trust managers to reduce costs to investors. Someone who can
put in the full allowance may be able to negotiate a reduced initial charge.
Either way, the change in the rules is likely to be good news for both
managers and investors. The former will have a bigger slice of the savings
market; the latter will be able to get a larger diversified portfolio, at
what will probably be a reduced cost.
Exeter breaks new ground
THERE ARE more than 1,400 unit trusts, so it is rare to find one launched in
a truly new area.
But it did happen in the first quarter of 1992, with the launch of the first
trust to be based on investment trust warrants. Exeter Fund Managers, which
specialises in the split-capital investment trust sector, was behind the
trust, and now has a complete range of split-capital funds - with trusts
based on capital, income and zero shares as well.
Warrants, which give the buyer the right to buy shares at a set price, are
highly speculative instruments, and thus the risks involved in such a trust
could be high. But Exeter is building in a safeguard by putting 40 per cent
of the portfolio into zero preference shares, which should produce steady
capital growth.
Minimum investment in the fund is Pounds 1,000, with an initial charge of 6
per cent and an annual management fee of 1 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11595</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (16): Reality falls
short of theory - Bonds / They're usually a sound investment in recession.
So what's gone wrong?
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON LONDON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BULL run in global bond markets ground unceremoniously to a halt in
March. Bond prices fell back in all major markets, eroding the capital gains
seen by investors during 1991 and the early part of this year.
Worst hit was the UK government bond market, where the election crystallised
fears - about an increased supply of gilts, for example - which investors
had hitherto glossed over. According to figures from JP Morgan, a balanced
portfolio of gilts gave a negative return of 2.44 per cent during the month.
But the gilts market was not alone in facing a crisis of confidence. Only
four of the 12 markets measured by the JP Morgan Bond Index Monitor showed a
positive return during March.
The best performer was the Australian government bond market, which returned
a miserly 1.08 per cent - still not enough to drag investors into profit for
the quarter following an appalling performance during January and February.
So why have bonds performed so badly in so many markets?
After all, bonds are usually regarded as an excellent investment during
recession, and there is little sign of a global economic upturn. As
governments cut interest rates to stimulate economic activity, bond yields
fall to match - meaning that bond prices rise, presenting bond holders with
a comfortable capital gain.
Disgruntled bond market investors might reasonably ask why theory has failed
to deliver at this point in the economic cycle. Different factors are at
work in different markets, but some of the common themes are:
Fear of inflation is bad for bonds, because rising prices erode the real
return available from fixed-interest investments. Where bond market
investors see inflation coming, bond yields rise.
While interest rates should still fall in many economies, there are fears
that inflation has not been bought under control. For example, bond market
analysts and economists are starting to talk about 'stagflation' in the
German economy, the combination of depressed economic activity and high
inflation.
Faced with persistent inflationary pressures, it now seems unlikely that the
Bundesbank will lower German interest rates until much later this year.
German government bond prices fell sharply as the market adjusted its
expectations.
Fear of inflationary pressures was also a factor behind the jitters of the
US bond market over the quarter. Amid signs that the US economy is moving
out of recession, 10-year US bond yields rose from 6.90 per cent at the turn
of the year to 7.70 by the end of March.
Fear of high government borrowing, and therefore a high level of bond
issuance, has been most noticeable in the UK. Going into the election, all
the main political parties were committed to increases in public expenditure
which could not be financed out of taxation.
Just how much will be borrowed from the bond markets depends on what
economic growth the government is able to deliver, and therefore how much
can be raised from taxation. However, a public sector borrowing requirement
of even Pounds 30bn this year - at the lower end of current forecasts -
translates into a lot of new government bonds. This is expected to limit the
potential for a rise in gilts prices for some time.
Political uncertainty is difficult to quantify, but undoubtedly has an
unsettling effect on bond markets, reducing the number of buyers and
sellers, and increasing volatility of bond prices.
Intermediaries in the international bond market have complained for weeks
that institutional investors are unwilling to commit funds. Recent elections
in the UK, France, and Italy, and the prospect of a presidential election in
the US in the autumn, have added to the prevailing mood of uncertainty.
But even without elections, there is little consensus among professionals on
the economic outlook. For example, Credit Suisse First Boston started its
latest investment outlook: 'Is the world heading for a vigorous supply-led
boom or a prolonged and dangerous slump? Paradoxically, either outcome is
plausible in the longer run.'
Above all, however, many bond markets were probably due for a correction
following a remarkable rally over the past year. The gilts market may have
fallen during March, but it has still delivered a healthy 11 per cent return
over the last 12 months. Despite a dismal first quarter, investors in
Australian government bonds have earned an outstanding 18 per cent return
over the same period.
But choppy market conditions have been reflected in the performance of bond
funds, probably the easiset way for private investors to play international
bond markets. According to Finstat figures, only four of the 25 available
international bond funds turned in a positive return during March.
Yet well managed (and perhaps a touch lucky) fund managers can turn in a
good performance even in a volatile market. For the three months as a whole,
the best performer among the 25 funds was the Whittingdale US Government
Bond Fund, which showed an admirable 7 per cent growth.
Of the more diversified funds, the best return for the quarter was by the
Guinness Flight Global High Income fund, which specialises in buying
high-yielding bonds such as Spanish peseta and lire bonds. The fund returned
4.3 per cent over the three months.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11596</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (15): Few openings
if Bush loses - Most dealers expect the president to be re-elected in
October. But should defeat seem imminent, US markets would fall
significantly
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GEORGE BUSH's mortality, both physical and political, was rammed home at the
end of last year by his bilious tour of Japan, and then in February by his
embarrassing showing in the New Hampshire primary.
Things look better for him now, but it still does not require too much
imagination to picture his losing the presidency in November.
Such a volcanic change of the political landscape seems certain to produce
shifts in the market. This could require changes, both in stock selection
and also at the level of international asset allocation.
But the investment professionals have not spotted many new opportunities. At
the moment, they are rather more worried by the damage a Bush defeat would
do. Despite his well publicised wobbles at the turn of the year, most
dealers believe that Mr Bush will win again, and US stocks are priced
accordingly.
Should it become obvious that the president was going to lose, US markets
would probably endure significant falls.
A Bush defeat would probably mean that the US economy would have fallen
below current expectations, and that recovery had not arrived on cue. This
would require cuts in share prices.
Wall Street would also perhaps react negatively to a Democrat president,
solely on grounds of sentiment. It is difficult to prove this with any
certainty, because Democratic victories are now so rare - the last was Jimmy
Carter's in 1976 - but Peter Oppenheimer, chief economic strategist at
Hambros Bank, has produced figures which suggest that the market is
politically sensitive.
The Dow-Jones index shows a detectable election cycle under both parties, in
which it rallies sharply in the last six months prior to the election, and
performs strongly in the third year of the political cycle (as indeed it did
last year).
However, according to Mr Oppenheimer, 1976 shows up as an exception to the
rule. In the six months prior to that election, US equities only rose 2.1
per cent, the lowest rise in any comparable period since 1968, and far lower
than the 21.3 per cent in the six months before Ronald Reagan's first
victory.
Markets also did worse in the first 12 months of Carter (down 11.4 per cent)
than at any other comparable point in the political cycle - in the first 12
months of George Bush, the S&amp;P Composite went forward 22.3 per cent,
according to Hambros.
These last figures catch the height of 'merger-mania', which was great for
stocks. This was closely associated with the Republicans, and a new
administration, with tighter controls over corporate activity, would close
off hopes of a return to the big leveraged deals.
In the long term, Chris Goudie, of Baring Investment Management, doubts
whether a Democrat administration would be so bad, but says the short-term
effect would be marked. This would make long-term bond yields more
attractive.
For international asset allocation, the tougher question concerns the
dollar. Dealers are unlikely to trust a Democrat administration, which would
put the dollar under pressure. This would be an argument for switching out
of US equities. However, Mr Goudie again tones down this risk. He suggests
that this would only be a marked effect if Democrats retained control of the
Senate, which some commentators believe they could lose in November.
The other risk concerns base rates, which many might expect to move up under
a Democratic administration. However, a political change seems unlikely to
affect this, as they are already thought to be at the bottom and set to rise
with growth in the economy, even if Bush does win.
A Bush defeat would, therefore, probably be bad news for US equities in the
short, and possibly the medium, term.
If asset allocation is hard to call, stock selection is even tougher. Here
are one or two of the experts' hunches:
Oil companies could be expected to do very badly, for several reasons.
First, the Democrats are thought to be much more likely to push through
tighter legislation against pollution.
Martin Brook, fund manager for Cannon Lincoln, points to the legislation
already enacted in California to force petrol providers to lay on special
pumps which cut down on emissions. These cost roughly Dollars 1,000 a pump.
It would be bad news for oil companies, and their share prices, if such
measures came into force across the US.
Second, the oil industry has always been regarded as a natural bedmate of
the Republican party. Loss of its privileged access to government would harm
sentiment towards it among traders.
Motor companies might also expect to be hit hard by environmentalist
legislation against 'gas guzzlers' requiring cars to have a certain minimum
number of miles per gallon.
It is doubtful, however, whether a Democrat president would do much to harm
the car industry, as it is likely he would have been elected with the help
of blue-collar votes from Michigan and the other auto-industry states.
Environmental protection companies ought, by the same token, to do better.
In the UK, Commercial Union has recently launched an international
investment trust to take advantage of investment opportunities that arise
from enacting new environmental legislation. It is skewed slightly towards
the US. Specialist niche companies, involved in purification, air filter
scrubbers or monitoring systems, which tend to trade globally, could all do
well.
Retailers might be helped, particularly those at the lower end of the
market. Michael Moule, of Touche Remnant, who manages the Bankers and Law
Debenture investment trusts, points out that companies such as K-mart and
Wal-mart might benefit from any extra spending power given to people in
lower earning brackets. Their lack of any international exposure would also
lead them to out-perform other stocks.
Health might be given a boost in confidence under the Democrats, so
companies operating in the sector could perform well.
It might not be wise to carry this argument too far, as these stocks have
already performed very well. For example, Framlington's health unit trust,
60 per cent of which was invested in US health stocks, rose 91 per cent last
year alone.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11597</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (14): Takeover
sweetens the holding - The Taveners deal sees the investment up by 24.6% in
six months
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN GOLDSTEIN-JACKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN THE autumn Quarterly Review, I selected shares in the sweet
manufacturers, Taveners, for the portfolio.
I believed that this small company had take-over potential, because it had
attractive products, produced reasonable profits, and already had a
shareholder, Finnish confectionery group Karl Fazer, with a 29.89 per cent
stake in the company.
The portfolio bought 3,500 Taveners shares, paying 70p each.
In February, Taveners announced an agreed takeover by Toms Fabrikker, a
Danish chocolate and confectionery group. The portfolio accepted the
takeover terms of 165p per share. In addition, Taveners paid a special
dividend of 6p per share. Thus, an investment costing Pounds 2,450 in
October produced cash of Pounds 5,985 in March. What is especially nice
about accepting a cash takeover bid is that shares can be disposed of
without incurring any dealing charges.
Together with accrued interest on its earlier cash holding in the Britannia
Building Society, this brings the portfolio's cash holdings to Pounds 7,514.
This means the portfolio is up a very healthy 24.6 per cent in six months.
There is a tremendous temptation, when holding so much cash and having made
a modest stock market 'killing', immediately to plunge back into the market
and hope to repeat the performance of the Taveners investment.
However, the portfolio's other main investment - shares in Gestetner, also
bought in October last year - serves as a sharp warning that what goes up
can also go dramatically down. In these uncertain times for world stock
markets, cash does have some advantages.
The portfolio will continue to hold its Gestetner shares, although it will
now set a limit at which the shares will be sold. If Gestetner shares fall
below 90p and look as if they will fall further, then the portfolio will cut
its losses and dispose of them. If Gestetner then continues its share price
slide, the portfolio might consider buying back the shares if they were to
fall within the 60p to 65p range.
Taking a five-year view, I still feel that Gestetner should be a reasonable
investment, although recent profits performance has been poor. For example,
for the year to October 31, 1991, pre-tax profits fell by 57 per cent, from
Pounds 52.1m to Pounds 22.5m. However, the year-end gearing, counting its
outstanding loan stock as debt, was sharply reduced from 96 per cent to 26
per cent. The company has also shed more than 1,000 employees, about
one-tenth of its workforce.
It is also worth remembering that Ricoh, the Japanese office-equipment and
camera-maker, bought a 24.2 per cent stake in Gestetner in September last
year, paying 250p per share.
Ricoh's own business has been suffering recently. It has fallen into losses
for the first time since it was listed in 1949.
In March, it was reported that Mr Hiroshi Hamada, Ricoh's president, had
ordered all Ricoh directors to 'have a resignation letter in your shirt
pocket' every day at work, as a reminder that the resignations could be
accepted at any time if the company's performance did not improve.
It seems likely, therefore, that, if Gestetner does not improve its profits,
too, the Japanese may urge some strong action. Or perhaps they might sell
their stake in Gestetner to another possible predator or increase their
stake to gain control.
In any event, Gestetner remains an interesting, if risky, speculation. It
has a worldwide spread of interests, and, if the pound were ever devalued
(or 'realigned within the ERM'), this could help to boost the company's
overseas sales and profits.
Ricoh is one of the official sponsors of this year's Olympic games, and will
be receiving considerable publicity as a result. One hopes that this will
translate into increased demand for its products and extra business for
Gestetner, which distributes Ricoh products in certain territories.
One company that will be receiving a lot of free publicity for its products
during the summer Olympics is Pentland Group.
Speedo swimwear has been worn by more gold-medal winners than any other
swimwear brand. It ought, therefore, to be prominent at this year's Olympics
and worldwide television coverage of attractive bodies competing in Speedo
costumes ought to increase brand recognition and sales.
Pentland bought various Speedo interests in 1990, and has since
significantly increased them with Speedo operations around the world.
In addition, Pentland owns 20 per cent of the famous sportswear company
Adidas, which also ought to benefit from Olympic publicity. But Speedo and
Adidas products are not just bought by sports people - they have an even
wider appeal as fashion products.
Pentland had net cash of Pounds 273m (equal to 75p per share) at December
31, 1991, mainly due to its disposal of its remaining interest in the Reebok
sports shoe company.
Pentland is, therefore, well poised to ride out any continuing recession and
pick up any 'forced sales' or other bargains of companies whose products it
can develop and promote.
The portfolio will, therefore, purchase 3,500 shares in Pentland at 99p per
share. My wife and I have held Pentland shares in our personal equity plans
since June 1990, when we purchased the shares for 75p each. And my personal
pension scheme took advantage of a drop in Pentland share price in August
1990, to buy shares at 62p each. I took a long-term view with these
purchases, looking for capital growth over the years.
The portfolio will continue to hold cash, ready to take advantage of any
suitable buying opportunities that may appear, due to continuing unsettled
markets.
For example, Fisons, the pharmaceuticals and scientific instruments company,
would have considerable attractions if its share price fell back to around
the 285p level, bearing in mind that its 1991 low was 293p and its 1991 peak
was 515p.
If Fisons did fall to the 285p level - and looked as if it would not fall
much further - then the portfolio would buy 800 Fison shares in the hope of
a turnaround in profits or a takeover bid.
The company has announced a stream of bad news this year, but has all the
bad news been discovered and released - or is there more to come? It is
worth playing safe and waiting to see what happens in the next few months.
Of course, the share price may not fall much further, and the portfolio may
miss being able to buy at its preferred price; but, in the current uncertain
economic climate, I feel it is better to err on the side of caution.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
HOW THE POUNDS 10,000 PORTFOLIO STANDS AFTER SIX MONTHS
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
              Number      Purchase                  March 25   March 25
Company      of shares   price (p)  Cost (pounds)    price (p)   value
                                                               (pounds)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Gestetner      1,500        183        2,745           99        1,485
Pentland       3,500         99        3,465           99        3,465
SHARES SOLD:                                     Sale price:   Proceeds:
Taveners       3,500         70        2,450          171*       5,985
Existing cash++                                                  4,994
Cash from dealings                                               2,520
New cash total                                                   7,514
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
TOTAL                                                           12,464
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
* Includes 6p cash dividend.
++ Cash includes accured interest in Britannia Building Society's
Capital Trust account.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11598</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (11): Bourses are
deflated by the Bundesbank's refusal to compromise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONIA SHARPE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE SECOND quarter is traditionally a relatively quiet period for
continental European equities, as shareholders participate in
capital-raising exercises which have been announced with the previous year's
corporate results, or wait for dividends to be paid before making fresh
share purchases.
But this year any share price rises in the April-June period are likely to
be tempered by a higher risk factor, caused by interest rate considerations
and political uncertainty.
Last month, investors began to question the timing of the first interest
rate cut in continental Europe, when an overshooting of money supply growth
and stubbornly high inflation in Germany prompted the Bundesbank to
reiterate its commitment to a stable Deutsche Mark. A growing consensus that
German interest rates would not be reduced until well into the second half
of this year deflated buoyant stock markets throughout the continent.
According to the FT-A World Indices, Europe excluding the UK closed the
first quarter with a gain of 7.1 per cent in local currency terms, compared
with a 10 per cent gain at the beginning of March.
The Bundesbank's refusal to compromise on interest rates, despite evidence
that countries throughout Europe need a looser monetary policy to boost
their flagging economic strength, has prompted speculation that a
realignment in the exchange rate mechanism (ERM) is necessary.
It is difficult to guess who would take the lead. France believes that its
interest rates are artificially high, because of Germany's dominant position
in the ERM; Belgium and the Netherlands have little fiscal flexibility; and
Italy is committed to its 'lira dura' policy. Even Portugal's recent entry
into the wide band of the ERM was not seen as an opportune moment. Current
fears that a revaluation of the D-Mark is inevitable are likely to hang over
continental bourses during the current quarter.
European stock markets are also unsettled by the emergence of vocal minority
parties in France, Italy and Germany. Italian shares slid 7.3 per cent in
March, on fears that the new 'leagues' in the prosperous north would attract
voters away from the leading parties in the general election on April 5,
which would make it harder than usual to form a lasting coalition
government.
France, by contrast, was cheered by the sacking of its first female prime
minister, Edith Cresson, at the start of April. She was replaced by the
finance minister, Pierre Beregovoy, who is liked by the stock market because
of his commitment to improving equity investment in France and his hard line
on inflation.
Lisa Hosking, global strategist at SG Warburg Securities, says France is a
'clear success story', because French companies have become much more
competitive through restructuring, and, through their transatlantic
acquisitions of the past few years, will benefit from the eventual economic
recovery in the US. Also, shares in highly-leveraged companies will react
swiftly to any cut in domestic interest rates.
Germany, whose new-year rally has been capped by the Bundesbank's stance on
inflation, is likely to tread water in the second quarter, until wage
negotiations in the engineering and public sectors are completed. However,
its longer-term outlook remains positive, with earnings expected to recover
in 1993, and the removal of supplementary taxes at the end of July should
revive domestic consumer demand.
Spain proved to be a big disappointment in the first quarter, because
persistently high inflation ruled out the hoped-for cut in interest rates.
In spite of its being one of the cheapest European markets, analysts have
also been put off by the lack of improvement in the wage structure.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11599</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (12): Varied
performance reflects investors' uncertainty about the economy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ALTHOUGH US stock markets posted mixed results in the first quarter of this
year, the big story was the billions of dollars in newly issued stock that
flooded them.
The rush of stock issues - both initial public offerings (IPOs) by companies
making their debut or returning to the markets, and sales of new shares by
already listed companies - boosted trading volume to high levels. On the New
York Stock Exchange, daily volume averaged 216.5m shares, while on the more
active Nasdaq over-the-counter market it averaged 221m shares.
A record Dollars 30bn was raised via common stock issues and IPOs, compared
with Dollars 9.5bn in the first quarter of 1991, as US companies rushed to
take advantage of relatively firm stock prices and strong demand from
individual and institutional investors for equities.
The pace of new stock issues is unlikely to be maintained, primarily because
the hesitant performance of stock prices in the latter part of the quarter
has made the case for issuing new equity less persuasive.
The best gains of the first quarter were recorded by secondary stocks, with
the Nasdaq composite index rising 6.28 per cent to 602.07 as investors
remained keen on biotechnology, computer technology and healthcare stocks in
particular. Second best was the Dow Jones Industrial Average, which advanced
2.1 per cent to 3235.47. The Standard &amp; Poor's 500 index, which is most
representative of the US economy, however, showed a net loss for the three
months of 3.2 per cent, ending the period at 403.69.
This varied performance reflects investors' uncertainty about the outlook
for the economy and corporate earnings. The Dow managed a modest gain,
because cyclicals such as Bethlehem Steel, Caterpillar, General Electric and
International Paper were popular early on as investors sought stocks that
would benefit most from economic recovery.
The quarter opened strongly, with the momentum from the December 20 interest
rate cut carrying share prices to a series of new highs in the first six
weeks. Although investors were buying stocks partly in expectation of a
turnaround in the economy, the unattractive yields offered by alternative
investments lured money into equities.
The steady climb in stocks peaked in early March. From then on, prices
oscillated as investors waited for corporate earnings and economic
performance to catch up with share prices.
Monetary policy remained on hold throughout the quarter, with the Federal
Reserve seemingly content that enough had been done to ensure a steady,
inflation-free recovery. Politics reared its ugly head in the form of the
presidential primary season, however, and signs of early weakness in the
Bush re-election campaign cast a cloud over sentiment.
The prognosis for the second quarter is more of the same. Until corporate
earnings display a marked improvement and economic data point to a
sustainable recovery, analysts expect share prices to stay stuck in a
holding pattern.
In Canada, concern about the sluggish economy, the realisation that the pace
of the recovery will lag several months behind the turnaround in the US, and
a recent increase in interest rates, kept a lid on price rises. During the
quarter the Toronto Stock Exchange composite index fell 10 points to
3,412.10. The most troubled sector was financials, with bank stocks hit by
the problems of debt-burdened property giant Olympia &amp; York.
The Mexican stock market, meanwhile, thrived once again, aided by a strong
performance from bank stocks rising sharply in the wake of privatisations.
The Bolsa index rose almost 30 per cent in local currency terms to 1,875.73.
If Bush should lose - Page 13
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11600</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (13): Weak economic
pointers and lower corporate earnings sap confidence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE MARCH end to the 1991 financial year failed to give Japanese share
prices the boost that had been expected, and the Tokyo stock market closed a
disappointing fiscal year with lingering fears that the Nikkei Stock Average
could plunge even further.
The Nikkei, which in mid-March fell below the 20,000 psychologically
important support level for the first time in five years, closed the first
quarter at a new five-year low of 19,345.95. It had fallen 18.7 per cent
since the beginning of January.
Investor confidence suffered, as a result of further evidence of a weakening
economy and sharp downward revisions of corporate earnings for the year
ended March. Sony, the consumer electronics and entertainment group,
announced that its parent company would post net losses for the first time
since the company was listed on the Tokyo Stock Exchange in 1958. Matsushita
Electric Industrial also revised downward its consolidated pre-tax profits
for the year to March to a 43 per cent fall.
Financial scandal involving leading politicians further unnerved investors.
And revelations of stock scandals, in which securities companies had
window-dressed clients' accounts by manipulating loss-making investments,
also depressed confidence.
Meanwhile, an expected interest rate cut by the Bank of Japan failed to
materialise. Political pressures on the central bank to cut the official
discount rate were seen as having set off the move, widely expected in
March. Threats by Mr Shin Kanemaru, the godfather-like figure of the ruling
Liberal Democratic party, to sack Mr Yasushi Mieno, governor of the Bank of
Japan, if the official discount rate was not cut, shocked the financial
community. Additional pressure from cabinet members also discouraged market
participants.
Financial markets reacted coolly to the emergency economic support package,
announced by the government on the last day of March. The package's
proposals to revitalise the stock market was seen as a re-hash of
long-discussed reforms.
Most investors believed that the package indicated a lack of commitment on
behalf of the government to support the stock market. Since proposed rule
changes to allow companies to hold their own shares, calls for higher
dividends, and the establishment of large-lot equity investment funds failed
to convince, the Tokyo market continues to be haunted by a lack of buyers.
Life assurers, traditionally large-lot buyers of equities, are moving from
stock investments into direct corporate lending, and investment trusts are
seeing sharp declines in new-money inflows.
The current weakness is prompting foreign investors, who have been the main
buyers of the Tokyo market during the past year, to reassess allocation of
overseas investments.
In the Pacific Basin, Hong Kong continued its rise, on the back of high
liquidity and improving political sentiment on mainland China. The Hang Seng
index rose 14.9 per cent on the quarter, to 4,938. However, dealers point
out that, as interest rates in the US seem to have hit bottom, the market,
which is led by the US through currency links, holds a possibility of a
short-term correction.
According to Adam Le Mesurier, analyst at Barclays de Zoete Wedd, the Thai
market is attractive, because of the favourable economic environment. A
tight grip on monetary policy has curbed domestic demand and inflationary
pressures, leading to an easing in interest rates. The SET index has risen
15.7 per cent, to 823, but still looks promising on a 12-month view.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11601</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (9): A time to pick
stocks with care - Recessions end eventually, and analysts remain convinced
that, in the medium term, equities will outperform fixed-interest and cash
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DOMINICK COYLE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE IS no prize for naming the most bombed-out equity market in the first
quarter of 1992.
Japan, as measured by the 225-share Nikkei Average, ended a truly dismal
three months at its lowest level for more than five years; while the wider
Topix index dropped below 1,400 for the first time since November 1986.
Fund managers overweight in the Japanese market will have a tough time in
quarterly investment reviews with their trustees, and it may take a lot more
than talk of 'buying bargains at the bottom of the market' to sound
convincing. Tokyo has been a sinking bottom.
In terms of total returns in sterling, based on the FT Actuaries World
Index, Japan showed a whopping minus 16.5 per cent in the January-March
quarter - one of only three markets (the others being election-wobbly UK,
and Denmark) to produce a negative return.
Europe, excluding the UK, showed a useful 7.5 per cent return; the Pacific
region, excluding Japan, almost double at 13.5 per cent. Sterling investors
in Mexico continued their roller-coaster ride, with a total return over the
quarter of almost 34 per cent. Malaysia had a very positive 20 per cent; the
French market more than 11 per cent; and Germany, despite problems and fears
over unification, just over 9 per cent.
As ever, stock selection was almost as important as country allocation.
Winners here included media stocks, automobiles, forestry and paper
products, and chemicals; but most markets gave a thumbs-down to banks and
other financial institutions, heavy engineering and textiles. The
capital-goods economic group overall managed almost a 3 per cent total
return, with some tentative signs of companies feeling a little more
optimistic about growth prospects, especially in the US. Italy, like
Britain, had election fever.
Fund managers overweight in Japan had been reduced to praying and hoping
that the authorities there would intervene to at least stabilise the market;
and indeed, there was a move in Tokyo on April 1, when the Bank of Japan cut
the official discount rate by 75 basis points (50 had been the market's
average forecast) and the government unveiled an emergency economic package,
in essence bringing forward some scheduled capital investment. But the
market's first response was a yawn - and a further 4 per cent slide in the
Nikkei Average, the main Japanese index which three years ago threatened to
break through the 40,000 mark.
But is it all doom and gloom ahead? Most market-watchers think not. Despite
the current economic uncertainties, analysts remain convinced that, in the
medium term, equities will continue to outperform fixed-interest and cash.
Recessions, however deep and prolonged (as in the UK) eventually end, and
markets are expected to anticipate the upturns, often by as much as a year
or more. They are even taking some consolation from Japan, arguing that if
the Nikkei was worth buying at 35,000-plus, there must be bargain-basement
deals to be done at around the 20,000 level.
The markets have been a shade over-optimistic about a decline in interest
rates in Europe, given the tough stance of the Bundesbank on German monetary
policy, but the national wage rounds there should be over by mid-year,
holding out the prospect of a cut in German rates, which should allow other
European markets to follow suit. The discipline of the ERM is likely to
herald a period of moderate inflation levels, and the OECD is beginning to
make optimistic forecasts of GNP growth in the main markets for 1993. Some
recent US economic data is modestly encouraging.
The second quarter has started with many markets in a cautious mood, and
investors playing for the short term would do well to be overweight in cash.
It might not be bad advice either for the more cautious fund managers, at
least until the present uncertain investment dust settles.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11602</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (10): London tumbles
from a Budget-day peak
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVE THOMPSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LONDON'S EQUITY market began the new year much as it had behaved for most of
1991: on a rising trend and full of optimism. Responding to this
bullishness, the FT-SE 100-share index bounded ahead to reach 2,574.8 on
March 10, Budget day, its highest point since November last year.
Thereafter, it never stopped falling, eventually closing the three-month
period some 53 points, or 2.13 per cent, lower.
The reasoning behind the UK market's enthusiasm was easily pinpointed. Apart
from the driving force of a strongly rising Wall Street, there were various
ultimately incorrect assumptions. The big institutions bought the market on
hopes of early signs of economic recovery, which would be followed by
interest rate cuts. The rate cuts would help fuel consumer demand and
business confidence, which in turn would be reflected in an upturn in the
political fortunes of the Tories. They would produce a tax-cutting,
vote-catching budget, followed by a general election victory. Reality proved
otherwise.
Chancellor Norman Lamont's Budget was so badly received that the market
promptly slumped over 52 points in a single session, its heaviest one-day
fall since last year's failed coup in Russia. The City was alarmed at a
public sector borrowing requirement of Pounds 28bn, substantially in excess
of the most pessimistic forecasts. The announcement of the general election
followed within 48
hours, and the market had to face the prospect of an election with UK
interest rates above 10 per cent and with the likelihood that they would
need to rise even more in the not too distant future.
The damage wrought by the recession continued to manifest itself in a
constant stream of disturbing statistics on the economy. Gross domestic
product fell 2.5 per cent in 1991, the biggest year-on-year fall since 1933,
and the longest post-war sequence of quarterly falls.
The quarter did produce some big surprises on the takeover front. The on-off
romance between Midland Bank and Hongkong &amp; Shanghai Banking Corporation saw
the two banks betrothed - but the marriage not so far consummated. The rest
of the bank sector was deeply troubled, as worries emerged about property
developers Olympia &amp; York
and Heron Corporation.
A number of cash-raising exercises
materialised, notably Thorn EMI's Pounds 516m rights issue to help finance
its purchase of Virgin Music from Mr Richard Branson. ECC asked its
shareholders to stump up Pounds 214m to enable the group to redeem Dollars
350m of Auction Market Preferred stock in the US.
Corporate results, for the most part, were as expected. Composite insurers
were horribly mauled by mortgage indemnity losses. Royal omitted the final
dividend. Lonrho's dividend cut, sharply lower profits and a series of asset
sales saw the group's share dropped from the Footsie list of top 100 shares.
Politics aside, other factors will increasingly come into play as the year
progresses. Strategists have been highlighting the effects on equities of
the sharp rise in PSBR for the foreseeable future. JP Morgan, the US
investment bank, says: 'The return to large-scale gilt issuance will
pre-empt cash which would otherwise have gone into equities.'
County NatWest, meanwhile, forecasts rights issues of Pounds 11bn over the
coming 12 months. Some analysts argue, however, that market valuations look
increasingly supportive of equities.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11603</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (8): Time to take a
sun cheque - The Plowshares / They're off for a cheap holiday in the
Bahamas, but first there's the usual currency problem
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BEVERLY CHANDLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
John and Alison Plowshare, in their late forties, live in a smarter part of
North London. He is a partner in an architectural practice, and earned
Pounds 60,000 last year; she is a part-time receptionist at the local GP's
surgery. Their children are: Lucy, aged 21, at university; and Toby, 18,
still at school. Through the deaths of John's parents and his subsequent
inheritance, the Plowshares have a portfolio of Pounds 50,000 in unit
trusts, Pounds 6,000 each in a personal equity plan and just over Pounds
36,000 in the building society as rainy-day money.
IT'S BEEN a hard and stressful year for the Plowshares. John's architectural
practice has been experiencing financial difficulties for some time, and
there has even been some doubt about the security of Alison's job at the
GP's surgery.
As a result of the tougher financial climate, the usual family summer
holiday to a friend's house in Tuscany was cancelled last year, and the
Plowshares are generally feeling rather worn out.
Opportunity arrives one breakfast time, with a letter from an old school
friend of John's, inviting them to take advantage of the current cheap air
fares to Miami and to use his house in the Bahamas, which will shortly be
empty for two weeks.
It doesn't take more than a day's thought for Alison and John to decide that
this is just what the doctor ordered: exotic, international and above all
fairly cheap. The opportunity seems too good to miss.
Tickets are bought and travel arrangements made. The only thing left to do
is the one thing that Alison dreads most: the Plowshares must decide how
much money to take on holiday with them, and, more contentiously, in what
form to take it.
For years, the portability of holiday money has been the subject of a
recurrent argument. John, faced with foreign travel, firmly believes that a
credit card will get him everywhere, while Alison has greater faith in
traveller's cheques. The argument has become more complicated with the
attentions of Toby who, over the last few years, has professed himself to be
fond of 'dosh - and lots of it' for foreign travel.
The dosh option is firmly dismissed by Alison, on the grounds that, the last
time any of the family had lots of it, it got blown away over the city
ramparts in Perugia. Similarly, she recalls scouring the Dordogne for a
restaurant that would accept the one type of credit card the Plowshares had
taken with them, finding such a restaurant in the local chateau, and the
subsequent sickening disbelief with which she had faced the credit card bill
after their return. Had they really spent that much money?
Alison decides that, in order to end the great foreign money debate once and
for all, she will undertake a little research campaign. She spends the best
part of a day looking at the various options, and returns home amazed at the
variety of ways one can take holiday money abroad, and appalled at the
variety of prices one can pay for the facility.
Over dinner that evening, she lays out her findings: 'We should certainly
take enough cash to last us for three to four days, for incidental expenses.
It should be in US dollars, not Bahamian dollars, because they are both
acceptable in the Bahamas, but US dollars are cheaper when obtained over
here.
'They will cost us between 0.5 and 2 per cent in commission, depending on
where we get them from - although one bureau de change explained that what
you really need to look at is the minimum charge, not the commission cost.
Can you believe that the minimum costs vary between Pounds 2 and Pounds 5,
depending on where you go to get your cash?'
John works out that Pounds 5 is 3 per cent commission on the Pounds 150 cash
they are planning to take, and resolves to choose the source of cash
carefully.
'I have also finally got to the bottom of those confusing signs next to the
foreign money desk at the bank,' says Alison triumphantly. 'The 'we sell at'
figure is the price that you pay when you buy foreign cash. The higher that
figure, the better the rate: 1.73 means that you get USDollars 1.73 per
pound sterling. The 'we buy at' figure is the one you get when you take your
cash back to the bank.'
The rest of the family digest this information, and John begins to reflect
on the comparative simplicity of just taking a credit card.
'The rest of the money we should take in dollar traveller's cheques,' says
Alison. 'With US dollar traveller's cheques, we will know exactly what
exchange rate we are getting. We will know exactly how much money we have
and how much we have spent, and the commission rate is roughly the same as
cash.
'There is also,' she points out, 'a replacement-within-24-hours service
available, if the cheques are stolen or lost. And we can cash them in
restaurants, bars and shops - not just at the bank.'
'We can also use my credit card,' says John, plaintively.
'Well, I suppose so. It'Il certainly be useful for identification purposes,'
Alison admits. 'But you do realise that credit cards charge their own
exchange rates, and that interest charges, depending on your card, run from
between 23.7 per cent and 29.8 per cent for purchases and even higher for
cash withdrawals?
'Also, it's very difficult to budget, and, as we know, the card may not be
accepted everywhere.'
John and Toby, and secretly Alison, are relieved that at least The
Plowshares Holiday Money Research Project has been completed and the debate
closed. They set off on holiday with a small amount of cash, a large
quantity of traveller's cheques and John's credit card.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
TRAVEL MONEY PRICING: TRAVELLER'S CHEQUE COMMISSIONS
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
      Buy          Sell         Buy            Sell
          Sterling                Other Currencies
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
THOMAS COOK
       2%           1%           3%             2%
Pounds 3     Pounds 3     Pounds 3       Pounds 3
     Min          Min          Min            Min
Does not charge a commission when buying Thomas Cook traveller's cheques
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
BARCLAYS BANK
      No            1%          1%              1%
    charge   Pounds 2    Pounds 2        Pounds 2
                  Min         Min             Min
Sterling and USDollars traveller's cheques are stocked only. Other
currency travellers cheques incur postage charge
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
NATIONAL WESTMINSTER BANK
      No            1%          1%              1%
    charge   Pounds 4    Pounds 4        Pounds 3
                  Min         Min             Min
Non-stocked traveller's cheques incur postage charge
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
MIDLAND BANK
       2%           1%          3%              2%
Pounds 3     Pounds 3 Pounds 2.50     Pounds 2.50
     Min          Min         Min             Min
No commission charges when buying Thomas Cook traveller's cheques (all
currencies)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
LLOYDS BANK
       2%           2%          2%              2%
Pounds 3     Pounds 3    Pounds 3        Pounds 3
     Min          Min         Min             Min
Pounds 5 administration fee for all foreign currency traveller's
cheques
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
ROYAL BANK OF SCOTLAND
                    1%        0.5%              1%
             Pounds 3 Pounds 1.50        Pounds 3
                  Min         Min             Min
Only buy back own (Amex) sterling traveller's cheques
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
TSB
Pounds 1            1%       1.25%              1%
    Flat     Pounds 2    Pounds 2        Pounds 2
    fee           Min         Min             Min
No commission charged when buying own (Visa) sterling traveller's
cheques
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Thomas Cook
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11604</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (7): Choosing a
personal pension - The Experts' Panel / Three views on how to make the most
important investment of a lifetime
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
IN EACH issue, the Quarterly Review asks a panel of experts to recommend
products in a particular financial services field.
The aim is to help readers through the complex, and often bewildering,
choices they need to make when purchasing a financial product.
This time, the subject is the always topical one of personal pensions.
James Higgins, of fee-charging advisers Chamberlain de Broe, emphasises the
need to cut through the gloss put on pension packages. The two really
important aspects of a company's service, he says, are investment expertise
and cost:
'The best sort of product pays no commission, and has a flat administration
fee. In this way, you can keep the cost of advice separate from the cost of
the plan. A product that we particularly like is Provident Life's
self-invested pension.
'This allows you to build up your own investment portfolio within a pension
fund, with all its attendant tax benefits. Basically, Provident Life provide
the administrative framework, and the investors can either appoint their own
fund managers or even manage the funds themselves.
'You can invest in equities, investment trusts, unit trusts, gilts, deposits
and commercial property: the list is extensive. You have greater freedom by
not being tied to one investment manager. Cautious investors might simply
wish to select a few investment trusts and let the managers get on with the
job.
'Provident Life charges Pounds 270 initially, with an annual administration
charge of Pounds 270. This may sound high, but take the case of someone
making a single-premium payment of Pounds 30,000 (including perhaps a
transfer from a previous occupational pension scheme). Normally, on a
packaged insurance company scheme, the initial charge would be about Pounds
1,500 - or even higher if the investor contracts to invest a given sum each
year. A Pounds 540 first-year charge equates to under 2 per cent. Clearly,
the bigger the fund, the lower the proportionate cost.
'Running investment charges can also be kept to a minimum by carefully
selecting cost-effective investments, and by further ensuring that any
further commissions generated are reinvested to your advantage.
'Many people, however, will prefer to save directly with one company,
perhaps in the with-profits medium. There are a group of companies that we
would recommend for those who feel that the self-invested route is not
suitable. The top half-dozen perhaps are Standard Life, Scottish Amicable,
Scottish Equitable, Scottish Widows, Clerical Medical and Norwich Union.
'They all have similar good, lengthy track records, investment expertise and
charges. They tend to specialise in the fields of life assurance and
investment, rather than being more widely involved in general insurance.
'These companies all pay commission to advisers. It is therefore important
that they are able to reinvest all of this into your savings plan to your
best advantage.
'Equitable Life is a company with a very high reputation, which does not pay
commission to advisers. It does, however, have similar initial charges to
other companies, because its own salesmen are paid commissions. Ongoing
charges, though, tend to be comparatively low.
'However, Equitable Life has a particularly interesting annuity. Equitable
Life's with-profits annuity allows you to continue to have with-profits
investment, through your annuity, after you have retired. This means that
you can have increases in your pension without having to pay the high costs
of escalation at outset.
'Products that should be avoided are those sold by tied agents, as there is
no choice on offer, and tied agents' commission tends to be considerably
higher even than that paid to independent advisers.'
John Edwards, a former FT journalist who now works for advisers Berry, Birch
&amp; Noble, says:
'Virtually every company claims that it has the best pension fund
performance and can produce convincing-looking statistics as proof. In any
event, past performance, as they say, does not guarantee future returns.
'There is little point in comparing projections of the future benefits,
since, under the Financial Services Act, they all have to use the same
annual growth rates and charges, laid down by Lautro. The presentation may
differ, but basically the underlying figures are all the same. This prevents
'telephone figure' projections, of the kind seen in the past. However, it
makes explaining why you have chosen a particular pension provider quite
hard on occasions.
'In spite of these difficulties, it is fair to say that there are between 10
and 15 companies which have been good pension fund performers consistently
over the years. This provides the basic framework, and after that it is very
much a matter of individual choice.
'Another very important factor in making a recommendation is the quality of
the service and administration. Some of the star investment performers, like
Norwich Union, Standard Life and Scottish Widows, are avoided by some
advisers as a result of alleged poor quality and slow service.
'For independent advisers, the level of service provided often depends on
the efficiency of the local office of the different insurance companies. A
good and helpful 'inspector', as they like to call their salesmen, can make
all the difference.
'My number one choice is Scottish Equitable. It is a company which has
traditionally specialised in selling the complete range of pension policies,
primarily through financial advisers. It has a very creditable investment
record in both with-profits and unit-linked pensions.
'You cannot, however, put all your eggs in one basket. On with-profits
pension policies, particularly for older people, my alternative choice is
Equity &amp; Law. It also has a good investment track-record in with-profits
policies, and presents the projections in an easy-to-understand manner.
'For unit-linked policies, my alternative choice is M&amp;G. It is true that
their unit trust investment record has sagged somewhat in recent years.
Nevertheless, they remain a good and well-respected investment house with a
reputation for straight dealing.'
John Bridel, of financial advisers Towry Law, says that any comprehensive
list of recommended personal pension policies is liable to be long. 'What is
good for one client will be unsuitable for another,' he explains. 'I have
chosen one single-premium and one regular-premium contract, which will be
suitable in some circumstances.
'For a regular-premium policy, I choose Friends Provident's Pension
Portfolio. Unit allocation rates are competitive; those paying Pounds 80 a
month, or Pounds 960 per annum and over, will get 102 per cent in the first
10 years and 105 per cent thereafter. For premiums of Pounds 50 a month,
allocation rates are 100 per cent in the first 10 years. In the first year,
the money invested buys initial units which are subject to an additional
annual management charge of 6 per cent. Thereafter, accumulation units are
allocated.
'A policy charge of Pounds 2.50 per month is deducted, and the initial
management charge is currently 5 per cent, with a rounding-up adjustment not
exceeding 1 per cent for the investment funds, and 5 per cent of the offer
price for the with-profits fund. The annual management charge is  3/4 per
cent per annum, except for the Stewardship Fund where it is 1 1/2 per cent.
'The current annual bonus on the with-profits fund at 11 per cent (of which
4 per cent is guaranteed) is competitive, and there is a terminal bonus
after three years. There is a wide fund choice and two free switches are
allowed per annum; thereafter a charge of Pounds 15 per switch is made.
'On early retirement, the full bid value of accumulation units and a
percentage of the initial is available, depending on the number of years
outstanding to the original selected retirement date. For example, five
years before the selected date 71.9 per cent of initial units are available,
plus all accumulation units.
'Provided one full year's contributions have been paid and any increase in
regular contributions maintained for one year, there is no penalty if one
stops regular contributions. A transfer value can be taken at any time, and
the basis of calculation is the same as that applicable for early
retirement.
'Eagle Star's personal pension account is my chosen single-premium policy.
Allocation rates vary, both with the amount of premium and the years to the
selected retirement age. They range from 97 per cent, for contributions of
Pounds 5,000 to Pounds 10,000 for a period of less than 5 years, to 109 per
cent for contributions over Pounds 25,000 and terms of 25 years and over.
'There is a management charge of 1 per cent per annum of the fund value
(other than the with-profits fund), an initial charge of 5 per cent, plus
rounding of up to 1 per cent, and a setting-up charge of Pounds 60.
'The current annual bonus rate on the unitised with-profits fund is 12 per
cent (of which 4 per cent is guaranteed) plus a terminal bonus from
commencement at the present time.
'There are 12 unit-linked funds, in addition to the with-profits fund, of
which any eight can be used at any one time. One free switch is allowed per
annum, and a charge of Pounds 12 made for additional switches.
'On earlier retirement than at the selected age, the allowance rate is
adjusted to that which would have been applicable if that term had been
selected at the outset and the same would apply to a transfer.'
When it pays to commute: Page 26
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11605</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (6): Lessons from
the real Depression - Which assets for the nineties? / You could compare the
ERM to the gold standard, though if we are forced out the inflationary
consequences could be more severe than after 1931. However, investors today
have an extra option: index-linked gilts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARRY RILEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ARE WE at a watershed for the investor? Every few decades the conventional
wisdom about how personal portfolios should be disposed may need to be
re-examined.
The longer that the British economy remains obstinately sluggish, and
inflation continues to subside, the more relevant could be the experience of
savers long ago before the second world war.
During the 1970s and the 1980s, it became the familiar pattern that
sophisticated private investors put most of their money into houses and
company shares (or more frequently, into equity-based institutional
products, such as unit trusts, pension plans or endowment policies).
This investment pattern was primarily a response to inflation, which
averaged 13 per cent a year during the 1970s and remained a serious -
although variable - threat during the 1980s. Almost throughout this period
the pound sterling floated freely - whereas during the 1950s and 1960s it
had been loosely linked to the dollar, and in 1990, of course, it became
tied to the Deutsche Mark.
The UK proved unable to maintain the value of sterling satisfactorily on its
own, and investors came to understand this the hard way. Government
fixed-interest securities (gilt-edged) turned out to be a swindle: if you
invested Pounds 100 in gilts in 1965 in a supposedly safe investment, then,
adjusting for the purchasing power of money, you would have lost nearly 90
per cent of your capital by 1980.
Short-term deposits were not much better. Bank and building society rates
were held down by cartels and restrictions. During the 1970s, building
society depositors suffered negative returns every year, allowing for
inflation. Even adding in interest, the annual real losses varied between 2
and 14 per cent. It was a much better idea to borrow than to save.
Stock market investors also lost in real terms in the 1970s, but not so
badly. Home owners did best at that time, especially if they had big, cheap
mortgages.
Further back in history, however, British investors needed to behave very
differently. In 1925, the UK went on to the gold standard, in effect a kind
of ultra-tough version of the European exchange rate mechanism. Although the
government was forced off the gold standard in 1931 and it devalued by 25
per cent against the US dollar, that was the time of the slump and inflation
remained quiescent.
In fact, the cost of living fell by 2 per cent a year on average between the
mid-1920s and the mid-1930s. Gilt-edged proved to be excellent investments
over this period, and although the running yield gradually fell from 4 1/2
to about 3 per cent, the capital value rose correspondingly. Allowing for
negative inflation, the total real return was about 10 per cent a year.
Incidentally, I am relying for many of these figures on the excellent
long-term Equity-Gilt Study from stockbrokers Barclays de Zoete Wedd,
covering the period 1918-1991.
What about shares? Going on to the gold standard had meant that UK equities
failed to share in the late 1920s boom on Wall Street, but on the other hand
there was no dramatic 1929 crash either. After the initial shock of the 1931
devaluation, which hit gilts but was worse for equities, the stock market
staged a strong revival which lasted up to 1936.
As for houses, this was a period of cheap houses and low-cost mortgages.
People were more inclined to rent than to buy, and from the investment point
of view houses were regarded as income-earning assets rather than as a
source of capital appreciation.
Do the 1920s and 1930s have any lessons for us today? You could draw
parallels between the gold standard and the ERM. So long as we stay hitched
to the Deutsche Mark, fixed-interest bonds may be attractive investments.
But if we are forced out of the ERM, the inflationary consequences could be
more severe than they were from 1931 onwards, because at that time many of
our imports came from countries within the sterling area.
Even within the ERM, negative inflation is scarcely likely. In the UK, since
the war, there has been no year when retail prices have fallen, although in
1959 they were unchanged. But it is worth looking at the six-year period
1958-63. Inflation was only 2 per cent on average during those years, the
kind of pattern we might expect within the ERM and, eventually, European
monetary union.
What happened to investments at that time? Well, gilts yielded 5 or 6 per
cent, and gave modest real returns, while the stock market boomed,
reflecting the strong economy of the 'you've never had it so good' era. But
the strength of share prices may have reflected a once-and-for-all recovery
from the distortions of wartime: from 1960 onwards, share prices stagnated
for several years.
Coming back up to date, we have recently been moving through a transition
period. Essentially, the shares-and-houses boom had petered out by about
1988. Gilt-edged have begun to perform quite well. Even more remarkable has
been the strong performance of building society savings accounts, which have
given excellent returns since interest rates rose four years ago.
The high short-term interest rates must be a transitional phenomenon,
however. Since 1988, short-term rates have been higher than the long-term
rates on gilts. In historical terms, this is an aberration. Savings accounts
may not be an easy way out for investors for a great deal longer.
Today's investors have one extra option: index-linked gilts. These are about
10 years old, and have performed rather badly so far, with their failings
exaggerated by the very high returns available on other assets. But they
could do well if there is a prolonged depression and real interest rates
come down. They also give protection against high inflation, and could
become more popular if sterling is taken out of the ERM.
Whatever happens, it does not look as though the residential property market
will provide good returns in the foreseeable future. Money will be kept
relatively tight, and the tax breaks on mortgage borrowing are not nearly as
attractive as they used to be.
If the new government looks like sticking it out within the ERM, then
fixed-interest gilts could be attractive, although not many British
investors are comfortable about buying them. There is pre-war historical
evidence to suggest that, in tough economic conditions, they can perform as
well as company shares. But if sterling is floated again, investors will be
wise to place their main reliance once again on the stock market.
The way we were
The FT 30-share index was not launched until 1935. However, the Institute of
Actuaries index had been operating for seven years, and was the recognised
yardstick of London equity prices. Here, it shows how the market fell after
the crash of 1929, rose again soon after the UK government had come off the
gold standard in 1931, and continued rise until the late 1930s brought the
fear of war.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11606</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (5): An unwieldy
hybrid that guarantees cover in the future - Whole-of-life insurance / The
policies are flexible and convertible. And once you have bought one, you are
insurable for the rest of your life, without the need for further medical
evidence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHOLE-OF-LIFE insurance policies may not sound gimmicky. But an array of
extra attractions has been added to these basic life policies, in an attempt
to save them from becoming misfits among insurance products.
This has made the policies easier to sell, but an equal array of problems
remains.
Endowments, lasting a fixed term and with minimal life cover, offer stronger
investment performance for those who need an investment. Meanwhile, term
assurance, which insures against death within a specific period, provides
cheaper protection.
Whole-of-life, which offers life cover indefinitely and pays a surrender
value if you want to discontinue the policy, is left as an unwieldy hybrid
somewhere in the middle.
It has undoubted uses in inheritance tax planning. You can take out a
whole-of-life policy in trust, so that your heirs can use the eventual
pay-out to meet their IHT liability. But this is far removed from the
mainstream market for life assurance, which most people buy when they start
a family.
The role of whole-of-life in this situation is more dubious. These contracts
are likely to be more expensive at the outset than term assurance. However,
crucially, they can offer a surrender value. With term assurance, if you
survive your term all the premiums you have paid remain in the pockets of
the insurance company.
This means that whole-of-life can, just about, prove to be a healthy
long-term investment. But it makes little sense to buy whole-of-life as an
investment in its own right.
As Mark Bolland, of Chamberlain De Broe, puts it: 'As far as I'm concerned,
if you want an investment you buy an investment. If you want life cover, you
buy a life policy.'
But there may be a case for whole-of-life instead of term as a pure
protection policy. It costs more initially, but if cash-flow is not a
problem, it may offer better value in the long term.
You can choose the level of investment content. Three levels of life cover
are normally quoted. These are: 'minimum', which puts the least into the
protection and concentrates on investment; 'standard'; and 'maximum', which
devotes the highest amount possible to life cover, rather than investment.
Thus, a given level of 'maximum' cover is actually cheaper than 'standard'
cover.
If you opt for maximum cover, you give yourself the cheapest possible
protection, but cut the chances of a decent surrender value. But 'minimum'
cover seems pointless - you pay a lot for the protection, while the
investment is still likely to be feeble compared with alternatives.
Towry Law provides the following figures, assuming policies are taken out by
a 29-year-old male non-smoker paying a constant Pounds 1,000 annual premium:
After 10 years, the greatest death pay-out from the companies surveyed comes
from Sun Life, which offers Pounds 638,000 on a maximum-cover basis. The
surrender value, if you were still alive, would be Pounds 4,420. For
standard cover, the pay-out would be Pounds 239,151, with a surrender value
of Pounds 9,410.
The figures for minimum cover show this is an option which can safely be
ignored - the pay-out on death would be Pounds 34,500, while the surrender
value would still only be Pounds 11,900. As you would have parted with a
total of Pounds 10,000 in premiums, this is scarcely the hottest investment
available. The strongest surrender value from any company surveyed by Towry
Law was Pounds 13,300 from Prolific Life - still not the kind of investment
to get Gordon Gekko reaching for his phone.
So the argument for whole-of-life rests on the strength of protection
offered. Term assurance, by definition, is temporary. If you have a heart
attack, or some other serious illness, you could find yourself uninsurable
at the end of the term. This is a serious problem.
But once you have bought whole-of-life cover, you are guaranteed to be
insurable for the rest of your life, without needing extra medical evidence.
Premiums are reviewed every 10 years, so you do not lock yourself in at a
permanently low rate.
Whole-of-life policies are also more flexible, although the worth of many of
the options which have been strapped on is open to question. And you pay for
the flexibility.
For example, you can convert the policies into critical-illness contracts,
or add on permanent health insurance, or increase cover on specific named
events, such as marriage or the birth of a child. Many companies offer
link-ups to a range of different investment funds.
Any of these options might be attractive, but it is pointless to buy them
unless you need them. Also, beware of buying unnecessary extra cover - for
example, if you already have permanent health insurance through your
company, there is no point in paying for more via your own personal life
policy.
Young parents starting families should look seriously at whole-of-life
policies. If you can afford them, they will relieve you of much anxiety.
Otherwise, term assurance is the more obvious choice.
A useful halfway house is 'convertible term' assurance, which allows you to
buy the right to start a whole-of-life policy at the end of a fixed term. In
this way, you keep your premiums to a minimum at a time when you are paying
a lot for nappies, but still have the security of whole-of-life protection.
 ------------------------------------------------------
HOW THE COSTS VARY (POUNDS PCM)
 ------------------------------------------------------
Male, aged 40, non-smoker Pounds 100,000 sum assured
5-year renewable/convertible term        18
With increase option                     22
WoLA: maximum cover                      37
WoLA: standard cover                     86
Minimum-cost WoLA                        72
With-profits WoLA                       238
 ------------------------------------------------------
Source: Chamberlain de Broe
 ------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11607</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (4): Top taxpayers
will save Pounds 160
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A NEW 20 per cent band on the first Pounds 2,000 of taxable income was the
prime 'goodie' in chancellor Norman Lamont's pre-election Budget.
The new band will save the vast majority of taxpayers Pounds 100 a year.
Coupled with the rise in the personal allowance to Pounds 3,445 (from Pounds
3,295), the Budget will save most basic rate taxpayers Pounds 137.50 and
higher rate taxpayers Pounds 160.
The 20 per cent band will add an extra layer of complexity for some savers.
Tax will still be deducted from savings accounts at 25 per cent, and those
who depend on savings income will have to claim back the Pounds 100 rebate
from the Inland Revenue. The good news for borrowers is that Miras relief
will still be granted at 25 per cent.
Otherwise the main Budget changes which will affect the personal finance
market were:
The move to allow unit and investment trusts to qualify for the full Pounds
6,000 personal equity plan limit (see articles elsewhere in this Review);
The plan to end the Business Expansion Scheme at the end of 1993; and
The changes in inheritance tax, to help owners of small businesses and
farms.
The two latter changes, however, were not contained within the Finance Act,
and so will have to be re-enacted by the new Conservative government.
A quirk of the rules also means that the inheritance tax threshold was
raised to Pounds 147,000, with a further rise to Pounds 150,000 now due.
Most allowances rose in line with inflation, including the capital gains tax
threshold which increased from Pounds 5,500 to 5,800. The exceptions were
the married couples' allowance (stuck at Pounds 1,720) and the higher rate
tax threshold (unchanged at Pounds 23,700 of taxable income).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11608</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (3): The Budget, a
refresher
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A new lower rate of income tax of 20p in the pound on the first Pounds 2,000
of taxable income.
Basic rate and higher rate taxes unchanged at 25 and 40 per cent
respectively. The threshold for higher rate tax is unchanged at Pounds
23,700 of taxable income.
The married couple's allowance will be frozen at Pounds 1,720 this year.
Single person's allowance increased, with inflation, from Pounds 3,295 to
Pounds 3,445.
Personal allowance for those aged between 65 and 74 will rise from Pounds
4,020 to Pounds 4,200
Married couple's allowance for those aged between 65 and 74 will rise from
Pounds 2,355 to Pounds 2,465
Personal allowance for those aged 75 and over will rise from Pounds 4,180 to
Pounds 4,370.
Married couple's allowance for those aged 75 and over will rise from Pounds
2,395 to Pounds 2,505
Income limit for age-related allowances will rise from Pounds 13,500 to
Pounds 14,200
Ceiling on mortgage tax relief unchanged at Pounds 30,000, but will be
applied at 25 per cent throughout, despite the new 20p rate.
Cigarettes up 13p on packet of 20, 1p on pint of beer, 5p on bottle of wine,
28p on bottle of spirits
Duty on unleaded petrol up 4.5 per cent, and on leaded petrol 7.5 per cent
Rate of car tax halved from 10 per cent to 5 per cent.
Vehicle excise duty raised by Pounds 10 to Pounds 110
Betting duty cut from 8 per cent to 7.75 per cent
Single pensioners on income support will get an extra Pounds 2 per week and
married couples an extra Pounds 3 a week from October.
Pensions cap will rise from Pounds 71,400 to Pounds 75,000
The capital gains tax threshold will rise, in line with inflation, from
Pounds 5,500 to Pounds 5,800.
The inheritance tax threshold will rise, by inflation, from Pounds 140,000
to Pounds 147,000.
The annual limit on unit and investment trust personal equity plans (Peps)
will be raised from Pounds 3,000 to Pounds 6,000.
Measures which the government can now enact
The threshold for inheritance tax will rise by more than inflation to Pounds
150,000.
The married couple's allowance will be payable to either partner, or they
can have half each, from April 1993.
Owner-occupied farmlands, farm tenancies, interests in un-incorporated
businesses, and holdings of over 25 per cent in unquoted and USM companies
will be exempt from inheritance tax. Relief from inheritance tax at 50 per
cent will apply to controlling holdings in fully quoted companies, holdings
of under 35 per cent in unquoted and USM companies, interests of landlords
in let farmlands and certain other business assets.
The rules on mortgage rescue schemes using the business expansion scheme
will be eased, and the BES for trading companies will be scrapped from the
end of 1993.
Minimum charitable gift eligible for gift aid relief will be lowered to
Pounds 400, not Pounds 600
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11609</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (2): Keep a European
perspective - The Tories' fourth term / Don't be seduced by the markets'
post-election resurgence: the bad news was in the price. And interest rates
still depend on Germany
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
REMEMBER NORMAN Lamont's second budget? In what seemed at the time to be a
brilliant campaigning coup de theatre, Labour's shadow budget robbed it of
virtually any publicity. Now that the red mists of political uncertainty
have cleared, it bulks much larger on the tax landscape.
What will be the impact of the Conservatives' election victory? The direct
effects on after-tax income were well rehearsed. Virtually everybody will
now receive an extra Pounds 100 a year, thanks to the introduction of the 20
per cent tax band on the first Pounds 2,000 of taxable income.
Meanwhile, they avoid the prospect of an effective top marginal rate of 59
per cent, which would have hit hard at the disposable incomes of the
wealthy.
The record receipts for both Business Expansion Schemes - initial estimates
suggested takings were up 59 per cent for the 1991-92 tax year at Pounds
407m, despite the recession - and personal equity plans, proved that many
savers were worried by this prospect.
However, what are the longer-term implications for savers and investors of
the Tories' fourth term? It is as well not to be too seduced by the markets'
resurgence in the immediate aftermath of the victory.
A lot of bad news was in the price, and the market was artificially
depressed. It is also as well to remember that the FT-SE index rose only 8.3
per cent during the Tories' third term, which began at the height of the
bull market. The average UK growth unit trust rose only 8.6 per cent in the
five years to the start of this month.
The runaway bull market which led to the crash in October 1987 is unlikely
to be repeated. But the outlook must look better for savers on a number of
factors:
Equities will almost certainly perform better than they would have done
under Labour - consensus estimates see the FT-SE at around 2900 by the end
of this year, compared with 2600 if the government had been ejected.
House prices may begin to recover as confidence returns. Lenders reported
that market activity was beginning to pick up, but was snuffed out by the
beginning of the campaign. Now, confidence, plus the chancellor's stamp duty
'holiday', should stimulate more demand.
Interest rates should have a chance to come down - certainly, sterling has
been spared the test it would have undergone had Labour won. That should be
good news for borrowers, even if it is not particularly exciting for savers.
However, it is as well to keep the election result in the European
perspective it virtually never had during the campaign. While the UK remains
in the exchange rate mechanism, further cuts in base rates will, to a great
extent, depend on cuts in German base rates.
And do not forget the high public sector borrowing requirement, which John
Smith condemned in apocalyptic terms. That should dampen any great ambitions
for the UK economy over the next two years. But the National Savings
products that are produced to help finance it are worth looking out for.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11610</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance (1): Happiness is
modest expectations - Keynote / Equity yields have been deceptive. Many
companies are digging into their reserves to maintain dividends
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARRY RILEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HISTORIANS WILL one day come up with searching analyses of Britain's
economic problems during the past couple of years. For the moment, we only
know that the perennial recovery hopes of the Treasury and most City of
London economists have been repeatedly dashed.
In spite of the Tories' election vicitory and some euphoria in the London
stock market, the recession continues.
A jittery market had managed to hold up really quite well until Budget Day
on March 10. But when the then Chancellor Norman Lamont revealed the
barrenness of the nation's cupboard, with a Pounds 28bn borrowing
requirement, effectively dashing the over-stimulated hopes of significant
tax giveaways, the financial markets began to crumple.
But first the good part. January had been quite buoyant, as it usually is,
and over the quarter as a whole the FT-Actuaries All-Share Index, the
broadest measure of the UK equity market, only lost about 1 per cent. This
was not as progressive as the performance of US stocks on Wall Street, where
the Dow Jones Average was still slowly advancing into new all-time high
ground until the beginning of March. But it was a great deal better than
what was going on in Tokyo, where the great 1980s share-price bubble was
relentlessly being deflated - stocks fell about a sixth during the first
three months.
It has been a time for much theorising about recessions and recoveries.
Official figures for the final quarter of 1991 confirmed that the British
economy was still heading downhill, confounding all those official
government forecasts of an imminent turn for the better. As further
statistics on industrial production, unemployment and car sales emerged
during the winter, it appeared likely that the economic contraction was
continuing into its sixth successive quarter.
Extraordinarily, however, the normal antidote to a recession - a fall in
interest rates - again failed to materialise. Short-term interest rates in
the UK stopped falling last September, and remained stuck at 10 1/2 per cent
during the January-March period, although rates in the US and in Japan were
slashed to under 5 per cent.
The UK's monetary freedom has, of course, been circumscribed by the decision
to join the European exchange rate mechanism in October 1990. Interest rates
are now set largely to suit Germany, which still has an overheating problem.
Britain has indeed bought exchange-rate stability and lower inflation, but
at a price which is only now emerging.
To an extent, the strains showed up in some terrible bank profit figures for
1991, when the bad-debt provisions of the Big Four high street clearing
banks aggregated Pounds 5.6bn. That reflected the big corporate failures of
1991 and the myriad small business and personal loan problems that have
built up during the recession. Recovery, it was hoped, was around the
corner. But further problems have emerged, especially in the beleaguered
property sector where major national and international developers such as
Speyhawk, Heron and Olympia &amp; York confessed to financial problems in March.
Against this unpromising background, the stock market seemed astonishingly
ready to believe that the Conservatives could pull off a narrow victory in
the general election.
But although stock market sentiment can cause big temporary swings around
the time of a general election, history shows that longer-run trends persist
either side of the result. In this case, we have a stock market which hit an
all-time high last September, more or less coinciding with the last fall in
sterling short-term interest rates, but has been struggling to hold its
ground since.
The big question-mark now is over dividend growth, which has been the great
engine of the UK equity market since profits growth petered out some two
years ago. Many companies have been willing to dig into their reserves in
order to keep paying out. In the first quarter, it was remarkable that there
were so many big banks and insurance companies willing to maintain or even
increase their dividends despite huge bad debts and underwriting losses.
Industrial companies were wilting, however, and even some traditionally big
payers, such as Lonrho, were forced to slash their dividends.
An average yield of over 5 per cent during the quarter had given tremendous
support to share prices in London. Historically, if you have bought the
equity market at this yield, you have never been out of the money for very
long. But then, we have not suffered such a prolonged recession - which at
some stage we may have to start calling a depression - since the 1930s.
So should we be wary of dividend growth prospects? The constituent companies
of the All-Share Index raised their payments on a weighted average basis by
just 4 per cent in the year to the end of March, and there was no growth at
all in the January-March quarter.
Some of the most buoyant dividends have come out of the newly privatised
sectors - such as water, where dividend growth has been 13 per cent over the
past year - and fortunately these utilities are now freed from political
risks. Companies as a whole, however, may want to rethink their dividend
strategies, because times are tough and dividend cover has been eroded.
In a depression, it can be better to buy bonds, once stability is reached.
But UK government bonds - gilt-edged - fared no better than equities during
the first quarter, with prices slumping in March and losing all their
earlier gains. Still, gilts too were boosted by the election result.
In the current quarter, it will begin to become clearer at what kind of
interest rate level the government will be able to sell the many billions of
pounds of gilts needed to finance the yawning budget deficit. But this could
be a troubled and erratic period for equities as well as government bonds.
We also face continued uncertainty over sterling's position within the
European Community's exchange rate. Can the Germans be persuaded to bring
their interest rates down and reduce the pressure on other member states? Or
might the UK be forced to find its own solution, possibly sharing a common
interest with France? With the election out of the way, and the need for
political unity within the parties reduced, there is likely to be a more
noisy political debate on this subject - and the longer that interest rates
stay high, the noisier it will be.
A simple devaluation of sterling can now be ruled out, with the
Conservatives back in power. Yet that only confirms the problem of the
recession. In the next few months, the happiest investors will be those with
modest expectations.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11611</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equity Futures and Options Trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOEL KIBAZO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DISAPPOINTING money supply figures from Germany led to a fall in stock index
futures after an advance early in the session, writes Joel Kibazo.
Trading in the June contract on the FT-SE opened at 2,655 and sporadic
buying was seen in the early stages of the session before a squeeze
developed as independent traders bid for stock, causing June to climb to
2,677, the high of the session by midday. News of the German money supply
figures sent June into retreat. The poor performance in the gilts and bonds
market coupled with a lacklustre Wall Street only served to bring out more
sellers, although a modest rally was seen in after-hours' trading.
June closed at 2,647 down 2 on the previous session and about 18 points
above its estimated fair value premium to cash of about 22. Turnover reached
7,354 contracts.
In traded options, volume totalled 39,979 lots, with the FT-SE 100 option
recording a day's total of 13,602 contracts.
Courtaulds was the busiest stock option. It traded 2,275 lots, with the
October 650 calls particularly busy. BT was the second busiest stock option,
trading 2,059 contracts, followed by Marks and Spencer with 1,970 lots
dealt.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 38
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11612</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / London Stock Exchange: US selling hits drug stocks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER JOHN, JOEL KIBAZO and COLIN MILLHAM
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PHARMACEUTICAL stocks dropped sharply in afternoon trading. The falls in
Glaxo, Wellcome, SmithKline Beecham and Reckitt &amp; Colman were responsible
for almost 8 points on the FT-SE 100 Index.
The initial pressure came from the US. Shortly after New York opened
yesterday afternoon, trading in US pharmaceuticals group Merck was suspended
in reaction to a large sell order which could not be matched with a buyer.
Merck had produced disappointing results last week. It was down Dollars 1
7/8 by the time dealing was halted and was expected to reopen a further
Dollars 4 lower. In London, dealers reacted by marking down any UK
pharmaceutical companies with shares held in the US.
Glaxo, 27 per cent owned by US investors, fell 35 before closing 19 1/2 off
at 728p. Wellcome, weak all day, partly because of a large overhang of stock
and also following a presentation, by Bristol Myers Squibb, of the US, about
a possible rival to Wellcome's anti-Aids drug Retrovir, weakened further to
close 47 down at 1027p.
SmithKline lost 17 to 799p in spite of first-quarter results in line with
forecasts. Reckitt has virtually no exposure to US markets but still
retreated 18 to 650p.
After London closed, trading in Merck restarted and the shares were quoted
around Dollars 4 3/4 off in New York.
Dowty races ahead
Turnover in Dowty Group leapt to 17m shares, around 7 per cent of its issued
equity, and the stock jumped 32 to 177p, making it the best performing stock
of the day in percentage terms, after TI Group's Pounds 482m bid for the
company.
Some investors took the view that the bid was a 'one way bet' in which they
gain in the event of a counter-bid from Smiths Industries, said to have had
long standing ambitions on Dowty, or as a cheap way of getting into TI
should the offer succeed.
While many City analysts see the offer as a 'knock-out price', a few
observers refused to rule out a counter bid by Smiths. Talk of an
alternative offer from Smiths, along with two large lines of stock
overhanging the shares, left Smiths 6 lighter at 308p after an initial rise.
TI tumbled 47 to 669p, the biggest percentage fall of the day, with analysts
remaining concerned about the dilutive effect of the bid on the company over
the next two years. A steeper fall may have been prevented by the view that
success could herald TI's entry into the FT-SE 100 Index.
Power generation and regional electricity companies were hit by a statement
from the National Grid that capacity could exceed demand by 57 per cent by
1997-98.
However, analysts said the figure appeared massively overstated and was
based on the assumption that new power stations would be built when there
was no chance of making a return on them, and no out-dated plants would be
shut down.
The Electricity Package fell Pounds 62 to Pounds 3128. the Scottish
generators bucked the trend, gaining ground ahead of the deadline for making
a second payment on the partly-paid stocks.
County NatWest said Scottish Power, up a penny at 98p on turnover of 17m
shares, was the cheapest stock in the utilities sector and was likely to
outperform the market by 15 per cent. Scottish Hydro-Electric rose 1 1/2 to
103 1/2 p on turnover of 8.6m.
Kleinwort Benson successfully placed 8.93m new shares in property
development and construction company Wilson (Connolly) at 192p. The placing
with various institutions raised Pounds 17m and Wilson gained a penny to
200p.
Lloyds Bank was 10 1/2 better at 406p ahead of a reported meeting to discuss
a possible bid for Midland. UBS Phillips &amp; Drew published a positive note
yesterday examining the financial implications of a takeover offer above the
one from HongKong and Shanghai Banking.
Hard-hit insurers bounced cheered by news that London &amp; Manchester had seen
combined new business growth of 33 per cent. The group's shares improved 10
to 265p. Guardian Royal Exchange, an old bid chestnut, rose 8 to 143p.
A squeeze in ECC sent the shares climbing 21 to 571p as some 1m changed
hands ahead of a listing of the stock in New York next week.
Oil group Lasmo declined 5 to 207p as securities house County NatWest put
out a cautious note on the exploration sector. The house prefers Enterprise
(off 4 at 392p) to Lasmo.
British Aerospace was volatile. The stock climbed 16 on the announcement of
a new chairman but ran into sellers to close 5 ahead at 348p on turnover of
3m.
Tate &amp; Lyle retreated 11 to 415p on news that Pepsico is to renew its
previous 10-year agreement for the use of Monsanto's Nutrasweet sweeteners
rather than change to Tate's Sucralose.
Share volume in Queens Moat Houses rose to 7.6m and the stock firmed 2 to
84p after BZW, its joint broker, issued a 20-page note recommending the
stock.
ICI was up comfortably in the morning ahead of the anticipated announcement
that it was selling its fibres division to Du Pont, of the US, and buying
their acrylics arm. However, the shares receded to end a net 2 off at 1364p.
One dealer said the whole market was concentrating on the possibility that
Hanson might sell its 20m-share stake in ICI. Hanson eased a halfpenny to
234p. BZW was said to be the latest house to cut profit forecasts.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1992
NEW HIGHS (223).
AMERICANS (4) Amer. T &amp; T, Chase Manhattan, Citicorp, Contl. Bank, BANKS (1)
TSB, BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (2) Invergordon, Mansfield, BUILDING MATERIALS (9)
Breedon, Heywood Wllms., Marley, Pilkington, Redland, Rugby, Spring Ram,
Travis Prkns., Wolseley, BUSINESS SERVICES (3) Gardner (DC), Hays, Hogg
Robinson, CHEMICALS (6) Br. Vita, Courtaulds, ICI, Leigh Ints., Porvair,
Yorks. Chems., CONGLOMERATES (2) Trafalgar Hse., Do. A, CONTRACTING &amp;
CONSTRUCTION (11) Berkeley, Edmond, Hewden-Stuart, Laing (J), Do. A,
Lawrence (W), Persimmon, Raine Inds., Tay Homes, Tilbury Dgls., Wilson
Bowden, ELECTRICALS (5) BICC, Do Cap Fin. 10 3/4 pc Bds., Delta, Johnson
Elect., Volex, ELECTRONICS (9) Admiral, Cray, Druck, Electrocomps.,
Eurotherm, Forward Tech., ISA, Misys, Sanderson, ENG. AEROSPACE (3) Dowty,
Hunting, Ipeco, ENG. GENERAL (13) Adwest, Brammer, Dobson Park, GEI, Hall
Eng., Ransomes 8 1/4 p Pf., Senior, Siebe, Spirax-Sarco, Skyes-Pckvt.,
Wagon, Weir, Whessoe, FOOD MANUFACTURING (3) Clarke, Finlay, Hillsdown, FOOD
RETAILING (6) Argyll, Iceland, Morrison, Do. 5 1/4 pc Pf., Sainsbury, Tesco,
HEALTH &amp; HOUSEHOLD (6) Greenacre, Huntleigh Tec., Jeyes, Kitty Little,
Ransom, Scholl, HOTELS &amp; LEISURE (4) Airtours, Barr &amp; WAT A, Ladbroke,
Wembley, INSURANCE COMPOSITE (3) AEGON, Hibernian, USF &amp; Gen, INV. TRUSTS
(65) Aberforth Spl. Level Cap., Do. Uts., Abtrust Pref. Zero Div Pf.,
Alliance, Bankers, Berry Starquest, Beta Global Em. Mkts. Wrrnts., Br.
Empire Sec., Brunner, Castle Cairn, China &amp; East., City of Oxford Zero Div.
Pf., Drayton Asia, Drayton Recovery Pfd. Growth, Dunedin Inc. Growth, EFM
Inc. Zero Div. Pf., Electra, Elect. &amp; Gen., Eng. &amp; Caled., Eng. Natl. Dfd.,
Do. Pfd., Exmoor Dual Zero Cpn. Pf., Flmg. Fledge., Flmg. High Inc., Flmg.
Intl. High Zero Div. Pf., Flmg. Merc., Gartmore Scot. Uts., Do. Zero Div.
pf., Gen. Cons., Govett Strategic, Greenfriar, I &amp; S Opt. Inc., Jove,
Kleinwort High Inc. Zero Div. Pf., Law Debenture, Lloyds Smllr. Co's. Cap.,
Lon. Atlantic, Lowland, M &amp; G Inc. Zero Div. Pf., Majedie, Merlin Intl.
Green, Morgan Grenfell Eq. Inc., Murray Smllr. Mkts., Murray Spl. Cap. Zero
Div. Pf., New Throg. Cap., Pacific Assets, Personal Assets, River Plate, Do.
Zero Div. Pf., Scot Asian Ptg., Scot. Nat. Zero Div. Pf., Scot. &amp; Merc. A,
Scot. Natl. Stpd. Pf., Select Assets Ln., Do. Sers. II, Smaller Co's, Sphere
Zero Div. Pf., TR City of Lon. Dfd., TR Pacific, TR Tech. Stpd., Pf.,
Templeton Emrg. Mkts. 1pc Ln. 2001, Do. Warrants, Throgmorton Warrants,
Witan, MEDIA (11) Border TV, EMAP, Euromoney, Grampian TV A, Headline Book,
LWT 3 15/16 p Pfd., Pearson, Portsmth &amp; Sund'ld., Scot. TV, Utd. News.,
Watmoughs, MERCHANT BANKS (2) Schroders, Do. N/V, METAL &amp; METAL FORMING (3)
Cook (W), Glynwed, Tinsley, MISC. (6) Calderburn, Cornwell Parker A, Faber
Prest, Frost, Gt. Southern, Silentnight, MOTORS (11) Appleyard, BBA,
Caffyns, Culver, ERF, Euro. Motor, Laird, Lucas, Do. Warrants, Pendragon,
Volvo B, OTHER FINANCIAL (7) Benchmark, Edin. Fund Man., INVESCO MIM, M &amp; G,
Perpetual, Rathbone Bros., S &amp; U Stores, OTHER INDUSTRIAL MATERIALS (7)
Cookson, ECC, McKechnie, Morgan Crucible, Do. 7 1/2 pc Pf., Norcros, Scapa,
PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING (4) Blagden, Bowater, Portals, Smith (DS),
PROPERTY (4) Helical Bar, Do. 5 1/4 pc Pf. 2012, Peel, YRM, STORES (3) Etam,
T &amp; S, Tie Rack, TELEPHONE NETWORKS (1) HK Telecom, TEXTILES (5) Alex.
Workwear, Baird, Coates Viyella, Shiloh, Tomkinsons, TRANSPORT (3) Assoc.
Br. Ports, P &amp; O Dfd., Transport Dev., MINES (1) Wstn &amp; Pacific Res.
NEW LOWS (39).
OTHER FIXED INTEREST (1) Ireland 13pc 1997/2002, CANADIANS (2) Brascan, Can.
Imp. Bk., BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (1) Anheuser-Busch, BUSINESS SERVICES (1)
Holmes Protection, CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (2) Birse, Havelock Europa,
ELECTRICALS (2) Bennett &amp; Fountain, Hilclare, ELECTRONICS (2) Densitron,
Lexicon, FOOD MANUFACTURING (1) Borthwicks, HEALTH &amp; HOUSEHOLD (4) Glaxo,
Lilly (Eli), SmKl. Beecham A, Do. Eq. Uts., HOTELS &amp; LEISURE (2) Kunick,
Zetters, INSURANCE COMPOSITE (1) Skandia Insce., INV. TRUSTS (5) Flmg. Euro.
Fledgling Warrants, Indonesia Eq. Fd., Jupiter Euro., Martin Currie Euro.
Warrants, Murray Spl. Cap. Uts., MISC. (1) Eurocopy, OIL &amp; GAS (2) Blackland
Oil, Trident Pet., OTHER INDUSTRIAL MATERIALS (1) Marling Inds., PROPERTY
(1) Power Corp., TELEPHONE NETWORKS (1) Telefonica, TEXTILES (3) Atkins,
Campari, Stirling, TRANSPORT (1) Norex, MINES (5) Doral Res., Monarch Res,
Southvaal, St. Helena, Wstn. Areas.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 38
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11613</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): German data frighten senior
bourses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GERMANY'S M3 data frightened senior bourses but tyre stocks bucked the
trend, writes Our Markets Staff.
FRANKFURT fell just before the close on the release of worse-than-expected
money supply growth figures for March. They caused the DAX index to shed a
2.42-point gain and close down 0.86 at 1,752.44. The FAZ index, calculated
at midsession, added 0.69 to 714.57. Turnover rose to DM6.1bn from DM5.5bn.
Auto stocks continued to improve, following Volkswagen's strong performance
on Wednesday, and prospects of good results at the car companies' press
conferences next month. Daimler, which recently reported strong sales of its
new S model in the first two months of this year, closed up DM2.50 at
DM790.50, but off the day's high of DM795.50. Volkswagen rose DM1.70 to
DM383.50.
Continental hit a 1992 high of DM279.50 before closing up DM8.80 or 3.2 per
cent at DM277.50. The stock is benefitting from the rise in Michelin shares
in Paris and from reports that Pirelli of Italy has resumed cooperation
talks with Continental.
Linotype-Hell fell to DM372 after omitting its dividend on 1991 results. But
news that first quarter orders had risen by 15 per cent helped it recover to
close just DM2 down at DM383.
PARIS was pulled from the day's high by a drop in the bond market, after the
German figures dashed hopes of an interest rate cut. The CAC-40 index rose
to 1,995.21 before ending down 5.54 at 1,978.14. Volume was a heavy
FFr3.4bn, bloated by activity linked to the close of the April account
yesterday.
Michelin remained strong after its results last week, adding FFr11.10 or 5.7
per cent to FFr204.80 in heavy volume of 1.8m shares. There were reports
that analysts were upgrading their forecasts following a meeting with the
company on Wednesday. However, some dealers said the stock was looking
expensive now that it had risen above FFr200.
MILAN continued to focus on Fiat and Pirelli. The Comit index rose 3.00 to
510.14 in turnover estimated at L60-80bn after L58.3bn.
Fiat closed L145 higher at L4,945, as dealers were encouraged by Wednesday's
comments on its car operations. Pirelli added L44 to L1,340 on continued
foreign buying. The stock is widely seen as a turnround situation, with
break even expected this year and a return to profit in 1993.
Sasib, part of the De Benedetti group, was unchanged at L5,975. After the
close, the diversified mechanical engineering company announced a 4 per cent
rise in net profit to L73.2bn, slightly ahead of expectations, though some
London analysts were disappointed that the dividend had not been raised.
STOCKHOLM rebounded from a weak opening to close broadly higher, thanks to
demand for Asea and Volvo ahead of their annual meetings. The Affarsvarlden
general index rose 4.2 to 984.2 in turnover of SKr837m after SKr491m.
Astra fell further after the company said it would go ahead with a plan to
drop restrictions on foreign share ownership. Its B free shares lost SKr13
to SKr514 while its A frees fell SKr22 to SKr530, reducing the 'free'
premium to just 3 per cent. Its A shares eased SKr5 to SKr514. Some analysts
recommended picking up the shares, now that the foreign ownership
uncertainty was out of the way.
AMSTERDAM resisted the fall in neighbouring Germany and the CBS Tendency
index rose 0.9 to 127.8 in turnover of Fl 692m.
The chemicals sector was strong with DSM and Akzo both rising Fl 1.80 to Fl
111.10 and Fl 152.30 respectively.
Polygram closed up 50 cents at Fl 48.80, just off an intraday year's high of
Fl 48.90, on UK buying. Nedlloyd was Fl 2.10 stronger at Fl 56.70 following
Wednesday's results.
BRUSSELS rose at the start of the new forward account. The Bel-20 index
gained 6.24 to 1,205.43.
Solvay, which said that it was buying Tenneco's US minerals operation, rose
BFr225 or 1.8 per cent to BFr12,650.
ZURICH was lifted by foreign interest in cyclical stocks. The SMI index rose
5.4 to 1,880.1. Brown Boveri bearers rose SFr120 to SFr4,200 while Georg
Fischer bearers advanced SFr20 to SFr1,140.
MADRID's general index shed 1.82 to 249.59. Telefonica lost nearly 4 per
cent to close down Pta40 at Pta1,015 in high volume.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
               FT-SE EUROTRACK 100 - APR 23
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Open     10 am    11 am    12 pm    1 pm     2 pm     3 pm     close
1173.80  1173.22  1172.86  1173.60  1171.48  1169.28  1169.25  1169.11
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
         Day's High  1174.19    Day's Low  1168.78
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
    Apr 22     Apr 21     Apr 16    Apr 15    Apr 14
    1171.34    1166.73    1169.83   1167.06   1157.52
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value 1000 (26/10/90).
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 35
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11614</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
INDUSTRIALS rose in Johannesburg with the sector index adding 27 to 4,219.
The overall index gained 18 to 3,377 while gold was unchanged at 1,023.
Barlows was up 90 cents at R56 while Richemont firmed 30 cents to R32.85.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 35
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11615</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Pension funds help
Nikkei rise above 17,000
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NEIL WEINBERG
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BUYING by pension funds and investment trusts combined with futures-linked
activity to push the Nikkei average sharply higher yesterday, writes Neil
Weinberg in Tokyo.
The 225-share index surged 562.93, or 3.3 per cent, to 17,402.05 for its
first close above 17,000 in three days. It reached a high for the day of
17,431.05 and a low of 16,832.50. Volume increased to 300m shares from 230m.
The Topix index of all first section stocks rose 32.00, or 2.5 per cent, to
1,315.03 as advances led declines by 814 to 184, with 129 issues unchanged.
In London the ISE/Nikkei 50 index gained 1.47 to 1,070.45.
Mr Masumi Okuema of UBS Phillips &amp; Drew International said the stock
market's supply-demand balance is expected to improve towards the end of the
month with the likely establishment of new funds allowing companies to
support their own shares by pooling funds as a step towards legalising stock
repurchases. He added, however, that the strength could prove largely
psychological and the market still lacks the buying interest needed for a
sustained recovery.
A boost from domestic pension funds and investment trusts sparked a rally
early in the day, while continued activity in index futures continued to
dominate for most of the day, as it has in recent sessions. Large local
brokerages were also seen strongly supporting speculative issues, a practice
rare in recent months.
The day's volume leaders were Teac, which forged ahead Y60 to Y1,090, and
Morinaga Milk, up Y13 to Y764. Top securities firms also fared well, with
Nomura advancing Y40 to Y1,310 and Nikko Y43 to Y635. However, Daiwa
retreated Y6 to Y773 on foreign selling.
Bank shares extended their rally, with Mitsubishi Bank rising Y150 to Y1,850
and Industrial Bank of Japan Y130 to Y1,880.
Drug issues and leading electricals continued to rise, Daiichi
Pharmaceutical adding Y50 at Y1,420 and Pioneer Electronic Y120 at Y3,880.
In Osaka, the OSE average moved ahead 486.42 to 19,621.45 in volume of 18.8m
shares.
Roundup
ANOTHER record high was achieved by Hong Kong, while the rest of the Pacific
Rim remained mixed. In Bombay, brokers resumed their boycott in protest
against a circular from the Securities and Exchange Board of India requiring
brokers to obtain clearance from the board before they could re-register.
HONG KONG rose further in strong volume. The Hang Seng index closed 98.75
higher at 5,287.78 in turnover of HKDollars 4.43bn, after HKDollars 2.85bn.
The most active stocks were HSBC Holdings, up 50 cents to HKDollars 41.00,
Cheung Kong, which gained 50 cents to HKDollars 22.00, and Hutchison
Whampoa, 20 cents stronger at HKDollars 16.20.
AUSTRALIA closed at a six- week high. The All Ordinaries index gained 9 to
1,608 in turnover of ADollars 247.5m.
BHP climbed 16 cents to ADollars 13.88 in volume of 2.1m shares, while
Brambles advanced 46 cents to ADollars 16.50 and Lend Lease rose 50 cents to
ADollars 16.10. Among the declines was CRA, which lost 26 cents to ADollars
14.04 after reporting a fall in March iron ore production.
SEOUL slipped in active trade. The composite index shed 1.35 to 582.87 in
turnover of Won381.8bn. Buying centred on low-priced shares, while stocks of
large manufacturers and financial groups were sold.
TAIWAN fell further as a demonstration in Taipei calling for direct
presidential elections depressed sentiment. The weighted index declined
34.76 to 4,470.31 in turnover of TDollars 12.7bn, against TDollars 14.3bn.
MANILA gained ground in active trading. The composite index put on 13.91 to
1,178.30 in combined turnover of 552.6m pesos, after 218.2m pesos.
There was foreign interest in Philippine National Bank, which released good
first-quarter earnings. It rose 2.50 pesos to 275 pesos.
KUALA LUMPUR advanced afresh, the composite index ending 8.95 stronger at
582.90 in MDollars 102m turnover (MDollars 69.2m).
SINGAPORE was dull. The Straits Times Industrial index eased 0.83 to
1,402.27 while turnover rose to SDollars 195m, up from SDollars 50m.
Singapore Airlines foreign shares receded 30 cents to SDollars 18.20.
NEW ZEALAND was buoyed by a survey showing an increase in business
confidence. The NZSE-40 capital index gained 23.09 to 1,451.40.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 35
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11616</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World Stock Markets: Hardly a squeak from Canadian
cheerleaders - The damage done to Toronto stocks by the crisis at O&amp;Y and
weak gold prices
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Between the travails of Olympia &amp; York, sagging gold and oil prices, and
only the faintest signs of an upturn in the Canadian economy, the Toronto
Stock Exchange has had little to cheer about lately. So it is not surprising
that while share prices on Wall Street have been climbing from one record to
another, Toronto remains in a rut.
Except for a maverick bounce earlier this month, the TSE 300 index has been
steadily losing ground all year. It has dropped more than 8 per cent since
mid-January. The index closed at 3,368 on Wednesday, far off its all-time
high of 4,112 in August 1987. Most of the damage has come from O &amp; Y
fall-out and from the sliding gold price.
With Canadian banks being O &amp; Y's biggest creditors, the TSE banks index has
slid by more than 18 per cent since mid-January. National Bank of Canada,
the smallest of the big six banks but with the heaviest exposure to O &amp; Y
relative to its size, has seen its share price drop by a third.
The banks' exposure to O &amp; Y itself, totalling about CDollars 3bn (Dollars
2.5bn), is only part of investors' concern. Even the developer's main
lender, Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce, could not absorb a big
write-down on its O &amp; Y loans without serious capital impairment.
More worrying is the effect that O &amp; Y may have on the real estate market as
a whole. Sales of buildings at firesale prices, coupled with even more
intense competition for office tenants, could force the banks to reassess
the value of a much bigger slice of their real estate portfolios.
This concern is reflected in the share prices of other heavily indebted
property companies. Calgary-based Trizec, which is North America's biggest
publicly traded real estate group and 35 per cent-owned by O &amp; Y, has been
trading this week at its lowest levels in more than two decades.
Bramalea, one of Canada's biggest homebuilders and a Trizec subsidiary, sank
below CDollars 3 a share this week. The shares lost 10 per cent of their
value on Wednesday alone, and are now more than a quarter below the price at
which a flopped rights issue was pitched earlier this month.
The gold mining index has fallen by 14 per cent from its late-January peak.
In spite of a 49 per cent leap in first-quarter income, American Barrick,
long an investor favourite, has sunk from a record CDollars 34.75 to
CDollars 27.75. The realisation is apparently sinking in that even astute
hedging cannot protect a commodity producer forever from the unpleasant
realities of the spot market.
Investors have even recently shunned some of Canada's best-known industrial
companies. Northern Telecom, propelled by 13 consecutive quarters of
earnings growth to a record CDollars 58.50 earlier this year, has since
retreated below CDollars 53.
Dofasco, the country's biggest steelmaker, is trading close to its 52-week
low. Shares of Air Canada, which is in a fight-to-the-finish with its rival,
Canadian Airlines International, are now at just half the price at which the
government sold its remaining stake to the public in July 1989.
Amid the gloom, lower interest rates and some cyclical stocks appear to be
pointing to better times ahead. Canadian Pacific Forest Products, for
instance, has gained more than 10 per cent in recent months.
But until more solid evidence of a broad-based business recovery appears,
the heftiest profits in Toronto are likely to come from more speculative
plays.
Two oil and gas producers - BP Canada and Ocelot Energy - have benefited
handsomely from a huge natural gas discovery in north-east British Columbia.
Mr Jim Doak, analyst at First Marathon Securities, expects the discovery to
boost BP Canada's net asset value by about 50 per cent by the end of 1993.
The shares of Ocelot (its biggest shareholder is the German metals group
Metallgesellschaft) have rocketed 70 per cent since November.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 35
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11617</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World Commodities Prices: Market Report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
New York nearby raw SUGAR futures climbed above 10 cents a lb in early
trading yesterday. Analysts said heavy trade shortcovering in the nearby
contract led the market higher. Funds and commission houses, already known
to be heavily long, were said to have beefed up positions at the open and at
several subsequent chart points. Dealers in London, where raws prices were
at 16-month highs in late trading, said that although the Thai crop looks
set to be large this year a significant proportion has been refined into
white sugar, limiting availability of raws. A drought in South Africa is
also set to restrict the supply of raw sugar. Most of the available nearby
supplies also seem to have made their way into 'strong hands' and it may not
be long before the market hits 11 cents a lb, basis May New York. On the LME
ZINC continued to be underpinned by technical tightness, notably for June
delivery metal. The premium for cash metal over three-month widened to
Dollars 44 a tonne from Wednesday's Dollars 29.50. The main objective is
Dollars 1,300 a tonne for three-month metal, dealers said. LME warehouse
stocks are expected to rise today.
Compiled from Reuters
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11618</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Taiwan aims to streamline pig
sector - An industry dogged by environmental protests
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LUISETTA MUDIE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TAIWAN'S PIG industry, dogged by environmental protests and low pork prices,
is likely to face a downturn in the coming months, as the government
implements policies to upgrade and streamline the industry.
The island's pig population recently topped 10m, which is one pig for every
two people. As well as satisfying domestic demand, pork is also the island's
largest agricultural export. Last year it exported Dollars 700m worth of
chilled and frozen pork, 90 per cent of which went to the Japanese market.
Taiwan's proximity to Japan and its lower labour costs has given it distinct
advantages over its major competitors there, namely Denmark, the Netherlands
and the US.
The Taiwanese market, however, is still closed to European meat, ostensibly
for veterinary reasons. Pork prices have been about TDollars 4,000
(USDollars 160) per 100 kg for the past year now, which pork producers say
barely covers their costs. Last year saw a drop in the number of
smallholdings with 200 pigs or less, while farms with 200 to 1,000 and
1,000-5,000 pigs increased by about 30 per cent and 40 per cent
respectively.
The environmental price, however, has been high. With one pig producing 3.5
kg of manure and urine per day, 35,000 tonnes daily have been pouring into
Taiwan's lakes and rivers, turning them black and devoid of oxygen.
The government's strategy has been to encourage farmers to install waste
treatment technology, promising TDollars 300 per pig to this end for farmers
in water conservation areas, and double that for those who are forced to
give up farming pigs altogether.
Provincial government officials claim that 65 per cent of farms inspected so
far have come up to regulation standards.
Pig associations say that this will do little to help farms with less than
200 pigs, who will be hardest hit by the policy. With the worst
environmental record and little spare cash, very few such farmers are likely
to come up to new standards to be set towards the end of the year.
In some areas telephone hotlines have been set up, and the public encouraged
to lodge complaints against casual pig farms that pollute their
neighbourhood. Such complaints can lead to fines of TDollars 60,000, an
amount likely to bankrupt smallholders.
Other analysts say that a strong farming lobby and the availability of low
interest loans from the government and farmers' unions, mean that the
smaller pig farms are unlikely to be sacrificed entirely.
One of the larger players, too, has been exploring other options. TaiSugar
will not be investing any new funds in its pig farming operations in Taiwan,
saying that the future looks uncertain. The state-owned enterprise has been
exploring possible sitings for new pig farms as far afield as Canada and
Australia.
On the other hand, Chia Hsin Livestock, with 35,000 pigs and diverse
agricultural interests, says it is confident it can ride out the slump in
pork prices.
An official of the cabinet-controlled Council of Agriculture said that the
government hoped to reduce the pig population by as much as 20 per cent,
scaling down the industry to subsistence level, while at the same time
making it more high-tech and efficient.
A contraction of this nature would in turn affect the demand for feed grain
and soyabeans. Taiwan is heavily dependent on imports of these items, mainly
from the US, importing more than Dollars 1bn of maize and soyabeans last
year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11619</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Indonesia's overstretched
rubber industry - A downturn in production after years of bucking the world
trend
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM KEELING and DAVID BLACKWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DECLINE of the international natural rubber market may finally have
caught up with Indonesia. The Rubber Association of Indonesia (Gapkindo)
expects production to decline by 20 per cent this year as farmers turn to
more lucrative crops.
This would be the first major reversal for a country which has bucked the
trend by increasing production during a period of low commodity prices.
Indonesia is the world's second largest rubber producer, with output rising
from 1.05m tonnes in 1985 to 1.27m tonnes last year with an estimated 3.1m
hectares (7.6m acres) under cultivation.
The value of Indonesia's rubber exports in 1990 amounted to USDollars 855m,
the third largest non-oil export after manufactured goods and forest
products.
Mr AF Budiman, executive director of Gapkindo, describes the outlook as
'very gloomy'. Hazy skies caused by last year's extensive forest fires are
partly to blame for the fall in production (a lower rate of photosynthesis
results in reduced yield) but he says the main culprit is the international
pricing system.
Consumers, such as the international tyre companies, prefer to buy direct
from processors in Indonesia and cut out traders in Singapore. Dr Budiman
says this has reduced the volume and quality of rubber appearing at auction
and kept prices low.
The price agreed between the tyre companies and processors, however, is
based upon the auction price, albeit with a small quality premium of between
2 and 5 Singapore cents a kilogram. As a result, Mr Budiman explains, 'many
processors feel the price they get is already discounted'.
The price squeeze is beginning to hurt processors and farmers. Indonesia's
SIR-20 rubber is fetching about 40 cents a lb in the US, which buys half
Indonesia's production. Industry officials say the price would have to reach
50 cents a lb for business to be remunerative.
A solution might be for the processors to channel more of their production
through the Singapore market, forcing tyre companies to buy from the traders
and increasing the auction price.
The initiative is already being taken by PT Nusira, Indonesia's largest
processor, which has five factories with a total capacity of 12,000 tonnes a
month. Mr Hasan Bahari, a director of Nusira, says that the company sells 90
per cent of its production direct to tyre companies, mainly Goodyear and
Yokohama, with the remainder being purchased by traders. However, Nusira has
decided to reduce direct sales to 70 per cent of production, Mr Bahari says.
Whether this will become an industry-wide trend remains unclear. As Mr
Budiman explains, the processors 'have already invested a lot to fulfil the
needs of the (direct) customers'.
For some producers a price rise could not come soon enough. Gapkindo
estimates that 10 per cent of processors have either closed or are operating
at significantly reduced capacity. Smallholders, who make up some 80 per
cent of production and are paid about 70 per cent of the world market price
for their rubber, are cutting back acreage, Mr Budiman says.
Mr Bahari remains more bullish about the future. He says that most farmers,
although unhappy with the price they receive, are tied into rubber
production and Nusira is not anticipating a problem with supply. Indeed
Nusira plans to increase capacity by 7 per cent this year.
'Other companies are reducing their production. We are increasing to lower
our costs", he explains.
A shake-out of the processing industry is likely. Gapkindo estimates that
high bank interest rates, averaging 27 per cent a year, have increased
production costs by up to 30 per cent in recent years. Smaller and less
efficient processors may fall by the wayside.
Industry concern at low prices is likely to result in demands for the
re-structuring of the International Natural Rubber Agreement, signed in 1987
and due to expire this year, which agreed a level of buffer stock and
intervention prices.
Indonesia was late in paying its financial dues in January to the
International Natural Rubber Organisation, which encompasses both producers
and consumers.
Although Gapkindo says the late payment resulted from a 'technical' hitch,
government officials are reported to be concerned at the organisation's
failure to lift prices out of their three year trough.
A meeting of producing nations to agree proposed changes to the
international agreement is scheduled for April 29-30 in Changmai, Thailand.
Such proposals might include an increase in the size of the buffer stock,
and a narrower band of intervention prices. As one Indonesian official
comments, 'Although not stated specifically, what we want is higher prices'.
The recent recovery in natural rubber prices appears too short of
fundamental support to last, according to the Economist Intelligence Unit's
latest World Commodity Forecasts, writes David Blackwell. The EIU has again
lowered expectations for the economy of the US, the world's largest consumer
of rubber. The small recovery of oil prices - which govern the cost of
synthetic rubber - is unlikely to be of much support to natural rubber
prices. Little support is expected from restocking demand.
The low prices of the last couple of years are to some extent explained by
the recent upward revisions for global production figures by the
International Rubber Study Group, the EIU believes. Belated production cuts
rather than any real recovery in demand have strengthened the market.
The best hope for better prices 'must come from an upturn in global demand'
as well as continued reduction in production in Malaysia and elsewhere. The
recovery from a low of 49.5 pence a kilogram in London on February 10 to
more than 54 pence a kilogram came just in time to avert a threat to the
International Rubber Agreement, whose members were unable to agree on
reducing the buffer stock intervention price bands.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11620</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World Commodities Prices: Fruit &amp; Vegetables
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Top quality bananas are this week's best fruit buy at 49-60p a lb (48-60p)
reports the FFVIB. Other good buys include Cape Golden Delicious apples at
55-60p a lb (55-60p). Also look out for Spania strawberries at 60-75p a  1/2
lb (75-90p). Crisp, sweet tasting Dutch carrots are superb this week at
30-40p a lb (35-40p). Also good are Egyptian new potatoes at 25-28p a lb
(25-30p). English and Jersey cauliflowers remain an excellent choice at
38-45p each (45-60p). Best homegrown salad buys this week are English Round
lettuce at 20-25p a head (20-30p) and English tomatoes at 70-75p a lb
(60-75p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11621</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: India disappointed with oil
round bids
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KK SHARMA
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW DELHI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
India's Ministry of Petroleum received a disappointing 24 bids for the 72
onshore and offshore blocks thrown open for exploratory drilling in the
fourth licensing round, writes KK Sharma in New Delhi. The ministry had
hoped for more interest in view of various incentives and concessions,
including production-sharing and tax benefits, that were offered for the
first time.
The incentives were offered because the country urgently needs new fields.
For the past two decades India's oil production has stagnated at about 240m
barrels a year. Because of the growing demand India has to use scarce
foreign exchange to import more than 150m barrels of crude and petroleum
products every year.
The foreign companies that bid included Royal Dutch/Shell, Amoco and Arco of
the US and smaller US firms like Andarco, Albion and Pan Energy Resources.
Private Indian bidders included Tata Industries, Hindusthan Oil Exploration
Corporation and Gujarat Gas of the Mafatlal group. Some foreign companies
that bid in previous rounds stayed away this time. They included Chevron of
the US, BHP of Australia and International Petroleum of Dubai. Exxon and
Mobil had also bid in earlier rounds. Indian companies that were expected to
bid but abstained were the Aditya Birla group, the Ambanis and the Ruias of
Essar.
The 24 bids received were for 13 blocks, eight offshore and five onshore.
Bids were made for onshore blocks in Rajasthan, Gujarat, Andhra, Maharashtra
and West Bengal.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11622</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Mexican mining reform debate
next week
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MEXICO CITY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE MEXICAN Congress will begin debating next week reforms to the
constitution aimed at easing restrictions on foreign investors in the mining
industry, according to an official at the Energy and Mines Ministry (Semip),
reports Reuter from Mexico City.
Mr Abel Magana, director of information at Semip, said that President Carlos
Salinas de Gortari was expected to present the initiative in Congress next
week. He thought the reforms would be approved within 15 to 20 days.
They would facilitate foreign investment in all sectors of the mining
industry except uranium, Mr Magana said.
The need for foreign investors to ally themselves with Mexican partners
holding majority interests would end and the requirement that the investment
work through a fund administered by a Mexican bank would also be removed.
The law would permit foreign investors to buy concessions to exploit mineral
reserves.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11623</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Alcan chairman calls for more
smelter closures
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING, Mining Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A CALL went out yesterday from Mr David Morton, chairman of Alcan of Canada,
for more high-cost western aluminium smelters to close to redress the
imbalance in supply caused mainly by Russian exports to the west.
At the same time the European Commission ruled out any immediate action to
protect its hard-pressed producers from the flood of aluminium from the
former Soviet Union. However, the commission is to monitor imports to
provide better statistical information.
It published a regulation requiring member states to give details of primary
aluminium imports from the Commonwealth of Independent States every month
from May 1. But an EC official suggested a clear statistical picture would
not emerge until the end of 1992.
He pointed out that, while the commission's action would not restrict
imports, it would provide better statistics to help it assess whether
measures to safeguard the European producers were needed. But he admitted
such measures would be difficult to apply.
The official held out the possibility that Russia, the biggest CIS aluminium
producer, would probably be cautious about its exports to the EC this year
because it would not want to undermine a market that provided an assured
source of desperately-needed hard currency.
In its preamble to the regulation the commission said aluminium imports from
the CIS to the EC had jumped from 12,586 tonnes in 1990 to 122,957 tonnes
last year. But imports from the CIS by the former East Germany, a big buyer
in the past, were included in the 1991 total.
Meanwhile, Alcan's Mr Morton used his annual meeting in Montreal to point
out that the closure of nearly 1m tonnes of western primary aluminium
capacity had already been announced, although not all had yet taken effect.
Included in the total was a 50,000 tonnes cut by Alcan, representing 8.5 per
cent of its world-wide capacity.
Mr Morton said recovery in aluminium demand would be slow and more western
capacity was coming into operation this year. 'We have seen the bottom of
the market but prices will have to struggle to sustain current levels for
the remainder of the first half of the year,' he added.
'I believe further production cutbacks in the industry, particularly of
older, higher-cost and less environmentally satisfactory smelters, must form
part of the solution,' said Mr Morton.
According to the Anthony Bird Associates consultancy group, the western
world's highest-cost smelters are in Italy, with production costs averaging
76 US cents a lb, Spain, 72 cents, Germany, 65 cents and the UK, 62 cents.
This compares with Venezuela, the lowest-cost country with an average of 47
cents, Canada, 49 cents, and Australia 50 cents.
Europe already is bearing the brunt of cuts so far. The European Aluminium
Association estimates that production by its members fell by 2.4 per cent
from the 1990 level to 3.533m tonnes last year. The fall in output has been
accelerating. It was 5.7 per cent in the last quarter of 1991 and more than
8 per cent last month.
The World Bureau of Metal Statistics estimates that aluminium imports from
the CIS to the west last year reached at least 935,000 tonnes of which
700,000 tonnes was consumed, leaving 300,000 tonnes in London Metal Exchange
warehouses at the end of last year.
Russia has allocated 615,000 tonnes of production for export this year but
in view of the chaotic conditions in the CIS many analysts believe exports
are more likely to be between 500,000 and 600,000 tonnes, or roughly half
the 1991 level.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11624</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Coffee price touches 17-year
low
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BLACKWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LONDON ROBUSTA coffee prices touched 17-year lows in early trading yesterday
as the recent downtrend continued.
Long liquidation pushed the July contract down to Dollars 782 a tonne, the
cheapest level for a second-month contract since the market switched from
sterling to dollars last year. However, the market recovered most of the
losses in the afternoon as profit-taking purchases emerged, July closing
just Dollars 1 down at Dollars 797 a tonne.
Mr Lawrence Eagles, analyst with GNI, the London futures dealer, said the
market was very oversold, with some operators willing to push it down
further. It was difficult to see a bullish factor emerging before the
International Coffee Organisation meeting in late June.
Future ICO developments 'promise to be one of the biggest market factors,'
according to the latest World Commodity Forecasts from the Economist
Intelligence Unit. The EIU believes that the prospect of a new international
agreement with economic clauses has improved through the greater flexibility
shown recently by Brazil, the world's biggest producer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11625</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Capital Markets: Barclays Bank credit rating
cut by IBCA
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BARCLAYS Bank, the last UK bank to have retained a Triple-A credit rating,
was yesterday downgraded to AA-plus by IBCA, the UK-based agency.
Last month, Moody's, the US-based credit rating agency, placed Barclays' AAA
debt rating under review for possible downgrade. The other leading US
agency, Standard &amp; Poor's, downgraded Barclays to AA-plus a year ago.
IBCA attributed the downgrade to the rapid rise in loan loss provisions over
the past three years. 'Despite incipient signs of recovery in the UK's
economy, it is expected that provisions will remain at high levels in the
current year,' IBCA noted.
In 1991, Barclays made provisions of Pounds 1.75bn to cover the risk of
losses on loans. Only NatWest suffered a bigger bad debt charge. However,
Barclays' bad debt provisions were smaller than all the other banks as a
proportion of its UK portfolio of loans.
In addition, Barclays has been less successful than other UK banks at
reducing its cost base. For example, Barclays' staff received a pay rise of
around 8 per cent in 1991, higher than at other UK banks, IBCA said.
On the positive side, IBCA described Barclays' liquidity as excellent, and
its capital position as satisfactory.
Moody's said it was assessing the bank's 'competitive environment and its
domestic and international strategies'.
Only five banks - Deutsche Bank, Union Bank of Switzerland, Swiss Bank
Corporation, Morgan Guaranty and Rabobank - are still rated AAA by all three
agencies; SBC's rating is also under review for possible downgrade by
Moody's.
The short-term debt rating of GPA, the Irish aircraft leasing company, has
been placed under review by Moody's for possible downgrade. The debt is
currently rated Prime-2. In addition, the BAa1 rating of guaranteed notes
and floating rate notes issued by GPA subsidiaries GPA Investment and GPA
Delaware is also under review.
Moody's review will focus on the company's financing needs for aircraft
purchase and structural issues affecting air travel and cargo transport.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11626</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Capital Markets: Banco Santander offer adds to
derivatives growth
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BANCO Santander de Negocios yesterday issued 5m warrants on the 10-year
Spanish government bond, the latest sign of the growth of activity in
derivative markets by Spanish banks.
Earlier in the week, Banesto launched a similar transaction. The first such
warrants were issued last year by Banco Bilbao Viscaya.
The American-style call warrants issued by Banco Santander, which run for a
year and a half, were authorised by the Spanish authorities. The deal,
arranged with Kidder Peabody, was aimed at international investors, whose
participation in the Spanish bond market has increased dramatically since
the removal of withholding tax early last year.
Growing participation by international banks, which actively trade the
market, has helped boost liquidity.
In addition to a growing market for warrants, both futures and options on
Spanish government bonds are now traded on Meff, the Spanish derivatives
exchange, and there is a broadening market in over-the-counter products.
A handful of warrant issues on Spanish government bonds is currently
awaiting approval from the Spanish authorities.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11627</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Nippon Mining to assist US
subsidiary
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NIPPON Mining, the Japanese non-ferrous metals and petroleum refining group,
is to provide nearly Dollars 150m to help Gould, its debt-ridden US
subsidiary, Reuter reports from Tokyo.
The assistance, to be given to the US copper foil maker by the end of 1992,
will be used to repay part of Gould's debts and improve its production and
research facilities.
The Japanese group aims to ease the burden of the unprofitable subsidiary
ahead of the merger of Nippon Mining with Kyodo Oil in December. After the
merger, Gould will become a subsidiary of the combined company, Nikko
Kyoseki.
Nippon Mining acquired Gould in 1988.
Nippon Mining expects Gould to post group net losses of Dollars 180m for
1991. Gould's long-term and short-term debts came to Dollars 900m as of the
end of 1991.
Nippon Mining forecasts group pre-tax losses of Y500m (Dollars 3.73m) for
the year ended March, mainly due to Gould's poor performance. It had group
pre-tax profits of Y14.88bn in the previous year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11628</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Li acquires HKDollars 500m
Pacific Concord note
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON HOLBERTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR LI Ka-shing's flagship, Cheung Kong, has increased its potential
shareholding in Pacific Concord, through the subscription of a HKDollars
500m (USDollars 65m) convertible redeemable note.
Cheung Kong already owns 8 per cent of Pacific Concord, a diversified
industrial company which manufactures watches, cosmetics, and has retailing
interest in China. If it converted its latest note, its shareholding would
rise to 17.55 per cent.
Cheung Kong said the deal strengthened its ties with Pacific Concord; the
latter said the capital raised would allow it to develop its retail
interests in China.
Mr Li, whose company is cash rich, has taken a number of minority interests
in local Hong Kong companies over the past year. The strategy seems to be to
raise the rate of return on surplus funds, rather than anything aggressive.
The latest Pacific Concord note pays 6 per cent, compared with money market
rates of over 4 per cent.
Last week Cheung Kong made a cash bid for the EIE Development which valued
the company at HKDollars 1.7bn. It is also interested in buying assets from
Olympia &amp; York, the troubled Canadian property company.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11629</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Wharf turns in nine-month profit
of HKDollars 1.21bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON DAVIES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WHARF (Holdings), the main listed company in the empire founded by the late
Hong Kong shipping tycoon, Sir Yue-kong Pao, announced profit before
extraordinary items of HKDollars 1.21bn (USDollars 157m) for the nine months
to December 1991.
The results, which were in line with market expectations, compared with a
HKDollars 1.44bn profit in the year to March 1991.
The company has just altered its year-end from March to December; it said
this meant the results represented an annualised increase of around 12 per
cent. This would represent the 24th consecutive year of profits growth, at
an average of over 27 per cent per annum.
Wharf is in a transitional stage, as it builds up its property portfolio.
The portfolio is expected to expand from 5.2m sq ft in 1991 to more than 13m
sq ft in 1998.
However, the bulk of this will not come on stream until 1993, with little
profits growth anticipated in the coming year. The company announced an
asset revaluation which increased its net asset value per share by 16 per
cent to HKDollars 16.19.
Further increases in asset value will follow the completion of its four big
developments: Times Square; New Tech Centre and Gateway Towers in Hong Kong;
and Lane Crawford Place, in Singapore. Times Square represents the key to
increased profits in the short term, bringing 2m sq ft of property to the
market in early 1993.
Wharf has also expanded its hotels division through the acquisition of four
hotel properties in the US. It meanwhile continues to seek opportunities in
infrastructure and telecommunications. It is to submit a tender for the
Western Harbour tunnel contract in the second half of 1992, while it still
plans to set up a cable television network in Hong Kong.
The directors recommended a final dividend of 42 cents, making a full-year
payout of 56.5 cents a share, compared with 49 cents in the year to March
1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11630</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Ohbayashi cuts annual earnings
forecast
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
OHBAYASHI, a leading Japanese contracting group, estimates parent pre-tax
profits of about Y53bn (Dollars 394m) for the year to March, down from its
November forecast of Y62bn, Reuter reports from Tokyo.
Ohbayashi posted parent pre-tax profits of Y60.31bn in 1990-91.
The estimate has been cut because of a drop in the company's non-operating
profits. Ohbayashi suffered large stock losses in 1991-92 owing to the
floundering Tokyo stock market, it said.
Ohbayashi's estimate for 1991-92 parent operating profit remains unchanged
from its November forecast of Y68bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11631</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Ralston may spin off baking
subsidiary
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
RALSTON Purina, the consumer products company which last week acquired Ever
Ready, the UK battery business, from Hanson for Dollars 227m, is considering
spinning-off of its baking subsidiary to shareholders.
Ralston said the aim of the move was 'to enhance shareholder value by
focusing more specifically on its other core businesses'.
The subsidiary, Continental Baking Company, claims to be the nation's
largest wholesale baker of fresh delivered bread and sweet baked goods, and
makes about 250,000 direct sales calls and deliveries each day. Its brands
include the Wonder bread products and Twinkies cupcakes.
The bakery business was bought by Ralston in 1984 from ITT, the
conglomerate.
In the year to end-September, the company had sales of Dollars 1.97bn, and
total assets of Dollars 765m. Its operating profit was Dollars 140m, after
environmental and restructuring charges of Dollars 17m.
The 'demerger' plan will be reviewed by directors of Ralston, based in St
Louis, on May 28.
Even if it is approved, tax clearances and other technical matters will have
to be resolved, and the transaction would probably not take place for
another nine to 12 months.
Ralston said the move would probably involve a dividend of up to Dollars
600m being paid from Continental Baking Company to Ralston.
Ralston's proposed moves come amid a modest spate of demergers in the US -
ranging from Union Carbide, with its industrial gases business, to Dial
Corporation with its financial services division.
The bakery market in the US - in common with the UK - is a mature industry,
with total sales of Dollars 7.4bn and static volumes in 1991. Continental
saw lower volumes in 1991, although higher margins meant operating profit
was flat.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11632</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: McDonnell Douglas hit by Dollars
80m provision
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MCDONNELL Douglas, the US defence and aerospace group, suffered a 10 per
cent drop in first-quarter net earnings after taking an Dollars 80m pre-tax
provision for losses on the C-17 military transport aircraft it is
developing for the Pentagon.
The C-17 has been at the centre of a long-running controversy between the
company and certain Pentagon officials who have alleged that the fixed-price
programme has suffered from severe cost overruns. McDonnell Douglas has
denied this and the provision is small relative to the size of the Dollars
6.6bn programme.
The company reported earnings of Dollars 52m, or Dollars 1.34 a share,
compared with Dollars 58m, or Dollars 1.50, in the same period of last year,
after taking the provision. But it added that earnings would have been up 74
per cent without the charge, with an improved financial performance across
most aerospace programmes. Revenues were little changed at Dollars 4.15bn,
against Dollars 4.24bn.
Its commercial aircraft operations saw operating earnings rise Dollars 15m
to Dollars 43m and its missiles, space and electronics systems business
produced a Dollars 14m rise to Dollars 54m. The C-17 provision cut the
military aircraft segment's profits to Dollars 41m.
The figures were helped by a Dollars 28m reduction in interest expense on
its aerospace side and Dollars 17m of pension income, thanks to a change in
actuarial assumptions.
The company said the C-17 loss was caused by estimated cost growth in the
portion of the programme which included research, development and the first
six production aircraft. This was now 90 per cent complete. Losses in this
area had been partly offset by performance on the four following production
aircraft.
The figures underlined the softened market for civilian aircraft. McDonnell
Douglas has substantially reduced its high level of indebtedness over the
past year but in this quarter the trend was reversed.
Aerospace debt at March 31 was Dollars 2.57bn, up from Dollars 2.39bn at the
end of December. The company said this was due primarily to reduced
commercial aircraft deliveries and lower bookings.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11633</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Sun Micro edges ahead
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SUN Microsystems, the leading US manufacturer of computer workstations,
unveiled a 5 per cent improvement in third-quarter net income to Dollars
61.4m, or 60 cents a share, on revenues that rose 12 per cent to a record
Dollars 952.2m.
In the quarter a year earlier, the company, based in Mountain View,
California, had net income of Dollars 58.7m, or 56 cents a share, on
revenues of Dollars 848.3m.
On Wall Street, Sun Microsystems' shares have been volatile recently amid
concern that it would not be able to live up to expectations of tremendous
growth.
The company has been one of the fastest-growing in the computer industry.
For the first nine months, Sun had net income of Dollars 135.6m, or Dollars
1.34, up 9 per cent from Dollars 123.9m, or Dollars 1.21, in the same period
last year. Revenues advanced 15 per cent to Dollars 1.62bn.
Mr Kevin Melia, chief financial officer, said demand in the third quarter
had been particularly strong in the Pacific Rim, especially in Japan. Growth
was more modest in the US and Europe.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11634</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Bombardier makes progress
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BOMBARDIER, the Canadian aerospace and transit equipment group, reported
higher profits for the year to the end of January, and is lifting its latest
quarterly dividend by 25 per cent.
Earnings were CDollars 107.7m (USDollars 91.27m), or 73 cents a share,
against Dollars 100m, or 71 cents, the previous year. Sales for the year
were Dollars 3bn, against Dollars 2.8bn.
Fourth-quarter profit was CDollars 36.8m, or 24 cents a share, up from
CDollars 33.3m, or 24 cents a share on fewer shares outstanding. Sales for
the quarter were Dollars 965m against Dollars 801m in the year-earlier
period.
Full-year results of the Lear Jet operations were included in the current
reporting period, against the unit's results for 10 months in the previous
period. In the fourth quarter, sales of consumer products were higher.
However, Bombardier said results from the transit equipment operations in
Europe were disappointing. Though sales were up sharply, Eurorail of Belgium
posted a loss. Bombardier has put in new management to enable it to handle
profitably a much higher level of production.
The new quarterly dividend rate is 5 cents a share, after a recent
two-for-one stock split.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11635</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: MCI improves to Dollars 134m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MCI Communications, the second largest long distance telephone network in
the US, yesterday reported first-quarter profits of Dollars 134m, or 51
cents a share, up from Dollars 123m, or 48 cents, a year earlier.
Revenues improved from Dollars 2.025bn to Dollars 2.225bn, partly because of
continued inroads into the consumer markets.
Mr Douglas Maine, chief financial officer, said promotions and discounts
resulted in higher traffic growth.
'We remain cautious as to the extent any economic recovery will affect these
results,' he added.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11636</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: US oil groups hit by low prices
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
EXXON, the largest US oil company, and Texaco yesterday reported sharply
lower first-quarter profits, continuing an industry trend reflecting lower
crude oil prices.
Exxon reported net income of Dollars 1.35bn, or Dollars 1.07 a share, down
from Dollars 2.24bn, or Dollars 1.78, in the same period of 1991.
However, Mr Lawrence Rawl, Exxon's chairman, noted that net income had been
up more than 20 per cent from the Dollars 1.12bn recorded in the 'more
typical' fourth quarter, in spite of lower crude realisations, a weak US
market for natural gas and softer economic conditions in many markets.
He said the results had benefited from stronger natural gas sales in Europe,
improved earnings from worldwide chemicals operations, overseas tax credits
and asset sales.
Operating volumes were strong, with liquids production, natural gas
production, refinery runs, petroleum product sales and chemical sales all
higher than in the first quarter of last year.
US exploration and production made Dollars 125m, down from Dollars 150m,
while foreign production earned Dollars 785m, up from Dollars 721m. Refining
and marketing profits slumped from Dollars 256m to Dollars 23m in the US,
and from Dollars 1.097bn to Dollars 450m abroad. Chemicals saw profits dip
from Dollars 123m to Dollars 87m in the US and from Dollars 100m to Dollars
63m abroad.
Texaco reported net income of Dollars 200m, or 68 cents, compared to Dollars
415m, or Dollars 1.51, in the first period of 1991. Revenues dipped from
Dollars 10.2bn to Dollars 8.6bn due to lower prices, offset only slightly by
higher sales volumes for refined products.
Mr James Kinnear, Texaco's chief executive, said world economic weakness had
lessened demand for crude oil and petroleum products, with a 15 per cent
drop in crude prices since the first quarter of last year.
He said Texaco intended to maintain its strong financial position and was
reducing its planned capital expenditure for the year by 10 per cent.
Meanwhile, Occidental Petroleum, the Los Angeles based group undergoing a
broad restructuring, reported net income of Dollars 98m, or 32 cents a
share, down from Dollars 136m, or 45 cents, in the first quarter of last
year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11637</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Linotype falls into red and
omits payout
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FISHER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
LINOTYPE-HELL, the German printing equipment manufacturer, will not pay a
dividend for 1991 after falling into the red as a result of weak export
sales and heavy restructuring costs.
It announced a group net loss of DM9.9m (Dollars 5.95m) compared with a
profit of DM37.5m in 1990. The decision to leave out the dividend follows a
cut of DM2 to DM13 a share in the previous payment.
Mr Wolfgang Kummer, chief executive, described 1991 as an 'extraordinarily
difficult year'. Turnover had risen from DM806m to DM1.2bn, but this was
entirely because of Linotype's merger with Rudolf Hell, formerly owned by
Siemens, the German electrical and electronics group, which has a one-third
stake in the enlarged company.
Excluding the effect of the merger, sales were 19 per cent lower; incoming
orders fell at the same rate.
Problems in the world economy masked progress made in restructuring the
group and in improving its product range. Because of the slump in foreign
business, the export share of turnover dropped to 60 per cent from 70 per
cent.
However, Mr Kummer expressed optimism about 1992 after a 15 per cent rise in
orders in the first quarter. He hoped Linotype-Hell, the world's biggest
maker of image-setting and reproduction equipment, would be able to resume
dividends this year on the basis of 'a markedly improved profit situation'.
He said the full impact of the extensive reorganisation - including a 20 per
cent cut in the workforce to 4,700 people since the merger in October 1990 -
would become apparent this year.
Mr Karl Heinz Midunsky, finance director, said DM200m of overhead costs,
notably on the labour side, had been eliminated. This gave Linotype-Hell a
lower break-even point. Another hopeful development is an array of new
products which was well-received at a recent trade fair.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11638</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: McDonald's advances 11% to
Dollars 187.4m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARBARA DURR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CHICAGO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MCDONALD'S, the world's largest fast food company, reported that its
first-quarter net income had risen 11 per cent to Dollars 187.4m, or 51
cents a share, from Dollars 168.5m, or 46 cents, in the 1991 quarter.
Worldwide sales increased 9 per cent to Dollars 4.92bn from Dollars 4.53bn
in the year-ago period.
Its domestic business, in which sales had been growing slowly and profit
margins had declined, benefited from price discounting and other promotional
programmes, coupled with efforts to reduce development and operating costs.
Domestic sales grew by 5 per cent during the first quarter and margins at
company-operated restaurants improved to 17.9 per cent of sales, compared
with 15.9 per cent a year ago. Sales outside the US continued their fast
pace at 14 per cent, in spite of the drag of a stronger dollar.
In the first quarter, the company added 50 restaurants, 42 of which were
outside the US.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11639</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: IBM invests in Hungarian
computer maker
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS DENTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUDAPEST
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
INTERNATIONAL Business Machines, the US computer company, is making its most
important move into eastern Europe by taking a majority stake in a
subsidiary of Muszertechnika, the privately owned Hungarian computer
distributor and manufacturer.
With its link with Muszertechnika's MT-Computers subsidiary, IBM hopes to
strengthen its position in the Hungarian market, which is dominated by
clones of IBM personal computers, mainly of east Asian origin.
IBM's share of sales of personal and mini-computers in Hungary stood at 10
per cent in 1991. Muszertechnika currently has a 25 per cent share of the
Hungarian market.
Muszertechnika, which IBM Hungary described as the most advanced computer
company in eastern Europe, is already a supplier of add-on boards for the US
company's personal computers.
The IBM equity investment in MT-Computers, for a sum not yet disclosed,
follows efforts by Arthur Andersen, the accountancy firm, to liquidate the
late Mr Robert Maxwell's 10 per cent stake in the Muszertechnika holding
company.
Muszertechnika said that the worth of the group had increased since the
Maxwell share purchase last year, which valued it at Dollars 110m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11640</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Banque Worms problems depress
UAP profit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
UNION des Assurances de Paris, the largest player in French insurance, saw
its net profits fall by 10.7 per cent from FFr4.22bn in 1990 to FFr3.77bn
(Dollars 671m) in 1991 mainly because of the problems of Banque Worms, one
of its banking interests.
Mr Jean Peyrelevade, chairman, described 1991 as a 'difficult year' in which
UAP, which is in negotiations with the Suez industrial group over its
minority holding in the Victoire insurance company, was beset by the
slowdown in the European insurance market, particularly in France and Italy,
although it fared well in the UK and Belgium.
UAP, a state-controlled company, is the latest of the large French insurers
to have announced a reduction in profits for 1991. On Thursday Axa disclosed
a more dramatic 28 per cent fall in net profits to FFr2.4bn. Victoire last
week announced a more modest decline of 1.7 per cent to FFr1.8bn.
Mr Peyrelevade refused to comment on the progress of UAP's discussions with
Suez over the Victoire stake, despite speculation in the French press that
an agreement is imminent.
UAP wants to exchange a large part of its 34 per cent stake in Victoire for
50 per cent of Colonia, the German insurance company controlled by Victoire.
The deal would enable UAP to fulfil a long standing ambition of expanding in
the vast German insurance market. Mr Peyrelevade said that, Germany apart,
UAP did not intend to further expand its international interests in the
foreseeable future.
Despite a decline in earnings per share from FFr50.2 to FFr44.8, the board
proposed to hold the dividend at FFr11.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11641</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: BNP doubles dividend as earnings
advance 82%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BANQUE Nationale de Paris, one of the largest French banks, yesterday
announced it was doubling its dividend from FFr7.8 in 1990 to FFr15.75 in
1991 after increasing net profits by 82 per cent from FFr1.6bn to FFr2.9bn
(Dollars 516m) last year.
The BNP announcement comes towards the end of a very mixed set of annual
results for the French banks. BNP, which saw its profits fall sharply in
1990 after it was forced to make hefty provisions on its loan losses,
managed to muster a recovery last year although its net profits have not yet
regained the FFr3.4bn achieved in 1989.
This follows the same pattern as Societe Generale, another of the big
state-controlled banks, which last week announced its return to profits
growth after a steep increase in provisions for 1990.
By contrast, other French banks had a tough time in 1991 when they were
forced to make dramatic increases in provisions. Paribas, the investment
banking group, recently announced its first ever loss of nearly FFr200m.
Credit Lyonnais, together with BNP and Societe Generale, saw 1991 profits
fall sharply after doubling provisions to FFr9.5bn.
The decision to double BNP's dividend marks the improvement in the bank's
performance in 1991 when it managed to raise its earnings per share from
FFr23.63 to FFr41.51. BNP had previously announced a 7.7 per cent increase
in net banking income from FFr35.2bn in 1990 to FFr37.9bn in 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11642</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Pechiney hit by aluminium price
fall
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PECHINEY, the world's largest packaging company and leading aluminium
producer, yesterday announced a 23 per cent decline in operating profits due
mainly to a sharp fall in aluminium prices.
The state-controlled group also announced details of an asset
reorganisation, which will leave its separately quoted 75 per cent
subsidiary, Pechiney International, as a packaging company and put the
aluminium business in the hands of the Pechiney parent. Pechiney is to pay
FFr3.84bn (Dollars 684m) net to take over Pechiney International's aluminium
and trading businesses, representing FFr6.05bn of assets minus FFr2.2bn of
liabilities.
Operating profits at the Pechiney parent fell from FFr6.68bn in 1990 to
FFr5.12bn last year, on sales down by 3 per cent to FFr74.42bn. Net earnings
fell to FFr820m from FFr2.22bn in 1990, excluding extraordinary gains.
In packaging, operating profits rose by 13 per cent, but aluminium earnings
collapsed, from FFr2.5bn to FFr1.48bn.
Mr Jean Gandois, the chairman, said prices were weakened by a sudden influx
of cheap exports from the former Soviet Union, which represented 22 per cent
of the western European market last year. Pechiney is supporting European
Commission moves to negotiate a voluntary restraint accord with the Russian
republic, he said.
Mr Gandois expected Russian exports to diminish this year because stocks
there were low and local demand was increasing. However, worldwide aluminium
stocks were still higher than normal, he said.
The outlook for packaging was good, but overall, the group expected
first-half earnings to fall, with a possible improvement in the second six
months of this year.
Pechiney International also recorded a sharp drop in operating earnings,
down 9 per cent to FFr3.29bn on sales up from FFr43.02bn to FFr45.12bn. Net
profits fell by 26.8 per cent to FFr842m.
The assets transfer means the share of Pechiney International's sales in
packaging will rise from 70 per cent to 85 per cent.
The purpose of the asset sale is to make Pechiney International more
attractive to investors and so help it raise capital, in line with the
French government's decree last year that state industry could sell up to 49
per cent of its shares to the public.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11643</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Solvay to buy Tenneco's Wyoming
unit for Dollars 500m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SOLVAY, the Belgian chemicals group, is to strengthen its position as the
world leader in soda ash production by buying Tenneco's Wyoming minerals
operation for USDollars 500m.
Solvay said yesterday that the deal, which should be completed by June,
would increase its soda ash capacity from 4.3m to 6m tonnes a year. That
represents nearly 20 per cent of the world market - greater than the
combined share of its two biggest competitors.
The deal will also further strengthen the balance sheet at Tenneco, which
embarked on a wide-ranging restructuring programme in September. By June,
the US conglomerate will have saved or raised Dollars 3bn, mostly through
issues of equity, the sale of non-core assets, and cuts in costs and capital
spending.
The purchase marks Solvay's first move into 'natural' production in the US,
which has by far the world's largest reserves of trona, the sodium-based
mineral from which soda ash is extracted.
Solvay pioneered the synthetic manufacture of soda ash, which is used for
making glass and detergents, in the 19th century. Despite expanding its
other activities in north America, it has not had a controlling interest in
a US soda ash plant for decades.
The Belgian group is buying Tenneco's 80 per cent share in a soda ash
production joint venture at Green River, Wyoming, the rest of which belongs
to Asahi Glass of Japan.
The unit should produce 1.7m tonnes of soda ash annually after expansion,
and has reserves of 170m tonnes.
Baron Daniel Janssen, Solvay's chairman, confirmed that the plant was
profitable and that natural soda ash production cost less than synthetic
manufacture, but he would not reveal the profits or margins of the business.
'When you buy a mine you don't just buy sales or profits for the coming
year, you buy the reserves in the mine for the coming hundreds of years,' he
said.
Solvay will pay Dollars 200m in cash, with the balance financed through
Solvay's US subsidiary, which will take on Dollars 300m of long-term debt.
That should increase the group's net debt to 35 per cent of shareholders'
funds by the end of 1992, against 22 per cent at the end of last year, but
Solvay said interest charges would be covered by cash flow generated by the
new operation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11644</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Acquisitions help boost sales by
23.7% at Sasib
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SASIB, the diversified precision engineering group controlled by Mr Carlo De
Benedetti's CIR holding company, raised net group profits by 4.3 per cent to
L73.2bn (Dollars 59.22m) last year, writes Haig Simonian in Milan.
Consolidated sales at the group jumped by 23.7 per cent to L766.6bn due to a
continuing acquisitions drive. Adjusted for new purchases, sales rose 5.3
per cent last year.
The company, which produces food processing equipment and railway signalling
technology with its original business of building cigarette-making machines,
is paying an unchanged dividend of L230 for ordinary shares and L250 for
savings shares.
Mr Gian Carlo Vaccari, managing director, said Sasib owned almost 3.2 per
cent of Credito Romagnolo, the big Bologna-based bank which recently raised
to 10 per cent the limit on the the size of stakes which could be held by
individual shareholders. In October, Sasib owned only 1.85 per cent of the
bank.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11645</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Thomson-CSF helped to 8% rise by
cost cutting
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THOMSON-CSF, the French state controlled defence electronics group,
yesterday announced an 8 per cent rise in last year's net profits and
forecast another earnings increase this year.
The group reported net profits of FFr2.34bn (Dollars 417m) in 1991, up from
FFr2.17bn in the previous year, on turnover down by 5 per cent to FFr35bn.
Thomson-CSF attributed the profits improvement to a fall in restructuring
charges and the gains of previous year's efforts at cutting costs.
Mr Alain Gomez, the chairman, said profits should rise in 1992, assuming a
constant company structure, but he warned that the Dollars 300m acquisition
of the missiles operations of LTV of the US would create slight dilution of
earnings. Thomson-CSF's bid was approved by a US bankruptcy court 10 days
ago, and the group is now waiting to see if it can win the final go-ahead
from the US committee on foreign investment, expected to make a decision in
three months.
Thomson-CSF warned that sales should fall again by between 3 per cent and 5
per cent this year, because of the continuing reduction in defence spending
by its government customers, and the winding down of a large missile
contract for Saudi Arabia. However, the group said it would continue to
restructure and look for opportunities to buy market share.
Despite the defence spending slowdown, Thomson-CSF has managed to keep its
order book steady.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11646</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Wasa turns in operating loss
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WASA, the Swedish insurance group, said its non-life insurance and finance
operations, which are due to be listed on the Stockholm bourse in 1993, made
an operating loss last year, writes Sara Webb in Stockholm.
The combination of heavy credit losses in the real estate sector and big
claims related to storm damage abroad led to an operating loss of SKr395m
(Dollars 66m) last year, compared with an operating profit of SKr57m in
1990. Premium income increased by 10 per cent to SKr4bn, the group said.
Wasa's life insurance operations, which rank third in Sweden after Skandia
and Trygg-Hansa SPP, more than doubled operating profit, to SKr2.25bn from
SKr981m in 1990 despite a drop in premium income from SKr3.6bn to SKr3.4bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11647</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Greece plans telecoms
privatisation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KERIN HOPE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ATHENS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GREECE plans a partial privatisation of OTE, the state telecommunications
monopoly, through a trade sale of at least 20 per cent of the company. The
sale will be followed by a share flotation on the Athens Stock Exchange,
writes Kerin Hope in Athens.
The trade buyer would be expected to take over management of OTE which, with
net income of Dr41bn (Dollars 213m) in 1990 on turnover of Dr200bn, is the
only profitable Greek utility.
The government has appointed Credit Suisse First Boston, the international
merchant bank, as its adviser on the sale. CSFB is already advising it on
the selection of private operators for two mobile telephone networks to be
launched in the Athens district next year.
The size of the flotation will be determined by the percentage of OTE
acquired by the trade buyer. However, no more than 49 per cent of the
utility can be privatised under the provisions of the Greek constitution.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11648</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / International Company News: Barlow Rand eyes Spanish target
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER BRUCE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MADRID
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BARLOW RAND, South Africa's biggest industrial conglomerate, is in talks to
buy Finanzauto, Spain's principal distributor of earth-moving equipment. The
purchase would be the largest South African investment on the Iberian
peninsular.
Baring Brothers, the UK merchant bank advising Barlow Rand, said yesterday
the South African group, through its British industrial affiliate, J. Bibby
&amp; Sons, was discussing making a formal takeover offer for Finanzauto. The
Spanish stock market yesterday suspended trading in Finanzauto.
At its suspended share price, the Spanish company, which is the sole
distributor of Caterpillar equipment in Spain, is capitalised at some
Dollars 114m. Finanzauto has been hit in the past two years by a drop in
orders as tight economic policies have dampened construction activity.
Pre-tax profits last year dropped 50 per cent to Pta1.3bn as sales fell from
Pta61.1bn in 1990 to Pta52.5bn. A fierce marketing effort in Spain by
Komatsu of Japan, which analysts say has concentrated mainly on underpricing
Caterpillar, has also sharpened the effects of the construction industry
slowdown.
Many analysts in Spain expect the slowdown in construction to continue well
into next year, particularly as Spain battles to trim its large public
sector deficits as a prelude to entering the European Community's economic
and monetary union.
The government is trying to hold spending in infrastructural work steady but
it will find the going difficult if the EC does not quickly begin to
transfer it funds through a new channel - so-called cohesion funds designed
to help poor EC members who demonstrate they are enforcing fiscal
discipline. But many of Spain's EC partners are loathe to support the new
funds.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11649</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Huntleigh shares jump 43p on profits
advance
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
HUNTLEIGH Technology, the USM-quoted medical equipment manufacturer,
yesterday saw its shares jump 43p to 503p after reporting a 42 per cent rise
in pre-tax profits for 1991.
The advance, from Pounds 1.62m to Pounds 2.31m, was achieved on sales up 19
per cent at Pounds 20.8m (Pounds 17.4m).
The recommended final dividend goes up 1p to 2.75p, making a total of 4.5p
(3p) for the year. Earnings per share came out at 17.15p (12.61p).
Mr Rolf Schild, chairman, said that during 1991 the healthcare division had
enjoyed strong sales growth in all products groups, at home and abroad.
Talks had been completed, subject to contract, to merge the sensors and
systems division with Tedea. The share structure of the venture is to be 65
per cent Tedea and the balance Huntleigh, reflecting the levels of
investment. Mr Schild said the venture had made an encouraging start.
Trading in the first half had begun well. Contributions from the UK, US and
German subsidiaries were significantly above the comparable period.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11650</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Hartons losses deepen to Pounds 5.4m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Hartons Group, which through its VT Plastics division distributes plastic
sheet and film, was hard hit by recession in its main markets of the UK and
Europe and announced losses before tax more than doubled from Pounds 2.14m
to Pounds 5.36m in the year to December 31.
Turnover fell to Pounds 92.9m (Pounds 129m) and there was an operating loss
of Pounds 918,000, compared with a profit of Pounds 3.42m in 1990.
Interest charges fell to Pounds 2.99m (Pounds 4.33m) because of reduced
borrowings. But exceptional items of Pounds 1.22m, the cost of further
rationalisation, were unchanged.
The company's North American distribution business was sold in July last
year, leading to an extraordinary loss of Pounds 617,000.
Losses attributable to shareholders totalled Pounds 6.2m (Pounds 2.8m) and
there were losses per share of 8.1p (3.6p).
No dividend is proposed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11651</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Buoyant Grampian TV rises to Pounds 3m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GRAMPIAN Television yesterday reported on a year in which it increased
profits against the general trend in a recession-hit industry.
The Aberdeen-based ITV company lifted pre-tax profits from Pounds 2.43m to
Pounds 3.18m on the back of advertising revenue that rose by nearly 3 per
cent in the 12 months to the end of February.
In October the company held on to its north of Scotland franchise despite
being outbid by two rivals who failed to make it over the quality threshold.
As a result Grampian will have to pay the relatively modest sum of Pounds
720,000 a year for its franchise.
'This has been a most remarkable year for Grampian Television,' Sir Douglas
Hardie, chairman, said yesterday.
The profits increase reflected both the buoyant local economy and the impact
of cost cutting, including the reduction in staff from a peak of 329 in 1987
to the present total of 185.
Despite the job losses, achieved through greater flexibility and efficiency
'we increased the number of hours and the popularity of our local
programming,' said Sir Douglas.
Turnover at Pounds 20.4m was little changed from the 1991 figure of Pounds
20.7m.
Earnings per share rose from 10.83p to 14.23p and the proposed final
dividend of 4.5p raises the total to 5.5p (4.1p).
An extraordinary item of Pounds 688,000 represented the cost of applying for
a new 10-year licence.
The shares advanced 9p to 164p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11652</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Wm Low falls to Pounds 8.8m after 'one-off'
costs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN THORNHILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WM LOW, the Dundee-based grocery chain which operates 68 stores in Scotland
and northern England, yesterday reported a 23 per cent drop in profits after
an accident-prone six months.
Interim profits fell from Pounds 11.4m to Pounds 8.82m pre-tax as the
operating margin was eaten away by a series of one-off costs and increased
promotional spending.
Mr James Millar, chairman, said: 'We let slip a little on the control of
costs and gross margin and in today's markets you cannot afford to do that.
'But we are back on track and in full control of our own destinies in the
second half,' he added.
Mr Millar's comments appeared to reassure the City and Low's shares rose 10p
to 223p.
Sales in the 28 weeks to March 21 rose from Pounds 198m to Pounds 222m, but
operating margins were eroded from 5.55 per cent to 4.15 per cent due to
increased promotional activity, store openings, and higher branch and head
office costs.
Mr Colin Mitchell, the former managing director who abruptly left the
company in February, received severance pay of about Pounds 200,000. Five
other executives who left in a cost-cutting campaign also received
redundancy pay, resulting in a total exceptional charge of Pounds 330,000.
Low is still searching for a new chief executive.
A lower tax charge helped protect earnings per share, but they still slipped
from 13.28p to 10.03p.
The interim dividend is held at 2.7p.
Low said underlying sales were running at 4 per cent ahead of last year.
'Within that figure we are seeing some real volume gains, with food
inflation running at about 3.5 per cent,' said Mr Harvie Findlay, finance
director.
COMMENT
The City was unnerved earlier this year by Mr Mitchell's departure and the
profits warning that followed soon after. Although the events were
unconnected, the company only sullied its reputation for reliability and
investors shunned the stock. Yesterday's comforting noises on volume sales
and costs suggested that some kind of rehabilitation was on the way as the
share price rebounded sharply. And pre-tax profits of Pounds 20.4m (Pounds
23.6m) for the year, putting Low on a prospective multiple of 10, are hardly
demanding. Low's management is still widely admired; its expansion programme
will improve quality of space as well as quantity; and the food market is
perhaps seeing the first glimmers of recovery. But having said all that the
question nonetheless has to be asked: do investors want to be exposed to a
stumbling second-line food retailer with only limited upside potential in an
economic recovery and with an uncertain long-term future? The brutal answer
is: probably not.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11653</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Liberty fall to Pounds 5.7m fuels
speculation over control
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UNCERTAINTY surrounding the largest and potentially hostile shareholder in
Liberty was heightened yesterday as the fabrics retailer and manufacturer
unveiled a 21 per cent drop in annual profits.
A spokesman for South African-born Mr Brian Myerson, whose investment
vehicle Concerto Capital holds 15 per cent of Liberty, said the
businessman's original plans to call for an extraordinary meeting were still
in play. However, Mr Myerson did not intend formally to request it in the
immediate future.
Mr Myerson called for the meeting in February to propose a new chief
executive and provide a cash injection which would dilute the Liberty
family's stake, which stands at more than 51 per cent.
Speculation over Liberty's future was bound to resurface as the group
revealed a decline in pre-tax profits from Pounds 7.23m to Pounds 5.66m in
the year to February 1. The fall was cushioned by a 44 per cent drop in
interest charges to Pounds 696,000 as the group cleared its Pounds 6m net
debt. Turnover fell from Pounds 92.5m to Pounds 84.9m.
Mr Harry Weblin, chairman and chief executive, said the 117-year old group
had survived 'the deepest and longest recession since 1945'.
Retailing took the brunt of the profits decline, falling 62 per cent to
Pounds 823,000 at the trading level, as sales slipped only 4 per cent to
Pounds 54.4m. The Gulf war had severely affected sales for the first three
months of the year. 'There was simply no tourist business,' he said.
Mr Weblin also blamed the impact of the uniform business rate for the
disproportionate fall in retailing profits. This had cost the group Pounds
250,000 last year, he said.
The converting and wholesaling business suffered less sharply, with sales
down 19 per cent to Pounds 22.7m and trading profits some 25 per cent lower
at Pounds 3.4m.
The bright spot for the year was the joint venture in Japan, where profits
were 41 per cent higher at about Pounds 1m, on turnover of Pounds 6m.
During the year the group began closing loss-making US operations, although
it plans to retain the New York store. Mr Weblin said Liberty would pursue
licensing operations in the US.
Signs in the UK were encouraging, meanwhile, with retail sales 'well ahead
of last year'. Mr Weblin warned, however, that 'any return to normal trading
is going to be gradual'.
The final dividend is 5.35p for a total of 7.2p (6.9p). Earnings per share
fell from 26.13p to 20.77p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11654</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Acquisition prompts jump to Pounds 3m at
Starmin
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
REFLECTING acquisition and subsequent reorganisation, Starmin produced
pre-tax profits of Pounds 3m for 1991, compared with Pounds 764,000.
Mr Owen Rout, chairman, said this was the second year of substantial
progress in the aim to develop as a medium sized quarry products group.
The proposed sale of the engineering division would allow management to
concentrate totally on developing the quarry business, he stated.
Extraordinary charges of Pounds 1.06m have been made against that.
The year saw substantial capital expenditure particularly in relation to
re-equipping acquisitions. Spending in the current year should be
significantly lower.
The pre-tax profit was split as to quarry products England Pounds 943,000
(Pounds 383,000) and Scotland Pounds 1.57m (Pounds 291,000), landfill Pounds
1.07m (nil), less discontinued businesses loss Pounds 64,000 (Pounds 10,000)
and interest paid Pounds 512,000 (received Pounds 100,000).
Turnover expanded from Pounds 8.8m to Pounds 18.2m. Earnings per share came
to 1p (0.4p) and the final dividend is the forecast 0.2p on capital
increased by the rights issue, to make 0.3p (0.1p).
Borrowings were Pounds 2.9m representing gearing of just over 9 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11655</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Engineering side behind 10% fall at Jones
Group
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VINCENT BOLAND
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   DUBLIN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JONES GROUP, the Dublin-based engineering and shipping company, reported a
10 per cent fall, from IPounds 5.51m to IPounds 4.96m (Pounds 4.52m), in
pre-tax profits for 1991.
The group cited the effect of the global recession on the engineering
division for the drop. The division showed a significant decline in both
turnover and profits.
Enviroquip, its US offshoot, failed to meet profit expectations due to cost
overruns on industrial projects in the fourth quarter. Shipping and
distribution, however, held up well.
Group turnover fell to IPounds 97.5m (IPounds 128m), reflecting the absence
of contributions from the Irish and UK environmental division which was sold
in December 1990.
Earnings per share were 31.9p (37p). A proposed final dividend of 8.5p makes
a total of 12.5p (12p).
Mr Denis Magee, chairman, said profits in the shipping division should be
substantially up in the current year following the addition of a new vessel.
Margins in engineering are extremely tight.
The group has become progressively more conscious of the problem posed by
its relatively-small size, he said, and is anxious to identify a sizeable
acquisition.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11656</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: AFE purchases 12.4% of Cronite
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
AFE, the quoted French engineering company, has acquired 2.01m shares in
Cronite Group, the Birmingham-based engineer and steel stockholder, for
which it is making a Pounds 7.3m cash offer.
The shares represent a holding of 12.4 per cent. The 45p a share offer has
the backing of most of the Cronite board and AFE has received undertakings
to accept in respect of 14.8 per cent.
AFE's purchase at 44p, the days unchanged closing price, included the 4.8
per cent holding of Charles Baynes, which was the main stake in Cronite held
by an industrial company.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11657</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: S Jerome loses Pounds 1m but looks for
upturn
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The continuing depressed textiles market, together with unexpected costs on
a number of contracts within the electronics division, pushed S Jerome &amp;
Sons into losses of Pounds 1.15m in 1991.
Turnover at Pounds 37.2m was little changed from the previous year's Pounds
37.8m, when pre-tax profits amounted to Pounds 100,000.
Mr Alan Jerome, chairman, said there was some evidence that a slow recovery
was in progress in the area of textiles.
There is no final dividend, leaving the total at 1p (2.6p). The directors
hope to return to both interim and final payments this year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11658</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Hong Kong group buys Benchmark Bk
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Guoco Group of Hong Kong, a financial services and investment group, is to
buy Benchmark Bank, a small London-based commercial bank controlled by
Benchmark Group, for an undisclosed sum.
Guoco, the locally-listed arm of Malaysia's Hong Leong Group, will carry out
the purchase through Dao Heng Bank, its wholly-owned banking subsidiary.
The acquisition, expected to be completed in May, follows Guoco's purchase
last month of a 49 per cent stake in Hoare Govett Asia.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11659</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Securities Trust of Scotland lower
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Securities Trust of Scotland reported net asset value of 70.1p at March 31,
down from the 76.9p of September 30 and 73.4p a year earlier.
Net profits fell from Pounds 10m to Pounds 9.69m for earnings per share of
3p (3.1p). A final dividend of 2.17p is recommended for a total of 3.25p
(3.1p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11660</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Rea down to Pounds 0.26m after heavy debts
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
After doubling its doubtful debt provision and making exceptional charges,
against income last time, Rea Brothers saw pre-tax profit decline from
Pounds 1.61m to Pounds 261,000 in 1991.
The private banking group provided Pounds 950,000 (Pounds 480,000) for
doubtful debts. The exceptional charge, of Pounds 189,000 (credit Pounds
945,000), represented a provision made by Rea Brothers (Isle of Man)
relating to potential payments under the Depositors' Compensation Scheme in
respect of the collapse of BCCI.
Earnings fell to 0.65p (4.09p) but the final dividend is 0.25p to hold the
total at 0.5p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11661</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Sphere Investment Trust cuts pay-out
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Sphere Investment Trust reported a net asset value of 20.9p per income share
and 66.7p per zero dividend share at December 31.
The figures compared with respective values of 19.3p and 58.9p 12 months
earlier.
Net revenue for 1991 rose to Pounds 4.33m (Pounds 4.09m) and earnings per
income share emerged at 3.53p (3.34p). A fourth interim dividend of 1.0575p
was paid in February bringing the total for the year to an unchanged 3.87p.
However, directors announced a reduced first interim of 0.75p and forecast a
total of 3.1p in a strategy designed to ensure full recovery of advance
corporation tax and to provide sufficient capital growth to safeguard
interests of zero dividend holders.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11662</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: VTR improves to Pounds 276,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
VTR, the video editing group, made a pre-tax profit of Pounds 276,000 in the
six months to February 29.
That was down on the Pounds 432,000 of the comparable period, but improved
over the Pounds 169,000 of last year's second half.
Turnover came to Pounds 3.53m (Pounds 3.18m) and operating profit to Pounds
413,000 (Pounds 556,000). Earnings were 2.4p (3.7p) and the interim dividend
is held at 1.2p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11663</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Wyevale buying Lewes operation
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Wyevale Garden Centres is increasing the number of centres under operation
to 41 with the acquisition of Swanborough Garden Centre of Newhaven Road,
Lewes, Sussex, for about Pounds 1.78m.
Consideration will be satisfied from the proceeds of a placing of 946,872
shares at 171p each to raise Pounds 1.62m. The shares will not rank for the
final dividend.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11664</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Tharsis loss rises and dividend halved
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Losses at Tharsis, the Glasgow-based group mainly involved in land
development in Spain, increased from Pounds 153,000 to Pounds 290,000 in
1991 and for the second successive year the dividend is halved.
There is no final payment, leaving the total at 3p. In 1990 the distribution
was cut from 12.5p to 6p.
On top of the loss, there were extraordinary charges of Pounds 1.46m. More
than Pounds 1m covered the costs of the ruling in the Spanish courts against
the company in respect of a claim of guarantees given for the performance of
an associate company.
The directors have received legal advice that the judgment should be
appealed.
Low gold price and a weak dollar on the result of bullion operations caused
Filon Sur to return a substantial loss, of which Pounds 408,000 has been
charged to Tharsis.
After a tax credit, losses came to 5.32p (earnings 3.23p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11665</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: GKN sets up centre in Japan
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
GKN, the components and industrial services group, and Tochigi Fuji Sangyo
are establishing, through their Viscodrive Japan joint venture, an
engineering centre in Japan for the continued development of Viscodrive
viscous couplings.
GKN has a 51 per cent interest in the joint venture.
The centre, which will cost Pounds 7m, will be built on a greenfield site at
Tochigi, near to Tochigi Fuji Sangyo's manufacturing facility. It is
expected to be operational from 1994.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11666</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: IBC losses halved to Pounds 4.5m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR ROY WATTS, chairman of International Business Communications (Holdings),
the specialist provider of business information, said the board was
'pleased' with the company's results for 1991, a year when pre-tax losses
were reduced from Pounds 10.1m to Pounds 4.5m.
The company, which has almost completed disposals of all its non-core
businesses, has undergone its second restructuring in 18 months.
Previously in November 1990, IBC's banks were left with 75 per cent of the
equity; as part of the restructuring announced in August 1991, 33 executives
bought 15.2m shares (10 per cent) from the banks. Further transfers from the
banks to the investing group of executives could reduce the banks' ownership
of ordinary shares to 50.7 per cent.
The new debt structure came into being on January 1 1992.
Operating profits grew from Pounds 462,000 to Pounds 4.79m, on turnover of
Pounds 50m (Pounds 74m).
However exceptional charges of Pounds 126,000 (credit Pounds 718,000), net
continuing interest reduced to Pounds 2.64m (Pounds 11.2m), accrued
debenture interest 1996 of Pounds 2.3m (nil) and non-continuing interest
payable of Pounds 4.23m (nil) caused the losses on the pre-tax line. Losses
per share emerged at 2.9p (28.5p) and again there is no dividend,
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11667</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Scot Power in Rumbelows deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON, Scottish Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SCOTTISH POWER, the electricity utility in southern Scotland, is expanding
its retail network by buying 17 shops and eight superstores from Thorn EMI,
which is pulling out of electrical retailing.
Scottish Power said the deal will reinforce its position as the leading
electrical retailer in Scotland, with a network extending into northern
Scotland - the territory of its rival Scottish Hydro-Electric.
The 17 shops are currently part of Rumbelows, with the superstores trading
under the Atlantis name. The shops will now come under the Scottish Power
banner and will develop its position as a brown goods retailer in addition
to being a white goods outlet.
In January, Thorn EMI said electrical retailing had lost the group about
Pounds 50m over the past three years. Its chain of 450 Rumbelows shops,
which had not made a profit since 1986-87, would be converted to rental
outlets for consumer electrical goods although most have kept the Rumbelows
name.
About 800 head office, service and distribution jobs would go, the group
said. The estimated cost of the changes was put at Pounds 40m-Pounds 45m.
Scottish Power is understood to be paying Thorn EMI Pounds 5m-Pounds 10m,
including stock.
Thorn EMI said it was pursuing a different strategy in Scotland to that in
England, because it already had enough rental outlets in Scotland to be able
to dispense with the Rumbelows stores.
Mr Mike Smith, Scottish Power's marketing and distribution director, said
that with the purchase it will have 91 shops and 11 out-of-town stores
Scottish Power doubled its share of the Scottish electrical goods market and
raised its retail turnover by 40 per cent in the year to March 31 1991,
converting a loss of Pounds 5m into near break-even.
Mr Smith said retailing was inherently profitable. He was particularly
pleased to buy the out-of-town stores, which would have taken several years
to set up from scratch.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11668</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / 1991 Results Season: Chairmen play poopers at optimists'
party - The market may be picking up, but companies remain gloomy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHILE THE stock market is bathing in the sunshine of an economic revival -
real or supposed - the chairmen of many UK companies appear to be deep in
gloom.
Judging by statements in many of the company results announced recently,
trading conditions are still difficult and there are few, if any, signs of
an upturn. The best chairmen say is that their companies will be well placed
when the recovery comes.
Sir Denys Henderson, chairman of ICI, the chemicals group, typified many
such statements in his annual report. He said that 'there is little doubt
that the coming months will continue to be difficult' and predicted the
recovery would be gradual when it did arrive.
The results season, for calendar year companies at least, is now drawing to
a close. The actual numbers have produced few surprises, if only because
analysts had already cut their forecasts with guidance from the companies
themselves.
What was more surprising was the relative lack of dividend cuts, which had
been feared in advance of the season. Companies have been reluctant to cut
dividends, even if they are not covered by earnings, perhaps hoping to keep
share prices up, or in the expectation that a recovery in profits will come
in time to cover the next pay-out.
If the dividends have been a plus point for the stock market, the chairmen's
statements have been a definite disappointment. There were hopes that
chairmen could produce some evidence for a pick-up in demand, allowing
market strategists to base a more bullish view on some harder evidence.
Now interest will shift to chairmen's remarks at annual meetings for signs
that the anecdotal evidence of a post-election pick-up in activity is
working through to companies.
Sir Christopher Tugendhat, chairman of Abbey National, did little to bolster
such hopes this week, saying that house repossessions were going to be
higher than his company had earlier expected.
As a result of the gloomy statements, there is already a movement to reduce
earnings forecasts for the current year, if only because profits for the
first half are likely to prove dull yet again. Forecasters are not expecting
much of a rise in output this year - with estimates of a 0.8 per cent GDP
increase for the year fairly typical - with the second quarter, perhaps,
marking the turn from minus to plus.
SG Warburg, the broker, for instance, had been going for a 17 per cent rise
in earnings from industrial companies at the start of the year, but has cut
that back to 14 per cent. With the stock market on an historic p/e of 16 - a
high level - some strategists feel it cannot go much higher than the current
level of 2,600 or so on the FT-SE 100 without better news on earnings.
A more bullish view is offered by County NatWest, which is expecting the
FT-SE 100 to reach 3,000 by the year-end, although it forecasts a rise in
industrial earnings of 10-12 per cent, which would keep the market p/e at
around 16. It argues that the p/e is always high just at the start of a
recovery, and then growth in earnings brings the multiple down.
The optimists suggest that analysts were not bearish enough when companies
were moving into recession and will underestimate the recovery when it
comes. The work many companies have done to cut costs will mean that even
without a pick-up in demand, profits will improve this year. Productivity
has risen as companies were quick to cut employee numbers. When there is an
uplift in volume, operational gearing could mean a sharp jump in earnings,
they argue.
But Mr Nick Knight, strategist at Nomura, counters that 'it will take a long
time for earnings to justify this level of the market'. He is bearish about
the current post-election euphoria, which he calls 'tenuous, at best'.
He says that a clear Conservative victory in the election would inevitably
and rapidly lead to an economic recovery was over-optimistic. 'You could
have Snow White and the seven dwarfs in Number 10 and they would not be able
to magic away the problems.'
Others also fear that the high level of real interest rates will continue to
delay recovery. Mr Peter Warburton of Robert Fleming Securities, the
merchant bank's broking side, is forecasting no economic growth in 1992
because of high interest rates.
While some headlines suggest that the current strength of sterling will mean
interest rate cuts, many in the stock market are more sceptical, believing
that base rates will stay above 10 per cent for most of the year.
There is a concern that now the government has been re-elected it can
continue its fight against inflation without fearing the electoral
consequences of high interest rates.
Another damper is the corporate sector's need to raise money. This is
particularly true if a recovery does come. Finance is needed to increase
working capital and to invest for the recovery, and the banks are still
reluctant to lend.
So far this year there have been relatively few rights issues, although more
companies have tapped the long-term debt markets. But more rights issues are
expected.
Adding those to new issues and a higher demand for funding by the
government, much of the institutions' cashflow is already spoken for. 'I
cannot reconcile what needs to happen to balance sheets with a rising equity
market,' says Mr Warburton.
There is agreement, though, that the recovery when it comes will be led by
consumers. The late-cycle sectors like chemicals and building companies will
have to wait until 1993 for much prospect of recovery.
One of the few chairmen to speak optimistically when reporting profits was
Sir Ian MacLaurin, head of Tesco, the supermarket group. He said last autumn
had seen the low point for his business and that 'recession is moving away'.
A similar story can be seen in the responses to the Confederation of British
Industry's distributive trades survey. However, March was a dull month for
retailers - put down to the calling of the election and the comparison with
a good month last year. It's hoped The hope is that April will produce a
better figure, with brisk Easter trading after the election.
While some argue that there is pent-up consumer demand and that real wages
are rising, others say that with house prices still falling - even if
activity in the market is picking up - consumers' confidence is still
fragile.
Recovery needs confidence and the hope is that the defeat of Labour and its
tax plans - although not making consumers better off in fact - will at least
make them feel they are.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11669</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: SeaCon chief undecided on new IoM bid
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SUE STUART
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   DOUGLAS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR JAMES Sherwood, president of Sea Containers, the Bermuda-based cargo
equipment and ferry company, paid a surprise visit to the Isle of Man
yesterday to attend the 162nd annual meeting of the Isle of Man Steam Packet
Company.
Sea Containers holds a 41 per cent stake in the company after making a
hostile bid in 1990. The bid was later withdrawn, but, under Stock Exchange
rules, Mr Sherwood is now free to bid again.
Speculation was rife among Steam Packet shareholders that his presence at
yesterday's meeting heralded an announcement of such a move. However, Mr
Sherwood said Sea Containers had not decided at the moment to renew the bid.
Steam Packet achieved record results for 1991 with a 21 per cent increase in
pre-tax profits from Pounds 3.3m to Pounds 4.1m.
Mr Norman Corlett, Steam Packet chairman, told the meeting: 'Once again I
have to express regret that so much time and money has been spent on
ownership matters. The Manx directors fervently hope that the future of the
Sea Containers shareholding will be resolved this year.'
Mr Corlett reported that for the first quarter of this year, passenger and
car carrying were up 2 per cent and 3 per cent respectively.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11670</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Bell Canada offshoot to take control of ELT
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BCE TELECOM International is to take a controlling interest in East London
Telecommunications which owns six cable television franchises in the London
area covering about 630,000 homes.
The deal will make BCE, a subsidiary of Bell Canada, a significant force in
the UK cable television industry.
The Canadian company has reached agreement to buy PacTel Cable's 45 per cent
investment in ELT, and is also buying part of the stake of Jones UK, the
other current main shareholder in ELT.
Together the two purchases will give BCE a controlling interest although
Jones will continue as manager of cable TV operations.
PacTel Cable, a subsidiary of Pacific Telesis of the US, has long made it
clear that it wanted to sell its minority stake in ELT and concentrate on
the 1m homes in the UK in cable franchises it wholly owns.
The ELT franchises range from the London boroughs of Newham and Tower
Hamlets to Barking, Waltham Forest and Epping.
Progress, however, has been slow and BCE estimates that Pounds 200m in
capital expenditure is needed over the next five years to fully develop the
business.
Bell Canada will obviously be interested in expanding the telecommunications
and data services of ELT.
The latest figures from the Independent Television Commission show that in
the year from January 1991 the number of telephone lines installed by cable
TV contractors in the UK increased from 2,224 to 21,225.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11671</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Jupiter Tyndall replaced as trust manager
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN, Personal Finance Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BOARD of the European Project Investment Trust yesterday announced that
it had appointed Murray Johnstone to replace Jupiter Tyndall as investment
managers of the trust.
The change is another setback for Jupiter Tyndall, the financial services
group formed from the merger last year between Jupiter Tarbutt Merlin and
Tyndall Holdings. Pacific Horizon, another trust managed by Jupiter Tyndall,
is currently the subject of an agreed bid from Martin Currie Pacific, which
will mean the loss of another management contract.
However, Jupiter Tyndall has acquired, on behalf of its clients, an 11 per
cent stake in European Project, and has informally proposed to the board
that shareholders should be given the opportunity to sell their shares at as
close as possible to asset value. Mr John Duffield, chairman of Jupiter
Tyndall, said that it was an important principle that shareholders should
have this option if the management is changed.
If European Project rejects the suggestion, then Jupiter Tyndall has the
option of calling an extraordinary meeting to vote on the proposal.
Mr Duffield said that Jupiter was surprised at the change of manager, given
the performance of the trust. Association of Investment Trust Company
figures show that the trust had the 3rd best (out of 13) asset performance
of European general trusts over the year to March 31.
Mr Jonathan Bradley, chairman of European Project, said that there had been
pressure from shareholders to narrow the discount and expand the asset base
of the trust. A proposal from Jupiter Tyndall to merge European Project with
Jupiter European investment trust, and create a new split capital trust, had
been rejected.
Mr Bradley felt that Murray Johnstone's strong presence in the private
investor market should bring in extra demand for the trust's shares, via
savings schemes and personal equity plans, thereby helping to narrow the
discount.
Investment trusts have been very successful in attracting private investors
over the last few years, a process which has reduced the discount to net
assets on which trust shares have traditionally traded. Mr Bradley said that
in future he thought it would be 'quite difficult for trust management
companies that don't have some means of reducing the discount to be
successful'. He added: 'The days of huge discounts and cosy sewn-up boards
are over'.
European Project's shares were only trading at a discount of 8 per cent
yesterday but Mr Bradley said the discount had averaged 'in the high teens'
for quite long periods and had only narrowed after the board had announced,
on April 10, plans to change the investment management arrangements.
Murray Johnstone has agreed to take a reduced fee of 0.5 per cent in the
first year of managing the trust. In the following two years of its three
year contract, the fee will be 1 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11672</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Burmah chief's pay rises 40% despite static
profits
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FREEMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE PAY of Mr Lawrence Urquhart, chairman and chief executive of Burmah
Castrol, rose by 40 per cent last year according to the group's annual
report and accounts.
The increase was recommended by Burmah's remuneration committee despite the
fact that annual profits were static and earnings per share fell by 19 per
cent.
Mr Urquhart earned Pounds 385,000 in 1991, against Pounds 277,000
previously. Burmah said the increase contained equal amounts of
performance-related bonus, a straight percentage annual rise and an element
related to his post of chairman.
The comparison with the previous year is complicated by the timing of his
promotion at the start of July 1990. The accounts show that Mr Urquhart
received Pounds 156,000 as chairman and chief executive in the 1990 second
half, which means he earned Pounds 121,000 as chief executive in the first
half. That implies an annual chairman's salary of Pounds 70,000 before last
year's increase.
The accounts also reveal details of Burmah's purchase of Foseco, the
chemicals group, for Pounds 270m at the of 1990, giving the fair value of
Foseco's net assets as Pounds 110m. Much of the goodwill was written off
against reserves in 1990, leaving a Pounds 30m write-off last year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11673</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Peugeot Talbot profits halved
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PROFITS OF Peugeot Talbot, the UK subsidiary of the French car maker, were
more than halved last year.
The company is expected to disclose today that its net profit fell to Pounds
30-Pounds 35m in 1991, from Pounds 74m in the previous year. The pre-tax
balance dropped from Pounds 109m to about Pounds 50m.
The UK motor industry suffered a severe setback last year in the face of the
deep recession in the new car market.
Along with Peugeot Talbot, Vauxhall, the UK subsidiary of General Motors
remained in profit, while several other British car makers, most notably
Ford, Jaguar and Rolls-Royce suffered record losses.
Rover Group motor vehicle operations plunged into an Pounds 83m pre-tax
loss, compared with a profit of Pounds 103m in the previous year.
While the overall UK new car market declined by 21 per cent, Peugeot new car
registrations fell by only 6.6 per cent to 115,557 123,671)
Its UK market share has increased steadily in recent years; it rose to 7.3
per cent in 1991, from 6.2 per cent in 1990 and only 4 per cent in the
mid-1980s.
Profits were depressed last year by the near-25 per cent drop in car output
at the Ryton, Coventry, assembly plant to 87,983 (116,548).
Close to 70 per cent of the UK output was exported.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11674</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Prestwick returns to the black with interim
Pounds 81,000
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON, Scottish Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRESTWICK Holdings, the Ayr-based printed circuit board manufacturer, made a
pre-tax profit of Pounds 81,000 in the six months to January 31, compared
with a loss of Pounds 741,000 in the comparable period of 1991.
Turnover rose by 17 per cent to Pounds 13.9m, reflecting increased exports,
mainly to EC countries, and contributions from acquisitions.
Prestwick said that the costs associated with the new acquisitions and the
costs of increasing production in the company's plants at Ayr and Irvine
were being taken in the first half.
'We will continue with our strategy to create a broader-based
interconnection group,' Mr Wayne Osman, chief executive, said. Many of the
elements designed to give the company a significant competitive edge were
now in place.
The interim dividend is maintained at 0.5p, payable from fully diluted
earnings of 0.4p (losses of 2.3p) per share.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11675</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: Anglo Irish Bankcorp and Hill Samuel end
sale talks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VINCENT BOLAND
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   DUBLIN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ANGLO IRISH Bankcorp and Hill Samuel Bank have terminated negotiations on
the proposed purchase by Anglo of Hill Samuel Bank (Ireland), after failing
to agree detailed terms and conditions during negotiations following the
completion of their due diligence process.
The two sides announced agreement in principle on the deal on December 24
last year. Three weeks earlier, Anglo had raised IPounds 26m on a rights
issue.
Mr Sean FitzPatrick, Anglo's chief executive, said yesterday that the deal
failed because Anglo was unwilling to pay the minimum price sought by Hill
Samuel, part of the TSB Group. 'The gap between us got closer as
negotiations went on but our final ceiling price was below their floor price
at the end,' he said.
The difference between the parties when negotiations were terminated could
be as much as IPounds 10m (Pounds 9.2m).
Mr FitzPatrick said yesterday that the bank was pressing Mr John Clegg, a
former non-executive director and ex-chief executive of Wace, to dispose of
his family's 15 per cent stake and that prospective buyers had been
arranged.
He said the Clegg family was not willing to sell because to do so may be
interpreted as an admission that the rumours linking Wace with the IRA were
true.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11676</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: DC Gardner rejects third approach
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DC GARDNER, the loss-making management consultancy and business services
group, has rejected for the third time an approach from Mr Colyn Gardner,
its former chairman.
Mr Gardner, who holds a 10 per cent stake, said he was prepared to offer
'substantially more' than last night's closing price of 38p, through his
company, Capelfield.
It is believed that Mr Gardner, backed by a leading financial institution,
is offering about 54p per share. This would value the group at about Pounds
13.5m, compared with a market capitalisation of Pounds 9.5m.
Mr Gardner says funding for the offer is conditional on the unanimous
backing of the board and a due diligence report into the group's financial
condition.
DC Gardner said it was not obliged to notify shareholders of the 'informal
approach'. 'Under (the) Takeover Code, we are entitled to be satisfied that
Capelfield is in the position to fund the offer in full. We have not been
satisfied.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11677</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: SB blames Wall Street as shares fall 17p
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES IN SmithKline Beecham, the Anglo-American pharmaceuticals and
household products company, continued to fall yesterday despite its
announcement of better-than-expected first quarter results.
The shares fell 17p to 799p, from 872p at the start of the week, as US
investors continued to sell healthcare stocks. 'The fall is not a reaction
to the results, it's Wall Street,' said Mr James Culverwell of Hoare Govett.
SB reported a 10 per cent increase in pre-tax profits to Pounds 278m in the
three months to March 31. Mr Robert Bauman, chief executive, said the
company maintained its momentum of 1991, when profits exceeded Pounds 1bn
for the first time, and most divisions performed well in the first quarter.
The first interim dividend is lifted by 10.7 per cent to 4.15p (3.75p) for
the A shares, and by some 13 per cent to 48.77 cents (43.09 cents) per
equity unit, stock issued to SmithKline Beckman's US shareholders during the
1989 merger with Beecham. The difference between the dividend growth is due
to exchange translation rates.
Turnover increased by 9 per cent to Pounds 1.21bn while trading profit
improved 8 per cent to Pounds 289m. Currency movements lifted sales 4 per
cent but depressed profits 2 per cent.
Trading profits from pharmaceuticals were 10 per cent higher at Pounds 218m.
The antibiotic Augmentin performed well in Europe, although US sales
declined. Tagamet, a peptic ulcer treatment, increased worldwide sales by 2
per cent.
Havrix, marketed as the world's first Hepatitis A vaccine, has been
introduced in the UK, Switzerland and Belgium but it is too early to assess
its success.
The consumer brands division maintained profits at Pounds 44m, although
turnover increased by 5 per cent to Pounds 322m. Tums, the indigestion
treatment, and Aquafresh toothpaste lifted sales 14 per cent and 15 per cent
respectively.
The clinical laboratories division increased trading profits 27 per cent to
Pounds 14m, while animal health products were affected by recession and saw
a 7 per cent decline to Pounds 13m.
Interest charges fell to Pounds 12m (Pounds 15m). The company used a net
cash inflow of Pounds 106m to reduce borrowings by Pounds 48m to Pounds
454m.
Earnings increased to 13.5p per A share and 67.5p per equity unit.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11678</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UK Company News: A Fisher dips 17% in tough trading -
Balance sheet remains strong despite Pounds 47m cost of acquisitions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BOLGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALBERT FISHER, the fresh produce distributor and food processor, blamed
extremely difficult trading conditions in the US and UK for a 17 per cent
drop in interim profits.
Turnover, boosted by acquisitions, rose 16 per cent to Pounds 588m (Pounds
506m) in the six months to February 29, but pre-tax profits fell from Pounds
45m to Pounds 37.2m.
Shares in the group peaked at 133p last year, but fell steadily following
the resignation of its chief executive in the US. Yesterday they closed at
69p, down 2p.
Mr Tony Millar, the executive chairman who rapidly built up the group by
making more than 50 acquisitions, has since strengthened the US management.
This month Mr Tim Howden, 55, joined as group chief executive in Europe,
having previously been managing director of Rank Hovis McDougall, the food
group.
Mr Millar said that last year the City had been swept by fears over
companies which had experienced rapid growth during the eighties. He took a
pragmatic view of such shifts in sentiment and the group's strengthened
management team intended to get their heads down and concentrate on
producing growth.
The biggest problems in the half-year were in the US, with a 38 per cent
drop to Pounds 6.7m in underlying operating profits from fresh produce.
Although market shares were maintained, the volume of sales to leading food
service customers declined, reflecting a fall in hotel occupancy and
bookings for cruises, airlines and restaurants.
However, the group said its strengthened management team had cut staffing
levels by between 3 and 5 per cent, and was making good progress in turning
round the results of the distribution operation in Los Angeles.
In Europe, operating profits from fresh produce grew by 4 per cent to Pounds
7m. The UK potato packing operation performed disappointingly, and adverse
weather reduced volumes of fruit from Spain and Chile, but this had been
offset by the group's international sourcing expertise.
Operating profits from frozen and chilled foods in Europe were down 11 per
cent to Pounds 11.1m. Large increases in the fish and vegetable businesses
were offset by weakened UK demand for frozen vegetables and cockle supply
problems in the Netherlands.
Food processing and distribution in Europe saw a marginal dip in operating
profits to Pounds 8m (Pounds 8.1m). The group said the merger of three UK
operations - Stratford-upon-Avon Foods, Rowats Foods and Unimerchants - into
Fisher Quality Foods had resulted in substantial benefits.
The balance sheet remained strong, with net cash of Pounds 14m, following
Pounds 47m expenditure on acquisitions, Pounds 15m of capital expenditure
and a seasonal investment of working capital. Net assets fell from Pounds
273m to Pounds 253m.
The fall in UK interest rates cut interest income from Pounds 8.5m to Pounds
4.41m.
In March, Albert Fisher sold Holco, a Dutch mushroom and asparagus bottling
plant, to Hillsdown Holdings, the food processing group, at a loss of Pounds
5.95m, which it treated as an extraordinary item.
Earnings per share fell by 17 per cent to 4.31p (5.18p), but the interim
dividend is lifted to 1.85p (1.75p).
See Lex
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11679</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Japan's government acts to end doubts on banks' health
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEFAN WAGSTYL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN'S Ministry of Finance yesterday issued a detailed report on the
financial performance of Japanese banks, in an attempt to quash doubts about
the health of the country's banking system.
The ministry released estimates of the banks' financial results for the year
to the end of March, saying Japanese banks were 'very sound' and would have
no difficulty coping with the fall in the Tokyo stock market or a sharp rise
in bad loans.
The ministry's action followed the sharp fall in bank share prices and
reports of growing concern overseas about some Japanese financial
institutions. The statement was issued after the stock market closed
yesterday, but speculation about its contents helped the Nikkei average to
rise 562.93 to 17,402.05.
However, foreign bankers said any improvement in sentiment about Japanese
banks could be short-lived because the figures in the ministry's statement
were largely in line with expectations. They said the ministry had not
allayed worries about further write-offs in 1992-93 which could be much
larger.
The finance ministry said operating profits for all 153 Japanese banks rose
26.8 per cent to Y3,659bn (Pounds 15.46bn), boosted by declining interest
rates. Pre-tax profits fell 17 per cent to Y2,799bn, due to aggressive
write-offs for loans and investment loans, including those related to the
property market. Net after-tax profits fell 24 per cent to Y1,379bn.
Banks' valuation losses on share portfolios surged 500 per cent to Y1,734bn
and the write-off for bad loans rose to Y639.3bn.
A senior ministry official said the large national banks - including 11 city
(commercial) banks, three long-term credit banks and seven trust banks - had
between Y7,000bn and Y8,000bn in bad loans at the end of the fiscal year.
However, the ministry official said banks could easily cope with bad loans
because they had unrealised portfolio gains of Y17,000bn.
The figure for bad loans is lower than analysts' estimates of at least
Y20,000bn. However, much depends on the way in which bad loans are
calculated.
The ministry said all but 'one or two' leading banks cleared the 8 per cent
capital adequacy ratio set by the Bank for International Settlements.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11680</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Bank of Scotland offers Lloyds deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT PESTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BANK OF SCOTLAND is interested in taking up to 500 branches from Lloyds
Bank, if Lloyds decides to bid for Midland Bank, it emerged yesterday. Such
a deal might help Lloyds persuade the Monopolies and Mergers Commission not
to block its bid.
Lloyds said yesterday it was keeping 'under review' the question of what it
should do in the light of Hongkong and Shanghai Bank's Pounds 3.3bn bid for
Midland.
Lloyds believes the MMC may obstruct a takeover attempt because of concerns
that competition in the market for small business loans may be reduced. If
Lloyds were to transfer a significant number of branches to another smaller
bank, such as Bank of Scotland, or the Scottish operations of National
Australia Bank, that could increase competition.
According to banking sources, Bank of Scotland is likely to be interested in
such a deal.
Banking sources also warned yesterday that Lloyds would probably need
parliamentary approval in the form of a private member's bill to integrate
fully its operations with Midland's. Under the parliamentary timetable, such
approval might not be forthcoming until the end of next year.
Lloyds' board last night discussed the possibility of bidding for Midland
though formal debate is taking place this morning. But if Lloyds does decide
to make an offer, it may not launch its bid until after the weekend.
In today's board debate, Lloyds' executive directors, led by the chief
executive, Mr Brian Pitman, are understood to be in favour of bidding.
There are six executives on the board, likely to be supported by Mr Michael
Thompson, deputy chairman and formerly deputy chief executive.
There are also 12 non-executive directors whose views are harder to gauge,
according to bankers. Lloyds' chairman, Sir Jeremy Morse, is said to be
uneasy about making a move that would be viewed by Midland as hostile.
In his first public statement since it emerged a month ago that Lloyds is
interested in buying Midland, Sir Jeremy said Hongkong Bank's bid had
'implications' for all other big UK banks. Speaking at Lloyds' annual
shareholders' meeting, he said: 'We are keeping it under review.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11681</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Vickers sees Rolls-Royce sale recede
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
VICKERS, the UK engineering group, said yesterday that offers received for
its troubled Rolls-Royce Motor Cars subsidiary had been too low, in spite of
discussions with potential purchasers which had ranged 'far and wide'.
Sir David Plastow, chairman and chief executive, told shareholders that the
range of valuations put upon the business by others 'does not match the
long-term value which we think Rolls-Royce Motor Cars has to Vickers
shareholders'.
The receding prospect of an early sale of the heavily lossmaking luxury car
operations depressed the Vickers share price which closed 10p lower at 154p.
Several shareholders pleaded with Sir David at the group's annual meeting
yesterday to keep the car operations in British ownership. 'My 90-year-old
mother chased me to this meeting,' said one. 'She is absolutely horrified
that the company could be sold to the Japanese or the Germans. There is much
more to this than just a business deal.'
Sir David, who retires at the end of May, said the Vickers board had
considered 'the options for the car business in the best long-term interests
of shareholders'.
It had held 'exploratory discussions with a number of international
companies' but Sir David claimed that 'many people think they understand the
Rolls-Royce Motor Cars business but few do'.
After the shareholders meeting, he said 'it could be that it is not for
sale. That might be the conclusion that we are coming to.'
While Rolls-Royce was having 'a difficult time in its market place, the
company is most definitely not in permanent decline', he told shareholders.
Mr Peter Ward, Rolls-Royce Motor Cars chairman and chief executive, said the
car operations would reach break-even on a monthly trading basis during the
final months of the year.
Sir David forecast that worldwide Rolls-Royce/Bentley sales in 1992 would be
'at similar levels' to last year. Sales in 1991 plunged 48.3 per cent to
1,723 - the lowest level since 1968 - from the record 3,333 achieved in
1990.
In the first quarter of this year, UK sales of 109 were 47.8 per cent lower
than a year ago, while sales in Japan fell from 179 to 58. In the US, sales
recovered to 94 from 76 a year earlier.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11682</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / The Lex Column: Albert Fisher
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Albert Fisher has taken to spinning a remarkably conservative line these
days. Where takeovers once ruled, organic growth and non-executive directors
are now the order of the day. Having illustrated the need for an Accounting
Standards Board with its annual results in October, the group has had a
change of heart which may or may not be connected with the chronic
underperformance of its shares.
The interim figures followed the ASB's recommendations on extraordinary
items to the letter, crystallising a Pounds 6m loss on the disposal of the
Holco mushroom company and a related Pounds 12m write-off of goodwill
through the profit and loss account. Pre-tax profits fell by 17 per cent in
the first half, thanks largely to lower demand in the US where like-for-like
operating profits fell by 40 per cent.
Cost-cutting by new US management should bring benefits in the second half,
but Fisher concedes that progress will be slow until the economy improves.
The shares are on a current year multiple of less than 8. The company will
have to consolidate its new identity before that changes.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11683</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / The Lex Column: Germany
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The March surge in German money supply may have shocked Frankfurt's
financial markets, but the Bundesbank is unlikely to risk international
opprobrium by raising interest rates. Equally, with the M3 aggregate growing
at an annual rate of nearly 10 per cent, there is less reason than ever to
expect a cut in official rates this year.
Higher rates might make the money supply problem worse. The inverted yield
curve has already swollen demand for short-term bank deposits, which form
part of M3, at the expense of bond investment. That is pushing up the rates
on government paper, incidentally limiting the scope for lower gilt yields
in the UK.
Interest rates are a blunt instrument for curbing credit when generous
subsidies are available on loans to eastern Germany. But all the Bundesbank
can do now is sit tight till inflation abates. If Germany's European
partners cannot accept the consequences, their only recourse is a
realignment. What price Maastricht then?
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11684</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / The Lex Column: ICI
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ICI's decision to pull out of its loss-making nylon business is to be
welcomed, particularly since it gets world leadership in acrylics and Pounds
250m cash in exchange. But the deal raises a mildly disturbing question. The
list of traditional commodity businesses ICI has lately abandoned also
includes fertiliser, soda ash, lime and salt. In theory, it should be
replacing these with more specialised products offering higher added value.
But in the past year, it has pulled out of a large part of its advanced
materials business. This deal takes it out of engineering plastics. Where is
the ICI of the future?
Granted, the nylon deal is not quite done yet. Du Pont's case for being
allowed to take a European market share of up to a third in some products
rests on the need for a regional champion to take on Far Eastern producers
in world markets. It remains to be seen whether Brussels is receptive to the
idea; and if not, how far the rest of the deal can be rescued.
In the meantime, another nagging question remains. At its best in the 1980s,
the nylon business was no more than decently profitable. With hindsight, it
might usefully have been sold off in the last wave of ICI restructuring a
decade ago. Could there be other businesses the company is failing to tackle
this time round?
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11685</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / The Lex Column: BAe
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr John Cahill's appointment at British Aerospace comes as something of a
relief. BAe is a sprawling organisation with a proliferation of plants and
shaky financial controls. Mr Cahill, who comes from a company with legendary
financial controls and 800 operating units, plainly has much to offer. It is
slightly odd that he has no background in the political aspects of the job,
which in a curious reversal of roles will be attended to by the chief
executive. But if he and the shortly-to-be announced finance director can
improve BAe's operating efficiency, that will do to be getting on with.
The longer-term shape of the business remains more problematical. Mr Cahill
asserts that his first priority is to increase market share in BAe's defence
business, which will otherwise carry on dwindling as the peace dividend
rises. The motor and property businesses are best left alone until their
markets improve, but their place in the portfolio must surely be under
review. And while Airbus may be best allowed to come right in its own time,
there is a pressing need to deal with the regional aircraft business. It is
Mr Cahill's job to disprove the familiar aphorism of Mr Warren Buffet: that
when a manager with a high reputation takes on a company with a low one, it
is the company's reputation which emerges intact.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11686</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / The Lex Column: Dowty comes to earth
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The sad truth about TI's bid for Dowty is that the target could scarcely
have tried harder to provoke attack. It may have put a brave face on things
by maintaining its interim dividend last December despite a 73 per cent fall
in pre-tax profits, but that cannot distract from a flawed and badly
executed strategy of diversification into information technology and
electronics. Dowty's market capitalisation is lower than it was six years
ago, while that of TI has more than tripled.
Like Hawker Siddeley before it, the company is thus left with a lame
defence. The question is basically one of price. TI appears to have pitched
its offer just high enough to give any lurking rival second thoughts. It can
justify the price to its existing shareholders on the grounds of confidence
in its own ability to sell the information technology and electronics
businesses quickly. Though this is, belatedly, part of Dowty's strategy too,
a new and less sentimental management would probably have more luck.
With that out of the way, the merged group would be free of debt and able to
enjoy the benefit of the cost savings Dowty's management has already
instituted. That prospect might just about make the deal look opportunistic
enough for the institutions to demand a small increase in the Hawker manner,
but it is an outside chance at best.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11687</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Letter: Bookmakers closer than the polls
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr LEONARD STEINBERG
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Much has been written recently about opinion polls, and during the
weeks prior to the election our lives were governed by them. Some people say
the conclusions of opinion polls are so inaccurate that they should not be
taken seriously. My letter to you is written as a bookmaker running one of
the larger betting shop businesses in the country. I believe that the odds
the bookmakers quoted were much more accurate than the variety of margins
given by so many different opinion polls.
On the morning of the election, most bookmakers had the Conservatives as
slight favourites, which was a good indication and so much more accurate
than either the opinion polls or the exit polls. Carrying my profession a
little bit further forward, I believe opinion polls can influence electors,
and also believe that if they are not stopped entirely, they should
certainly not be permitted during the last few weeks of an election
campaign.
Leonard Steinberg,
chairman,
Stanley Leisure Organisation,
Stanley House,
4/12 Marylebone,
Liverpool L3 2BY
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11688</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Letter: Engineers' status in UK now seen in 'quite a new
light'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr RON KIRBY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, There were points in Mr Ledger's letter (April 18) on the status of
engineers which call for comment.
Much to our delight, recent independent research has shown that young people
from all backgrounds are starting to see engineers in quite a new light.
'They travel the world and earn lots of money . . .'; 'They work with three
dimensional computer imaging . . .'; 'Engineers are like doctors, lawyers
and accountants . . .'; 'There's glamour in being an engineer. You have a
lot of freedom, you invent things, you try out new ideas . . .'; 'I fancy
the travelling, designing and building machinery, and using computers to
help you design . . .'
These are just some of the spontaneous replies young people gave when asked
what they thought about engineers by researchers evaluating our
Neighbourhood Engineers scheme. The scheme sends engineers and technicians
to secondary schools to work in teams with teachers giving friendly,
informal advice across the national curriculum. More than 6,000 engineers
and technicians are already involved with 1,600 secondary schools.
Further evidence of a change in attitude among teenagers is the increased
number of young people applying for places in higher education to study
engineering.
Another myth which still persists is that 'many British engineering
graduates go into the financial sector'. Not true. Seventy-eight per cent of
engineering graduates take up jobs in industry. Twelve per cent go into
finance or commerce and the remaining 10 per cent go into other fields. We
are quite happy with 12 per cent going into finance; we need analysts and
others in the City who understand engineering.
Salaries? Over the last few years, engineers have seen their average
earnings move up well above the Retail Prices Index, according to
Remuneration Economics. Some examples: 1988, increase in earnings of 9.5 per
cent (RPI 4.8 per cent); 1989, 12.1 (8.2); 1990, 14.5 (9.8); and 1991, 10.0
(5.5).
And status? Margaret Thatcher told the 1985 Engineering Assembly that it had
to be earned. But a few months ago, at the national final of our Young
Engineers for Britain competition, John Major, the prime minister, said it
is his aim to change the culture of Great Britain 'so that the British
engineer enjoys the same status as the German engineer'.
Ron Kirby,
director of public affairs,
The Engineering Council,
10 Maltravers Street,
London WC2R 3ER
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11689</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Letter: Rail action in Italy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr ANGELO GENNARI
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Robert Graham ('Rail chief gets tough', April 14), though generally
well-informed and scrupulous, does not this time accurately describe the
'tough action' he writes about.
Without any consideration of the merits of the conflict he recounts, it
should in effect be noted that:
'unauthorised industrial action' does not exist in this country: no
authorisation, by anyone, is ever necessary to go on strike, and therefore
the employees who went on strike will not be penalised for having done so;
management will rather 'deny pay increases' to those employees on strike
against the very collective bargaining agreement that brought those
increases to them: meaning they cannot eat and refuse the cake;
it is not 'strikers' who are penalised through the pay packet, but those
employees who refuse the pay increases won for them through collective
bargaining by the most representative trade unions in the country. Including
my union.
Angelo Gennari,
director,
studies and research,
Italian Confederation of
Workers' Trade Unions (CISL).
v. PO 21, 00198 Rome,
Italy
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11690</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Raw materials of a promising deal: The swapping of ICI's
fibres unit for Du Pont's acrylics businesses raises questions about ICI's
development
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL ABRAHAMS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir Denys Henderson, the chairman of ICI, was in good humour yesterday as he
announced he was swapping his fibres operations for the acrylics businesses
of Du Pont, the US chemicals group. The thought that Pounds 250m in cash
would also make its way to ICI as part of the deal added to the width of his
grin.
'This is the first significant deal achieved through my swap-shop idea,' he
explained. 'Chemical companies need to be as imaginative as possible as they
seek to restructure their operations.'
Nevertheless, the move raises questions about ICI's longer-term ability to
develop its businesses. The deal follows a fundamental reappraisal of the
operations that began in September 1990. The company's reshaping, Sir Denys
insists, was already initiated before Lord Hanson's conglomerate took a 2.8
per cent stake in the company last May. ICI realised it had to cut costs to
remain competitive.
Since the reassessment, Sir Denys's management team has been skilful at
restructuring and disposing of businesses. During the past 20 months
observers estimate ICI has sold off nearly Pounds 1.5bn of assets. These
include its fertiliser business, soda ash and lime interests, and salt
operations. At the same time costs have been slashed. Since January 1990,
more than 14,000 staff have been cut.
Sir Denys says the company has adopted a strategy of concentrating on
businesses that are either global or highly profitable. The fibres
businesses at the centre of yesterday's swap fitted neither criteria.
The history of ICI's involvement in fibres is long and unhappy. The decision
to pull out follows protracted struggles to make the unit profitable. Fibres
contributed significantly to the materials division's losses of Pounds 14m
during the last quarter of last year.
A combination of a long-term shift in the fibre customer base from Europe to
Asia, combined with the recession, finally convinced Sir Denys to sell.
For more than 20 years the company has been grappling with increasing
competition from the Far East. The problem has been that ICI's operations
have been based mainly in Europe where its customer base has been shrinking.
As textile manufacturers have increasingly shifted to low labour-cost areas
in Asia, so fibre-manufacturing has been set up there.
Between 1970 and 1991, the European share of the world man-made fibres
market shrunk from 31 per cent to 18 per cent, while production outside the
US, Europe and Japan has increased from 24 per cent to 54 per cent.
ICI has responded to increasing Asian competition by pulling out of areas
where it would be forced to compete purely on price. During the late 1980s
it made the difficult decision to stop making polyester, which the company
invented.
Instead, ICI concentrated on high-performance nylons for home furnishings,
carpets and clothing, such as ski-wear, all sectors where it believed it
could command a premium. In 1988, the fibres operations generated profits of
Pounds 53m.
But while premium clothing and household products were successful during the
late 1980s, by the recessionary early 1990s they flourished less well. Mr
Scott Davidson, managing director of ICI Fibres, estimates demand for nylon
fell 20 per cent during 1991 alone. Most European manufacturers are still
running their plants at 80 per cent capacity.
Caught by falling demand, ICI fibres management slashed costs. Nearly 1,000
jobs were cut in 1991 and a further 800 were planned for this year. The
division's headquarters at Harrogate was closed and replaced by an office in
Brussels with only 20 staff.
In spite of such cost-cutting efforts, Sir Denys decided that the fibres
operations could no longer be considered as core businesses. In February,
when Sir Denys announced last year's full-year results, he warned that
rationalisation at the fibres unit had been insufficient to improve margins.
Sir Denys said yesterday that ICI could not afford to expand its nylon
businesses to the US and Asia, or update its plants in Europe.
'We have to be truly global,' said Sir Denys. 'And we just couldn't justify
the additional investment needed to do that in fibres.' He added that the
cost of environmental measures in the UK and Europe had been far higher than
expected since the mid-1980s.
Certainly, ICI could not afford to compete with Du Pont. Mr David
Williamson, Du Pont's European president, estimates his company has on
average recently spent a total Dollars 500m a year on updating plants. It
has announced a Dollars 1bn nylon plant for Singapore and plans to spend
Dollars 10bn over the next decade on nylon production elsewhere.
Du Pont, the world's largest manufacturer of nylon, believes it can make a
better job of the fibres businesses than ICI because it can afford to spend
money on them. The deal meets two of its strategic goals, according to Mr
Williamson. It reinforces one its core businesses - nylon - while at the
same time extending its reach in Europe.
Du Pont had little previous presence in the European nylon market, says Mr
Robin Anson, managing editor fibres and textiles publications at the
Economist Intelligence Unit, the market research group. 'In this business
size has become critical.'
Du Pont will become the leading supplier of nylon in Europe with about 25
per cent of the market, according to the company. It will be competing with
other suppliers such as BASF of Germany, France's Rhone-Poulenc and Akzo of
the Netherlands.
Sir Denys said yesterday the swap was not an indictment of ICI's fibres
management. He pointed out that other European companies were restructuring
their operations. Last month Rhone-Poulenc and Snia of Italy merged their
staple fibre and polyamide carpet yarn operations. He said managers had
struggled to bring the businesses to sustained profitability.
Many of ICI's businesses are now facing difficult conditions. The
management, which has succeeded in making disposals, must now prove it can
expand its businesses organically.
A key test will be how it handles the new acrylics businesses which fit Sir
Denys's strategic perfectly. ICI will be transformed from number three to
the world's leading manufacturer of acrylics - used, for example, for
windows and bathroom furniture - with production and sales of Pounds 500m a
year in the US, Europe and Asia. Dupont's acrylics businesses had sales of
Dollars 300m in the US, where they were second to Rohm and Haas, the
American group.
ICI's confidence in the business is demonstrated by the doubling of capacity
in the UK and Taiwan. Although profit margins have historically been between
15 and 20 per cent, they are presently depressed by the global recession.
Meanwhile, disposals of petrochemicals and plastics businesses are probably
in the pipeline. The danger is that Sir Denys could find the company he
chairs might one day no longer merit inclusion in the chemical industry's
first division.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11691</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Letter: DTI changes that raise hopes of greater support for
exporters (2)
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From C F J SIEGL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, You report ('Treasury given regulatory role', April 16) that the DTI
will retain overall responsibility for insurance companies in the new
division of responsibilities between the DTI and Treasury.
It is to be hoped that this division will include the Export Credits
Guarantee Department (the UK government insurance agency), whose formal
place is with the DTI but whose policies have been systematically dictated
and eroded by the Treasury during the last parliament.
We look forward to the new secretary of state for trade and industry having
the vision and will to establish through ECGD the long-term political
initiatives which will give our exporters the stability they need to thrive
and prosper.
C F J Siegl,
Flat 1,
Northam House,
15 New Street,
Wells, Somerset BA5 2LD
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11692</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Letter: DTI changes that raise hopes of greater support for
exporters (1)
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr IAN J CAMPBELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, The professional exporting community welcomes Mr Michael Heseltine's
decision to restore the title president of the board of trade (Observer,
April 21).
For far too long in recent history the 'trade' element of the Department of
Trade and Industry has been treated as the Cinderella sector. International
trade is vital to the UK's economy. Unless we reverse the current disastrous
balance of payments deficit, sterling's weakness and high interest rates
will persist indefinitely.
We hope that the new president's clearly expressed ideas on appropriate
levels of government support will assist Britain's hardworking (and often
unsung) exporters to improve on our 8 per cent share of world trade.
To achieve this he will have to cut a broad swathe through the ideological
jungle of myopia Treasuriensis. Perhaps this is an ideal job for Tarzan?
Ian J Campbell,
director general,
The Institute of Export,
Export House,
64 Clifton Street,
London EC2A 4HB
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11693</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Building blocks of recovery: The factors fuelling the US's
emergence from recession
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The US economy seems to be recovering from one of the longest periods of
stagnation since the Great Depression. But the pace of growth is sluggish
and the US is unlikely to serve as an effective locomotive for the world
economy, as it did in the early 1980s.
On the contrary, alarm about adverse trends in Japan and Germany is raising
doubts about the outlook for US exports, which have contributed heavily to
overall growth in recent years. At the same time, few economists are
entirely confident about the domestic revival: a relapse into full-blown
recession is not expected, but few forecasters would be shocked if a period
of faster growth were followed by another temporary setback.
Last Friday, Mr Alan Greenspan, the Federal Reserve chairman, told the
Senate banking committee that a mild recovery appeared to be under way, but
he was evidently frustrated at its sluggish pace in spite of repeated cuts
in interest rates. 'I don't find 2 per cent growth, which is what we're
experiencing at this particular stage, adequate,' he said.
The International Monetary Fund was also noticeably cautious in its latest
economic forecast released this week. Officials say a US recovery seems to
be under way but describe it as 'modest' and 'hesitant'. The IMF, like most
other forecasters, expects growth to fall far short of the 5-6 per cent
annual rate typical of the early stages of past recoveries.
The Fed's anxiety is understandable. After a surprise easing of monetary
policy a fortnight ago, the federal funds rate - the cost of overnight money
for banks - is 3.75 per cent, the lowest level for a generation. Low rates
have stimulated rapid growth of bank reserves. But bank credit remains
depressed and M2, the main measure of the money supply, has again dropped to
the bottom of its 2.5-6.5 per cent target range. Within a few months of this
happening last year, a weak economic recovery had fizzled out.
The Fed is nervous because the economy is behaving strangely. From the
Second World War to the Reagan boom of the 1980s, the economy followed a
traditional business cycle. During upturns, inflation rose and companies
began to accumulate inventories - stocks of unsold goods. Fiscal and
monetary policy was then tightened, curbing demand and causing an abrupt
liquidation of inventories. After a brief downturn, policies were loosened
and companies began to rebuild inventories. Growth surged and the cycle
began again.
The past few years have not fitted this pattern. The rise in oil prices
triggered by Iraq's invasion of Kuwait in August 1990 tipped the economy
into a brief recession: gross domestic product declined sharply in the final
quarter of 1990 and the first quarter of 1991. But this short period of
contraction was only a phase in a much longer period of stagnation.
Excluding the two quarters of declining output, the economy has grown at an
annual rate of barely 1 per cent for three years. Unemployment has crept
higher and now stands at a six-year high of 7.3 per cent.
This slowdown was fundamentally different from previous post-war recessions.
The late stages of the 1980s boom were characterised less by an excess of
inventories (which remained tightly controlled) than by a glut of real
assets, especially commercial real estate but also of cars and other
consumer durables. This was financed by excessive levels of debt in all
sectors of the economy. The relevant question today is not whether the
economy is capable of inching forward, but whether balance sheet strains
have healed sufficiently to permit a healthy recovery.
Late last year, the outlook appeared grim. With employment and production
falling, many sectors of the economy seemed to be experiencing a 'double
dip' recession. But late in December, Mr Greenspan seized the initiative,
cutting the discount rate by a full-point to 3.5 per cent. This decisive
move - the boldest of his career - prompted a surge in share and bond prices
and checked a damaging slide in household confidence.
Today the short-run outlook seems brighter partly because the monetary
relaxation is being supported by an easing of fiscal policy. To bolster its
re-election chances, the Bush administration has accelerated federal
spending and reduced personal tax withholding rates. The IMF reckons the
total fiscal stimulus this year is equivalent to about 0.8 per cent of GDP,
less than in the early 1980s but still significant.
The signs of economic improvement are visible mainly in the consumer and
housing sectors.
Residential construction is the one sector of the economy to have enjoyed a
'normal' recovery since early last year. Housing starts have risen almost
continuously and are now running at an annual rate of more than 1.3m -
sharply above last year's trough - but a pace that may not be sustained
given demographic changes that have reduced the demand for housing.
Personal consumer spending is estimated to have grown at an annual rate of
about 5 per cent in the first quarter, relative to the final quarter of last
year. This rebound, however, only compensated for weakness during most of
last year and leaves consumption subdued relative to past recoveries.
The rapid growth of consumer spending, however, may not be sustained. Sharp
increases in retail sales in January and February reflected special factors
 -temporary injections of spending power from tax refunds and higher benefit
payments, unusually warm weather and faulty seasonal adjustments. The
savings rate also declined from already depressed levels.
Retail sales dipped slightly in March. And, significantly, car sales -
usually a crucial ingredient in consumer upturns - had not recovered even by
early April.
In other sectors, solid evidence of recovery remains patchy. The Purchasing
Managers' Index - a guide to the health of manufacturing - has bounced back
after a sharp decline in the winter. But order books are filling slowly.
Industrial production grew sluggishly in February and March but only partly
made good previous falls.
Non-agricultural employment rose only marginally last month and was not
significantly higher than last May, when the faltering upturn supposedly
began. On the other hand, claims for unemployment insurance have fallen
quite sharply in recent weeks, providing tentative evidence of an upturn.
Exports were weak around Christmas but rebounded strongly in February,
helping reduce the monthly trade deficit to only Dollars 3.4bn, the smallest
shortfall since 1983.
What is likely to happen next? A minority of monetarist economists is
worried about a potential resurgence in inflation. The shadow open-market
committee set up to second guess the Fed is already calling for higher
interest rates. Most economists, however, are confident that inflation will
remain subdued at about 3.5 per cent, in spite of a freakish 0.5 per cent
jump in the consumer price index last month.
But there are clouds on the horizon. The core consumer price index has risen
more rapidly than expected for several months. And a leading indicator of
inflation compiled by economists at Columbia University is pointing to an
early acceleration of inflation - to perhaps 4 per cent.
On output, the range of opinion is surprisingly narrow. A few brave souls
are projecting GDP growth of slightly more than 4 per cent at an annual
rate, but the majority of forecasters - including the White House and Fed -
expect growth to fall in a 2-3 per cent band. Fast rebounds are always
possible when production is running well below capacity, but there are many
reasons to favour the more conservative growth forecast:
The poor international outlook. Mr Greenspan is probably right to downplay
the direct impact of Japanese share price falls on US markets. But the
shifting of resources into the export sector to help service debts incurred
in the 1980s has left the American economy more dependent on overseas
markets than ever before. Since 1987, exports have accounted for two-thirds
of total growth.
Low consumer confidence and weak labour markets. The long US stagnation
appears to have seriously dented household confidence. Indices of consumer
sentiment rose slightly in March but remain close to their lowest level for
a decade. The sour mood is closely linked to labour market trends. After
generating more than 18m jobs in the 1980s, the Great American Jobs Machine
is idling. This mainly reflects a belated wave of restructuring in service
industries. While beneficial in the longer term, the immediate effect is to
create unusual job insecurity for white-collar employees.
Sectoral weakness in defence and commercial real estate. The drag on the
national economy from defence cuts is widely underestimated. The
retrenchment has already led to the loss of 780,000 jobs with another 1m set
to disappear by 1995. Industrial production of defence and space equipment
is down more than 10 per cent from its 1990 peak with further cuts in the
pipeline. Commercial real estate, meanwhile, is showing few signs of
recovery. Indeed, further large cuts in non-residential construction
spending appear likely given a precipitous fall in building permits.
The debt overhang. A surge in bond and equity issues has allowed companies
to restructure debts. Many households have refinanced mortgages at lower
rates and paid back some instalment debt. But this has addressed only a
fraction of the 'excesses' of the 1980s. As a share of GDP, household and
corporate debt remains well above the levels of the early 1980s, not to
mention previous decades. In contrast to previous recoveries, consumer and
business spending in this upturn seems unlikely to move far ahead of
sluggish income growth.
These trends seem likely to flatten the normal trajectory of recovery.
Looking further ahead Americans may need to adjust to diminished growth
prospects. Annual growth in excess of 3 per cent during the Reagan boom
reflected unsustainable levels of borrowing. Even the ever-bullish White
House Council of Economic Advisers concedes that the potential growth rate
in the 1990s is only about 2.2 per cent a year compared with 2.7 per cent in
the 1980s. And even this requires an unexplained jump in productivity growth
to offset slower expansion of the labour force.
The biggest economic challenge for Mr Greenspan and other policymakers may
thus lie less in achieving an unspectacular growth rate of about 2 per cent
than in convincing Americans that - at current levels of savings and
investment - this is the best to be expected without an acceleration of
inflation.
 --------------------------------------------
AMERICA'S LACKLUSTRE RECOVERY
 --------------------------------------------
REAL GDP
 --------------------------------------------
  1991/92          Average of
 % change       past recoveries
   0.6               3.0
 --------------------------------------------
INDUSTRIAL PRODUCTION
 --------------------------------------------
  1991/92          Average of
 % change       past recoveries
   0.8               4.1
 --------------------------------------------
HOUSING STARTS
 --------------------------------------------
  1991/92          Average of
 % change       past recoveries
  32.7              31.2
 --------------------------------------------
EMPLOYMENT
 --------------------------------------------
  1991/92          Average of
 % change       past recoveries
   0.0               1.6
 --------------------------------------------
CONSUMER SPENDING*
 --------------------------------------------
  1991/92          Average of
 % change       past recoveries
   2.1               3.5
 --------------------------------------------
CAPITAL SPENDING*
 --------------------------------------------
  1991/92          Average of
 % change       past recoveries
  -2.1              -1.2
 --------------------------------------------
CORPORATE PROFITS
 --------------------------------------------
  1991/92          Average of
 % change       past recoveries
   4.3              32.2
 --------------------------------------------
PRODUCTIVITY
 --------------------------------------------
  1991/92          Average of
 % change       past recoveries
   0.7               2.7
 --------------------------------------------
Recovery periods: trough to trough plus two
qtrs/eight months. Includes recoveries from
1969/70, 1973/75 and 1980/82 recessions.
Assumes 1991/92 recovery began May 1991.
* Real
 --------------------------------------------
Source: Gail Foster, The Conference Board
 --------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11694</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Free to speak their minds
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOE ROGALY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
In a free country even former prime ministers have the right to express
their views. If Mrs Margaret Thatcher declines to enter a nunnery, as many
of her erstwhile colleagues wish she would, that is her business. Her
celebrated article in Newsweek is best regarded in this light. It tells us a
bit about her, and a bit about the internal debate among Tories. It is a
contribution to public knowledge. There is no need to expostulate about its
author's claims to political immortality.
What it tells us about Mrs Thatcher is unsurprising. She does not say so,
but it is clear that she is no longer an imminent threat to the stability of
the government, as she was perceived to be last year. She cannot diminish
the authority given to Mr John Major by the decisive victory won under his
leadership on April 9. These are unpalatable facts. Her reaction to them
reveals her to be as vulnerable to fits of self-justification as anyone
else. 'If a man gets up and says, 'Look, really, I'm a very modest man',
would you believe him?' she writes. 'What about the person who says 'I care
far more about people than she did'? Look at the record, and make a
judgment.' Plainly, Mrs Thatcher is unable to see herself as others see her;
most of us have the same difficulty with ourselves. Those who consult the
record will judge Mr Major to be more modest, and more caring, than his
predecessor.
There is, however, profit in considering the issues she raises. These are
real enough. 'They think they would do more for the public services than I
did,' she protests. 'Some think that implies taking a bigger proportion of
growth, leaving less to the people.' This is a serious argument, to which Mr
Major must eventually respond. The health and education services cannot be
improved by the magic wand of opting-out alone. When the new management
structures are in place, the demand for more cash will be strongly supported
by accompanying accounts. Mrs Thatcher, whose insistence on 'sound finance'
has always been unwavering, speaks for an important segment of the party
when she warns that the government's share of the national income must be
reduced.
If he had not taken a vow of silence about her outbursts, Mr Major could
reply that he is aware of the need to restrain public spending. He appointed
one unreconstructed Thatcherite, Mr Michael Portillo, chief secretary to the
Treasury, and another, Mr Peter Lilley, to head the most intractable of the
giant spending departments, social security. A third, Mr Michael Howard,
will cap local authority spending. The new defence secretary, Mr Malcolm
Rifkind, will stand or fall by his ability to squeeze a maximum peace
dividend out of a notoriously spendthrift department. After a while we may
consult the record and assess whose administration turned out to be the most
frugal  - Mr Major's or his predecessor's.
Mrs Thatcher has also warned against what she calls 'a policy of intervening
in industry', by which she must mean Mr Michael Heseltine. She is not the
only Tory to be worried about our tall friend. We may assume that he will
reverse the dry-as-dust strategy of the old Thatcherite industry department.
There would have been little merit in his taking the job if he was not to be
allowed to do it his way. Mr Major must have known this when he offered the
post to Mr Heseltine. He cannot have appointed so powerful a politician to
so important a department with the intention of struggling to restrain him
at regular meetings throughout the next four years.
These and other well-known Thatcher concerns (such as further integration of
the European Community) will be voiced through her new foundation and
perhaps from a platform in the House of Lords. Mr Major has no need to
worry. Since his election in his own right he can reasonably expect the
allegiance of the bulk of his party. Yet he will not have a free ride. Where
Mrs Thatcher has a legitimate point, he will have to win the argument.
So much for her. Another politician in a spot of bother over something he
wrote is Mr John Patten, the education secretary. His article in last week's
Spectator affirms his belief in God and bemoans the increasing
secularisation of our society. The question I have heard people ask this
week is: 'Should an education secretary express religious views?' My answer
is: 'Of course he should. Why on earth not?' I have previously criticised Mr
Patten, but that was because I do not agree with his views on constitutional
reform. His right to be a Christian and proud of it is, however,
unquestionable, even if he is education secretary.
I will venture further down the path of political incorrectness, to suggest
that perhaps Mr Patten is wiser than his critics. 'Secularisation,' he
writes, 'submerges the quaint and old-fashioned idea that in the end
happiness comes not from cars, colour televisions and consumables but from
within ourselves.' He is right, right, 100 per cent right.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11695</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Leading Article: Don't patent human genes
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE NATIONAL Institutes of Health, the US government's medical research arm,
has created turmoil in the biotechnology industry and outrage in academic
science by filing almost 3,000 patent applications for human genes whose
function is still unknown.
The most prominent casualty of the storm so far is James Watson, who
discovered the structure of genes 40 years ago. He resigned last week as
head of the US-led Human Genome Project, part of a Dollars 3bn international
effort to work out the entire genetic blueprint for human beings. Watson's
bitter opposition to the NIH patenting policy was a primary reason for his
forced resignation.
Although the technical details of the dispute seem esoteric, the financial
and medical implications are enormous. A large part of the biotechnology
industry in the next century will depend on knowing the detailed sequence of
human genes. Converting that knowledge indiscriminately into marketable
intellectual property, as NIH is trying to do, would damage the development
of the industry. It might also inhibit academic research leading to cures
for diseases such as forms of cancer that cannot even be treated today.
International action is needed urgently to sort out the confusion caused by
NIH's precipitate action - which was taken with the approval of the Bush
administration - and create a new framework for genetic patents. The OECD
would be a suitable forum in which to develop an agreement outlawing the
indiscriminate patenting of genes. It should still be possible to patent the
discovery of individual genes whose function and potential commercial uses
are specified.
Pre-emptive strike
Allan Bromley, President Bush's science adviser, defends the US move as a
pre-emptive strike to defend the interests of the American taxpayer against
private companies which, NIH believed, were preparing to bombard the Patent
Office with similar applications. But it has already had a disastrous impact
on international co-operation in genetic research.
The UK Medical Research Council, backed by the government, is preparing to
retaliate by filing US patent applications next month for more than 1,000
genes discovered by its scientists, using automatic sequencing machines like
the NIH researchers. The MRC says it wants an international ban on such
patents but in the absence of an agreement it has to 'protect the UK
position'.
Other countries with substantial DNA sequencing programmes - notably Japan,
France, Germany and Italy - are not only opposing the US action but also
resisting the temptation to retaliate like the MRC by filing their own
patents. In characteristic style, Hurbert Curien, the French science
minister, took the moral high ground with his declaration that 'a patent
should not be granted for something that is part of our universal heritage'.
National interests
The European countries are angry with the MRC for condemning the NIH and
then following its lead. But they are protecting national interests by
refusing to send genes discovered by their scientists to an international
DNA database which the MRC recently set up in London with EC funding. Their
reaction shows how the NIH patent applications are inhibiting the
information exchange that should underpin basic medical research.
It is possible, of course, that the US Patent Office will resolve the
problem simply by rejecting the NIH and MRC applications, on the ground that
they fail to specify a practical use for the genes. If so, the biotechnology
industry will breathe an immense sigh of relief. But experts say it would be
unwise to count on this, because the US is remarkably liberal in its
interpretation of what makes a valid patent.
Biotechnology is already bedevilled by disputes over intellectual property,
which have enriched hundreds of patent lawyers over the past decade while
inhibiting the development of the industry. But the NIH move on gene
fragments brings a threat of patent wars on an even larger scale. It will be
in the interests of all parties - even the US taxpayers whose interests NIH
claims to protect - to agree that mass-produced genes cannot be patented.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11696</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Leading Article: Overhauling the aid agencies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE THIRD WORLD is confronted by a hotch-potch of agencies anxious to
provide funds to encourage its development. But this ad hoc system of
development lending looks increasingly ill-equipped to meet the challenges
posed by the fall of communism and the shift to more market-friendly
economic policies throughout the developing world. Rationalisation is
required; what is needed is not fewer agencies but more clarity over their
respective roles.
The many institutions in this business were created at different times for
different reasons; their roles have been fine-tuned over the years to deal
with newly-perceived problems. Together they are responsible for loan
commitments of around Dollars 40bn a year, about 60 per cent of them made by
the Washington-based World Bank.
Beside it are the regional development banks for Asia, Latin America, Africa
and, as of last year, Europe. Since the World Bank can only lend under
government guarantee, a sister institution, the International Finance
Corporation, was created to encourage private sector development in part by
lending to private companies.
Most of the banks operate concessionary lending arms for the poorest
countries and other funds for special purposes. So does the International
Monetary Fund which offers cheap long-term loans for countries undergoing
structural adjustment of their economies.
Net recipients
At present, these institutions are getting more from the developing world
than they are giving - they are net recipients of resources as borrowing
governments pay more in interest and repaid loans than they receive from
them. Increasing the amounts to be lent would be desirable, but only under
the right conditions.
These would include an improved ability on the part of the lending
institutions to channel money to the private sector in developing countries.
The current system discriminates against governments wishing to use the
private sector to develop their run-down infrastructure. That the World Bank
and some of its partners can only lend to governments - and the IFC and
other private-sector lending affiliates have insufficient capital - reduces
the incentive for Third World states to privatise their utilities.
The institutions should also play a bigger role in the alleviation of
poverty and in improving the environment. The World Bank is too big and
remote to address the points of detail that are crucial to the success or
failure of anti-poverty programmes, such as getting the money to the people
who need it.
New questions
There are new questions too about so-called 'conditionality', the terms
under which loans from the institutions are granted. The ending of the Cold
War has raised the question of how much 'political' conditionality should be
introduced. Whether the existence of democracy, however defined, is an
appropriate condition for lending by the IMF and World Bank remains
controversial. But whatever the right answer, this conditionality should not
bite too deeply. It is, for instance, not sensible for the Inter-American
Development Bank to be lending for balance of payments support to a country
where the IMF and World Bank are not lending; but there is no reason why it
should not lend for a road or poverty-alleviation project.
The regional banks do have a distinctive role to play in offering specialist
and informed assistance to private sector activities, many of them quite
small in scale, and in helping to promote social welfare programmes. In many
fields the World Bank is already too big adequately to monitor the results
of its lending.
But to perform these tasks the regional development banks must strengthen
their intellectual resources (an area where they compare most unfavourably
with the World Bank) and move ahead with administrative reforms.
The reform that is definitely not needed is the replacement of the current
fractured system by one overweening development lending institution,
whatever some in the World Bank may believe. There is no monopoly on good
ideas or good practice.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11697</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Arts: Don Giovanni - Theatre Royal, Glasgow
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD FAIRMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The last time Scottish Opera tried its hand at Don Giovanni it came up with
a bizarre show featuring a Giovanni who flounced around the stage like some
self-regarding Oscar Wilde so in love with himself that he hardly had time
to think about women at all. It did not last long.
Now the company has returned to the opera and on Wednesday at the Theatre
Royal, Glasgow, it unveiled its new production, produced and designed by Tom
Cairns. This is a staging which at least looks good. A series of abstract
designs, mostly curtains slashed by swords or backdrops with
suggestively-shaped openings, makes a stylish visual impact, not least in
the graveyard scene with its window out on to an unearthly world.
There are also a few symbols brought into play. A crimson pool of light
represents spilt blood; a sword thrust into the ground marks the call to
vengeance. In the finale a giant hand beckons Giovanni to hell and a pair of
wings sticks up out of his dining-room floor. Or were they bananas or
phallic symbols? By this point the symbolism was getting obscure. And why,
incidentally, was the final sextet truncated with no explanation?
Unfortunately it will be clear by now that this is one of those productions
which poses more questions than it answers. Little interest is shown in the
characters or in getting the drama to come alive. For example, when Giovanni
starts to seduce Zerlina, no feeling of sensuality envelops the stage, and
for that the blame must be shared between Cairns and the conductor, Robert
Dean, a noted Don Giovanni himself at Glyndebourne, but not regrettably a
vivid interpreter with the baton.
In the end the sets have the colour, the depth of perspective, the subtlety
of atmosphere. Everything that goes on within them is one-dimensional, grey,
uninvolving. We know from several other productions that Steven Page can be
an effective Don Giovanni, but here he makes little impression. Gidon Saks's
Leporello is not sharp enough of wit; David Gwynne needs better intonation
as the Commendatore. Glenn Winslade repeats his trusted Don Ottavio. As
Masetto, Meurig Davies is sunk in his aria by flabby playing from the pit.
That is an endemic feature of the evening and the sense that the singers as
a team needed a stronger guiding hand may explain why the women, too, make a
limited effect. Virginia Kerr is the creditable Donna Elvira and Linda
McLeod as Donna Anna wields her sword like a true Valkyrie, though she
exited after her first aria sounding exhausted by the trial of singing
Mozart. Rosemary Joshua alone comes away unscathed, a lyric and appealing
Zerlina.
The production is further holed below the water-line by an uncomfortably
banal rhyming translation, which has Leporello listing 'strumpets and
crumpets' in his catalogue, and some strange choreography by Aletta Collins.
The last dance at Giovanni's party seemed to involve each guest sticking a
forefinger up his partner's nostril, which may or may not have been
symbolic.
What to do with this Don Giovanni? The best course would seem to be yet
another new production as soon as possible and then these stylish designs
could be used for some other opera. Almost any other would do, in fact. And
that, I fear, is ultimately half the problem.
Theatre Royal, Glasgow 041-332 9000 until 3 June, then on tour. Production
sponsored by The Foundation for Sport and the Arts.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11698</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Arts: Simon Rattle and the CBSO - Carnegie Hall, New York
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW PORTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Simon Rattle and the City of Birmingham Symphony Orchestra gave three
well-attended Carnegie Hall concerts last week. The programmes - big works
of 1911-1913, from the orchestra's Towards the Millennium enterprise - have
already been reviewed in these pages. Three of the pieces - Ravel's Daphnis,
Debussy's Images, and Stravinsky's Rite of Spring - were live manifestations
of EMI recordings.
More than once, in London, I have felt that the Birmingham orchestra was a
band overpraised - because it has so remarkable a conductor and plays so
responsible a civic role. I wondered what people would hear and think in
Carnegie, where the Vienna and Berlin Philharmonics, Cleveland, Chicago, and
Boston set standards for orchestral playing. The LPO came to Carnegie last
month, under Franz Welser-Most, played Beethoven, and by American standards
did not play well.
The New York judgment seems to be that the CBSO is an excellent but hyped
regional orchestra - as accomplished as the orchestras of, say, Cincinnati,
Baltimore, and St. Louis but not, internationally, in the first league: not
in respect of string tone or of woodwind virtuosity. The New York Times
critic put it more strongly: 'When the clouds of praise clear away . . .
what we hear is an assemblage of very modest skills . . . The wind soloists
are undistinguished. The brass is muddy and tends to creak in exposed
moments; the strings are dry.'
But that was after the first concert. I heard all three and thought that the
orchestra as it settled into Carnegie - which, after the recent rebuild, is
no longer the welcoming, flattering hall it used to be - began to sound
better and better. The strings did bloom in On hearing the first cuckoo (an
encore); they positively glowed in a movement of Apollo (another encore).
And the orchestra played often with magical softness, such as American
orchestras - even the New York Philharmonic under Masur - seldom achieve. It
also showed that it could play as loudly as any rivals, but it did not
respond to every f and ff indication with an ffff.
The only flop performance in a series of eight 1911-13 works (plus four
encores) was Pierrot Lunaire, declaimed (in German, not English) and cutely
mimed in a spotlight by Elise Ross while the instrumentalists, encouraged by
Rattle, played out, eloquently, and drowned her. The only work not worth
hearing was Prokofiev's brittle First Piano Concerto. (Forget it unless
Richter is the soloist). Nielsen's Sinfonia Espansiva, Daphnis, Images,
Jeux, and the Rite were spellbinding. Falstaff was emotionally a knockout to
a point where I struggled to stifle sobs distracting to neighbours. Eighty
years ago, composers wrote with a richness and thoroughness that makes
today's American symphonic lions - Del Tredici, Corigliano, Glass, Reich,
Torke, Kernis, Zwilich - seem sadly simple-Simon.
Simon - not the simple one, but the Birmingham Simon with high, serious aims
 -is a British success story. Nige is another. Mr Kennedy made his New York
Philharmonic debut the same week, playing the Sibelius concerto, in Avery
Fisher Hall. For the record, he wore a black-and-white patched jerkin and
prominent red-white-and-blue socks above sneakers, and sported a colourful
scarf; a peacock among penguins, he made the New York players,
conventionally clad, look dowdy, middle-aged or old.
He played the hell out of the concerto, gave a fearless, high-contrast
performance. (Colleagues made comparisons with Huberman, another
controversial violinist who put passion above polish.) I thought his
performance very exciting. So, evidently, did Kurt Masur, the responsive
conductor.
The CBSO concerts were supported by the British Arts Council, the New York
Arts Council, and many private donors.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11699</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Arts: As You Like It - Royal Shakespeare Theatre,
Stratford-upon-Avon
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MURRAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
David Thacker's new RSC production begins in darkness, and ends in light: at
least he has got one thing right. Duke Frederick's court is incarcerated in
black marble, with the men all in shiny black greatcoats and boots (it
looked at first as though the RSC had returned to the black-leather mode of
yesteryear), Rosalind and Celia tight-buttoned in dresses of an
indeterminate period. From this fairly heavy-handed start, one waited for
some definite view of the play to develop and make itself felt.
It never did. Once in the Forest of Arden, indeed, we never knew where we
were. There was a broad tilted greensward, suitable for displaying market
produce, and a huge branching tree whose foliage was inadequately disguised
for the winter scenes. What kind of charade was being played out remained
utterly unclear; it carried no undertones or overtones, nor the least
romantic conviction.
A few individually attractive performances floated free, unmoored by any
whole dramatic conception.
In the opening confrontation Peter de Jersey's Orlando was appealingly
desperate, though even in platform heels brother Oliver (Adrian Lukis)
looked hopefully menacing rather than truly nasty. (Later, on his
reappearance in the forest, he seemed not merely chastened but lobotomised.)
In the visual circumstances, Duke Frederick (Andrew Jarvis) could only be a
comic-book tyrant. The wrestling match was cautious, as if an Equity
safety-officer had laid down firm provisos. Alfred Burke made a plaintively
decent old Adam; the girls remained ciphers so far.
Nobody except poor Adam was noticeably discommoded by the Arden winter ' the
exiled Duke (Jeffrey Dench, unvaryingly placid), might have been taking his
regular seasonal break. Gary Yershon has set 'Blow, blow, thou winter wind",
like the other songs, as a pop-lusty ballad, academically well-made; he also
supplies big-band Hollywood triumphal music for the end.
Nor is anybody greatly enlivened by the coming of spring; Yershon's
home-from-the-hunt chorus, however, strikes a suddenly fierce, dark note
that gets no follow-up. Magic should be easy to come by in Arden, but there
was a great dearth of it here.
Phyllida Hancock's Celia is always pleasant and upper-middle genteel,
without any touch of the astringency that sharpens the best Celias.
Orlando remains nervously introspective and well-spoken (the more florid
speeches tax his diction a little).
Nothing special is done with Touchstone, although Anthony O'Donnell gives
him a fine, professionally waspish attack. The shepherds and the rustic
sluts are about par for the course.
There is a sterling Jaques from Michael Siberry, much the most striking
performance of the evening: strong, uncensorious, philosophically detached
but eager for discovery ' his connoisseur's delight in Touchstone's
fantastications is itself delightful. Almost alone, Siberry exemplifies the
thoughtful life that ought to inform any creditable As You Like It.
And the all-important Rosalind? Well: bobbed hair does not a 'Ganymede'
make. Samantha Bond's boyish disguise consists of a clinging open-necked
shirt and trousers cut as if positively to emphasise her femininity. Her
voice is husky but high, and its range narrow-gauge.
Mostly she flutes brightly, with brief bursts of breathy ecstasy which seem
to come from a different character, not from this 'Ganymede's' secret soul.
Understandably, Orlando keeps a wary distance; he would have to be mad to be
taken in.
Miss Bond hops from hillock to hillock, struts, poses, flings her arms wide
(eventually this routine begins to infect her fellow players too). It took
me some time to place this strangely familiar act, but at last the penny
dropped: Peter Pan] - Wrong play.
In repertory to September 11.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11700</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Arts: Moving
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALANNAH HOPKIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Hugh Leonard's new play examines the changes which have taken place among
the plain people of Ireland in the course of his long career as a dramatist,
a career which started in 1954 and has given us 31 stage plays to date.
As Moving opens in 1957, Tom and Ellie Noone have finally become the
occupiers of 'a house with stairs in it', even though the fact that they
will have to pay Pounds 4 a week to the bank for the next 20 years fills
Ellie with dread. The Noone family has four children, the eldest of whom are
typical Fifties teenagers, rebelling against the religiosity and
nationalism, of their schooling, and the heavy censorship of their films and
books. Ellie's mother, an unsober working-class granny - 'She'd steal the
pattern off a willow plate' - lives with them, causing tension. Tom and
Ellie retain family loyalties while priding themselves on a modern outlook.
When Tom Noone's schoolteacher friend, Turvey, feels obliged to feel
concerned that Tom's son no longer attends Sunday Mass, Tom Noone is
determined to talk it through, and not to play the heavy-handed
paterfamilias.
In the second act, instead of presenting the same Noones, timeworn and
disillusioned, the clever Mr Leonard presents us with a totally new set of
Noones. Tom and Ellie (their essential ordinariness once again brilliantly
captured by John Olahan and Anita Reeves) married in 1969 and have two
children aged 16 and 18. The same removals man, played with comic brio by
Johnny Murphy, acts as a king of on-stage chorus, pointing out that although
the Noones' moving day in 1987 is supposed to be roughly the same as it was
in 1957, it keeps coming out differently. One difference is that granny has
her own 'bijou home', and in contrast to the earthy survivor of Act One, is
a pretentious hypocrite. The inimitable veteran of Irish comedy, Maureen
Potter, no longer lurches about in wrinkled stockings, but minces along in a
chain-store floral frock. The teenagers are lovable middle-class 'punks'.
Turvey, the bachelor teacher, is now overtly gay.
Leonard's observation of the foibles of suburban Dublin remains sharp, as
does his concern with the ways in which people relate to their own past.
Moving is more than another comedy of manners. It is Leonard's contribution
to the debate on Irish identity, a debate which seeks to discover whether
Ireland's long overdue adoption of the values of the developed world is a
good thing, or whether something irretrievable has been lost. His answer
seems to be that as long as people like Tom Noone do not let material wealth
swamp their natural optimism, the new Irish will be all right. Would that it
were that simple.
Abbey Theatre, Dublin
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11701</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Arts: Today's Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Today's most promising offers all appear to be factual. The first in a
6-part series about British Olympic medal winners, Tales Of Gold, (7.30
BBC1) deals with Sebastian Coe and Steve Ovett. Their dominance of middle
distance running in the 1980s ought to make for a fascinating programme, the
only ominous point being the choice of Kenneth Branagh to deliver the words.
Put actors in dark dubbing theatres where they cannot show their faces and
too often they work their shirts off to be noticed via their voices. In a
rather odd bit of planning, 9.30 sees the start of another 6-part
documentary series on sport, this time rugby on BBC2. Up And Under begins
with a look at Wigan's clubs, league and union. On BBC2 in Nature (8.00),
Julian Pettifer observes British animal rights campaigners trying to rescue
another donkey from unfeeling Spaniards. Today's Short Stories (8.30 C4) is
about Barbara Carpenter, now 70, who has farmed in the Forest of Dean all
her life. Yet another new 6-part series, Made In The USA begins on Channel 4
(11.10). This time the subject is American culture generally and television
in particular.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11702</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Arts: Satyajit Ray - Obituary
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIGEL ANDREWS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Satyajit Ray, whose death was announced yesterday, was Indian cinema's
greatest ambassador to the west. Tomorrow has been declared a public holiday
in West Bengal in his honour.
He was born on May 2 1921, to a culturally prominent Bengali family. His
father, a writer, painter and photographer, sent him to Calcutta university,
after which Ray spent two years studying painting with Rabindranath Tagore.
A brief career in advertising took him to London, where he saw and was
influenced by the De Sica movie, Bicycle Thieves. That experience, followed
by a friendship in India with Jean Renoir, for whom Ray worked as a location
scout on The River, helped shape his style as a film-maker.
Before Ray's Apu Trilogy appeared - Pather Panchali (1955), followed by
Aparajito (1956) and The World Of Apu (1959) - India was a country known to
foreign filmgoers for its prolific and impenetrable popular cinema.
The tender, diligently-composed naturalism of Pather Panchali, based on an
Indian book Ray had illustrated during his years as an artist, was a
synthesis of European cinema's neo-realism with Indian miniature-painting.
It was a style which remained throughout Ray's career, subtly inflected to
suit the differing moods of his films. It could take on a fantastical-poetic
timbre in The Music Room. It could be darkened for his portraits of
oppressed or freedom-seeking women: Devi; Three Daughters; Mahanagar. Or
again his style could be coloured with fairy-tale make-believe in The
Adventures of Goopy and Bagha, or The Golden Fortress.
As Ray's career progressed, he never quite overcame the charge levelled by
some Indian critics, that he was unable to make convincing films outside his
own class. The accusation was that when Ray made films set among educated
people, or witty talk-pieces like Days And Nights In The Forest, he was on
home ground; when he depicted peasant life, however, as in Distant Thunder
or the Apu films, he made his characters behave and sound like refugees from
the leisured classes, mysteriously slumming it in the countryside.
If Ray's success abroad owes as much to a hypothetical blind spot as to the
film's visible virtues, at least the virtues include a superbly
unostentatious sense of composition, and an ability to coax subtle shadings
from performers.
His best films, like The Music Room and Charulata, dwell on the human face
and voice, flickering with tiny fires of expression.
The films made during Ray's late career declined somewhat in quality. The
Chess Players was a static parable of colonialism, shot in the gaudy colours
Ray had long eschewed. Home And The World was a tale of family tensions.
Enemy Of The People was a disappointingly wooden Ibsen adaptation.
However, Ray was ill for many years during this period, and a film-making
style already notable for its understatement could hardly take a further
depletion of energy. Even at their best, Ray's films were so gently paced
that they defeated viewers who might have been natural soulmates. Francois
Truffaut walked out of Pather Panchali because 'nothing was happening.' To
present-day tastes, The Adversary, Company Limited and The Middle Man, Ray's
caustic trilogy of morality tales about the business world, takes a long,
portentous breath to blow out a few tiny fires of fraudulence.
Modern film-makers, have been deeply influenced by Ray. James Ivory (whose
Shakespeare Wallah was homage to Ray) brought Ray's humane and delicate
precision to his best work, including his adaptations of EM Forster's
novels. In the 1960s, Ray's bleakly lyrical realism influenced British New
Wave film-makers such as Lindsay Anderson and Karel Reisz.
Realism is currently out of fashion. So, perhaps, is Ray himself. But his
best work spoke up for an important cinematic tradition: the one which comes
down to us from the Lumiere brothers, the one which believes that the
enhanced representation of real life is worth more than all the fast action
and trick photography that movies in other moods can give us.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11703</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / FT Law Report: Digest of Hilary Term cases
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AVIVA GOLDEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DAVY OFFSHORE LTD v EMERALD FIELD CONTRACTING LTD (FT, January 28)
The plaintiff, Davy, agreed to supply a floating production facility and
single point mooring to the defendant, Emerald, which was a contractor to
supply equipment and services to licensees of the right to explore and
extract oil from the Emerald Oil field in the North Sea. The scheme entailed
that Davy was to produce the various listed documents to Emerald which then
had to issue the completion certificate, sign the final stage certificate,
and obtain a section 10 certificate under the 1972 Industry Act. The
documents would then be returned to Davy which would present them to the
bank under the letter of credit. Payment by the bank was to be postponed for
five working days after presentation and acceptance of documents. Giving
judgment for Davy on the contractual intention as to the point at which
title should pass, Mr Justice Hobhouse stated that it was Davy's drawing
under the letter of credit that satisfied the condition to passing of title.
THE BERGE SUND (FT, January 31)
A charterparty provided that the master, although in the owners' employ,
'shall observe the orders of the charterers as regards employment of the
vessel'. An off-hire clause provided that hire should cease for loss of time
'not caused by charterers' fault . . . due to repairs, breakdown, accident
or damage to the vessel, collision, standing, fire, interference by
authorities or any other cause . . . preventing the efficient working of the
vessel . . . .' The vessel carried a contaminated cargo and loading was
delayed until the tanks were cleaned. The arbitration dispute concerned the
delay and the charterers claimed back hire paid for that period. The
arbitrators awarded Dollars 600,002 to the charterers, stating that they
were unable to make a definite finding as to the cause of the failure of the
corrosion test. The owners, on the other hand, contended that the delay was
caused by the the charterers who had chosen to employ the vessel in shipping
dangerous cargo. Dismissing the owners' appeal against the award, Mr Justice
Steyn stated that there had been no express finding that loss of time
resulted directly from compliance with charterers' orders.
IN RE BISHOPSGATE INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT LTD MIRROR GROUP NEWSPAPERS AND
OTHERS v MAXWELL AND OTHERS (FT, February 4)
Dismissing the appeal by Kevin Maxwell (and others) against Mr Justice
Hoffmann's decision that he must answer questions put to him by the
provisional liquidator of Bishopsgate Management Ltd, Lord Justice Dillon
said that the Court of Appeal agreed with the approach of Mr Justice
Vinelott in the case of Levitt (FT, October 29 1991), where he stated that
the provisions of the 1986 Insolvency Act must be looked at as a whole to
ascertain the purpose of an examination under section 236, and whether that
purpose necessarily involved abrogation of the privilege against
self-incrimination. There Vinelott J said: 'To answer that question, the
court must ask whether there is any public interest in ensuring that the
inquiry was carried out thoroughly and expeditiously.' Part of the mischief
in the old law was its apparent inability to deal adequately with dishonesty
or malpractice on the part of bankrupts or company directors. By the 1986
Act, parliament had acted to allay public concern and, with the assistance
of the court, had extended greatly the investigative powers available to
appointed office-holders.
GIROZENTRALE UND BANK DER OESTERREICHISCHEN SPARKASSEN AKTIENGESELLSCHAFT &amp;
OTHERS v THE TOSG TRUST FUND LTD (FT, February 5)
The nine plaintiff banks appealed against a decision that the defendant, the
Tosg Trust Fund Ltd (incorporated in 1970 by members of an unincorporated
association, the Tour Operators Study Group (Tosg)), was entitled to use
money advanced by the banks for purposes other than in connection with
claims against members of the Tour Operators' Study Group. In allowing the
appeal, the Court of Appeal stated that in so far as monies had been
expended in alleviating the consequences of failure to customers of
subsidiaries of a holding company, Travel, they were not expended in the
performance of the Fund's rights, duties, powers or discretions set out in
its memorandum of association. When the banks had issued their bond, they
had covered one company only, namely Travel, and had exposed themselves to
the risk of failure of Travel which, in the present case, was the only Tosg
member. Thus the banks' exposure in the present case could not be affected
or extended by something of which they knew nothing.
STANDARD CHARTERED BANK AND ANOTHER v WALKER AND ANOTHER (FT, February 7)
The banks proposed the reconstruction of Brent Walker and sought injunctions
requiring the defendants to vote in favour of, or restraining them from
voting against, resolutions at an extraordinary general meeting. The banks
believed that if the restructuring arrangements were not approved, Brent
Walker's collapse would be inevitable and the shares would be worthless. In
giving judgment for the banks, Mr Justice Vinelott stated that, in
appropriate and rare circumstances, the court had the jurisdiction, however
it was described, to restrain conduct which would destroy property over
which a debtor had given a charge. It was only in an extreme case that the
court would interfere by injunction with the exercise by a
shareholder/debtor of the voting right attached to his own shares. However,
in the present case, the banks had shown that the obstruction of the
reconstruction proposals would amount to the wilful dissipation of assets
which, consistent with Mareva principles, the court had jurisdiction to
prevent happening.
GOMBA HOLDINGS (UK) LTD v MINORIES FINANCE (FT, February 11)
Minories Finance made substantial advances to the mortgagors under
debentures, guarantees and mortgages. Demands for repayment were not met and
joint receivers of the assets were appointed. After having raised sufficient
funds to meet their liabilities, the receivers were discharged but there
were outstanding disputes as to the accounts. The mortgagors served notice
of their objections to the accounts submitted, including 'unreasonable
and/or improper amount'. Mr Justice Vinelott declared inter alia that the
mortgagors were not entitled to object to non-litigation items on the ground
that they were unreasonable. Allowing part of the mortgagors' appeal, the
Court of Appeal stated that the effect under Order 62 Rules 19 and 24 was
that if an account contained items of litigation or non-litigation costs,
they could be referred to a taxing master for him to decide what amount was
recoverable. The mortgagors were entitled to object to items that they said
were unreasonable but any doubts were to be resolved in favour of Minories.
ITALIA EXPRESS (FT, February 12)
After the assured, Mr Ventouris, had served notice on the underwriters for
total loss of the vessel Italia Express under a War Risks insurance policy,
the underwriters did not dispute that the loss fell within one of the
insured perils. Their sole defence was that the loss was caused by Mr
Ventouris's wilful misconduct. On the 37th day of the trial, the
underwriters withdrew those allegations. The present issues related to
damages and Mr Ventouris claimed special or general damages for (a) loss of
income which would have been earned by a replacement vessel; (b) loss of
increase in capital value of a replacement vessel; and (c) damages for
hardship, inconvenience and mental distress. The underwriters contended that
such damages were irrecoverable in principle, and that those claimed under
(c) were in any event not sustainable. Upholding that damages were not to be
awarded under (c), Mr Justice Hirst stated that such claims were only
recoverable in the case of a contract to provide peace of mind or freedom
from distress. A marine insurance contract was not of that character.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11704</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Appointments: Virani brothers leave Control Securities
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Nazmu, Zul, and Silu Virani are leaving the board of Control Securities, the
property and leisure group which they rescued from the brink of liquidation
in 1985.
Although the brothers still own about 11 per cent of the company, it
announced yesterday that they would step down as directors and executives.
Trading in the company's shares has been suspended since October, when the
Serious Fraud Office - investigating the collapse of the Bank of Credit and
Commerce International - led a raid on the homes of the Virani brothers and
Control's offices. Nazmu has been charged with involvement in a false
accounting conspiracy.
Nazmu has often been cited as the force behind the Virani success, but
colleagues say the younger, lower-profile brothers have also been vital.
They, like Nazmu, fled Idi Amin's Uganda in fear of their lives 20 years
ago, having left behind a land-based wealth worth millions.
Starting with a supermarket in Dulwich, London, the family business rapidly
grew to become a property and leisure empire comprising 24 hotels, a brewery
and 800 pubs.
The Virani family is now worth more than Pounds 80m and Nazmu alone ranks
among the wealthiest 100 people in the UK. However, the family's involvement
in the pub business has raised some controversy within the Islam community -
the brothers are all devout Ismaili Muslims - as drinking alcoholic
beverages is strictly forbidden. Nazmu dismisses such concerns, saying his
religion does not forbid him to make money.
Zul, a small stocky man, held the post of managing director of the leisure
division. This became the powerhouse of Control's growth following the
collapse of the property market. Lean and lanky, Silu was the man behind
Control's property successes in the heady days of the 1980s.
Their resignations, along with Nazmu's, appear to have been the price which
Control must pay to achieve a relisting. The Stock Exchange says this now
depends on information regarding their successors.
*****
Barbara Manfrey, formerly joint md of EM Warburg, Pincus &amp; Co International,
has been appointed a director of APAX PARTNERS &amp; CO VENTURES.
*****
John Bennett has been appointed head of compliance for Hill Samuel and a
director of HILL SAMUEL BANK; he moves from Citibank.
*****
KLEINWORT BENSON SECURITIES has appointed as directors Richard Allan,
Yashwant Bajaj, Julian Brown, Edward Cumming-Bruce, Andrew Edmond, Albert
Edwards, Maxwell Elvidge, Simon Fine, Robert Fowlds, Martin Graham, Peter
Isard, Simon Mould, Darren Smith, Mark Stokes, and Simon Toller. KLEINWORT
BENSON INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT has appointed as directors David Felder, Keith
Hamilton, Nigel Lanning, Stephen Renals and William Steel.
*****
Brian Carter and Graham Lowe have been promoted to become finance director
and sales director, respectively, of ABBEY NATIONAL FINANCIAL SERVICES.
*****
Christopher Norris has been appointed a director of WINTRUST SECURITIES.
*****
Robert Davis has resigned from SMITH NEW COURT.
*****
Masahito Omachi has returned to London as md and chief executive officer of
NIKKO EUROPE in place of Isao Sakuraba who has returned to Japan. Koji
Mitsumori has been appointed md of the European administration division in
place of Kunihiko Inagaki who has also returned to Japan. Akihisa Furuno has
been appointed company secretary.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11705</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Appointments: Hanson man for Hadleigh
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
HADLEIGH INDUSTRIES, the troubled USM-quoted mini-conglomerate which had
substantially to restate the size of its interim losses last month, has
hired a man from Hanson to help put its finances in order.
Nigel Davis, 38, who has spent 11 years with various Hanson subsidiaries,
has been appointed finance director in place of David Maddison who resigned
after the company was forced to restate its first half pre-tax losses from
Pounds 283,000 to Pounds 535,000.
The company, whose shares have fallen from a peak of 228p to 52p, has also
added an independent outsider to a board of directors which has seen an
unusually heavy turnover since the company came to the market three years
ago.
John Pickard, 62, a former chief executive of Serck Group and F H Lloyd and
currently deputy chairman of Bimec Industries, has joined the company as a
non-executive director.
Hadleigh plans to add an additional non-executive director in May but the
company has made no progress in replacing Brian Lowery, the chief executive
of its engineering division, who resigned earlier this year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11706</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Appointments: Rhodes resigns from BET
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Phillip Rhodes, a director of BET since 1989, resigned yesterday from the
business services group.
He had been in charge of strategic planning until a year ago, when
institutions installed American John Clark as the new chief executive in a
management overhaul designed to counter the company's dismal performance.
On his arrival, Clark, who had been chief executive of San Francisco-based
Core-Mark International, put a Core-Mark colleague, Keith Payne, in charge
of strategic planning.
Rhodes, 45, who was still in his office yesterday, refused to comment on the
reasons for or timing of his resignation, or to say whether he had found
alternative employment. For the past year he has been in charge of
environmental, catering and contract services. Before joining BET, he had
worked for Guinness.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11707</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Appointments: East thru west, home's best
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Indulging in its own minor form of devolution, the Royal Bank of Scotland is
expanding its treasury and capital markets operations north of the border,
putting 45-year-old Scotsman Bill McKay in charge of trading and sales for
Scotland.
McKay, who set up the bank's trading room in New York in 1978 and later had
a stint in Hong Kong, has moved north at a time, he believes, when Scottish
fund managers, insurers and industrial companies have advanced hugely in the
sophistication of their foreign exchange and interest rate risk management.
He will report to Tim Goode, director of treasury and capital markets in
London, who says the move demonstrates that 'we plan to have the best
treasury and capital markets operation in Scotland'. It has yet to be
decided whether the expanded outfit will be centred in Glasgow, with the
foreign exchange operations, or in Edinburgh, where sterling money market
activities have been located.
Proximity to customers is the name of the game, according to McKay - as well
as being Scottish. 'All things being equal, most institutions north of the
border would rather deal with a Scottish dealing room.' Making his 18 or so
dealers as efficient and speedy as the 60 odd traders in London will be part
of his task.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11708</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Technology: Viewers take the starring role - Compact discs
for television go on sale in Britain on Monday
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Whether you are a couch potato or prefer to spend your leisure time in the
garden, the television set is likely to feature prominently as a source of
entertainment and information.
But in spite of all the advances made in television technology over the
years, one thing has remained the same - watching TV has always been a
passive experience.
Philips, the Dutch electronics group, hopes to remedy this by bringing an
element of 'interactivity' to the television screen through a new
entertainment system called Compact Disc Interactive.
CD-I, which has been sold exclusively in the US since November and is being
launched in the UK on Monday, is a multimedia system combining animation,
graphics, text, video and audio on a compact disc.
The machine which plays the programmes is similar to a standard audio
CD-player but is connected to the television instead. It can also be
connected to a stereo system to achieve superior sound.
What differentiates CD-I from other entertainment media that use the TV
screen, such as video recorders or laser disc players, is that CD-I enables
the viewer to manipulate the material using a remote-controlled device.
Instead of a programme running from beginning to end as it would on TV or
video, CD-I discs have several layers of material hidden behind what is
shown on the screen. This can be tapped into using a remote control unit
similar to a mouse used for computers. It can move easily from a drawing of
an engine, for example, to a textual description and on again to a still
photograph of the engine. The images can also appear on the screen at one
time.
CD-I is a digital system that uses memory chips and a powerful
microprocessor which acts as its 'brain'. Like a computer, a CD-I disc and
player can:
Store and process an enormous amount of information. The five-inch 650 Mbyte
CDs can store up to 250,000 typed pages of text, more than 7,000
photographic quality images, 19 hours of speech and four planes of visual
effects.
Provide instant access to material anywhere on the disc. Unlike video tapes,
which are analogue, digital discs allow random access to the material
contained in it. Just as users can move from one track of a CD to another
without going through the tedious fast forward sequence of a tape, it is
possible to move instantly from one part of a CD-I programme to another.
Present different types of information, from text to video, simultaneously.
CD-I is a multimedia system in which a video picture can be combined with a
text and a graphic illustration of a related subject on the screen at the
same time. Proponents of multimedia say that this simultaneous presentation
of material is closer to the way we use our various senses to perceive the
world around us.
Allow the user to alter the material on the screen. The microprocessor
'brain' that runs the CD-I disc sion. For example, in certain programmes
users can choose the colour of the graphics. In a music programme a
particular musical piece can be heard on piano, violin or flute.
CD-I is thus one of the earliest products that brings together computers and
consumer electronics, a convergence that the electronics industry has been
anticipating for some time.
But what, by bringing computer elements to the TV, does CD-I offer that
other media do not?
To some extent, it combines the functions of pre-recorded video tapes and
laser discs. Karaoke, video and computer games, music lessons and children's
educational programmes are among the programmes Philips has lined up.
Philips, however, sees the attraction of CD-I primarily in being an entirely
new entertainment experience because it gives users greater involvement in
and control over the software.
For example, in Treasures of the Smithsonian, a programme organised as a
tour through the 13 Washington museums and the National Zoo, the user can
spend as much time in any one part of the museum as they like and browse or
navigate through the museum at their own pace, much as they would in real
life.
They can also jump from one room in the museum to another room at the other
end of the complex, in an instant. Additional information on each of the
exhibits can be called to the screen by using the remote control unit.
One thing CD-I does not do is to provide full-motion video, which would
bring feature films on compact discs. Currently video is restricted to a
small portion of the screen but Philips is bringing out a version capable of
transmitting video over the full screen later this year.
Future applications could bring interactive films and magazines which might
even be linked to real-time television programming.
But by being so many different things at the same time, the system risks
confusing its audience. Multimedia has been described as a technology
looking for a role.
Philips' biggest challenge in selling its multimedia system may be to
convince people why, on a lazy Sunday afternoon, they should want to
interact with their TV anyway.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11709</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Technology: Games people play
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PHILIPS is counting on CD-Interactive to help boost its sagging consumer
electronics business. But the success of its multimedia entertainment system
depends largely on the availability of good software. Consumers must have
enough interesting material to play on their CD-I machines or they will not
purchase the hardware.
'Our job is to create experiences that are so compelling that it will make
people want to engage in them,' says Bernard Luskin, president of Philips
Interactive Media of America (Pima), the software subsidiary set up to
produce programmes especially for CD-I.
Philips has signed up 40 co-publishers to help with the task, including
Time-Life Books, Rand McNally and the Children's Television Workshop, which
produces Sesame Street, the long-running television series.
Gaston Bastiaens, director of interactive media systems at Philips, is
confident that film production companies and record businesses which own
software rights will want to produce CD-I titles as another way of
exploiting their assets.
Pima has so far made about 50 CD-I titles. These have involved producers,
developers and publishers working together. Production costs range from
Dollars 150,000 to Dollars 350,000 for each programme.
Like many other consumer electronics manufacturers, Philips expects software
to be an increasingly important source of revenue. Although it is licensing
its CD-I technology to several Japanese manufacturers, it is the software
that will drive the profits, according to Bastiaens. Philips is committing
itself to subsidising an entirely new segment in the software industry in
order to support its new technology.
Producing the software is expensive due to the vast amount of material that
goes into each title, and the amount of time it takes to make one programme.
Sales are not high enough yet for Philips to want to reveal figures, but
CD-I is not expected to bring in much revenue for at least another two or
three years.
In the meantime, Philips faces the time-consuming and costly process of
convincing consumers that its interactive media is worth spending Pounds 599
for a player and Pounds 15-Pounds 35 for a single disc.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11710</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Technology (Worth Watching): Extending help to the leaning
tower
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The leaning tower of Pisa is not only leaning, it's also revolving according
to initial findings emerging from data collected by the UK-based Building
Research Establishment which is monitoring the tower's movements for the
Italian authorities.
BRE has installed electrolevels, originally developed for aircraft
navigation, to detect movements of the tower, some of which have not been
observed before.
An electrolevel consists of a glass phial containing an electrolytic fluid
and three electrodes, spaced at equal distances along its length. As the
phial tilts, the quantities of fluid between the electrodes change and the
electrical resistance between them is altered. The gives a measure of the
rotation.
When work to stabilise the tower begins, the data from the BRE instruments
will be used to give early warning of any changes in the tower's tilt. BRE:
UK, 0923 664081.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11711</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Technology (Worth Watching): Shrinking camera put in the
picture
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Last year the snap-happy Japanese bought some 50m single-use cameras, making
Japan the biggest market for 'disposable' cameras.
Now Konica, the Japanese camera maker, has launched what it claims is the
world's smallest disposable camera, which is the size of a packet of
cigarettes and weighs in at 75 grams (2.6 ounces) without flash and 120
grams (4.2 ounces) with. Konica said this makes it about 30 per cent smaller
and 20 grams (0.7 ounces) lighter than current models.
Initially the camera will be on sale only in Japan, at Y1,800 (Pounds 7.65)
with flash or Y1,000 without. Konica: Japan, 03 349 5251.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11712</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Technology (Worth Watching): Early warning to put safety
first
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN HOLDSWORTH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The Cullen Inquiry into the Piper Alpha disaster in 1988 found that if the
public address system on Piper Alpha had not failed, more lives could have
been saved, writes Ian Holdsworth.
A new kind of PA system, billed as 'explosion-proof', has been developed and
is being installed by the Chevron oil company on its new Alba oil platform
in the North Sea. The system, made by Spector/Lumenex of Nottingham, has
been designed to exceed the safety requirements laid down by Lord Cullen.
It has two principal features. First, it can work in a gas-filled
environment without any danger of causing an explosion. Conventional systems
have to be switched off during a gas alarm - when they are most needed -
because of the risk of ignition from the electric current. Second, every
part of the PA system is duplicated so that if any piece is destroyed the
rest will continue to work. Spector/Lumenex: UK, 0602 608052.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11713</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Technology (Worth Watching): The baby PC with grown-up
features
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Portable computers have been shrinking in size ever since they were
introduced in the early 1980s. But compared with the desktop PC, pocket or
hand-held machines still represent an uneasy compromise in terms of screen
size, keyboard and compatibility.
Vortek, part of the the Korean Samsung group, believes it has found the
answer by developing the first A5-sized portable, dubbed the Handbook PC.
The machine, which comes with a hard disc and 2Mbytes of memory, weighs 1kg
and is half the size of conventional notebook PCs. Using its sophisticated
power management features the machine can run for up to four hours with five
AA-sized alkaline or rechargeable batteries.
The Handbook can work with Microsoft Windows software and standard Dos
applications as well as its built-in personal organiser functions. It goes
on sale next month and will cost around Pounds 1,500. Vortek: UK, 081 569
7513.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11714</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / The Property Market: A turn for the worse
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Returns on commercial property turned negative in March for the first time
since last August, according to the Investment Property Databank, a research
group.
Yields moved outwards, reflecting the continued downward pressure on rental
and capital values as well as the climate of pre-election uncertainty.
Rental values were cut by a further point in March, after falling by a
percentage point in February. Capital values fell by 0.7 per cent, their
worst single month's result since last July.
The quarterly figures also deteriorated. In the three months to March,
rental growth fell from -1.5 per cent to -2.3 per cent, capital growth
dropped from -0.9 per cent to -1.7 per cent, and total returns declined from
1.1 per cent to 0.3 per cent.
The year-on-year total return of 1.2 per cent improved, although at a
slowing rate compared with late 1991.
Retail outperformed the industrial sector, with total returns of 0.6 per
cent and 0.2 per cent, respectively.
The total return for the office sector was -1 per cent, which is the lowest
monthly return since last July.
During March, the retail sector's rental values dropped by another 0.2 per
cent and the equivalent yield increased from 8.6 per cent to 8.8 per cent.
 --------------------------------------------------------
IPD MONTHLY INDEX
 --------------------------------------------------------
Monthly change (index based at Dec 1986=100)
                   Mar 1992     Feb 1992     Change
IPD                167.04       167.15        -0.11
Retail             152.11       151.18         0.92
Office             161.97       163.53        -1.56
Industrial         232.51       232.14         0.37
 --------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11715</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Management: Post Office gives uniforms the stamp of approval
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DIANE SUMMERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Customers queueing for stamps in the post office can now play a new game to
while away the time: spot the grey and gardenia refurbishments, and toning,
smartly-uniformed staff.
More than 800 main post offices have so far been revamped in an effort to
lift them out of their former utilitarian gloom.
Overall, Pounds 40m is being spent on bringing premises up to date and -
with the introduction of automation - service into the modern age.
As part of the process, the appearance of employees is also being overhauled
with the issue of grey and yellow clothing that would not look out of place
in more up-market establishments such as banks or airlines.
Uniforms, workwear or, as Post Office Counters likes to call it,
'careerwear', is increasingly being used by service organisations to
strengthen identity and alter public perceptions.
The aim is to reinforce images of professionalism, build pride in the team
and thereby improve customer service. In the Post Office's case, the hope is
that the introduction of new clothing for staff will lead to some tangible
improvements in customers' perceptions of the service they receive.
Indeed, perception, rather than the objective measure of performance itself,
appears to be the key issue. For, according to Post Office Counters' own
research, customers have very little idea of, for example, how long they
have actually queued.
On average, they think they have waited twice as long as has actually been
the case. Frustratingly for the Post Office, taking action to cut down on
queueing time seems to have little impact on these perceptions.
In refurbished offices, however, customers feel they have not had to queue
for so long, regardless of actual waiting times.
The hope is that the new staff clothing will add to the 'feel good' factor
and further close the perceptions gap.
The 10,000 staff themselves should also feel better in the new clothes as
the existing cheap and nasty blue outfits, the subject of a steady stream of
staff complaints, are replaced by softer, more generously-cut, modern
styles.
Designs were drawn up by Anne Tyrrell Designs, the same consultancy that
recently reformed British Rail's look, in consultation with a Post Office
staff-management steering group.
The mix and match outfits - which will have been fully introduced by the end
of June - include grey jackets for both sexes, a choice of suit skirt styles
and lengths plus a crepe de chine blouse, scarf and skirt for women.
Other interesting additions are a sari and maternity wear - the latter
requested, says Crozier, by some of the 'larger ladies who find it more
comfortable'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11716</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Top price for Korean lacquer box: Saleroom
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A SMALL Korean stationery box, inlaid with lacquer and made during the 16th
century, sold for Dollars 550,000 (Pounds 312,000) at Christie's in New York
on Wednesday. It was a record price for an item of Korean lacquer and
trebled the estimate.
In the past two years, new collectors of works of art in Korea and Taiwan
have come to the aid of the international auction houses, whose turnover
declined sharply when the Japanese stopped buying Impressionist and Modern
pictures.
The Far East is now a leading fine art centre.
Christie's auction of Korean works of art totalled Dollars 2.9m with 19 per
cent unsold, suggesting that buyers are becoming more selective.
A hanging scroll of the 14th century, depicting the Willow-Branch
Avalokitesvara, a Buddhist deity widely worshipped in Korea at this period,
was on target at Dollars 385,000.
The auction houses are still trying to tempt Japanese buyers. On Wednesday
Christie's held its first auction devoted to modern Japanese paintings. Only
eight of the 20 lots sold, but 'Work no. 10' by the abstract artist Saito
Yoshishige, was within its forecast at Dollars 165,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11717</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Heath made Knight of Garter
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR EDWARD HEATH, the prime minister who led Britain into the European
Community, is to join Britain's highest order of chivalry.
Buckingham Palace announced yesterday that the Queen had appointed the MP
for Old Bexley and Sidcup and father of the House of Commons to be one of
three new Knights Companion of the Most Noble Order of the Garter.
The other two appointees are Lord Sainsbury of Preston Candover - who will
retire as chairman of Sainsbury, the food retailer, in the next 12 months
after 23 years in the post - and Viscount Ridley, the Lord Lieutenant of
Northumberland.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11718</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Lang introduces softer tone on ruling Scotland
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON, Scottish Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Ian Lang, the Scottish secretary, yesterday inaugurated a more
conciliatory approach by the government to ruling Scotland and called for 'a
change of tone in Scottish politics'.
Presenting his team of four Scottish Office ministers, Mr Lang again
rejected opposition demands for a multi-option referendum on Scotland's
constitutional future but did not rule out referendums as a matter of
principle.
He said no proposal had been put to him by the opposition parties, which
were 'puffing and posturing'.
Mr Lang said the issue of constitutional change had been dealt with in the
general election. The Scottish National party, which fought for Scottish
independence, had won only three seats while the biggest swing in Britain
against Labour, which wanted a devolved Scottish parliament, had been in
Scotland.
'I can see circumstances in which a referendum is a useful mechanism, and
for that reason I'm certainly not willing to rule it out in principle,' he
said. 'But when you start talking about a referendum on three rather woolly
and ill-defined concepts then you identify all kinds of difficulties in
phrasing it, in carrying it out and in deciding what has been decided after
the referendum has taken place.'
Labour and the SNP have demanded a referendum with a choice between the
status quo, a devolved Scottish parliament and independence. A rally will be
staged in Glasgow on Sunday by Scotland United, a group formed by Labour
MPs.
Mr Lang said he was willing to listen to proposals for changes in how
Scotland was governed within the union of the United Kingdom.
His minister of state, Lord Fraser of Carmyllie, the former advocate
general, has responsibility for constitutional matters, in addition to
health and home affairs. Lord Fraser said he did not wish to
'over-emphasise' that responsibility.
Lord James Douglas-Hamilton, the education minister, said he wanted 'calm
and steady' progress in education after the upheavals of recent years. His
fellow junior ministers are Sir Hector Monro and Mr Allan Stewart.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11719</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Cash warning over education
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
UP TO 4,000 teachers face redundancy as a result of spending cuts this year,
Mr Nigel de Gruchy, general secretary of the NASUWT teachers' union, claimed
yesterday. He told the union's conference in Scarborough that hundreds of
schools faced going bust or becoming 'educationally bankrupt'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11720</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Nucor rules out Ravenscraig deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HOPES evaporated yesterday that Nucor, the US steel producer, would salvage
part of British Steel's complex at Ravenscraig, Lanarkshire. Nucor officials
visiting Scotland told shop stewards that the plant was not suitable for its
needs.
Nucor did not rule out building a mini-mill in Britain to produce sheet
steel by the thin-slab casting process. Hunterston on the Firth of Clyde,
where British Steel has an ore handling terminal and two mothballed steel
plants using the direct reduction process, is a possible site.
Mr George Quinn, one of the shop stewards at Ravenscraig, which is due to
close in September with the loss of 1,200 jobs, said Nucor thought that the
cost of refurbishing the coke ovens and blast furnaces at Ravenscraig made
its plans unviable. He blamed British Steel for failing to invest
sufficiently in the plant in the past.
The Nucor team visited Scotland at the invitation of Scottish Enterprise,
the development body, after a suggestion by Mr Jeremy Bray, the Labour MP
for Motherwell South.
It had always been unlikely that Ravenscraig, as an integrated plant, would
be compatible with the type of operation in which Nucor specialises in the
US, or that British Steel would be eager to encourage a potential
competitor.
The Nucor executives are expected to meet Mr Ian Lang, Scottish Secretary,
or Mr Allan Stewart, Scottish industry minister, before leaving Britain.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11721</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Big quake shakes California
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN FRANCISCO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A STRONG earthquake rocked southern California on Wednesday night, across
200 miles from the Mexican border to Santa Barbara.
Seismologists said there was a 10-25 per cent chance that the shock, and one
a few hours earlier, might herald an even stronger quake within the next
three days.
In Los Angeles, buildings swayed for several seconds, telephone services and
electricity supplies were temporarily disrupted. Initial reports suggested
that damage was light with only minor injuries.
The quake, just before 10pm local time, measured 6.1 on the Richter scale,
said seismologists at the California Institute of Technology. Six on the
scale means ability to inflict 'severe damage'.
The epicentre was 10 miles east of Desert Hot Springs, which is about 100
miles east of Los Angeles. The tremor was believed to be a shift on the San
Andreas Fault, which runs the length of California.
Two hours earlier, a shock of 4.6 on the Richter scale had shaken the
region.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11722</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Mulford warns over Germany's deficit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR DAVID Mulford, US Treasury under-secretary for international affairs,
warned yesterday that the German fiscal deficit could persist for much
longer than previously anticipated, and create a lasting drag on world
economic growth.
'Germany has a large fiscal deficit and a tight monetary policy, and this is
having a major spill-over effect in Europe,' Mr Mulford said. 'It's causing
high interest rates and low growth, and contributing to unemployment,' he
said.
Germany faces a grilling on Sunday from its partners in the Group of Seven
leading industrial countries, led by the US, over how it plans to deal with
the soaring deficit.
The International Monetary Fund's World Economic Outlook report, released
this week, also called for cuts in the German deficit to enable European
interest rates to fall.
US officials have been at pains to make clear that they do not blame
Germany's Bundesbank for the high level of the country's interest rates.
They see the budget deficit as the core of the problem, this having bloomed
as the cost of absorbing eastern Germany has mounted.
The under-secretary said that, although Germany's deficit now amounted to
3-3.5 per cent of gross national product, the country's total public sector
borrowing requirement, including borrowing by public institutions such as
the Treuhand privatisation agency or the state railways, was beyond 6 per
cent of GNP.
He acknowledged that the US general government deficit also stood at about 6
per cent of GNP, but said this was not a structural deficit and would
decline as the effect of the savings and loan industry rescue began to
disappear.
Mr Mulford expressed the fear that, in Germany, the deficit was financing
growth in the eastern part of the country largely through income transfers,
rather than through productive investment. 'This raises the question of how
long this is going to go on, and whether it is a structural problem,' he
cautioned.
The under-secretary said he did not want to put himself amid Germany's
policy debate, but Treasury officials say that Bonn needs to demonstrate a
serious enough commitment to curbing its fiscal deficit so as to provide a
background that might persuade the Bundesbank it could safely begin to lower
its interest rates.
'We did provide the background for the Federal Reserve to lower interest
rates by 400 basis points,' a senior Treasury official said.
Bosnia-Hercegovina, Croatia and Slovenia have filed applications for
membership of the International Monetary Fund. The three republics, seceded
from Yugoslavia, will join a waiting list behind the 15 republics of the
former Soviet Union, whose applications are expected to reach a vote by the
IMF's board of governors next week.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11723</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Teledyne accused of false testing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE US Justice Department has accused Teledyne, a leading maker of military
electronics, of having falsified tests on a basic component of sophisticated
weapons and spacecraft, according to the New York Times, Reuter reports from
New York.
In a civil lawsuit, the department maintains the company's failure to test
the components properly defrauded the government of as much as Dollars 250m,
the newspaper said.
The suit against Teledyne asserts that the company routinely certified to
the government, in 1983-1990, that the components, known as electromagnetic
relays, had passed rigorous tests of reliability, when in fact the parts had
often failed.
At times, the test results were distorted by faulty test equipment, the suit
charges.
Each year, Teledyne makes hundreds of thousands of the relays, which have
been used in the US space shuttle, the Patriot anti-missile system and
dozens of other items.
Teledyne, which also makes industrial products, had disclosed it was the
subject of an investigation of testing irregularities, the newspaper said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11724</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World Trade News: Prospects fair for east-west trade bridge
 -Leipzig Fair is finding a new role after the collapse of the Soviet bloc
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID DODWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DR CORNELIA Wohlfarth, appointed last August as managing director of the
Leipzig Trade Fair, is offering no hostages to fortune. 'This is the year
after zero. I'm not offering any predictions for the future,' she says.
'There are not the masses here that were here before, but that means nothing
because many of those who used to come from the Eastern bloc were just
getting away from their dreary lives, enjoying a rare opportunity to taste
the consumer goods of the west.'
Dr Wohlfarth, who left the world of publishing at the age of 47 to head what
used to be called 'the mother of all fairs', has good reason to be unclear
about the future: 11 of this year's 26 fairs have never been mounted before;
many are exhibiting for the first time; and with the economies of eastern
and central Europe in turmoil, it is no mean task to pinpoint what market
the fair should be aiming for.
She can nevertheless be cautiously sanguine about long-term prospects. The
830-year-old fair is at the heart of the economy of both Leipzig, and the
Lander of Saxony of which it is capital. Traditional fairs such as the
Fashion fair and the Jewellery fair have grown this year despite turmoil in
the east: each attracted over 20 per cent more visitors this year than in
1991.
With the federal government pouring up to DM200bn (Pounds 68bn) a year into
the east, it is unlikely to lack financial and strategic support. Bonn has
granted DM300m for modernisation, while the municipal government has
provided land for a new technical fair site to open in 1995.
Already, there is an air of hope in the city: many buildings are being
refurbished; the air is clearer following the closure of many of the dirty,
loss-making heavy factories; free enterprise has brought colourful street
stalls selling everything from socks to potted pansies; pizza bars stay open
until midnight.
Dr Wohlfarth has a clear strategy: 'We should try to develop an identity of
our own. The fair is part of the regeneration of the east, she says. 'The
aim is to offer fairs that solve problems - not just the usual product
exhibition halls, but workshops, seminars, congresses and a contact centre.
'But without hotels, there is nothing we can do in this direction yet: at
present we are providing a preview of what the future will offer.' One
thousand extra visitor beds are being provided by renovating houses in the
city centre. But eight new international hotels will be open by 1995.
Her critical task is to provide focus for Leipzig fairs of the future. The
universal spring and autumn fairs that used to provide the west with a
business link to the former Soviet bloc are as much a part of history as the
bust of Lenin outside the Soviet pavilion at the fair site.
In the long term, Leipzig's comparative advantage is likely to be its
strategic location between west and central Europe, but with the economies
of central Europe in disarray, short-term focus is on the needs of Saxony
and other neighbouring eastern Lander.
'It may be 15 or 20 years before eastern Germany has the same quality of
life as the west, but business will be going on: there is so much catching
up to do. There will be business openings in the reconstruction of the area,
so fairs will focus on the environment, transport, and construction
sectors,' she forecasts.
So in March Leipzig mounted Terratec, a fair for environmental engineering
and environmental protection, and Translogo, a fair on traffic engineering.
In autumn, fairs on building engineering equipment and on the construction
trade are among those aimed at rebuilding the region's economy.
But long-term plans focus on Leipzig's role as a springboard to east and
central Europe. Dr Wohlfarth aims not only to attract exhibitors from the
west looking to markets in the east, but also to bring managers from the
east to Leipzig to attend workshops on international trade, marketing, and
funding: 'We will help to train them to find their way through the market
systems of the west that are so new to them,' she says.
'It will take a long time before the former Soviet Union is able to build
its own effective links with western companies, but by then we will have
established ourselves. In the end, it will not be the size of the fairs that
will count, but the quality,' she adds.
An East-West Contact centre is planned, with an aim that at least half the
exhibitors should come from eastern Germany or eastern Europe. To pave the
way, the fair has appointed representatives in Prague, Warsaw, Budapest,
Vilnius, Moscow and St Petersburg. Representatives are about to be appointed
in Minsk and Kiev. To give them added clout, they will represent not just
the Leipzig Fair, but also Saxony.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11725</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World Trade News: Havel meets Japanese Emperor Akihito
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CZECHOSLOVAK President Vaclav Havel, pictured with Japan's Emperor Akihito,
yesterday asked Japan to help revive the economy in his former communist
country, Reuter reports from Tokyo. In talks with Prime Minister Kiichi
Miyazawa, Mr Havel called for increased economic exchanges, including
preferential tariffs, to boost trade. He also appealed for investment to
build up medium and small firms in his country. Mr Miyazawa promised
financing and investment to help privatise Czechoslovak firms. He said Japan
would offer preferential tariffs from next month to boost imports of
Czechoslovak glassware. The two countries are to sign a trade agreement in
Tokyo today.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11726</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World Trade News: Japan agrees to cut car exports to EC
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER and JOHN GRIFFITHS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN has agreed to cut its 1992 car exports to the European Community, a
European Commission spokesman said yesterday, Reuter reports from Brussels.
He said Japan's Ministry of International Trade and Industry (Miti) agreed
at late night talks in Tokyo to cut sales by somewhat more than the expected
5 per cent decrease in EC car market demand this year.
The spokesman said the Japanese side expected that disruption to the EC's
new car market could be avoided if Japanese exports to the 12-nation bloc
this year were reduced from 'a rate somewhat above that of the expected
decrease of the total demand' after taking into account the state of the
market and the specific difficulties the Community's motor manufacturing
industry faces.
The spokesman would not say exactly by how much Japanese car exports would
be cut this year, but said they had shipped 1.25m cars to the EC last year,
and Community new car demand was expected to fall by 5 per cent this year.
The spokesman announced that a compromise had been found after two days of
talks in Tokyo following the Commission's request to the Japanese to cut car
exports to the EC.
The Commission, the EC's executive body, asked for the cuts in view of poor
operating results by some Community carmakers, falling domestic demand, and
difficulties facing the EC industry as it undertakes expensive restructuring
to make itself more competitive with its more efficient Japanese rivals.
An EC-Japan agreement last July provided for a transition period until the
end of 1999 before the EC car market is thrown open to unrestricted Japanese
competition.
The agreement provided for monitoring of Japanese car exports in the
transition period, in line with annual shipments of up to 1.23m units.
This figure was based on 1990 levels and assumed that the EC new car market
by the end of the century would be 15.1m vehicles annually, compared with
13.8m in 1990.
John Griffiths adds: Earlier this week, Japan announced details of
reductions in direct car exports to the US.
The Ministry of International Trade and Industry (Miti) announced individual
company quotas for an overall reduction of 28.2 per cent, to 1.65m vehicles
this year from 2.3m vehicles in 1991.
However, actual exports to the US last year are estimated at only 1.73m
vehicles.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11727</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World Trade News: Dunkel claims 'positive sign' in talks
over trade impasse
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NANCY DUNNE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Arthur Dunkel, Gatt director general, said yesterday he had 'no doubts'
that the Uruguay Round of global trade talks would end successfully. It was
a question of when, and of whether the global trading system could afford
further delays in reaching a new General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade.
The first challenge, Mr Dunkel said, was to hold the line against
protectionism. 'The pervasive nature of protectionism is such that only
collective action by governments can defeat it and ensure progress towards
liberalisation.'
Mr Dunkel saw 'a positive sign' in the meeting on Wednesday between
President George Bush and EC officials over agricultural trade. Although the
deadlock has yet to be broken, both sides claimed that 'new ideas' for a
solution had been exchanged.
'I read between the lines,' Mr Dunkel said. 'New ideas means movement,
flexibility.'
He deplored the fall-off in momentum in the negotiations in the last month
of 1991 and warned that developing countries which had already opened their
markets were being damaged by continued protectionism in the industrialised
world.
Mr Dunkel said he was glad the two sides had set a new deadline of June for
resolving the impasse. He had sworn never to set another deadline, so he was
'glad to see' others were now doing it for him.
The director general's optimism was not widely shared in the US business
community, particularly after Mrs Carla Hills, the US trade representative,
indicated that she had heard nothing more than new formulations of old
ideas.
Mr Dunkel said the Round was particularly difficult because countries, for
the first time, had to put national legislation on the bargaining table and
this raised questions of sovereignty.
He said concerns expressed by Mr Michio Watanabe, Japan's foreign minister,
about progress towards a new Gatt agreement were positive. Japan had been so
'discreet' and 'shy' about taking leadership, that the letters from Mr
Watanabe to Washington and Brussels calling for action were a shock, he
said, but 'a very good shock.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11728</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World Trade News: Pretoria seeks to revive trade with Asia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP GAWITH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A SOUTH African trade mission arrives in east Asia today in an effort to
boost trade with the region.
The delegation is keen to rebuild trade with Japan in particular. Japan was
South Africa's largest trading partner until 1987 when it froze bilateral
trade at 1987 levels. Japan banned steel imports, exports of arms, computers
and certain vehicle types, new investment and loans to South Africa.
None the less, Japan continued to export many goods not included in the ban.
Japanese cars account for about half of all vehicle sales while National
Panasonic is a market leader in consumer electronics.
Japan has now lifted sanctions against South Africa and restored diplomatic
relations.
Few observers doubt that it will soon re-establish itself as South Africa's
main trading partner. It has long been a major purchaser of South African
raw materials.
South Africa is also hoping to encourage Japanese investment in South
Africa, particularly joint ventures.
The mission, led by Mr Derek Keys, minister of Trade and Industry and
Economic Co-ordination, will visit China, Japan, Taiwan, South Korea and
India.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11729</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World Trade News: US anti-Gatt lobby steps up campaign
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NANCY DUNNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Uruguay Round of trade talks will 'sabotage' US law on consumer rights
and the environment, according to American anti-Gatt groups.
The anti-Gatt lobby in the US - including environmental, consumer and farm
groups - have stepped up their campaign this week to coincide with President
Bush's declared Trade Week. They claim the support of 162 Congressmen for a
resolution warning the president against Gatt legislation which jeopardises
US environmental, consumer, health or labour laws. The resolution has the
backing of Mr Richard Gephardt, the House majority leader.
Gatt rules would prevail over national standards and the anti-Gatt lobbyists
argue that negotiators must ensure that a Gatt agreement would not undermine
US standards on issues such as consumer rights and the environment.
The anti-Gatt forces are seeking public support in full page newspaper
advertisements which claim that 'the only thing free about free trade is the
freedom it gives the world's largest corporations to circumvent democracy
and kill those pesky laws that protect people and the planet.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11730</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Pact urged to help poor nations: UN report sees benefits for
rich in a deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EDWARD MORTIMER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A 'NEW global compact' between industrial and developing countries is
proposed in this year's Human Development Report, published yesterday by the
United Nations Development Programme.*
Such a compact would aim to achieve, by the year 2000, universal basic
education for men and women, primary health care and safe water for all, the
elimination of serious malnutrition, and at least 80 per cent access to
family planning. It would also aim to create enough job opportunities to
absorb the growth in the global labour force while reducing absolute poverty
by 50 per cent.
While these aims would be of more direct interest to developing countries,
industrial countries would benefit from closer co-operation on drug
trafficking and pollution, relief of immigration pressures through creation
of job opportunities in poor nations, and reduction of nuclear threats
through lower international tension and acceptance of non-proliferation
policies. Both sides would benefit from global peace and disarmament and
from prevention of unmanageable debt burdens.
The report, compiled by an independent team of economists 'under the
guidance' of Mr Mahbub ul Haq, a former finance minister of Pakistan,
suggests that the new compact should be financed partly from a global 'peace
dividend' of around Dollars 1.5 trillion (million million), resulting from a
3 per cent annual cut in all countries' military spending throughout the
decade.
It also says industrial countries should reform their Overseas Development
Assistance so that two-thirds goes to the poorest nations (at present only a
quarter does) and at least 20 per cent to 'human priority expenditure' (at
present only 7 per cent).
A 'global debt bargain', involving a substantial write-down of debts by
official donors and commercial banks, would halt the debt-related net
transfer from developing to industrial countries, which the report says is
currently Dollars 50bn a year.
It also suggests various forms of funding for environmentally sustainable
development, such as a one-dollar-per-barrel oil consumption tax, yielding
around Dollars 24bn a year, an equivalent coal tax (Dollars 16bn), and
rationing certificates for carbon dioxide emissions. Finally, developing
countries could increase their exports by Dollars 40bn a year if global
markets in both goods and services were liberalised.
Such a compact, the report suggests, should be prepared by a process of
world consultations, leading to a 'world summit on human development'. It
also suggests creation of a privately funded body, 'Honesty International',
to monitor and combat corruption, following the successful example of
Amnesty International in human rights.
These are the main prescriptive conclusions of a report which gives a
disturbing analytical and statistical picture of inequalities and obstacles
to development in the global economic system.
In particular, the report shows that global income disparities have widened
in recent years. By 1990, it says, the richest 20 per cent of the world's
population had incomes 60 times greater than the poorest 20 per cent,
whereas in 1960 this was only 30 times. Even those figures are based on the
distribution between rich and poor countries: if maldistribution within
countries is taken into account, 'the richest 20 per cent of the world's
people get at least 150 times more than the poorest 20 per cent'.
The report attributes this widening gap partly to the national policies of
developing countries but also to unequal access to capital and technology
and to restrictions on free movement of goods and labour.
An important innovation of previous reports was the 'human development
index,' which combines life expectancy, educational attainment and income
indicators to give a composite measure of human development. On this
measure, Canada has now displaced Japan as the world's most developed
country. The US trails in sixth position, behind Norway, Switzerland and
Sweden. Next come Australia, France and the Netherlands, with the UK 10th
and Germany 12th (behind Iceland). But if gender disparities are taken into
account, Sweden is in first place, while Canada drops to eighth and Japan to
18th.
At the other end of the table, Guinea has wrested the wooden spoon from
Sierra Leone. Romania, in 60th place, is the least developed 'industrial'
country, while Barbados, at number 20, scores highest among those officially
classified as 'developing'.
*Human Development Report 1992, Oxford University Press, Dollars 16.95
paperback, Dollars 29.95 cloth.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11731</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Population growth to hit environment
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN HUNT, Environment Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
STEEP INCREASES in world population could lead to catastrophic environmental
damage and loss of species and natural habitats, according to a study funded
by organisations including the United Nations Population Fund and the World
Wide Fund for Nature.*
It says the UN anticipates world population could level out at 11.5bn by the
end of the next century compared with today's 5.4bn. But upper forecasts put
the figure at 12.5bn by 2050 and 28bn by 2150. The 1990s will be the decade
of fastest population growth in history, with an extra 97m people every
year.
It advocates a massive programme for women, giving them access to family
planning methods, education and health.
*The Third Revolution, Paul Harrison, I B Tauris, London, Pounds 16.95.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11732</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Japanese guilty on Iran arms
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A Japanese company and four former officials were found guilty yesterday of
illegally exporting missile parts to Iran, Reuter reports from Tokyo.
Japan Aviation Electronics Industry was fined Y5m (Pounds 21,140), a company
spokesman said. The former officials, including ex-president Yukio Kaito,
received two-year prison sentences suspended for three years. The company
was accused both in Japan and the US of repairing US-licensed missile parts
for Iran during its 1980-88 war with Iraq.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11733</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Hyundai move dropped
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SEOUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The South Korean government yesterday decided to drop plans to punish
Hyundai Electronics Industries (HEI) for alleged loan violations, writes
John Burton in Seoul.
The decision by the Office of Bank Supervision (OBS) is the first sign the
government may be trying to defuse its feud with Mr Chung Ju-yung, the
Hyundai founder. The OBS alleged HEI used bank loans illegally to finance
the Unification National Party, the new anti-government group established by
Mr Chung.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11734</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Burmese junta chief quits
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AP
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   RANGOON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
General Saw Maung, the Burmese leader, has resigned as its chairman for
health reasons, the official Rangoon Radio announced last night, AP reports
from Rangoon.
Gen Than Shwe, deputy chairman and army commander, will succeed Saw Maung,
63, as leader of the junta, the radio said. Saw Maung and a group of
military officers seized power in 1988 after suppressing a nationwide
pro-democracy uprising.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11735</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / UN peace force may be sent to Somalia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL LITTLEJOHNS, UN Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE United Nations Security Council may despatch more than 500 troops to
strife-torn Somalia under a plan outlined last night, writes Michael
Littlejohns, UN Correspondent in New York.
Military costs for a six-to-nine months peacekeeping operation are estimated
at a relatively modest Dollars 23m. For the first time in a UN operation,
the main body of infantry would be sea-based - using a ship off the capital,
Mogadishu, as base camp.
Fifty unarmed military observers in Mogadishu would monitor the ceasefire
that went into effect on March 3 between the two main factions in the Somali
civil war. They would also provide escorts for relief supplies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11736</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / French car industry criticised on training and productivity
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE French car industry must make huge improvements in worker training and
cut 2.5 per cent of its labour force annually until the end of the decade if
it is to survive, according to a government-commissioned report published
yesterday.
The study, for the Commissariat Generale au Plan, the state planning
commission, says the industry must make 'gigantic efforts' to survive
Japanese competition, due to hit the protected French market with full force
from 1999 when all import quotas on Japanese cars are due to end.
The industry lost 115,000 jobs between 1981 and 1990, but needs to lose many
thousands more of their 320,000 direct employees over the next eight years,
says the report.
The industry's technology is competitive, finds the report, the result of a
year-long study by industry and union experts. But the average French car
worker compares badly with British counterparts at the Nissan factory in
Sunderland, Tyne and Wear, which the report finds potentially as efficient
as Japanese staff.
French car workers are 'relatively old, often little trained or untrained,
and sometimes even illiterate ..manual workers do not seem very motivated,'
writes Mr Gilbert Rutman, the report's author and honorary president of Elf
Aquitaine, the state-controlled oil group.
The average age of workers at one of Renault's main fact-ories at Flins near
Paris is 45, as against 28 at Nissan UK, for example. In 1989, nearly half
the French car industry workforce had no professional diploma, it says. Of
the total, only 2.4 per cent had a higher diploma as against the 13.1 per
cent French national average.
Mr Rutman calls for a restructuring plan similar to that of the state-owned
steel industry in the 1980s, and for subsidised training schemes to improve
young workers' skills.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11737</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Gonzalez gives ground under party fire: The Socialists'
internal struggles over Spain's new unemployment law
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER BRUCE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRIME MINISTER Felipe Gonzalez of Spain may have found an opposition party
worthy of his talents as a pacifier - his own Socialist Workers Party
(PSOE).
A clear illustration of this has been splashed all over the front page of
Spain's biggest newspaper, El Pais, for the past two days. On Wednesday, the
main front page headline read: 'PSOE to alter unemployment decree in
parliament.' This was Mr Gonzalez on the ropes as the party decided to
modify cuts in unemployment benefit decreed by the government two weeks ago.
Yesterday it read: 'PSOE backs government over benefit cuts in face of union
intransigence.' In other words, prime minister bounces back, party
'rallies', and the unions become the bad guys.
There is no point trying to make much sense of this. It is merely the
left-wing PSOE disagreeing with its right-wing government yet again, and Mr
Gonzalez, leader of both, working hard to hide the cracks.
The benefit cuts have poisoned the political atmosphere. Mr Carlos Solchaga,
the finance minister, has made them central to his convergence plan, which
is designed to show how Spain plans to meet the economic criteria
established in Maastricht last December for economic and monetary union in
1997.
The cuts trim benefits to unemployed people and double the time in work  -
to one year - required to qualify for them. The government reckons they will
save about Dollars 4bn this year and, with luck, 'encourage' people to look
harder for jobs. The unions have called the measures the worst attack on
workers ever, and the General Workers Union is threatening a general strike
in the autumn.
For the left-wingers who run the PSOE, cutting benefits to the jobless while
restrictive monetary policies slow investment is the moral equivalent of
clubbing baby seals. It was inevitable that resentment and fear would break
out, despite Mr Gonzalez's best efforts.
However, as the prime minister is still the only man who can win elections
for it, the party is directing its ire at Mr Solchaga, whose conservative
policies have made him the bete noire of Spanish politics.
He had done his work with precision. The convergence plan was published on
April 2, debated in parliament on April 7, and the benefit cuts gazetted as
a decree law the following day. Because party pressure had forced him into
an expansive 1992 budget last year, the cuts were that urgent.
A secret meeting - details of which were leaked - was then held outside
Madrid by some leading Socialist party figures to try to dampen union
discontent. The unions, though, continued to growl, particularly as the
government is putting the finishing touches to its first law to control
strikes.
The party was under great pressure. A general strike in the summer could
disrupt both the world's fair in Seville and the Olympic Games in Barcelona.
And with no early global economic recovery in sight, fighting an election by
October next year (presumably after a tough 1993 budget, if Mr Solchaga is
serious about convergence) would be very difficult.
On Tuesday, then, the party executive, with Mr Gonzalez in attendance,
decided to tamper with the decree in parliament next week and not to merely
rubber stamp it. They will loosen some benefit conditions affecting people
working on temporary contracts in seasonal sectors such as tourism.
While their boss kept strangely silent, Solchaga aides rushed to insist that
the intent of the decree will not be affected and Gonzalez loyalists in the
party seized on this to infer that nothing at all was happening.
However, the party has wrung an important concession from its leader: it
will now be allowed to be seen as sufficiently concerned about Mr Solchaga's
'Draconian' measures to do something about them. Mr Solchaga cannot be seen
to be getting a free ride and the symbolism of any change is of great
importance.
The finance minister could resign but won't. Resignation on points of
principle is not a tradition in Spanish politics.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11738</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / German money supply continues to rise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FISHER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GERMANY'S money supply continued to grow well outside its target range last
month, giving a clear signal to participants at this Sunday's Group of Seven
meeting in Washington that the Bundesbank will hold firm on monetary policy.
Mr Helmut Schlesinger, the president of the German central bank, will attend
the G7 meeting of leading industrial countries with Mr Hans Tietmeyer, his
deputy, but economists do not expect them to come under serious pressure to
cut interest rates as a stimulant to the world economy.
The Bundesbank has repeatedly stressed its concern with the high rate of
money supply growth compared with the target range of between 3.5 and 5.5
per cent which had been set for this year. In March, M3, the broad monetary
aggregate, grew at an annual rate of 9.75 per cent after 8.5 per cent in
February and 9 per cent in January.
Propelling M3 higher has been heavy lending by banks to companies and
individuals.
Much of this has been to finance corporate investment in eastern Germany.
Mr Paul Brunker, European economist at Robert Fleming Securities in London,
said it was unlikely M3 would return to the target range this year, based on
the average for the fourth quarter of 1991 used by the Bundesbank as its
base.
Also worrying the bank has been inflation, which reached an annual rate of
4.8 per cent in March.
Official German interest rates were lifted by half a point in December,
putting the Lombard rate at 9.75 per cent.
The Bundesbank's stance received support this week from the International
Monetary Fund, which called on the Bonn government to cut its high fiscal
deficits.
The central bank has warned that large transfers to east Germany must be
accompanied by a greater determination to curb spending in the west.
Mr Theo Waigel, Germany's finance minister, responded to the Bundesbank's
message at the Easter weekend by promising tough policies to clamp down on
expenditure. But his promises were short on detail.
US view of German rates, Page 7
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11739</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Slovenia's PM to call poll
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LJUBLJANA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Slovenia's new prime minister said yesterday he would call early elections
and immediately tackle economic problems, after ousting the government that
won the republic its independence from Yugoslavia, Reuter reports from
Ljubljana.
Parliament asked Mr Janez Drnovsek, a 41-year-old former Yugoslav president
and economist, to form a government after Christian Democrat Lojze Peterle
lost a confidence vote on Wednesday night amid dissatisfaction over economic
problems.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11740</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / US consulate for Vladivostok
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AP
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The US has received permission to re-open its consulate in the Russian far
east port of Vladivostok this summer, the regional governor, Mr Vladimir
Kuznetsov, said yesterday, AP reports.
US diplomats will work from a former communist party dacha, or summer home,
while negotiating a permanent location. The governor did not rule out the
possibility the US might re-acquire the property that served as its
consulate from 1890 until the 1917 revolution and again from 1933 to 1949.
Vladivostok was closed to foreigners until 1991 because of its large Soviet
naval base. Mr Kuznetsov said the decision to allow the reopening of the
consulate followed the visit of an official delegation led by Senators Frank
Murkowski of Alaska and Steve Summs of Idaho.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11741</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Chernobyl death toll put as high as 8,000
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRYSTIA FREELAND
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KIEV
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE UKRAINIAN government has officially estimated that between 6,000 and
8,000 people died as a direct result of the meltdown of the Chernobyl
nuclear reactor, which occurred six years ago this Sunday, writes Chrystia
Freeland in Kiev.
Environmental activists put the figure at 7,000 as early as September 1990
but the former communist authorities and the International Atomic Energy
Commission played down the effects of the fallout.
The new government of independent Ukraine has made an effort to come clean
about the effects of Chernobyl and vowed to shut down the reactor. One of
Ukraine's leading environmental activists, Mr Yuri Shcherbak, has been named
as environment minister.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11742</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / World News in Brief: Ripple riddle
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
US scientists said the discovery by a Nasa satellite of 'ripples of matter'
near the edge of the cosmos could help explain how stars and galaxies
evolved from the big bang that created the universe.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11743</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXBCAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920424
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  24 APR 92 / Co-op Bank calls 'unethical' customers to account
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CO-OPERATIVE Bank is planning to tell corporate customers involved in
blood sports and other activities of which it disapproves to change their
ways or close their accounts.
The action will accompany the bank's publication next month of a formal
ethical policy which will be heralded in an advertising campaign including
television commercials. It follows a market research exercise late last year
in which the bank canvassed the views of 30,000 of its 1.5m customers.
The Co-op said yesterday that up to five 'businesses or commercial
organisations' would be approached to 'discuss whether it is appropriate to
continue banking with us'.
Individuals would not be approached, because the bank assumed that most of
them already shared its values.
The policy would stress attracting new sympathetic customers rather than
targeting ones who did not conform. 'We are confident it will gain us
business,' the bank said. 'This isn't a one-off campaign. It's a question of
stand up and be counted.'
A draft of the ethical policy says the Co-op will not engage in business
with manufacturers, importers or farmers involved in the fur trade.
Equally unacceptable will be those involved in animal experimentation in
toiletries and cosmetics, or animal exploitation such as blood sports,
intensive farming and the breeding of dangerous dogs.
The ethical policy precludes the bank from engaging in business with
manufacturers of tobacco or tobacco products promoted in the less developed
world, with foreign regimes which are in breach of human rights, or with
arms manufacturers supplying these countries.
In addition, it says it will maintain procedures and training programmes to
detect illegal activities such as drug trafficking, money laundering and tax
evasion. It will co-operate with the authorities to stop and prosecute any
such action, and instantly dismiss any staff who are involved.
The Co-op and its parent, the Co-operative Wholesale Society, have long
taken strong stands, including refusing to do business with South Africa and
banning fox-hunting on their land.
The bank issued a Customers' Charter last year under which it refuses to
give out credit information without customers' specific permission.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11744</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXARAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920423
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 APR 92 / Dump Truck shouts foul
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEFAN WAGSTYL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
KONISHIKI, the American sumo wrestler, has swung a heavy punch at the Japan
Sumo Association in his efforts to win elevation to yokozuna, the sport's
highest rank never yet achieved by a foreigner.
In newspaper interviews this week, he has accused the association of
'racism' for denying him promotion, even though he has won three
tournaments.
The charge, denied by the Sumo Association, could generate friction between
the US and Japan, if American politicians choose to take up Konishiki's
case.
The 262kg Hawaiian, also known as the Dump Truck, said the only reason he
had not been made a yokozuna was 'because I'm not Japanese'.
The sumo association declined to comment on Konishi's claims. But it said a
wrestler's rank was decided by his performance in the ring and race was not
a consideration.
The latest row over Konishiki's status erupted after he won his third
tournament in March. After some deliberation the wrestler was told he would
have to wait 'until the next tournament or the tournament after that'.
There are no specific standards for promotion, but the sumo promotion
committee has considerable discretion. As well as results, it takes into
account health and spirit. Konishiki's style irritates some fans because he
relies on using his vast bulk to push out rivals. Purists argue this demeans
the sport and a true yokozuna should have a better range of throws and
thrusts.
There have also been suggestions that foreigners cannot be yokozuna because
they cannot appreciate the significance of sumo in Japanese culture.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11745</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXARAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920423
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 APR 92 / Li calls for reduced role of socialism
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BEIJING
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
LI PENG, China's prime minister, has said the role of the state in the
socialist system must be cut back, Reuter reports from Beijing. Li, a
hardliner with close ties to elderly Communist Party conservatives, told a
group of visiting scholars that China must make 'fundamental changes in an
economic structure which has shackled the development of productive forces',
the official media reported yesterday.
His pro-market statements, made at a seminar on economic reforms on Tuesday,
are among the clearest signs to date that he is bowing to economic change as
advanced by Deng Xiaoping, 87, the paramount leader.
'The general trend in China will be for market regulation to expand greatly,
while direct planning continues to diminish,' the official New China News
Agency quoted Li as saying.
But his speech offered no concrete suggestions for reform and underlined his
determination to maintain the political strait-jacket imposed on China after
the crackdown on pro-democracy protests in 1989. 'Structural transformation
and reform of the economic system must be implemented against a background
of political stability.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11746</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXARAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920423
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 APR 92 / Moslems fight back as Serbs bombard Sarajevo
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURA SILBER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BELGRADE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
STREET-BY-STREET fighting in Sarajevo, capital of Bosnia-Hercegovina,
yesterday was concentrated on the Ilidza district where Moslems attacked
Serbs controlling the area.
Radio Sarajevo said an unknown number of people had been killed and wounded
in the counter-attack against Serb fighters who had infiltrated the district
without any resistance.
The hotel in Ilidza housing 60 European Community ceasefire monitors was
riddled with bullet holes. No injuries were reported but Mr Colm Doyle, an
EC official, said: 'This is mindless violence. Using a hotel with the EC and
journalists in it and a hospital with patients as targets is not
encouraging.'
The United Nations peacekeeping force based in Sarajevo cancelled a press
conference owing to heavy mortar fire in the city. Witnesses said the
Moslem-dominated old town was still under bombardment by Serb forces, but in
some districts a few people ventured out after more than a day in shelters.
Most workers remained at home and schools were closed.
There were conflicting accounts of which side was prevailing. One witness
said: 'By using street battles, Moslem forces appeared to gain the upper
hand on Serbs, who rely on heavy artillery on the hillside above Sarajevo.'
Another witness said: 'It is chaos; it is not clear who is controlling the
situation.'
The Serbian-dominated federal army, however, appeared to be staying outside
the fray in the city of 525,000 inhabitants, 49 per cent of whom are Moslem.
A mission by Lord Carrington, the chairman of the EC's peace conference on
Yugoslavia, is due to go ahead despite the fighting. Mr Doyle said EC
observers had been assured that the political leaders of the three factions
 -Serb, Croat and Moslem - could meet Lord Carrington's party at Sarajevo
airport today.
Several EC countries voiced concern about the escalating violence in Bosnia,
with France calling for swift UN intervention to keep the conflict from
spinning out of control.
Germany vowed that the 'greatest possible international pressure' would be
applied against Serbia to end the bloodshed.
A spokesman for Mr Hans-Dietrich Genscher, the foreign minister, said that
the EC had approved an April 29 deadline for Serbia to stop the fighting or
face international penalties. If the deadline passed with no change in
Bosnia, the EC and the US would confer on what steps to take, he said.
Bosnia's Serbs, who make up 31 per cent of the 4.35m population, are opposed
to independence from Yugoslavia. Moslems and Croats, who represent nearly
two thirds of the population, support independence.
Elsewhere, Sarajevo radio said Serb artillery attacked Bosanska Krupa, in
the north-western Moslem heartland and reported artillery exchanges in the
north-western towns of Derventa and in the mainly Moslem Bihac.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11747</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDXARAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920423
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 APR 92 / World News In Brief: Mexican blast kills 100
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
At least 100 people were killed and up to 600 hurt when gas explosions
ripped through the sewage system in the western Mexican city of Guadalajara.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11748</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDWA1AF1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920423
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 APR 92 / French ports blocked by dockers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
STRIKING dockers occupied 12 French ports yesterday, blocking goods and
stranding passengers bound for Corsica and north Africa, union and port
sources said, Reuter reports from Paris.
The communist-led General Workers Confederation said 97 per cent of the
country's 8,300 dockers heeded its call for a stoppage in protest at
government plans to reform work practices and cut jobs.
Strikers blocked the ports of Marseilles and Bordeaux on Tuesday night. The
stoppage spread to 10 others, including Nantes, Rouen on the river Seine,
and Dunkirk.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11749</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDWA1AF0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920423
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 APR 92 / Commercial Union set to choose new headquarters
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER and VANESSA HOULDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COMMERCIAL UNION, the insurance company whose London headquarters were badly
damaged 10 days ago by an IRA bomb which killed three people, expects to
move into the Cutlers Exchange building which has been empty since it was
finished nearly a year ago.
CU is expected to sign a two-year lease for 46,000 sq ft of the 67,000 sq ft
building in Cutlers Street in the City 'within the next few working days'.
The rent CU is likely to pay, close to the asking price of Pounds 27.50 a sq
ft, reflects a near-halving of City rental prices over the past three years.
Greycoat, the building's developer, said the lease was in solicitors' hands
and it hoped to complete the deal by the weekend.
Some 450 of the 650 staff displaced from the CU tower, who have been working
in branch offices in Croydon and other properties in London, are expected to
move to the new premises by the end of next month.
Mr Richard Owen, one of the CU executives supervising the company's response
to the bomb, said CU would be unable to return for over a year to its head
offices on 10 floors of the CU tower.
Complacent City workers, Page 9
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11750</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDWA1AFZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920423
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  23 APR 92 / UK Economic Indicators
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                       UK ECONOMIC INDICATORS
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
ECONOMIC ACTIVITY - Indices of industrial production, manufacturing
output (1985=100); engineering orders (Pounds billion); retail sales
volume and retail sales value (1985=100); registered unemployment
(excluding school leavers) and unfilled vacancies (000s).
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
               Indl.   Mfg.    Eng.    Retail   Retail   Unem-
               prod.  output  order*    vol.    value*   ployed   Vacs.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
1990
4th qtr.      106.8   115.0    32.9    119.2    170.8    1,770    139.1
1991
1st qtr.      106.6   113.3    31.8    120.1    140.0    1,987    142.9
2nd qtr.      105.2   112.4    31.4    118.7    147.7    2,238    110.9
3rd qtr.      106.4   112.3    31.0    119.7    149.8    2,417    105.7
4th qtr.      106.1   110.9    30.0    119.6    177.6    2,513    112.4
March         107.1   113.0    31.8    122.6    144.1    2,091    141.5
April         104.3   112.4    32.1    118.4    148.3    2,174    121.8
May           104.1   112.3    31.7    117.8    146.3    2,241    109.3
June          107.3   112.5    31.4    119.7    148.4    2,300    101.5
July          107.4   113.3    31.9    120.3    152.6    2,369    104.0
August        105.7   112.1    32.0    119.4    147.9    2,425    106.6
September     105.9   111.7    31.0    119.4    149.0    2,457    106.5
October       106.6   110.9    31.0    119.2    153.5    2,474    103.5
November      106.1   111.1    30.9    120.4    169.0    2,515    109.7
December      105.7   110.7    29.9    119.3    203.8    2,551    123.7
1992
1st qtr.                                                 2,635    124.6
January       104.3   109.9    31.4    119.7    146.0    2,607    122.0
February      105.5   111.1            120.2    145.0    2,647    124.3
March                                                    2,652    127.5
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
OUTPUT - By market sector; consumer goods, investment goods,
intermediate goods (materials and fuels), engineering output, metal
manufacture, textiles, clothing and footwear (1985=100); housing starts
(000s, monthly average).
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
           Cnsmer.   Invest.   Intmd.   Eng.   Metal   Textiles   Housg.
            goods    goods     goods   output  mnfg.      etc.   Starts*
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
1990
4th qtr.   112.0     117.1     101.0   115.9   116.1     92.6     11.4
1991
1st qtr.   110.2     117.0     101.4   113.8   110.1     89.2     12.3
2nd qtr.   109.8     114.8      99.9   111.6   110.1     87.8     14.3
3rd qtr.   109.6     114.1     102.3   110.4   110.9     87.5     14.3
4th qtr.   109.0     111.9     102.9   108.1   110.0     86.1     11.8
March      110.5     116.0     102.6   113.0   112.0     89.0     14.1
April      110.0     115.0      98.1   112.0   108.0     88.0     14.1
May        109.8     114.8      97.9   112.0   110.0     87.0     14.9
June       109.7     114.7     103.7   111.0   112.0     88.0     13.9
July       110.8     115.4     103.2   112.0   111.0     88.0     16.0
August     108.6     114.1     101.6   110.0   112.0     88.0     13.4
September  109.4     112.7     102.1   109.0   110.0     87.0     13.6
October    109.3     111.0     103.9   108.0   110.0     86.0     14.1
November   108.3     113.1     102.7   109.0   111.0     86.0     12.0
December   109.3     111.4     102.1   108.0   109.0     86.0      9.3
1992
January    109.3     109.3     100.5   106.0   108.0     86.0     13.8
February   110.3     109.5     102.0   108.0   111.0     87.0     12.0
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
EXTERNAL TRADE - Indices of export and import volume (1985=100); visible
balance (Pounds m); current balance (Pounds m); oil balance (Pounds m);
terms of trade (1985=100); official reserves.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
          Export  Import  Visible  Current    Oil   Terms of  Reserves
          volume  volume  balance  balance  balance  trade* USDollars bn
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
1990
4th qtr.   125.1  137.8   -3,161   -2,261    +315    100.2     38.46
1991
1st qtr.  123.5   136.2   -3,017   -2,304    +213     98.8     42.33
2nd qtr.  127.0   137.9   -2,204     -208    +209     98.1     44.26
3rd qtr.  128.5   139.9   -2,340   -1,246    +315     97.9     44.59
4th qtr.  129.0   139.5   -2,558    - 642    +481     97.4     44.13
March     128.3   137.7     -883     -645    +180     98.3     42.33
April     124.5   138.5     -874     -209     +31     98.2     43.59
May       124.0   136.8     -941     -275     +64     98.0     43.71
June      132.4   136.3     -389     +276    +114     98.0     44.26
July      127.8   138.9     -626     -261     +35     97.8     44.63
August    131.6   144.9     -827     -463     +57     98.1     44.69
September 126.1   136.0     -887     -522    +223     97.8     44.59
October   126.2   137.6     -890     -251    +110     97.6     44.25
November  128.5   139.5     -959     -321    +176     97.7     43.91
December  132.2   141.3     -709      -70    +195     97.0     44.13
1992
January   121.8   137.2   -1,158     -858    +155     98.9     44.59
February  131.4   148.6   -1,050     -750    +114     99.9     44.75
March                                                          44.31
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FINANCIAL - Money supply M0, M2 and M4 (annual percentage change);bank
sterling lending to private sector; building societies' net inflow;
consumer credit**; Clearing Bank base rate (end period).
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                    Bank        BS      Cnsmer.    Base
                 MO   M2    M4     lending    inflow*   credit**   rate
                  %    %     %     Pounds m   Pounds m  Pounds m    %
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
1990
4th qtr.        3.4   8.1  13.7    +15,097     1,210      +736    14.00
1991
1st qtr.        2.9  10.5  10.6    +10,232     2,085      +335    12.50
2nd qtr.        1.7  11.8   8.9     +9,275     2,555      +312    11.50
3rd qtr.        2.1  11.4   7.1     +6,520       739       +26    10.50
4th qtr.        2.8  10.1   6.1     +7,460       426      -304    10.50
March           2.5  10.8   9.9     +1,941       543      +161    12.50
April           1.5  11.3   9.7     +4,426     1,337      +329    12.00
May             1.6  12.0   9.3     +2,798       774       -37    11.50
June            1.9  12.1   7.8     +2,051       444       +20    11.50
July            2.2  11.3   7.7     +3,375       286      +165    11.00
August          1.6  11.9   7.1     +2,180       188       -46    11.00
September       2.4  11.1   6.5       +965       265       -93    10.50
October         2.6  10.6   6.4       +936       529       -73    10.50
November        2.9  10.3   5.6     +5,427       -49       -34    10.50
December        2.8   9.4   6.2     +1,097       -54      -197    10.50
1992
1st qtr.        2.2   7.6   6.0     +2,953                        10.50
January         2.2   7.8   6.3     +3,663       293       -62    10.50
February        2.2   7.5   6.0       +285       145       +13    10.50
March           2.2   7.5   5.6       -500                        10.50
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
INFLATION - Indices of earnings (1988=100); basic materials and fuels;
wholesale prices of manufactured products (1985=100); retail prices and
food prices (Jan 1987=100); Reuters commodity index (Sept 18th 1931
=100); trade weighted value of sterling (1985=100)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
             Earn-  Basic   Whsale.                   Reuters
             ings   matls.*  mnfg.*   RPI*   Foods*   cmdty.*  Sterling*
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
1990
4th qtr.    123.5   103.7   128.2    130.1   121.3     1,721     94.1
1991
1st qtr.    126.0   103.0   130.6    130.8   123.9     1,689     93.8
2nd qtr.    128.1   103.4   133.1    133.6   126.1     1,737     91.4
3rd qtr.    130.8   101.5   133.9    134.2   125.7     1,680     90.7
4th qtr.    132.5   102.5   134.6    135.5   126.5     1,625     90.9
March       126.5   102.4   131.4    131.4   124.4     1,715     92.9
April       127.5   103.6   132.8    133.1   125.9     1,737     92.3
May         128.4   103.5   133.2    133.5   125.6     1,721     91.7
June        128.5   103.2   133.3    134.1   126.9     1,754     90.2
July        129.1   102.5   133.6    133.8   125.3     1,721     90.3
August      131.5   101.1   133.9    134.1   126.4     1,662     90.7
September   131.7   101.0   134.1    134.6   125.4     1,655     91.0
October     132.0   101.5   134.3    135.1   125.6     1,635     90.5
November    133.0   102.6   134.7    135.6   126.8     1,631     91.0
December    132.3   103.4   134.8    135.7   127.2     1,609     91.2
1992
1st qtr.    103.0   136.4   136.2    129.0   1,509               90.6
January     134.0   103.2   135.8    135.6   128.4     1,596     90.8
February    135.6   103.2   136.2    136.3   129.1     1,586     90.9
March       102.5   137.3   136.7    129.4             1,615     90.1
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
*Not seasonally adjusted
**Net changes in amounts outstanding, excluding bank loans.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
